title,selftext,subreddit
[xMODx] Updated Seddit Rules / Posting Guidelines ,"**Edit: Get this to #1 spot guys!**

##Rules / Guidelines
***

The primary focus of Seddit (/r/seduction) is the study of human seduction. Mainly, how to integrate specific seduction and self-improvement techniques into our long-term personalities and how to succeed at forming successful romantic relationships.

While the discussions within Seddit focus primarily on the male seduction of females, most techniques and information referenced may be flexibly utilized in all types of relationships. Male --&gt; female will be assumed in examples below. 

When evaluating if a post is appropriate, the golden rule is to ask yourself: *""Does this post help guys meet women?""* 

##Appropriate Topics
***

### * FR's

Great field reports focus on the **techniques, mindsets and phrases** you
 specifically used that changed the course of the night to being successful.
If FR is a failure, then be sure you can point out specifically what would 
have turned it into a success. 
A good FR says *""This is what I did, and why it worked""*. 

While we appreciate functional Field Reports, often users post what are
essentially diaries, giving a rundown of the night without any focus on
actual techniques used. For instance:

| I went to the starbucks today, and smiled at cashier, but got too nervous to say anything so I just left.

This doesn't do anything to help guys meet women. Share positive value with
the community, this keeps the sub filled with useful material! Begin your FR with a topic starting with '**[FR]**'

### * Links to Articles / Videos
There are tons of great blogs, vlogs, podcast, forums, and articles about
seduction, and we love to stay up to date on what is out there in the
community. Post these if you find them useful!

However, if the video is more about fun (like approaching while holding a
dildo), it might be removed because it isn't a good example of actually
helping guys meet women. Also, videos of friendzoned guys or guys bad at
pickup might not be allowed if they violate the golden rule of ""Does this
help guys meet women?""

### * Sharing Techniques
If you have come up with your own techniques, **SHARE THEM!!!**. We rely on
the community for new approaches and ideas, just make sure they are field
tested with at least 20 approaches.


### * Asking specific questions, intermediate and above
While the subreddit can become clogged with questions like ""How do I approach"" or ""How do I kiss a girl?"", more advanced topics can provide a rich discussion. Examples:

* How do I juggle multiple women?
* How do I bounce women within first 45 minutes to my place?
* Best way to arrange a threesome?
* Struggling with a specific aspect of inner-game
* Advanced Linguistic Techniques (NLP)

##Common Inappropriate Posts
***

### * Overly Broad / Beginner Topics
Things like:

* How do I approach
* How do I get a number
* I'm in college, how do I talk to girls
* How to kiss a girl

Without specifics, there is not much help we can give than ""Read the
sidebar"". The sidebar and beginner materials covers the basics from how to
meet a stranger, get her number, get a day2 and attract / seduce her to the
bedroom. This basic sequence does not need constant discussion. **tl;dr RTFM**

### * Physical Limitation
Great guide on [**Why Looks Don't Matter**](http://redd.it/yhna6). This is an
answered question, proven over and over. No need to re-ask it.

### * Will this work for me? Depressed / Awkward
Short answer: **YES!!!**

Many of the guys that have transformed their lives started as some of the
most awkward, FA people you have ever met. While this is not substitute for
professional psychiatric help (and if that is the case, you should start
there), practically any guy capable of communicating with others should be
able to put this to use. 

Study the sidebar and beginner text, and if you are strugggling after 3
months of serious work, then you can post about what specifically isn't
working. Don't make a post until you've put in the foundational reading and work in. 

### * Asking for Advice
Any calls for specific situational advice with a specific female should be
directed to /r/askSeddit. Note that is ask**SEDDIT**, not ask**REDDIT**.

It exists to give you a place where sedditors can answer your questions
without bogging down the frontpage of /r/seduction. 

The problem with these topics is they are specific to **YOUR** situation,
while broad pickup topics are applicable to **EVERY** guys situation. We have
80,000 readers, and focus of sub is to help everyone.  

### * Rage Comics / Failure links
In short, things like rage comics, stuff about FA guys or friendzoned losers
are not appropriate, and will be deleted. Simply making fun of the community
or guys that aren't good with women does nothing to **HELP** guys with women. 

### * Commercial Advertisement 

Seddit is not an advertisement forum, and any information posted should be aimed at helping progress our member's abilities in the arts of seduction. A specific reason why the link is helpful to sedditors should be accompanied in the post or in a comment.

Links should be made to actual content, rather than advertising a book or simple a website's homepage. Any blatant advertisement of products that cost money without prior approval from moderators can be met with deletion.

##Comment specific rules
***

Attacking (flaming) any member will get either a warning or a ban at the moderators discretion. Calling any member a rapist, insinuating anything negative about their character because they practice seduction, or just plain name calling are all forbidden.

If you think the post isn't helpful, then report it to the moderators. Do not go in and call the OP names. 

##Celebrity / Industry AMA
***

Please contact and schedule these through moderators. We maintain a numbered list of Official AMA's, and for inclusion you must schedule with moderators. Furthermore, AMA are often the source of flaming and attacks from hostile subreddits, so we schedule moderators to be online for the AMA to control these. If these are not scheduled through the mod team and these attacks occur, the entire thread might get removed.

All AMA's must follow the reddit standard:

* Questions are answered in real time, not hours later. Make the AMA **when you will be at the keyboard**.
* Questions must be answered on reddit, in the thread. Not youtube, not on a blog.
* Be prepared to answer any question, not just commercial ones.
* Have fun!",seduction
Killing Your Ego: The #1 Trick To Solve Your Approach Anxiety,"Your ego is the voice in your head arguing that you’re a certain type of person. Ignoring this voice is the best thing you can do for your game. 

Below, I’ll explain why the ego is so dangerous and suggest four methods to help you murder it. 

# The ego acts like your friend  

One of the most common - yet most damaging - messages the ego will replay to you is:  

*“You’re a cool guy who doesn’t look stupid, doesn’t fail at things and doesn’t embarrass himself.”* 

It’s so comforting to listen to that voice - and it will play all sorts of tricks to talk you out of proving it wrong. 

However, the ego is not your friend

In fact, **the #1 thing you can do to improve your game is toss your ego in the trash** 

After all: 

* It’s your ego that stops you opening when you’re not ‘in state’
* It’s your ego that stops you opening in front of a group of strangers.
* It’s your ego that stops you building social momentum through mass approaching.
* It’s your ego that stops you re-approaching.
* It’s your ego that stops you trying to pull when the set is going OK.
* It’s your ego that makes you avoid all awkward situations.

In fact, all forms of approach anxiety are 100% ego-based. 

Failing to take action in these situations stems from your ego not wanting you to look stupid, fail or embarrass yourself.

That’s all it will ever want from you.

It’ll create some incredible rationalisations to protect this ‘cool guy’ image too. 

*“You’re not the sort of guy who runs after a woman.”* 

*“You’re too cool for warm-up sets.”*

*“You’re too cool to reapproach.”*

*“You’re too good to risk getting tooled by guys in a mixed set.”* 

*“You’re better than these ‘club girls’ anyway.”*

Hands up who has convinced themselves this before? 

This is a cleverly disguised form of approach anxiety. It’ll have you leaving the club alone again and again, albeit with your ego intact. 

Fuck that!

Surely you’d rather ignore your ego and go home with a beautiful woman? 

# How to kill your ego 

Now, you understand *why* you want to kill your ego, here are four ideas for *how* to do it.

**1. Meditate** 

Meditating is one of the most effective methods to quieten the unhelpful thoughts in your mind, and focus on the present moment.  

**2. Try new things** 

Your ego would love you to rest on your laurels and only try activities you’re good at. Of course, if you do that, you never grow or become better at anything. 

Fuck that!

Instead, try new things, fail, embarrass yourself.

In game, that means opening difficult sets. It means staying in set when you don’t know what to do . It means going after the ‘9s and 10s’ instead of the girls you feel comfortable speaking to.

Maybe you’ll mess these up, but it’ll show you that messing up isn’t a big deal. You’ll become numb to the ego damage associated with failure. That’s a key quality for improving your game. 

What’s more, you’ll become better at opening those difficult sets, the more you practice. 

**3. Hang around with people who are better than you** 

Your ego would love for you to hang with people that never get laid. This confirms its constant message that you’re the best - even if you only get laid once a month off Tinder - and you don’t need to do anything to improve yourself. 

Fuck that!

Hang out with guys that are more fun, more charismatic and get more girls than you. It will feel uncomfortable, but it’ll also inspire you to rise up to their level. 

You’re the average of the five people you spend the most time with. 

(This step is great advice for entrepreneurs. Many make the mistake of only hanging out with employees or business owners who make less than them. This might make them feel really cool and successful, but they’ll never be inspired to elevate their business to the next level.)   

**4. Ask for help**

Your ego will tell you not to ask anyone for help with anything. It’ll say you’re smart enough to figure it out on your own. 

Fuck that!

(I’d say the majority of ‘lurkers’ on this forum have never asked a question here for the same reason) 

In all elements of life (business, fitness, game etc), there will be someone that’s better than you. Seek them out and learn from them!

Even if your wingman gets less girls than you, there’s probably at least one part of their game you can learn from. So ask them! Don’t be too proud. 

# The bottom line

If you’re doing pick-up properly, you’ll be killing your ego every day by exposing yourself to the possibility of rejection. That’s awesome.  

Be aware that whenever your brain talks you out of approaching, that’s the ego speaking.

The ego isn’t you. It’s a deeply unhelpful voice in your head. The best thing you can do to improve your game is kill it. 

***I’ve co-launched a Telegram group for men who want to become incredible with women. Hundreds of guys sharing their success stories and getting advice on their sticking points. A real brotherhood. Drop me a PM with your Telegram handle if you’d like to join***",seduction
Is it a good idea to cold approach random girls in my college cafeteria?,Hey guy I am thinking about doing cold approaches in my college cafeteria will this be a good idea? ,seduction
Girls say I’m nice looking but slow and without initiative,"Girls I try to hang out with say I’m too slow to notice any flirting attempt, and that I have no initiative.
They say that even though I’m not ugly and some even say I’m good looking they say that I’m too slow 
Truth is, I’m always so ashamed to go and talk to a girl.
Most of my dates/nightclubs stands were either from tinder or friend that talked with the girl.
How do I get faster and with more initiative. ",seduction
SOS!!! What should I do with this girl?????,"Hi boys, two weeks ago we were drinking with my gang and a friend bring his bestfriend. She said she's writing movie and art critics in colleges newspaper. So we had an intense philosophical conversation about movies. Btw I love movies, I know so much about them. Anyway she left and I didn't hit on her for the whole chat because before she came my friend told me she always dated with muscular guys and I'm not fat but not fit either. So after she left my friend told me I was doing really good but it's not gonna happen because it's she. For two weeks I only talk with her twice because I only saw her two times and I am not sure if I wanna go over it. My friend knows her for seven years but even he tells me to try my luck. He told me that she's always saying looking for a guy like me but always dating with the muscular idiots. If she don't like the body of the guy she's seeing him as genderless he said. So what do you think fellows? Should I go over it and  if I do what do you suggest me to do? ",seduction
The Art Of Writing Field Reports,,seduction
"We connected, but she left me on read?","So I'm a college senior and I met this girl in one of my classes the other day. We didn't really talk much until the very end of the course, and then I hit her up once or twice cause I thought she was pretty cool &amp; attractive. 

I teased her in person, on Insta sometimes, we chatted and it seemed like she was pretty great. We even met up at a party during the weekend for a quick minute or two. I didn't really think too much of it. 

Then she commented on my Instagram picture with a couple of hearts and I took this to mean she liked me to some degree. I hit her up and made some small talk, followed by asking her how the week was looking and if she had any plans for the weekend. Aaand then I was left on read. 

Anyone care to explain what's going on/give their thoughts on the matter? I feel like she would be worth further pursuit but I can only handle so many games..",seduction
Hooking up with girls in clubs?,"Heya!

&amp;#x200B;

First of all i would like to start with saying that i dont really know why I am writing this post - just looking for an advice or end up finding that there is something wrong with me?

&amp;#x200B;

A little bit about myself: I am 25 years old Bulgarian chap currently living in Birstol, United Kingdom for 2+ years. Before I move to UK my look was horrible and my self esteem was really low ... Like 6ft under the ground low. I used to be overweight and fat all my life - Basically I used to be the ""fat kid"" in my class.... Growing up during my teenage years I never managed to get myself a girlfriend or hook up with girls / flirt with girls at parties/clubs due to my horrible look. Also i never had a relationship nor 1 night stands. Once I moved to UK it was time for a new begining - Started going to the gym and had a strict diet. I managed to lose 6.5 stones of my weight in about an year and I looked much better. Started getting fashionable ""fuckboy"" haircuts and grooming/shaping my beard often. In the end all of the above helped me to drasticly improve my self esteem.

At some point I decided it is time to start going out to clubs... In the begining I didnt think about hooking up with girls - just wanted to have few drinks and listen to the music I enjoy - drum and base/ electronic music / trap. First couple of times clubbing I notied that few different girls were looking at me while dancing and they were slowly getting closer to me but i didnt bother talking to flirt / talk with them as i thought that this can't be real and I am just being selfish....Third time I went out there was a girl dancing around me and staring at me all night. In the middle of the night i started looking back at her right into her eyes and at some point just made a sign with my hands pointing the empty space on the dancefloor infront of me - she immediately moved infront of me and started dancing with me. Five minutes later she was pushing her ass against my male parts... At this point i was over the moon thinking - WTF I REALLY ATTRACT GIRLS?!?! So we danced for about half an hour like this and I grew some balls and asked her whats her name. She said her names is XXXXX and she asked me about mine. When I told her my name she just looked at me and went away - Dont want to sound racist but I think she didnt fancy the fact that I am not English :D.....A week later I went to a big rave and the same happened again - this time the girls didnt mind my name and she literally started touching my male parts and pushing my arm agains her private parts. We talked a little bit and at some point she told me - Come with me to the toilet... She wanted to give me a BJ right there but I refused and told her its better if we got back to mine/hers for the night. In the end we ended up going back and spending the night at her place.... After this night my self esteem was over the moon....I started going out at least 2 Saturday nights a month hoping for the same to happen....

Well turns out it never happaned again but here is what always happens when I go out:

I get into the club with my mate. Have couple of drinks and start dancing. Every time on the dance floor i notice at least 3-4 different girls a night staring at me and getting closer and closer to me. Sometimes I go out to the smoking area to have a quick cigarette or to another room of the club / another area of the big room and there they are - same girl from the previous room/area dancing near me and lookin at me... Most of the nights at least 2 girls tend to give me a few intentional ""pushes"" with their elbow / asses...

&amp;#x200B;

The problem is that I am always too scared/shy to talk to these girls like my life is at stake and I will loose everything in the world... Lot of times had girls shaking their heads with funny faces while looking at me and walking away after giving me few pushesh and dancing around me for 15-20 minutes without me giving them any attention....

&amp;#x200B;

Anyone of you had a problem like this? Can you please give me an advise how to overcome my ""shyness""? I would also like to hear the female point of view :)

&amp;#x200B;

Thank you !

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
Student Day Game Pick-up During Bootcamp - Infield Coaching Examples,,seduction
London nightgame venue suggestions?,For a 19 year old tourist ,seduction
"I can talk to practically anyone about dumb stuff, how to I train myself to talk about stuff that will be more seductive than just common banter?",,seduction
Just got ghosted after a great interaction... What went wrong?,"So on a random Saturday night at the bar. Couple days before halloween We were having a good time, and I opened this girl. She turned out very receptive. Long story short, I did some game, push pulls, wasn't afraid to disqualify her, tease her.

In the end, she actually closed for my number. And snapchat as well. And we chatted for over 2 hours. Eventually she had to get back to her friends. However she lost track of her friends. We walked out the venue together, and I pretty much chatted with her until her friends showed up. She was in a town an hour away, but got a hotel with her friends. It wasn't very possible to pull that night due to her friends. I eventually hugged/kissed her good night and said we'll be in touch.

The next day, texted a little. She seemed very receptive at first. I then said, alright have a good one. DM me when you're in town. That was it. And later the day, she blocked me on snap. I confronted her about it, and she blocked my number.

That was a pretty good set that night. And I was suspecting maybe she was drunk, but we had quite some intellectual conversation, things that usually don't happen in a club scene. I'm trying to figure out what exactly went wrong.

Thanks!",seduction
Advice Needed,I met up with a girl on Sunday from Tinder. The date went really well. We sat and talked for three hours straight about many different topics. When should I ask her out again? I am living in Japan if that helps. Please give me some tips. I do not want to seem needy as I have limited experience with Japanese girls.,seduction
How to engage with a girl who just went through break up?,"There is this one girl who flaked the first time I asked her out. After a few tries, she told me she just went through a break up not sure if she's ready to see someone else.   
I didn't think it is a big deal and I told her it is ok to have a past. I am not trying to change who she is and force her to forget someone. Eventually, we went out. I think the date is amazing and we set up a second date before we said goodbye  
The day before our scheduled second date, she texted me saying she still doesn't think she's ready to date yet. I didn't respond this time because I know she needs time to go through the emotions. I can try to persuade her, but I know logic is not going to help her   
I am planning to re-engage her after a week or two. I know this is the right thing to do. I don't want to give up yet just because she's pretty amazing when we went out.   
Now the question is how I should engage her again after a few days to a week? ",seduction
How should I react to this?,"First a little bit of background:

This is the first time I've actually asked a girl out. I've been stressing over her for the past month or so, and then I just decided fuck it. We knew each other for about a month or two and at first I was convinced she was attracted to me, everything she did pointed at it, but I didn't take action when I should, so that's on me. In last week or two, I sense a disconnection from her, like she's leaving(only thing to do, imo, since she figured I would never ask her out). I started thinking about it, and decided since she's getting over me(if she didn't already), and I have nothing to lose, so I just texted her.

I simply asked ""Wanna grab coffee?"", I say when and where, she says how she's busy. Alright, let's reschedule. I set up a different time and location, and she answers with ""hahahaha why tho?"" and I said honestly how I think she's a cool person and how I want to get to know her better. After a while I get a notification, and all she said is ""Nah.""

Alright cool, she doesn't want to go, I probably misunderstood her signals, whatever.

So the next day, I notice somethings happening with her friends. So I assumed she showed them our convo, now at this point, I'm still cool with whatever happened, like I thought she liked me, I was wrong, let's move on right?

I'm talking with my friends and this dude(close friend of hers) comes up to me and asks me this ""Hey Moonshot\_\_ I want to get to know you, lets go for a coffee"", leaving laughing. Basically I was right, she did show everyone our convo, and it could potentially ruin my reputation.

In a couple of days her friends, her and I will have to be in the same room together(reason doesn't matter), and I am sure they'll try to do some shady shit.

I was cool with her rejecting me, but this shit pisses me off, best way to maintain frame?",seduction
Game comes naturally with girls i dont find all that attractive?,"I've noticed myself having way more success with girls I'm not that interested in hooking up with, like it just comes super naturally compared to girls i really wanna hook up with. Any advice for this?",seduction
Is it OK to be jealous or controlling if a dude asks to take your girl home? Would you let a dude buy your GF drinks?,"I tried posting in relationships but was removed so I will try here...

This weekend my GF and I attended a Halloween party at a bar. Prior to this day, we had spoken about boundaries regarding dancing or talking with other people when we go out. And whether it's OK. We playfully joked around about it being ""hot"" to watch us grind on other people, etc; So, we agreed and allowed that dancing was OK, but obviously nothing over the top.

&amp;#x200B;

Anyway, one thing we did not talk about was accepting drinks or anything drink related...

&amp;#x200B;

 As much as I want to be cool and alpha watching my GF grind with some other dude..talking about things and executing are different. Especially with drinks involved (I was intoxicated).  So...fast forward to the party. So my GF was dressed ""half naked"" (her words) and of course was getting a lot of attention and eyes on her. She is one of those girls who loves attention FYI and is always trying to dress to impress. Which is fine, I'm not controlling or crazy or anything. So we're at the bar...and At one point, she asks me to go get her makeup from the car in order to touch up her lipstick or something. So I did. I went outside to get it and amazingly by the time I got back in (5 min?), there was already a guy talking to my GF, and by that time he had already ordered her a drink too, which she accepted and was sipping on. Immediately I feel a bit awkward but I know I should not, so I sit down next to them ( she saved my seat, at first I was going to stand and let them converse) but she introduces me and insists I sit. I don't remember what happened next but the guy moves away from the bar , maybe a couple feet behind us, he is with a couple friends, and so my GF and I continue our night. I am fine with the fact that other dudes are going to hit on my GF, But later things change a bit and I come to some realizations...

so.. a couple minutes go by..and A song comes on, and my GF starts dancing in her chair, really provocatively. She has on a very revealing costume FYI so thinking back, I feel ""she knows what she was doing"" yet in the moment I did not have this thought process. Just so happens to be that the guy who bought her a drink is directly behind her chair. So of course, he is intrigued and she succeeds (if that's what she purposely was doing?) at getting his attention. So the guy asks her for a dance while I' minding my own business pretending that I am oblivious to whats going on. She then asks me if its OK to dance with the guy, and I nod without much care (pretending not to care). While they are dancing I start to feel a bit awkward given the fact that I am alone at the bar saving her seat while she is dancing. I remember at one point a friend of hers is at the other end of the bar looking at me, probably with pity, because I did feel and probably look quite awkward.

&amp;#x200B;

So the song/dance ends and she comes back to the seat, and i'm thinking ""ok cool, it's normal to be jealous but hey everything is fine""

&amp;#x200B;

This is when everything changes.  My GF denies saying it but I swear she tells me that the guy ""asked if he can take her home"". I laugh/smile awkwardly and pretend it doesn't bother me but I start fuming inside. The night continues and I don't express my discontent to her but I feel awfully disrespected, not by my GF per se, but by the guy, since I feel like guys don't respect my presence at all (I am a happy go lucky, skinny, goof ball), and yeah I think that comes from some insecurity as well.

&amp;#x200B;

Any so yes i'm a little furious, maybe due to child hood stuff and self esteem problems but I don't show it and keep my cool the entire night up until the guy makes another advance.  So..later on... My GF gets up to go to the bathroom...and on her way out, the guy starts talking to her again (or maybe she starts talking to him)? and I feel the need to go over and respectfully put my arm in front of him , on him, to ""whisk"" him away and let it be known that he's crossing the line. Between asking my GF practically right in front of me if he can take her home and now he is continuing to pursue her...not cool.

&amp;#x200B;

So...that's that. so my GF and I continue and ask for the bill and leave the bar. Not surprisingly, the drink the guy ordered for my GF is on my tab..but I don't say anything because I expected it and what kind of a fool is going to argue paying a drink that his GF accepted from another dude...seems kind of pathetic. So I pay it..and we leave.

&amp;#x200B;

We end up going to a diner and my GF makes some sort of comment. I'm boiling a bit and feeling upset that I had to feel confrontational at the bar ,  so I feel like I need to express myself and let it be know of a new ""rule/boundary"" so I tell her ""from now on, don't accept drinks from other guys, I realize it's not OK and can lead to problems. On top of that, I had to pay for the drink. Guys only buy girls drinks for one reason . Please don't put me in a position where I have to do anything confrontational"".

&amp;#x200B;

She says she didn't do anything wrong and that I was being a dick. I tell her that prior to the night I had not yet realized that 99% of the time, a guy buying a drink for a girl, and her accepting it, is an invitation for the guy to pursue her (case in point what happened at the bar). Not to mention her questionable behavior and indirectly seducing(??) him for a dance. FYI she did not even dance with me at the bar.

&amp;#x200B;

I then told her ""plus he said he wanted to take you home...what am I supposed to do""?

&amp;#x200B;

My GF then says with a slight attitude .. ""WHOA....he didn't say that, you're crazy and making stuff up in your head! that's your insecurity talking! and fine no drinks...but why are you being so insecure? why didn't you say anything about the drink after you saw the tab? You are a coward!  ""

&amp;#x200B;

So she immediately denies telling me that the guy had asked to take her home (FYI my GF has a history of telling me/exaggerating things pertaining to other guys in order to make me jealous or gauge/test my reaction. ) I immediately think...B.S. you are lying, either about what he said or now in denying that he said anything. Usually I wouldn't call her a liar and would just say ""sorry! I am so sorry I heard otherwise"" but the drunken version of me said ""dude..don't be a fool. why would you hear something so innacurate?""

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

I then say...believing that my GF is challenging my ""manhood"" or whatever and since i'm a ""nice guy"", ""OK, since you feel that way that I am a coward, I will go say something now !"" (the bar is 5 minutes from the diner) . I demand the key to the car, she objects, I tell her how I feel hoping we can compromise, She then says something along the lines of ""if you don't like it, then leave me!"" I tell her I will leave her in a split second if need be, so she probably thinking that I am bluffing and am not serious or maybe too weak toactually do it, doesn't attempt to reassure me, so I get in the car and leave secretly hoping she would apologize for calling me a coward or insecure, drive back to bar, and march back to the bartender and tell them I was overcharged. Meanwhile, the whole time my GF is texting me ""I cant believe you left me here, alone, half naked! How could you leave your girl . Aren't you supposed to protect me? you are sick. I hate you! You know I get anxiety when left alone!"" etc;

Anyway, I handle it, go back to the diner, and she's upset. 

FYI my GF was once drugged and taken advantage of (guy slipped a rufee in her drink). So...that's why she was spazzzing out, or claiming to spazz out in order to manipulate the situation. she tried to say that I was ""triggering her"" by leaving her in a diner for 10-15 min, yet earlier in the night she was accepting drinks from strangers the second I left her sight. So on the way home I tell her this . ""if you are so affected about being drugged in the past and have so much anxiety and want to make me feel bad by saying I am not a protector/etc;, then why are you engaging in conversation with strangers and accepting drinks?""   she has no response of course.

&amp;#x200B;

We go home, she cries the whole night in a separate room, claiming she is leaving me.

&amp;#x200B;

Next day...I apologize for leaving her and reacting too strongly but stick to my guns for the most part and she actually apologizes much more, which is unheard of. Amazingly she seems much kinder to me throughout the whole day (she is usually bitchy and a bit condescending) and I actually feel a new sense of respect.

&amp;#x200B;

So...did I do the proper thing or am I in the hole?

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
Negative reaction to push pull lines.,"I was wondering, when you throw out some push pull line, like for example.

""Stop looking at me like that i'm not a piece of meat.""

and the girl laughs but makes sure to tell you that she was not looking at you like that (instead of just playing along), or maybe she doesnt even laugh at all.

I will usually smirk and say ""sure you weren't""

But still it makes me doubt where i stand, how do i read this feedback?

Should i ease up a bit afterwards with the cocky funny comments and or the intent showing, aswel as the kino. ?

It feels like some sort of mini rejection and to be honest it makes me just a little insecure to a point where its hard to continue and assume "" she wants me"".

I actually run into similar situations a lot.

Thoughts?",seduction
Looking for books,"As said in the tittle, I'm looking for the ""best"" read for self confidence etc..

What would you guys recommande ?

Thanks :)",seduction
Any LA area peeps. I’m from Long Beach and looking to get a group together to day or night game,,seduction
[FR] A Newbie's First Lay Report,"So first of all, I knew about game for some years but never really actually took proper action.
This year I decided to change my life and moved from my a small town to Berlin with my two best friends. 
I was looking forward to meeting girls and trying out cold approach. 

Me and my flatmate went to a thrift store last week and I ""approached"" this cute and beautiful brunette. I just asked her for an opinion about a ridiculous item I found and we just started vibing. I was making her chase a little bit by making fun of her outfit. We smalltalked for a few minutes and I got her number. Texted her later this evening and we started texting back and forth a little. 

Essentially she invited me to go grab some dinner two days later and so I did. 
We met pretty late and went for some food. The vibe was chill, not very sexual but I established a man to woman frame by strong eye contact and leading in numerous occasions. We went straight to the Subway after dinner because it was late already and cold outside. After evaluating the logistics (we were far from my place and she had to work in the morning) I decided to just go home. 

Two days later we met up again and I invited her for a late night walk in a park not far from my flat. I took a bottle of vine and we sat down at a bench. I started to sexualize our conversation and as we were getting a little bit tipsy together I really enjoyed her company. 
By this point my plan was to pull her to my flat and so I decided to offer her a cup of tee because it was starting to get very cold. We went to my place, drank some tea and listened to some music. I knew that she liked to smoke weed every now and then so I asked her to join me for a smoke and went to my room with her. We listened to some music (""Put that on my set"" by Asap Rocky and Sketpa) and she started cuddling/ escalating on me a little bit. I finished the joint and started making out with her and everything just went from there, no last minute resistance, no shit tests no nothing. 

 I'm still amazed by how smooth everything went and super thankful for this experience! 

Hope I did okay on my first Field Report :-) 
",seduction
"I asked girl to go out with me, now What?","Hi!

Sooo, I got drunk on Saturday and i sent mesage to a girl I used to like in primary school. I was asking her out for a dinner and she said yes, normally I wouldn’t do this in the first place but I’m international student and I’m not coming home still for a month. Any suggestions on how to keep her interesting during that month?

Thank you!",seduction
Is it bad to use emojis with texting?,"My buddy who hooks up with lots of girls says using emojis comes off as more in the way a girl or child would text and doesn't present you as manly.

I don't go crazy with them but I do like to use them. I feel like I like to express my personality better through them. What are your guys thoughts on this?",seduction
"""Everything you've ever wanted is on the other side of fear""","*I posted this in another subreddit, I got good feedback from it so I thought i'd toss it in here too.*

popped an addy one day before school, what resulted was a deep reflection on what made me scared. I like to use adderall to think, and it seems to never fail. This is what I came up with:

* Fear is the only thing standing in the way of anything.
* You must face your fear in order to eradicate it, there are no secret tricks to making your fear go away, you have to do the thing you are afraid of.
* You need to get out of your comfort zone every single day.
* If you do not face your fears, you will get angry with yourself and spiral downwards

**My particular fears currently are: Public speaking, talking to groups of attractive girls, expressing myself fully, being as assertive as I want to be.**

""Each of us must confront our own fears, must come face to face with them. How we handle our fears will determine where we go with the rest of our lives. To experience adventure or to be limited by the fear of it.""--Judy Blume

One of the big reasons why people pussy out is because they can't seem to get rid of the fear that they are feeling. The more they try to calm themselves down, the more it grows. The racing heart, the sweaty palms, shaky voice, inability to articulate your words. Truth be told, that won't go away anytime soon, and theres nothing you can do about it.

Theres no secret trick to mitigating your fear and anxiety, you need to embrace it and **BASK** **IN THE FEELING OF FEAR**. Realize that you can't get rid of it, enjoy the process of it being there and just try your best to function with it.

You need to make yourself **VULNERABLE** and willing to look ridiculous in front of people. Those who are brave are the ones who feel the fear, but do the thing anyway. Feel the fear, understand that in order to get over it you will need to feel it, don't try to make it go away, just enjoy the feeling, it's only temporary. Then be okay with looking like a fool, most times things will not end as bad as you picture them, just remind yourself of the power that you hold to change your circumstances and become the person that you want.

Finally, a little tip. If you want to grow as a person, you need to start working to get out of your comfort zone daily; desensitization. Think of why you want to conquer your fear and use that as motivation. Tell yourself that you will go through this fear in order to get a step closer to your vision.

**Ex**: I want to conquer my fear of public speaking and expressing my personality to its full potential because in a year when I leave home to live on my own I see myself being a free and open person who is impervious to social conditioning.

**Ex** 2. I want to conquer my fear of talking to groups of beautiful girls because in a year, I see myself being able to approach women with ease and always attracting the best women with my personality.

You need to **WANT IT MORE THAN YOU FEAR IT.**

I realized that if i'm not doing something everyday that makes me scared, if I don't get out of my comfort zone and challenge myself, I become stagnant. I stop growing, and this leads to frustration and anger. If you hold these emotions for too long, you will begin to self-destruct. The key to moving forward in life is facing your fears in order to move one step closer to the end result.",seduction
Suburban PUA Difficulties,Working on cold approaches in the suburbs is a bit difficult. No high traffic pedestrian areas. Shopping centers or coffee shops appear to be the best options but you run the risk of being banned from these locations if you're approaching too many women. Cold approaches in parking lots are a definite no. Any thoughts? ,seduction
How to move to the next level? (Sexual activities),"Okay so I’m 20 years old currently in college and I’m still a virgin. 
I know I know, Im not here to ask for advice on how to lose my virginity, I’m here because I have no game. I’ve been told by many girls I’m very attractive and they can’t believe me when I say I’m a virgin. There are some girls who straight call me a lair and are completely shocked. 

My question is, how do I get game? 

I’m very social and can literally talk to anyone but I have a hard time trying to show that I want more than just a small talk. I just can’t move to the next level. What do I do? Do I need to complement them? Most girls think I’m a fuckboy because of my looks and it’s difficult. 

I will say I probably need to work on my eye contact a lot more but idk what else to do to show the girl I’m interested in the next level? ",seduction
Halloween approaches [FR],"Went out last night with 4 friends to see if we could creep out any girls on Halloween.

At the bar and my friend is doing what he calls a 'warm up' set on a couple of old birds! After a few mins they eject/blow him out and sit down by themselves. My friends all go out to smoke but it's cold so I decide to stay inside and do my own attempt on the old girls. I open with ''Where's your Halloween costumes?'' (I wish coming up with an 'opener' that actually tends to lead towards a discussion was always as easy as it is at Halloween!)

They throw it back at me because i'm also in normal clothes, but I tease them and ignore that fact and tell them that they're boring and then start listing outfits that they should be wearing, and sexualise it a little by mentioning sexy 'undead' nurses in short skirts etc. I riff for a few seconds about how my friends are smoking so I thought i'd bug them for a while and within a few minutes they were asking my name and showing me lots of interest. My friends came back and told me we were moving too a different bar, and the girls said ''No! Don't take injesterust! We like him!''. I told the girls to come with us and they did.

In the next venue i'm flirting and dancing with the younger one (who is still like a decade older than me! I'm actually not interested in either) and then the older one comes over, pinches my ass, tells me she likes younger guys and basically puts it on a plate for me. I kind of carry on flirting, but i'm tryt to reject her gently and within a few minutes both girls are now talking to some other dudes who have taken them off my hands!

I open another girl on the dance floor. Much more my type! Canadian. 22. I open again with the same opener. It leads too a discussion. We do the names and ages thing. She seems SUPER friendly and talkative, but I know that this isn't necessarily an IOIm because American and Canadian girls are about 200 times friendlier with strangers than Brit girls typically (unless they think you're good looking)! It's going OK. I'm touching her when I get the opportunity and teasing her and stuff, but at some point I drop some sort of 'clanger' that completely ruins the interaction and she basically grabs her friend and walks away lol.

I go too a different bar. I open a girl sitting down. Same opener lol. She is very talkative which is fairly unusual for UK girls, so it's a pretty big IOI. Very soon she's talking about how she likes to be fucked and stuff. I wish I could remember how the conversation 'went there' so quickly. Not sure if it was something I 'done' and if it was just her. I was starring deep into her eyes on silences and stuff to increase the sexual tension. She was giving me that flirty look and getting super close to me at times and it was just super obvious that the kiss was 'on'. I went for it and We kissed. I was feeling her up and making out a fair bit. However, she was staying with a gay friend in a hotel and she didn't want me to go back there (neither did I , tbh! Not sure how I feel about banging someone whilst her gay best friend is watching!). I don't have my own place and after a while she gave me her number and disappeared.

Go inside to use the bathroom and on my way upstairs I opened a girl with the same opener and she just looked at me like a homeless person and sort of 'shooed' me away. That's more what i'm used too! A 'no girl' who I can tell from that initial reaction taht no matter what i'd have said (as my opener or after the opener) I'd have never have gotten her

Go back outside to the same seat where I was kisisng the girl and I notice another girl now sitting there. Probably opened her with the same outifit opener. Can't remember. She was sober/wasn't drinking and was sitting there whilst her 'slut' friend (her words, not mine!) was inside 'trying to find a handsome guy to bang her'. I spent the next 10 mins teasing her and talking nonsense and she really seemed to be enjoying herself. She also called me out on kissing the other girl. Turns out she saw that lol. So maybe I looked like a bit of a pervy quagmire. Still, It was going super well, laughing at my jokes, asking me what sort of girls I like, lots of presonal quetsions etc HOWEVER, there just wasn't that 'green flashing light' that was present with the girl that I kissed this time. Hard to describe. It was going well, but I just wasn't getting the same 'attraction IOI's' (KISS ME!!) that the other girl was giving me. I was thinking about how I can advance this, trying to remember all the tips from various PUA vids about how to escalate

First move was so ramp up the kino under using some sort of palm reading shit lol. I done it but I don't think that it really helped my cause. Her behaviour didn't change.

Next move was 'statements of intent'. Told her I thought she was kinda cute and said a few flirty things, but again, she didn't really reciprocate.

Only other move I could think of here was to just grab her and 'go for it' and try to kiss her! But my instincts told me that it would be a guaranteed painful rejection. (i'd also previous tried to 'test the waters' by kind of picking her up as she was sitting down, but she kind of pushed my hands away a little so I backed off, but that told me that going for a kiss was likely super low odds).

Was now a bit lost as to what to do and I knew that she'd be driving her friend back to where she lives soon (fairly far away) so I told her to give me her number which she did.

We text a little this morning and in one of them she said something like ''Wait, so you forgot our kiss?!!! I'm hearbroken''

I don't even remember kissing her but I was a little drunk! Maybe she's just being 'funny' and it's a joke lol. Or maybe I did kiss her. God knows. I don't think so?!!

Overall a fun night tbh, ALTHOUGH, i'm annoyed at 2 things.

1/not being able to escalate effectively and advance the interaction with the last girl. It was just so much easier with the other girl due to her body language and stuff. Not sure what else I could/should have done with the 2nd girl.

2/Even though i'm glad to have made some approaches, there were so many occasions where there were just stunning girls that I failed to open due to how hot they were. I can't open bitchy looking 8+'s! Always painful when you reject yourself tbh although it's so hard to do because I know that 98% of the time it's a hard 'no girl' who, no matter what I try, basically ignores me, and it does kill my ego/confidence, so I tent to float around hitting on the hot(ish) girls lol

EDIT:

Hmmm....it appears I actually did kiss her aswell. Bizarre. I honestly don't remember that at all!

Her: ''Omg you don’t remember our kids????? I’m heart broken.''

Her: I mean 'kiss', not 'kids'

Me: don't remember our kids OR our kiss. I'm not sure it happened. Not like me to do such a thing. Did you do it just to make your bouncer friend jealous?! haha

(some bouncer she knew was sniffing around her all night)

Her: No you kissed me, you where snogging some other bird right before me so you definitely kiss anyone lol. No I didn’t do it to make him jealous I done it because it’s what you wanted",seduction
How can I attract the attention of older men? [19F],"title. I am a 19 year old female but everyone I meet tells me I look 15/16. 

I do like men my age or in their 20s sometimes, but mostly I find myself wanting a man around 30+. I feel it's so out of reach though? I am aware of the difference in maturity, I'm not looking for someone to have a committed serious relationship with, more just a casual sexual relationship....

The men I work with aren't really an option, so I'm more thinking of how do I approach a (preferably) older guy at a bar? 

How can I even tell if he'd be interested in me? I know I should be direct and upfront, I'm just now sure how. 
Sorry if this was a bit rambling, but I appreciate any advice. Thanks

",seduction
"I think I've got issues inside me, but I don't know what it is","Hey

So several months or even years ago (I'm 21) I had great game. I know I was confident, attractive, and despite being in a relationship (cuz we had on/off times) wheeling girls wasn't easy but it wasn't as hard as now. I don't know where the hell it went South, but I suspect it was from my break up like 1.5 years ago. That's a loong fucking time ago. We dated for 4 and so odd aggregate years and she broke up with me - haven't slept with a girl since. 

This is all weird because I've got girl-friends, I'm a decent looking dude, I play sports, I'm a leader in school clubs, so like what the fuck. I don't have family issues, I don't have money issues. I do think that maybe I feel inadequate to my ""younger"" self, especially because I've gotten a tad fatter and my hair's starting to thin out. But still, I rock my thin hair with a pretty sick hair cut and I don't care that I've gotten some padding. 

Should I meditate like hell for a few weeks like Don Draper and clear my head? I guess it's important to note my diet sucks, I don't really hit the gym either. Did I just find my own answer? Should I start hitting the gym first and if the issue persists, do something else about it?

Thanks in advance for your help my friends call me a virgin ",seduction
Which book do you like better? How to be a 3% man or Models?,"I have read 3% man by Corey Wayne and it has taught me a great amount of knowledge in the dating and relationship world. The main teaching is to have a purpose in life and to stick to it, being none-needy and always keeping your center. Also, it shows ways on how to attract woman by only using the phone to set-up dates and not chasing all the time. Coach Corey Wayne teaches that keeping your emotions mysterious will attract the girl.
I am currently reading Models by Mark Manson. I am halfway but pretty much the book shows how to vulnerable. Not weak but vulnerable. Pretty much show the world what you think or want without the outcome of success or rejection. If you like a girl, to go and approach her and state that you like her. Or if something bothers you to state it to the girl.

I like both books. In my opinion, 3% man is better in the beginning of the courtship and dating. Still, I think that Models is good in maintaining the relationship. Being honest and vulnerable. 
Both books have similiar teachings and have enjoyed both books. What do you all think?",seduction
Where to start and what,"Hi to all, 
I am somewhat successful in life, the only thing that I miss is a woman and I don't like it.
So I would like to study seduction in order to attract and obtain some quality females.
Where should I start? I am asking about core books, manuals or videos. 
So far I only watched sparse rsdmax and other people videos on youtube. But I see there are huge differencies between them.

Thanks to the more experienced guys that will respond 😊",seduction
Friend-zone: Is it real or not? Explain.,,seduction
How and why to go 'Beast Mode' with your game," Pick-up 'Beast Mode' is essentially an immersion. 

* It means going out multiple times per week (definitely more than two).
* It means talking to **LOTS** of girls and building social momentum.
* It means pushing as hard as you can to get a close that session. 

If you’re coming from a place where you’re shy, introverted or have no experience with women, I’d argue Pick-Up Beast Mode is **ESSENTIAL** to your progress. 

They say it takes 28 days to make a lasting change to your habits. I say they’re probably right. 

# How to go 'Beast Mode'  

I’ve done several 'Beast Mode' immersion periods during the five years I’ve been studying pick-up.

Here’s how I do it. 

* Define a number of days I’m going out in the 28 day period;
* Define how long I'm going to stay out;
* Promise to write a field report every time;
* Then, fucking do it!

In my 'Beast Mode' months, I committed to one of daygame, nightgame or dates **EVERY DAY.**

Daygame was two hours minimum.  Nightgame commitment was **UNTIL THE BITTER END**. (How else are you meant to practice trying to pull?)

I look back at my beginner days with fondness I looked forward to meeting new wingmen off the RSD Inner Circle. I loved the feeling of getting into ‘state’ by talking to dozens of girls and building social momentum. 

I have always thought the game is FUN AS HELL, even when I sucked at it. Beast Mode should be a pleasure not a chore.  If you don't feel this way, that's the first sticking point to overcome. [This post should help](https://www.reddit.com/r/seduction/comments/9guu2c/game_is_fun_as_hell_please_explain_why_some/). 

Writing field reports is really important to your progress too. I wrote about why [in this post](https://www.reddit.com/r/seduction/comments/9owbdu/how_field_reports_can_help_cure_your_approach/). 

# The Truth About 'Beast Mode' 

The truth about 'Beast Mode' is that you'll always want to put it off until later.  

Unless you have massive emotional leverage (perhaps from a break-up, just discovering game or maybe a REALLY bad night of rejections haha), you’ll find some excuse to start it later. 

However, there’s never going to be a perfect time to start. There will always be an excuse available.

**So how do you motivate yourself to start?** 

Some good questions to ask yourself are:

* How much longer do you want to be getting the results you currently have in your dating life? 
* How long do you want to wait the get the girls you really want? 

How long do you want to wait to get laid at all? Most of my Beast Mode immersions were motivated by dry spells. 

If you go out this often, speak to tons of women and find something to improve upon every time, you have an extremely good shot of getting laid. 

To stick to your schedule, I’d recommend creating some accountability. Make your Beast Mode challenge public, share your field reports publicly and get feedback on them. 

# A message for the dabblers 

Some of you will think this is 'too much'. That's a shame. Because there's no way you can make any lasting change to your personality by being a chode for 5 days a week, then turning on your pick-up persona on Friday and Saturday.

You definitely won't get good by doing the odd daygame approach here and there...

I've seen a lot of my old wingmen try these strategies and fail. Most of them are just as bad as they were when I met them five years ago.  

Don't make the same mistakes as them. Go hard or go home (alone). 

***I’ve co-launched a Telegram group for men who want to become with women. There are hundreds of guys sharing their success stories and getting feedback on their sticking points. A real brotherhood. Seems like a good place to find some accountability. If you’d like to join, drop me a PM with your Telegram handle.*** ",seduction
Perplexing Issue After Daygame Approaches,"Hi all, I'm seeing a pattern develop and would ask your help to diagnose it.. and treat it.

&amp;#x200B;

I'm approaching girls at the mall &amp; in the street and have gotten better at gauging their buying temperature, it's now obvious when they are cold fish or when they are hot to trot.

&amp;#x200B;

However, it's very common that if the girl happens to be very receptive, the chat goes \*GREAT\* and I get her number, but never hear from her again.. like NO replies to my messages at all. It seems to happen with a lot of the interested girls, and is very frustrating.

&amp;#x200B;

Do you know why it would happen? It seems the opposite of what should happen. How do I fix it?",seduction
"I am genuinely curious about why I am attracting the kinds of women I am attracting, any experts want to take a stab at it?","So I have had a somewhat easy time landing above average looking girls in recent months but I have noticed some trends when I match with women on dating apps and occasionally do some approaches.

For one, I know it makes sense that I do better with women of minority groups than white girls given that I am not white myself. For some reason, black and Hispanic women have been the easiest for me.

**Now with white girls is where I get confused.**

I live in an area with a mixture of European groups, so you get a lot of blonds and some redheads (but redheads are rare everywhere) but also some dark haired people.

I know it is just a hair color but I have noticed the following...

1 - If she has dark hair and a tan (like Eastern European women, Jewish and Italian women do), it is almost as easy as attracting women of minority groups. In fact, I have had some women with this kind of a look come on to me HARD.

2 - If she has dark or brown hair, it is very doable.

Most of my matches that have been white girls on dating apps have had dark or brown hair.

I don't get nearly the same interest from blondes and redheads.",seduction
Can't connect with girls,"For basically as long as I can remember, I've struggled to form connections with other people. I was bullied in middle school, and consequently stayed away from others. High school was a slight improvement, but I was already significantly behind socially relative to my peers. I thought college would be an opportunity to start over. I spent the the last 3 years trying to befriend other people. sometimes it worked out, and I made friends. A lot of them don't talk to me anymore ( due to transferring or graduation).

&amp;#x200B;

I do my best to be kind and friendly, yet I don't get closer to the people I meet. Many people are friendly and chill with me (hanging out or dating) . I know the problem is me.  Walking through campus, I see couples and groups of people with each other all the time while I remain alone. It feels terrible not getting a single text on a Saturday night (especially last Halloween night) and spending the weekend alone on my computer or Xbox/PS/Nintendo. I've tried joining clubs, but I can't seem to make connections in the ones I join. Forget dating or having sex with girls, even people in general don't invite me to their plans.

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

 I wish I could just feel better somehow, but I don't know what to do. It really does feel like I've tried everything at this point. I'm not even introverted by any means, and would love to spend time in the presence of others if possible.",seduction
Tokyo Nightgame Venue Suggestions,"Hey,

I’m in Tokyo near Shinjuku and somewhat near Shibuya. Does anyone with experience have any recommendations of good bars/clubs in the area that are safe from scams/shakedowns/prostitutes? Read that nightgame is a good way to meet girls but I’ve tried a few places already that were packed with guys and others that were empty or felt scammy.",seduction
[FR] Falied the perfect pull. Last Minute Resistance,"Hi. So I basically failed the perfect lay situation and at the end she laughs at me.

Little background. Currently studying Finance and I met this girl at a lecture 2 weeks ago. I told her to sit next to me cause that was the VIP (as in a club), she laughed and we sat on the first row. We were vibing really good, no talking only small touches, teases etc. during the lecture. After that I n-closed. 

Fast forward one week later, after the same class we are having together we went on an instadate and I got to know her. We were having a walk in the park, vibing, having a great chat. Then we sat on a bench, I started doing the Kino, and kissed her. It was just a few kisses not a makeout session, I pulled away and said lets leave some more for the next time. (I basically play it right, doing the push/pull and I'm seeing her positive reaction.) We talked about how we both are looking for something casual, it was the perfect first date for me - zero investment, max reward.

Fast forward to today (One week later). She texted me a couple of times during the week, sending kiss emojis nonstop, basically a rising interest rate environment. So we scheduled a date for today, I pick her up after her lecture, and we go to a coffee, get some drinks, really chill vibe - we talked about tax evasion schemes. Afterwards I lead her to go for a walk in a nearby park (Getting close to my house by that time). So we sit in the park and kiss a bit, she started talking about photos (I do some photography) so I told her we should go home so I can show her how to edit photos. She agreed to come to mine - no resistance so far.

We get to the house, a short 5 min walk, and we enter. I had prepared everything beforehand. House was sparkling clean, smelling fresh, I joked a bit how I painted the paintings on the wall, again a cool vibe.

Then I pull up my secret weapon which I use everytime I have girls home. I open a bottle of red wine, get some sweets, and play The Weeknd - Trilogy. I made a joke how I'd show her my favourite album.

And we get to the perfect situation, drinking wine, having sweets, making out and Trilogy playing in the background.            At this point I stopped talking, I let Abel do all the talking for me while we enjoy the makeout sesssion.

 And then I start noticing how she resists a little bit. When we were kissing she stopped and laughed a bit, and did that a couple of times. We were making out and touching, but whenever I try to do something else I got a negative reaction

 (A strange laughter). She didnt even took her cardigan off.

Basically she was OK kissing but stopped me on every escalation attempt. I tried to do some push/pull by joking about how she wants to get me drunk and take advantage off me etc. It didn't work. 

So we end up having this 1 hour make-out session and at the end she has to go. She stands up, laughs a bit, and then shot me with the - ""Haha everything you do is intentional (or according to plan; depends on the translation)"".

This got me completely offguard, I've done this scenario with a few girls and succeeded every time, and its like ofc I do it intentionally, wtf does she mean by that? Is it good, is it bad? I'm so confused at the moment.

So guys, please help me learn my lesson from this situation. Did I fuck up the last minute resistance? Or did I make it too obvious what I was trying to do? This was our 2nd date..

Feeling a bit lost atm. I've never failed The Weeknd special...

&amp;#x200B;

",seduction
How To Pull A Girl From A Club,"Clubs suck. They’re unbearably loud, half the people are trashed, and the women get approached by so many creepy guys that they’re going to assume you’re another creep until you prove otherwise.

Despite all this, beautiful women congregate in clubs by the thousands in any decent-sized city.

Clubs might suck, but if you want to hook up with a hot girl the same night you met her, there’s no better place to do so than a nightclub.

Do you want to sleep with the kind of girls that most guys only fantasize about? Yes? Then it’s in your best interest to learn how to successfully approach a girl in a club.

&amp;nbsp;

##Clubs Are An Emotional Environment, Not A Logical Environment

&amp;nbsp;

Women go to clubs to have fun: if talking to you isn’t fun, you’re going to get rejected.

If most of the girls you approach say something to the effect of, “I have to use the bathroom,” or, “I have  to find my friends,” what they’re really communicating to you is, “Talking to you isn’t fun, I’m out.”

If you’re not having fun, no ‘pickup line’ will make a girl like you. But if you are having fun, you can make almost line work. Take for example a few of the crazier pickup lines I’ve successfully used:

&gt;Me: “Are you from Tennessee?”

&gt;Her: “Why, because I’m the only ten you see?”

&gt;Me: “No, because you look like a child of incest.”

(She asked me for my number five minutes later).

&amp;nbsp;

&gt;Me: “Did it hurt?”

&gt;Her: “What, when I fell from heaven?”

&gt;Me: “No, when you fell and broke your face.”

&gt;Her: “You’re such an asshole!” (while laughing)

&amp;nbsp;

&gt;Me: “You’re hideous.”

&gt;Her: ‘bursts out in laughter’

(this only worked because she was extremely hot.)

Now, I don’t recommend calling a girl hideous or implying that she looks like a child of incest. However, the fact that absurd lines like those can work illustrates an important point: what you say doesn’t matter nearly as much as how you say it.

You can get away with just about any line if you say it in the spirit of fun. At the same time, even the best lines will get you rejected if you say them with even a hint of neediness.

To make sure you approach in a way that adds to the fun, ask yourself this simple question before you approach, “How can I make her night better?”

Asking this question will remind you that you’re approaching to offer value, not to get something from the girl. And if you approach to make her night better, there’s a significantly higher chance that she’ll respond to you positively.

If you’re thinking, “That’s cool, but what line should I use?” You can open with pretty much anything, but if you want a go-to opener, use this, “Hey, I like your style and I had to introduce myself.”

The above line is good because it starts the conversation on a positive note in a way that compliments her but not so overtly that you give away some of your power.

&amp;nbsp;

##Make Her Feel Strong Emotions

&amp;nbsp;

Once you’ve started a conversation, how do you prevent the interaction from turning into a job interview? By inciting strong emotions.

An interview-style interaction is logical, it doesn’t go much deeper than:

&gt;“What do you do?”

&gt;“Where are you from?”

Flirting, in contrast, is emotional: it’s about creating and releasing tension. Flirting, at its core is push-pull, hot-cold, or positive-negative. 

The mixture of hot and cold creates uncertainty. It makes the girl wonder, “Does he really like me or is he just talking to me to kill time?” This uncertainty is exciting for the girl, and if you do it well, it can make her feel sexual arousal.

Things that are “hot” (or positive) include:

- Holding strong eye-contact.
- Complimenting her.
- Approving of something she says, “You’re a nurse? That’s awesome.”
- Getting in close physical proximity to her.
- Touching her.
- Smiling/laughing.
- Actively listening to what she says.

Things that that are “cold” (or negative) include:

- Teasing her: “You’re smart for a California girl” (can substitute any state)
- Disqualifying her (You’re like the sister I never had, let’s climb trees and drink kool-aid!)
- Taking a step back to create physical space.
- Avoiding eye contact.
- Saying you have to leave soon.
- Taking away physical touch.
- Interrupting what she says.
- Disagreeing with her.

If you’re too “hot” (positive), the girl will feel like she has complete power over you: she’ll think that you would sleep with her no matter what she said. Being overly available implies you must not have much value.

If you’re too “cold” (negative), the girl will feel you don’t like her as a person. As such, she won’t enjoy interacting with you – so she’ll leave.

The power of hot and cold lies in finding the right balance. Each girl is different: some prefer a mostly hot interaction, others prefer a mostly cold interaction.

However, on average I’d say the best balance is about 80% hot and 20% cold. Overall, the interaction is positive, but you’re using some “cold” to create a sense of challenge and intrigue.

Of course, your conversation can’t be all “hot and cold”, you do need to structure the conversation around something.

The easiest way to do this is to memorize a few basic questions that you can ask every girl you approach. These questions aren’t inherently fascinating, but you can use them as a foundation to build your conversations from.

Here’s some examples of questions you might use:

&gt;“What do you do for fun?”

&gt;“What are you passionate about?”

&gt;“How ambitious are you?""

&gt;“Where are you from?”

Whenever she answers one of your questions, you can do one of three things:

###1. Go deeper on that topic:

If she says she’s passionate about helping people, you can talk in-depth about how she wants to help people.

If she says she likes to hang out with friends for fun, you could say, “You seem like the type of girl who gets high with her friends and talks about philosophy”

###2. Compliment her:

If she says she is ambitious and she’s working on becoming a published author, you could say, “That’s really cool. I can tell you’ve got the kind of crazy brain it takes to be a good writer.” (You could then follow up with a question about her writing to go deeper on that topic.)

###3. Tease her:

If she says she’s from Texas, you could say, “Texas? That explains a lot.”

If you ask her what she does for fun and she says she likes to read, you could say, “How many times have you read 50 Shades of Grey?” (Implying she likes smutty romance novels)

Holding a conversation in a club isn’t complicated. The environment isn’t designed for deep, philosophical conversations. All you need to do is make the conversation emotionally engaging. Ask some basic questions to give the conversation structure, and when she answers those questions use pushes and pulls to create sexual tension.

##Lead Hard

So far we’ve covered how to approach a girl in a night club and how to keep the conversation interesting. If you want anything sexual to happen with the girl, the next thing you need to do is lead hard.

In a club, you can’t just approach a girl and talk to her for a couple hours in the same area you met her.

Within five minutes of approaching a girl, you should invite her to hang out with you somewhere nearby. For example, you might say:

“Hey, let’s go dance for a minute.”
“Let’s go to the outside area so I can actually hear you.”
“Come meet my friends, they’re really cool.”

If the girl you approach likes you, she’ll probably be comfortable to leave her friend and move to another area of the club with you. If she won’t, you have three options:

1. Invite her friends to come as well.
2. Stick around with her for another 10 minutes or so before making another suggestion.
3. Get her number and make plans to hang out with her later. If a girl isn’t willing to move a few feet away from her friends, there’s a good chance you’re not going to be able to bring her home with you. In that case, your best bet is to make plans for a date with her before moving on to another girl.
Once you’ve lead the girl to another area of the club, you can get more physical (because her friends aren’t there to judge her).

You don’t need to make out with a girl in a club to take her home with you, but if you’re new to picking up girls in clubs, making-out can help build your self-confidence so that you feel comfortable going for the pull later.

&amp;nbsp;

##Get Her Logistics

&amp;nbsp;

Make sure that if you’ve been talking to a girl for a good 15 minutes that you get her logistics. The simplest way to do this is to ask, “What are you doing later tonight?”

Her answer will give you a good idea as to how likely it is she’s going to go home with you that night. She might say something like,

“Nothing, what are you doing?”
“I’m not sure yet.”
An answer like that usually means the girl is down to hang out with you after the club closes.

If, however, she says:

“I’m going back home with my friends.”
“I’m going to sleep soon, I have work early tomorrow.”

Answers like those indicate that she doesn’t want to go home with you that night. To be fair, this isn’t a hard rule, there are exceptions. (If your intuition says you can bring her home, don’t hesitate to go for it).

Generally, if you get a response like that, I recommend you just grab her number and approach another girl. Otherwise, you might spend your entire night talking to someone who doesn’t want what you want.

&amp;nbsp;

##Go For The Close

&amp;nbsp;

If you think a girl is open to the possibility to going home with you, suggest that you and her hang out at your place. I like to use the lines:

&gt;“Hey, it’s way too loud here, let’s go get a drink somewhere we can actually have a conversation.”

&amp;nbsp;

&gt;You: Have you ever watched X movie/TV show?

&gt;Her: Nope, can’t say I have.

&gt;You: Are you serious? You have to see it, it’s amazing. Let’s go watch it.

&gt;Her: Right now?

&gt;You: Yeah, it’ll be fun.

If the girl’s down to sleep with you that night, you don’t need the smoothest line in the world to get her to agree to come home with you.

Once the girl has agreed to go back to your place, the rest should happen automatically. 

&amp;nbsp;

##Wrapping Up How To Pull A Girl From A Club

&amp;nbsp;

I’ve gone out to meet women in clubs with hundreds of guys – only a few of them have pulled attractive women home with them.

What’s the main reason these men fail to pull?

They just don’t take enough action. They approach one or two girls, get rejected, and then spend the rest of the night observing women instead of interacting with them.

If you want to bring girls home with you, keep in mind that most of your interactions aren’t going to lead anywhere. Even if you do everything right she might have a boyfriend, she might just not have chemistry with you, or she might be a lesbian. Don’t expect to pull one of the first few girls you approach.

A night out is marathon, not a sprint. It may take 10, 20, or even more approaches to meet a girl who you have mutual attraction with and who is interested in going home with you that night. Follow the four steps I outlined above and you will consistently be able to pull women home with you when you go out – so long as you stay out for at least a couple hours and keep approaching until you meet a girl who reciprocates your interest.

*You can follow me on Snapchat to see daily infield footage (approaches, makeouts, pulls) Username: AveryGHayden*",seduction
Recommendations for a good social skills program?,"After looking at PU for a bit, I've realized it's more important for me to start at a lower level - general social skills. How to talk to people in general, how to make friends, body language, expressing myself honestly, etc - all the things you might put under someone with good 'social skills'.

This is obviously a bit off topic (but only a bit - general skills underlie specific seduction skills), but does anyone have a recommendation for a good social skills program? Something similar to RSD's ""Transformations"" or any of the conference programs that were popular in the 2000s in the seduction community, but for social skills. I can find tons of one-off youtube videos, but nothing that's like a 5+ hour program. I want to watch, not read, btw, but I'll take good book recommendations as well (and I'm aware of How to Win Friends and Influence People).

Thanks!",seduction
"Dressing when still heavy, and tinder photos","So I lost 110lbs in the last 8 months and sit at 210 now. Basically once I hit 220 last month I suddenly was getting pursued by women on instagram. Got a girlfriend and broke a 6 year dry streak. Well that lasted only for a bit but I dusted off the cob webs.  I’ve realized there are plenty of women I just don’t know and want to get out there. I’m still working extremely hard on my body but I need some tips on how to make the most of what I have now to keep this momentum. 

Winter clothing is a heavy guys best friend right? Any tips on dressing to hide the other 30 I need to lose? I wear all name brands and am not afraid to drop money. Problem is I don’t fit into crap for more than a month at this pace.

Tinder photos are my next question. My hobby is race cars and it is not exactly a thing where you get good photos of the driver. Most of my non selfies are of me with my nephew and I don’t want to give the idea that I have a kid. So should I ask friends to take more photos? I think they avoid I because they knew I had issues previously ",seduction
7 Tips For Better Verbal Game,"Every new guy struggles with ""what to say"" to women. 

It's a complex subject. So I wrote a nice long article to help you all out. 

Read [7 Tips For Being Better at Talking to Women](http://www.absoluteability.com/game/7-tips-for-being-better-at-talking-to-women/)

Some more advice to improve your verbal game

Read Books. 

Lots of them. 

This year I've read close to fifty books. Books on self-help, religion and spirituality, business, and some great fiction. 

Reading puts more thoughts into your head, which means more to talk about. 

Take Improv

Improv classes teach you how to spit mad words, and present them in an entertaining way. I took a class for $100 from my community college. And there were a few hotties there too. 

Daygame

I don't think there's a better way to learn than to practice talking to women in the daytime. ",seduction
Sample Plans?,"Hey can y'all give me a sample conversation? I only know one joke imma use, I've never done this befor, and my names Leo.

So when asked for my name, I can be like ""my name is Leonardo, sometimes DiCaprio."" Idk, dumb shit I saw online.

So yeah I basically have no idea what to say. ",seduction
Need some help on learning on how to apply what these posts say and not fail the way I did..,"I started talking to a girl on and off 3 months ago, with the last month being full of chatting. I made it clear to her that I liked her by giving hints but in real life she acted like she was not interested at all. Opened up and told her what I thought of her and she said she didn't feel the same and she wanted me to stop make any moves, but she didn't want the bond to be broken because of me liking her and such.

It's like I forgot anything I read and went after her, feeling kind of dumb and also like if I had acted in another way things might've been different.

If anyone has any tip on what to do with my head and how to act near her, I'd be greatful. I know its kind of a stupid post but maybe any of you has been in the same position (?). I'm 20 btw if that counts..",seduction
From fat and shy to attractive and clueless,"TLDR: fat in high school so 0 experience with girls or being social in general. Lost weight, look way better and now girls won't stop showing interest but I mentally break down when it happens and don't do anything. 




The title is really what it comes down to but here's some background. (I'm a sophomore at a community college currently. 6,2 200 pounds )

Back in high school I was pretty much a loser socially. I was extremely overweight (350 at my heaviest) and my small group of friends I had only enjoyed playing video games. So that's what I did for 4 years of high school. Go to school, talk to no one except my close friends (about 4 of them) then go home and play games with the same people till 1am. Everyday, every weekend, for four years.

Once I graduated I was so done with being alone and having the same the friends I dropped them made new friends and started to get in shape. My first year of college my main goal was to self improve and lose weight. Which I did. Went from 350 to 200 since high school ended. And got way better at talking to new people and holding conversation. 

These days I have different friends who like going out and doing stuff as much as I do. I dress well and imo am a pretty attractive guy. I try to go out at least once a week but if I can go more then once I always do even if it means going to a show alone. 

So now here is the problem. I'll use the last time I went to a concert alone as an example. (it was a rave since I'm only 19 I can't go to bars or I totally would)

I do my normal thing and just go right into the crowed and have a good time dancing alone. Pretty soon the girls start to show up around me. It's pretty easy to tell (at least I think I'm reading them right)  when a girl wants you to do something. Eye contact, touching, moving toward me, the whole deal. But I don't. And it happens all night every time I go out. Honestly I've gotten so good at it that I can usually tell when they are giving up and about to walk away. 

I've had girls grab my ass, try to grab my dick, start to forcibly grind on me and believe it or not this one time a girl even was mouthing the words to the song playing (come home with me tonight, will you come home with me) literally facing me and dancing. And every time I just can't do it. 

I pretty much just break down mentally. My thoughts go from ""wow this place is sick, I love this song, woah that guys fucked up haha"" to ""omg wtf that girl just showed up in front of me, oh no she's looking at me what do I do. Is there something on my shirt? Oh shit now she's backing up into me. I'm just gonna back up so I don't make her uncomfortable. She's still backing up oh no. Fuck now there's another one. She keeps touching my arm please stop."" Then I usually change spots until it happens again. It's even worse when I'm with my friends cause they try to tell me a girl is showing signs but I still don't do anything and look like an ass and then they give me shit all night after. 

I just lose my cool when girls get involved it seems. And this is not just at night. It's the same thing at school 

""Oh shit that girl is looking at me from across the room again. Should I look at her? No she's not really looking at me. Damnit I looked at her and she was looking at me fuck. I'm not gonna look again cause I'll creep her out. Shit she's walking next to me now down the hall. Should I say something? What do I say?"" And then I try to get away from the situation asap. 

And don't even get me started on approaching a girl. That doesn't happen at all. Never tried it really. And honestly if the amount of interest I think I get is actually true I don't even need to approach I just need to say something and I can't even do that. 












",seduction
The power of starting over,"After an abusive relationship, the best option is to accept one's loses, take time to heal, learn from the bad experience, and move towards our purpose in life. However, many of us we get over this bad experience, heal, and then enter the amazing world of seduction.

&amp;#x200B;

Here are my thoughts on this matter:

&amp;#x200B;

[The power of starting over](https://youtu.be/D_NAUlTP0co)",seduction
How do you hang out with girls at University?,"I have come a long way with my game. I know how to meet and attract women but I don't know how to ask to hang out with them. It's not like cold approach in a city as this is social circle game. I will see these girls over and over again. I would like to hang out with them during the day to build more rapport and comfort with them.

&amp;#x200B;

Do I

&amp;#x200B;

1. Ask them to join me in an activity or something I'm already doing on a specific time?
2. Ask them when they are free for a coffee (or other ""datey"" activity)

The main concern for me is that I don't want to seem needy. 

&amp;#x200B;

I honestly appreciate any thoughts or ideas that you guys may have. This is really frustrating me",seduction
How to keep things cool/not-too-intimate when you first start hooking up?,"I've hooked up with a girl a couple times and I'm not sure how to keep things cool without scaring her off with too much intimacy. 

Just because of who I am as a person, I tend to treat every girl I'm with as more than just a booty call. I'll ask them to come over to dinner, I'll take them on walks, I'll say cute stuff to them over pillowtalk, I'll pull them in for a kiss before they leave – essentially, I don't just tell them to come over to fuck and then kick her out when we're finished.

My question is – are these things OK to do when I'm just starting to hook up with a girl? I'm not sure where things are going with this girl, but I definitely don't want to scare her off. Should I not kiss her when she leaves, and avoid asking her to do date-type activities? I guess I'm wondering how to strike a balance between 1) staying cool enough to not scare her off, and 2) being kind and intimate enough so that she doesn't feel like just a bootycall.

Thanks guys!",seduction
Any good YouTube channels or videos that would be digestible in audio only?,Trying to find stuff to listen to during my commute.,seduction
The Surprisingly Effective Way I Curbed Social Anxiety,"  

When I was 20 years old I finally found a way to fight my social anxiety and practice the subtle art and discipline of assertive communication, particularly with women. And it’s not what you think. I had been socially anxious for as long as I could remember. It was always hard to motivate me to “get out there and be social”. I always seemed to prefer my own company, even when loneliness and sexual desire were at the forefront of my concerns.

So, one day, after a long and insufferable bout of depression following the extravagantly destructive end of a 2-year relationship, I decided that I wasn’t making enough money to do the things I wanted to. Naturally, with no valuable education or trade skills, I did what any 20-year-old college drop-out would do. I became a waiter.

I was lucky enough to get hired at the first restaurant I walked into. A cheap Italian/American chain with high-demand despite their crappy reviews on Yelp. I was interviewed on the spot by a female manager who apparently thought I was cute, although I have never considered myself very attractive (Truth be told I was slightly overweight and beginning to bald). My palms were sweating profusely as I blurted out whatever bullshit I thought she wanted to hear from my sorry ass. Miraculously, it worked. I began training that week.

After nearly a year of isolating myself from my friends and the world, I was extremely uncomfortable with the interpersonal nature of this job, but I knew that if I hoped to make anything more than minimum wage in my region’s economic climate, I had to make it work. The promise of at least $100 per night in tips was too good to pass up. So I clumsily stumbled through conversations with my guests, who’s reasons for not trying to get me fired probably lay between indifference and pity.

Weeks went by, and then months. After countless exposures to brand new groups of diners (or “sets” if you want to think of it that way), I honed my observation of social queues and learned to adapt to a plethora of different social situations. The shear number of encounters quickly made me comfortable interacting with people I hardly knew. I became an integral member of the team and felt a sense of community amongst my coworkers which gave me a much-needed feeling of confidence and purpose. These are underlying principles of non-neediness.

**So here’s the point:**

It seems pretty well known that taking an active interest in combatting your social anxiety is the key to its eradication. But finding the motivation, or the excuse to do so is the challenge that holds most of us back. My motivation in the past was not good enough. Evidently, the dream of a vibrant social and romantic life was just not worth the uncomfortable journey for me. In this case, my excuse for putting myself through that mortifyingly awkward pain period was **purely** **financial**, yet it became perhaps the most transformative experience of my life. My point here is, not only does working in restaurants (or any sales environment) expose you to regular constructive social challenges, but it also allows you to **focus on a paycheck** while you do it, thus taking the pressure off of you to get your social interactions right the first time. You will think of your tables like jobs that need to get done, instead of the dreaded human we are all so afraid of talking to. Obviously one shouldn’t treat humans like objects, but for the sake of this pain period, this mindset and natural side effect of the job will serve your purpose. 

If this isn’t enough motivation for you, let me tell you about the culture of restaurant workplaces. Everyone there is in the same shitty position. Lots of hungry people want to eat, *right now*, so you and your team’s job is to get that food to their tables before they start bitching. Often facing overwhelming odds, you and your colleagues will endure stresses together that develop deep bonds, as well as drama. If you’ve ever worked in restaurants, you know what I’m talking about. It depends where you work, but chances are that many of the female staff will be attractive. Even if you don’t try to, you will build relationships with these women. I took home one of the waitresses in my first 2 months at that job. I had plenty of other opportunities that I did not pursue (or continue to pursue) for reasons relating to my own attraction and values. I even had the gay bartender chasing me. And no, I didn’t bang him, you fucking animals. I had opportunities with female guests that I did not act on out of professional courtesy, but looking back, the difficulties of number closing a customer could have been worked on. I did get a phone number left on a napkin once… Still counts.

To wrap this up, serving at a restaurant lifted me out of the bottomless pit of social oblivion that I had spent the previous year rapidly descending into. I might owe my life to it. Fast forward to today. I’m 22 and back in college. I drive for Uber on the side which provides more opportunities to grow socially by the same principle of constant exposure to unique situations and people. Uber presents its own dating opportunities, but that is a topic for another post. I am by no means free of social anxiety. I still fall victim to awkward interactions, bad days, bad months. I believe deep spiritual reflection and seeking knowledge on the nature of one’s own consciousness are vital to one’s contentment and subsequent improvement. 

If this helps one person out there in cyberspace one day, I will be thankful. Thanks for taking the time to share in my experiences.

Alex              ",seduction
SECRET: How to Go From Virgin to Playboy(+ Infield) | How to Pickup Girls - Brian Black,,seduction
Psychological Kino,Hey bros. I was meditating the other week and a new idea and method of game came to me. I call it psychological kino. It involves me talking to the girl and making my words and actions embed themselves deep in her brain and “escalating” on her neurons. This is the future of game I’m sure of it. With that I have suspended sale of text to succex and will be making a brand new pickup product online ,seduction
Is this text game creating attraction?,"&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/uktg3s1xjzu11.jpg

&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/b79w4qa0kzu11.jpg",seduction
What's the difference between being authentic and being yourself?,"If I do things to change myself, I will not be authentic anymore. I feel sometimes that I want to crack jokes around and talk everything that comes to my mind, but at the same time I feel that I can act better than that.

If I feel like I want to crack jokes around and say everything that comes to my mind, being spontaneous, picking random topics when dating.

1. **Is it ok** if I do it?
2. And if **I don't feel** it in that moment, can I do it?
3. If I am **not a spontaneous** person and I want to become one, and **I act like** one, does it mean that I am becoming **fake**?  ",seduction
Any tips for overcoming anxiety induced ED?,"After a lot of hard work building my social skills and fighting my social anxiety, I recently entered into a relationship with a really beautiful girl as a 23 year old kissless virgin. 

I've been seeing her for around 3 months and we've been ""exclusive"" for the past month. Everything is amazing outside of the bedroom. I have better chemistry with her than most people I've encountered in my life. Probably better than any girl I've ever been involved with. 

She wanted to hook up with me very early, like on the first time we hung out. I was nervous, and held off on sex for a few times. Around the third time we hung out, I attempted PIV with her. I was hard for the most part, but I don't she was wet enough and I started to lose my erection after trying to get it in for a bit. This made me really upset and consequently gave me massive anxiety. It's only been downhill from there. I've tried a few more times with the same thing happening every time. In fact, it's almost worse now. 

We've talked about it a few times, and she doesn't really seem to understand why it keeps happening. She says she will be patient with me, but I'm not so sure. I can tell she gets upset when it happens. I ordered some viagra from bluechew which will be here in the next couple days, and I'm really hoping that it works as it almost seems like it's my only option at this point. 

Has anyone else dealt with anything like this? How did you overcome it? ",seduction
Attractive guys read this,"My first real lay was from a student at work. I found out she had a crush on me but I would have never made a move let alone talk to her. What facilitated success was that we matched on Tinder. Extremely ironic I know. So before and after I basically had negative levels of game but she just liked me and that was enough for the most part.

There's two things I take away from this. 

Firstly, if you are an attractive guy you need to stop overthinking shit. It's good that you've learnt what girls are all about but stop trying to have some process in your head for how you are going to carry out an interaction. Just say hi, wing it, be awkward. Have some faith that if she likes you she's not gonna make it hard for you even if you spit some verbal diarrhoea.

Secondly, Tinder is fucking shit. That girl could have got with any guy she wanted. She was an 8 on Tinder. I had 0 game but the fact she knew me from REAL LIFE put me on her priority list.",seduction
Feel like I'm stuck in a cycle,"I'm 18, from the UK and i'm currently a kiss-less virgin. Unlike all my friends and most people my age, I opted for an apprenticeship instead of going to Uni. So while most people my age are out partying in big cities like London, Manchester, Birminham, Nottingham, Newcastle etc. I am stuck in my small shitty town. 

Don't get me wrong, I like the job that I've got and would much prefer to do what i'm doing now education/career wise than go to university but I feel like i'm really missing out on the social side of my life. 

I dunno whether i'm just making excuses or whatnot but where I am there are literally no clubs and only a couple pubs which just consist of 40+ year old blokes watching football (soccer for you Americans), and it's both financially out of my reach and too much of a distance to venture out driving an hour plus to reach one of these cities where there is an actual nightlife to meet people. 

Right now i'm kind of just going to work, getting home at about 6, going to sleep at 10 and then waking up and repeating the cycle. 

Any advice from anyone who has been in a similar situation or felt stuck regarding meeting, not just women, but people and friends in general would be massively appreciated. ",seduction
One of the worst things that can happen...,"You've been sending out a bunch of messages to girls on dating apps, you finally get a response, you're vibing, she's responding and it's going great. You ask her out for a drink, she agrees! She's gives you her number and you text her. But then tells you that she's out of town and that she won't be back until next week. We all know by the time she gets back most girls will probably have completely forgotten about you, they see a text from you and think ""who is this again?"" All that vibing for nothing, it sucks... ",seduction
"If you could give a 90-day plan to go from socially anxious to comfortable to speaking with women, how would you lay it out?",I'm trying to take small step-by-step to becoming comfortable with speaking and approaching women. Getting laid is more my secondary goal as my primary to just become comfortable in my own skin as I fight my self-defeating anxious thoughts,seduction
How to create emotion over snapchat,"I know it's generally frowned upon in this community to try to create any emotion over snapchat or social media in general, but before you completely dismiss the idea, i'm in high school and like it or not a lot of communication happens over snapchat.

I have good conversational skills and have no problem having long convos through snap while still maintaining value, but i'm not completely sure how to create a lot of emotion. Does anyone have any tips or examples?

&amp;#x200B;

Thank you!",seduction
Fear of Approaching in crowded places,"I have approached many girls from last two months but mostly when they were alone or no one was nearby. But in crowded places like crowded streets, railway station, subways, bus stand(if crowded) etc. I get freaked out by fear of people watching me. How can i overcome this? ",seduction
Got a kiss-close,"So on Friday night I went to a rave and was just doing cold approaches. Fast forward to 6-7am I find myself in a bar next door after not having much progress. I find a blonde Irish girl who's just into everyone getting kicked out of the club and there was this mixed race girl who I would say is a high 5 to a low 6. I did a bit of high level kino and she says next time we're gonna fuck.

Normally she isn't my type but I'm sort of enjoying it. Any opinions?",seduction
Halloween FR,"Went out last night with 4 friends to see if we could creep out any girls on Halloween.

At the bar and my friend is doing what he calls a 'warm up' set on a couple of old birds! After a few mins they eject/blow him out and sit down by themselves. My friends all go out to smoke but it's cold so I decide to stay inside and do my own attempt on the old girls. I open with ''Where's your Halloween costumes?'' (I wish coming up with an 'opener' that actually tends to lead towards a discussion was always as easy as it is at Halloween!)

They throw it back at me because i'm also in normal clothes, but I tease them and ignore that fact and tell them that they're boring and then start listing outfits that they should be wearing, and sexualise it a little by mentioning sexy 'undead' nurses in short skirts etc. I riff for a few seconds about how my friends are smoking so I thought i'd bug them for a while and within a few minutes they were asking my name and showing me lots of interest. My friends came back and told me we were moving too a different bar, and the girls said ''No! Don't take injesterust! We like him!''. I told the girls to come with us and they did.

In the next venue i'm flirting and dancing with the younger one (who is still like a decade older than me! I'm actually not interested in either) and then the older one comes over, pinches my ass, tells me she likes younger guys and basically puts it on a plate for me. I kind of carry on flirting, but i'm tryt to reject her gently and within a few minutes both girls are now talking to some other dudes who have taken them off my hands!

I open another girl on the dance floor. Much more my type! Canadian. 22. I open again with the same opener. It leads too a discussion. We do the names and ages thing. She seems SUPER friendly and talkative, but I know that this isn't necessarily an IOIm because American and Canadian girls are about 200 times friendlier with strangers than Brit girls typically (unless they think you're good looking)! It's going OK. I'm touching her when I get the opportunity and teasing her and stuff, but at some point I drop some sort of 'clanger' that completely ruins the interaction and she basically grabs her friend and walks away lol.

I go too a different bar. I open a girl sitting down. Same opener lol. She is very talkative which is fairly unusual for UK girls, so it's a pretty big IOI. Very soon she's talking about how she likes to be fucked and stuff. I wish I could remember how the conversation 'went there' so quickly. Not sure if it was something I 'done' and if it was just her. I was starring deep into her eyes on silences and stuff to increase the sexual tension. She was giving me that flirty look and getting super close to me at times and it was just super obvious that the kiss was 'on'. I went for it and We kissed. I was feeling her up and making out a fair bit. However, she was staying with a gay friend in a hotel and she didn't want me to go back there (neither did I , tbh! Not sure how I feel about banging someone whilst her gay best friend is watching!). I don't have my own place and after a while she gave me her number and disappeared.

Go inside to use the bathroom and on my way upstairs I opened a girl with the same opener and she just looked at me like a homeless person and sort of 'shooed' me away. That's more what i'm used too! A 'no girl' who I can tell from that initial reaction taht no matter what i'd have said (as my opener or after the opener) I'd have never have gotten her

Go back outside to the same seat where I was kisisng the girl and I notice another girl now sitting there. Probably opened her with the same outifit opener. Can't remember. She was sober/wasn't drinking and was sitting there whilst her 'slut' friend (her words, not mine!) was inside 'trying to find a handsome guy to bang her'. I spent the next 10 mins teasing her and talking nonsense and she really seemed to be enjoying herself. She also called me out on kissing the other girl. Turns out she saw that lol. So maybe I looked like a bit of a pervy quagmire. Still,  It was going super well, laughing at my jokes, asking me what sort of girls I like, lots of presonal quetsions etc HOWEVER, there just wasn't that 'green flashing light' that was present with the girl that I kissed this time. Hard to describe. It was going well, but I just wasn't getting the same 'attraction IOI's' (KISS ME!!) that the other girl was giving me. I was thinking about how I can advance this, trying to remember all the tips from various PUA vids about how to escalate

First move was so ramp up the kino under using some sort of palm reading shit lol. I done it but I don't think that it really helped my cause. Her behaviour didn't change.

Next move was 'statements of intent'. Told her I thought she was kinda cute and said a few flirty things, but again, she didn't really reciprocate.

Only other move I could think of here was to just grab her and 'go for it' and try to kiss her! But my instincts told me that it would be a guaranteed painful rejection. (i'd also previous tried to 'test the waters' by kind of picking her up as she was sitting down, but she kind of pushed my hands away a little so I backed off, but that told me that going for a kiss was likely super low odds).

Was now a bit lost as to what to do and I knew that she'd be driving her friend back to where she lives soon (fairly far away) so I told her to give me her number which she did.

We text a little this morning and in one of them she said something like ''Wait, so you forgot our kiss?!!! I'm hearbroken''

I don't even remember kissing her but I was a little drunk! Maybe she's just being 'funny' and it's a joke lol. Or maybe I did kiss her. God knows. I don't think so?!!

Overall a fun night tbh, ALTHOUGH, i'm annoyed at 2 things.

1/not being able to escalate effectively and advance the interaction with the last girl. It was just so much easier with the other girl due to her body language and stuff. Not sure what else I could/should have done with the 2nd girl.

2/Even though i'm glad to have made some approaches, there were so many occasions where there were just stunning girls that I failed to open due to how hot they were. I can't open bitchy looking 8+'s! Always painful when you reject yourself tbh  although it's so hard to do because I know that 98% of the time it's a hard 'no girl' who, no matter what I try, basically ignores me, and it does kill my ego/confidence, so I tent to float around hitting on the hot(ish) girls lol




EDIT:

Hmmm....it appears I actually did kiss her aswell. Bizarre. I honestly don't remember that at all!

Her: ''Omg you don’t remember our kids????? I’m heart broken.''


Her: I mean 'kiss', not 'kids'



Me:  don't remember our kids OR our kiss. I'm not sure it happened. Not like me to do such a thing.  Did you do it just to make your bouncer friend jealous?! haha 



**(some bouncer she knew was sniffing around her all night)**



Her: No you kissed me, you where snogging some other bird right before me so you definitely kiss anyone lol. No I didn’t do it to make him jealous I done it because it’s what you wanted




",seduction
Any advice you post her would be downvoted in r/relationships,"Either we are completely dysfunctional or r/relationships are full of people in denial.


I see so many posts there of women who work 2 jobs, work out daily, fucks the boyfriend on a regular basis, tells the bf she loves him and the boyfriend is always the obese depressed guy that cannot hold a job and plays call of duty all day. Where are all these hard working, fit, loving, caring women with such low standards? I have yet to meet one of these unicorns.",seduction
Making her qualify. Opinions,"What are your thoughts on opening with stuff like

""hey, you looked cute wanted to see if you are interesting""

or in the middle of convo 

""are you saying all that just so i can like you?""
""you looked like a crackhead but now i see you just were in a bad mood"" (ofc say this if she admits she had bad day, or smh)
""i don't like bad girls, you gotta behave around me""
""i like to be around high energy people, are u one of those?""

or talk about something then stop, look her in the eyes and say nothing, till the pressure makes her fill the gaps, then just smile like an evil bastard - boom shes investing 

Im using this type of high status guy, screening the girls all the time making them qualify and if they don't cover my standard they can feel i wull dumb them.

share ur opinion about that

",seduction
Why you should ALWAYS try to number-close,"*(Note1 : Swapping social media details is way stronger than swapping numbers. Hopefully the reasons why are common knowledge by now. The main reason is it allows you to demonstrate social proof. I used 'number-close' in the title because this still seems to be the appropriate PUA lingo. I'll use n-close through the post for brevity.)*

*(Note 2: Apply this exact same attitude to pulling and you'll get laid a hell of a lot more)* 

*(Note 3: If you disagree with this post, please comment and explain why. A healthy debate would be great.)*

**Anyways...**

Here's a scenario you're probably familiar with: 

You open some woman. You put in some effort to keep the conversation going, but it doesn't seem like she's into it. There doesn't feel like much of a connection. In this situation, you may feel like walking away without attempting to swap contact details. My advice is to try and n-close anyway!

# Why, what's the point???

I understand why you wouldn't want to do this. 

You might be thinking: 

* What's the point if you never want to talk to her again?
* It's important to have standards for the people you date and sleep with
* It hurts the ego to get turned down by a girl you're not even that into.
* Why put yourself through a potentially awkward situation when you don't even like her?

The answer to that final bullet is the exact reason why you SHOULD try and n-close EVERY SINGLE TIME.

My friend, who works as a confidence coach, does try and swap Instagram details with every single person he meets, no matter how brief the conversation is or unimportant the other person may appear to him. 

Sometimes it is awkward. Often, they do it anyway. 

After watching him do this a few times, I asked him WHY he does it. 

He told me: 

*""Joe, the most important parts of any interaction are the open and the close, so I want to practice this as much as possible. That way, when it really matters, I'm not going to stumble.""*

This was a great point. It's common to stumble over number closes with hotties, especially if she hasn't been giving you obvious indicators of interest (IOIs). Stumble over the close and it leaves a lasting negative impression on the woman. Why not get as much practice in as possible??

# 'Maybe Girls' often turn into 'Yes Girls'.

Girls who 'tolerate' you during an interaction without showing any IOIs are often nicknamed 'Maybe Girls'.

Most guys assume that 'Maybe Girls' are 'No Girls', but there are tons of reasons why they're being shy. 

Here are some: 

* Most girls aren't fucking used to being approached during the day. 
* Most girls aren't masters of social interaction, especially in this great new era of social media.
* Most guys become very shy and self-conscious when they're attracted to a man.  
* Most girls throw shit tests at men they're attracted to 

The bottom line is that it's often hard to tell whether these maybe girls like you. It's best to assume they do and number-close anyway. Many of these 'maybe girls' will open up through text and hopefully on the date too - but only if you give the interaction the chance to get that far. 

(**KEY POINT**: *Girls are generally more receptive to swapping social media details - and her feelings about you may change if you have a high-value Instagram profile.*)

You're telling yourself you're not number-closing because she's 'boring'. Give her a chance to prove you wrong. If she's hot enough to approach, she's hot enough to try and close.  

# The bottom line 

Game is a skill that you can improve at with practice. 

The only reason you wouldn't do this is to protect your ego. Kill your ego and improve your closing. 

***I've co-launched a Telegram group for men who want to become amazing with women. Hundreds of guys sharing their success stories and getting advice on their sticking points. A real brotherhood. If you'd like to join, drop me a PM with your Telegram handle*** ",seduction
Transitioning from Platonic to Sexual,"Just a little background I grew up in a very conservative and religious country with a religious upbringing, sex before marriage is wrong. At the same time I was very socially awkward growing up, spent most of my time inside and never socialized at all. A couple of years ago I wanted to get my life together so, I read a lot of seduction and dating material and went on a couple of dates.

&amp;#x200B;

Because of my inexperience when I am on a date it is very difficult for me to become sexual and I do not know why it does not come naturally from me. The conversation always is in the platonic stage and I do not know how to transition at all. What do you guys think I should work on and how can I approach this problem?

&amp;#x200B;

Thank you in advance",seduction
To those who have been unsuccessful,"TL'DR

Read at your own volition. Might mean something to you maybe not.

&amp;#x200B;

This is to all of my brothers who are trying to get better at this but are not having much luck. I am by no means a ladies man in any sense of the word, I am somewhat nerdy, I am a 7 out of 10 on my best day (which is rare), and have the nasty habit of acting like an socially awkward idiot in front of the girl I currently have my eye on. But I am starting to realize that it doesn't matter and that you have nothing to fear when approaching women. Over the past 6 months I so I have been trying to dedicate to better myself as a person and to build yourself as a person.  I have gotten alot better at approaching women. While I have yet to be successful,  I see myself getting better and better every time I ask a women out on a date. The biggest piece of advice I can give is to those who have been unsuccessful is repetition and trying to make yourself interesting/better.

Why am I making this post and what do I mean? Over the past 6 months, I have asked out more women than I have in the past 19 years and last night I asked out another girl and had the worst rejection of my life. We have hanged out many times before, she was complaining about how her social life was unsatisfying, and that she would enjoy it if someone asked her out on a date. I decided to take the initiative and ask her out. She gave some bullshit excuse and turned me down. Guys it happens and we will only get better if we are willing to embarrass and humiliate ourselves. Sounds brutal but its true. And the best thing about this that the more you do this is the less rejection phases you and the quicker you can move on to the next potential person and that you can learn from your past attempts. You will get better and closer every time you try and put yourself out there. Also, use this as an excuse to make yourself better. Personality wise, professionally, physically. I personally have been trying to get some IT certifications because I want to have a better job and make more money. Another thing I have learned is that women may not care if you have some nerdy cert or whatever. It doesn't really matter, if it is something you enjoy and are passionate about. Women will be able to smell the passion and success. 

To sum up what I am trying to say. Don't give up my dudes, get better and keep trying. No matter what it is, get better and try. Even if you do not know what it is your supposed to get better at. Fucking pick something and try it and if you like it, become good at it. Make yourself impressive. If you don't like what you pick, find something else and try again. I am at the beginning of this journey and I am by no means a success story  but I can see improvement and approaching women no longer freaks me out as much as it did. Thank you Seddit for existing and helping start this journey. ",seduction
The TRUTH About Women &amp; Money - Do You Need Money To Attract Women?,,seduction
Numbers are not fullfilling,"I wanted to write a reflection on my experience with girls. This is for all of you who think that fucking a ton of girls will fill a gap in your life.

When I was in high-school, I was a fucking hot shot, at least my senior year. In those years, girls are very superficial, they only liked me for my looks. I would get hit up by lots of girls and of course, I was fucking a ton. Girl after girl, party after party, it wasn't as cool as you think.

I was a stud, and everyone knew it, I quickly rose to the top of the social ladder because of my ""crazy game"" which was nothing more than a friend telling me a particular girl wanted to get with me. I would take them wherever and if they didn't want to escalate to sex, then I would leave. Simple, and it worked really well, my method filtered out the girls who weren't ready for or who didn't want to have sex.

About midway through the year, this wonderful girl who was a year below me added me on snapchat. This girl was one of the prettiest girls in the whole school I think, she was gorgeous, but there was a problem. She was naive as fuck. She was a good girl, very wifey material, smart, very compliant and sweet. In any other life, I would have ditched it all for her, right then and there. But I couldn't, I wasn't gonna let some flower be the reason for my demise from the top.

I told her I wasn't looking for anything exclusive one day after she texted me that she made out with this guy after I had made out with her. I confessed that I was getting with this other girl but that I should've told her because I didn't think she wanted to be exclusive. She was mad but decided to keep talking to me. I guess she thought that I would eventually get sick of the other girls and want to be with her. We would hang out every now and then, maybe once every two or three weeks. I was having sex with like 3 other girls while I had the good girl in my back pocket, I felt guilty but never said anything to her, I didn't want to hurt her feelings.

Anyway, she kept getting mad at me for getting with other girls, her friends were telling her about what was going on at parties and stuff. One day I was walking in the hall with this one hot girl who I fucked a few days before, we were flirting and I was touching her and she was reciprocating. The flower walked past us at one point and saw, I didn't notice her but she texted me and was clearly mad. We ended up going to lunch that weekend and I told her the conditions that I had set out previously: I didn't want anything exclusive. I told her that we could still talk under those terms or we weren't gonna talk at all. (I didn't say it like that, i was a bit nicer about it). She agreed to stay talking to me.

When promhouse came around, I finally told her that I wanted to end things, I told her that she was too naive for me and I wanted someone more mature. We never had sex, she was still a virgin, but I didn't want to be the one to go through all the firsts with her. She went on a rant and I did feel bad for leading her on for lack of a better term.

I continued my streak at promhouse. 

Now everything that I did that year with girls led up to one moment at promhouse when I was alone in the apartment I was staying in. It was about 3:30 in the morning and I had just gotten back home from another house. I walked in and sat at the table in the kitchen, I immediately felt this hole inside of my body. Unfulfillment with myself, and with what I had wasted my time with that year. I hadn't cared about anything more than partying and fucking girls.

From this moment I realized that fucking all the girls in the world could never give you any fulfillment, the fulfillment needs to come from within. I wasn't productive at all that year, I had no purpose, I was sad inside and covered it up with girls and drinking. I wonder what would have happened if I would've just ditched it all and settled sown with that girl. Too late now. **Gentlemen, it's not about the sex, it's about the relationships.**",seduction
I’m 20 years old and my cat is probably better at flirting than me.,"I come from a religious family, I was always told to keep distance from women before marriage since it was a “bad” influence.
                                 
I’m 20 years old now,  and finally got the courage to tell my family I’m not religious. I wanted then to finally start dating, but I’ve noticed that I literally do not know how talk to girls and escalate/flirt.                                              

I go to university, probably 70% of my fellow students are female, but I never seem to get past studies when I’m having a conversation with one of them. I miss affection in my life but I do seriously do not know how to work to it or anything...",seduction
how to escalate on our third date,"third date in the three weeks, this is because we are busy with work and school. we’re 20, i’ve only gone as far as hugging when we meet and just walking close together, never held hands/kissed etc. 

We’ll be at a gallery/exhibition type event and there’ll be lots to do/eat/see, how can i escalate and break the touch barrier? when is a good time to initiate holding hands? and what happens if she doesn’t reciprocate with holding hands? this will be our third time seeing each other, kiss her goodbye or no? ",seduction
Being social VS Game,"I was thinking of just submerging myself in social events for the next month and seeing what happens. I’m pretty socially awkward and isolate myself quite a bit, which I’ve realized i no longer want to live Doing. Plus I know I will always suck at game until I can fix some of these issues.

Has anybody tried this? Just thinking of doing a daily event and trying to talk to people as much as possible there. Perhaps bars/clubs Friday and sat.",seduction
Pick up game roadblock,"Me and my mate go out to pick at bars and clubs. We’re good looking roosters and we keep encountering a roadblock. We are confident and not anxious of conversation, but we find ourselves asking all the questions to the girls without much interest or interaction mostly them talking about themselves and not asking much about ourselves.

Are we talking to about the wrong things? Is there something we should be saying? Is it our mentality? ",seduction
Can a girl tell if you like her?,"Men usually have a hard time whether a girl likes them or not. She may invite them over to her home and still be wondering what she wants.

What about women though? Do they have the same kind of struggles? And I'm not talking about women who are encountering nice guys as those are fairly obvious. I'm talking about guys who usually keep it cool or even act aloof around a girl they like, yet still check her out for instance. Do women manage to figure those guys out as well, or they're just as confused as we are when women do the same shit to us? ",seduction
When should you make your move during Netflix and Chill?,"Like, will the girl I'm dating think I'm scared of making a move if I want to wait till after the movie to start kissing? Does everyone make their moves mid-film? I have never watched a movie with a girl at home *before* actually having sex. 

I guess just go with the flow and see how the night progresses? Any comments?

&amp;#x200B;

PD: What movies do you recommend? I would personally go with a comedy to keep things light, but it might kill the mood. Or maybe get into the Halloween mood and watch a horror film?",seduction
What is the proper way to slide in a girls dm's?,"To give more info on this so its easier to answer based on the details:

\- Me and the girl have never talked in real life before

\- I cannot talk to her in real life as we do not go to the same school anymore. We did last year though.

\- She follows me back on instagram and actually likes my pictures and views my stories, so she isn't a complete ghost towards me.

So what would be the right thing to do? I have read other posts where most people say to just say ""Hey"" and see where it goes.",seduction
Need some help with building sexual tension and escalation,"I've been having great success recently with meeting girls on campus that I click with and have engaging and playful conversations with but I'm totally clueless as to how to progress to something more.

Yesterday is a great example. After dance class I started talking to this girl, found out we were heading in the same direction so we walked back together. Had a great conversation, she's usually reserved in dance class but she talked her head off and was very expressive. When we got to where we were supposed to split off we ended up deciding to make a circuit so we could talk longer. She kept close to me the whole time.

Now, I'm reviewing and trying to see what I could have done better. When I asked her what her plans for the evening were she said nothing. Then, I didn't want to seem needy or overeager because I'm going to bump into her again in dance class either way, but maybe I should have pushed for a coffee date or something? We hugged goodnight but should I have done something physical before that? I got her number too but I haven't texted her yet... What steps should I take? Is there some material that I should take a look at that explains in detail how and when to escalate? I know this is a long read but any help will be really appreciated.",seduction
The greatest day is the year is upon us,"Well technically Halloween isn’t until Wednesday but this is pseudo Halloween. So go out be whoever you want and act a fool behind a mask!

And if anyone is in the Tampa/st Pete area, I’m new here and would like to meet a few of you, let me know if you’re up for up to get a group going.

HAPPY HALLOWEEN",seduction
She can't stop talking,"I've been talking to this girl (in person) and I think she likes me (messages me often, flirty stuff etc. It's pretty obvious) But the thing is, she really is talking 80/90% of the time.. she talks for a minute or two straight, I slide a couple words in and it all repeats lmao. I read that it's a good thing that a girl does the most talking but this is just too much I think... I also feel like I don't add anything and makes me feel like the connection is not fully there. Any advice? ",seduction
thoughts on models by mark manson,"hi everyone, so I'm a female in college, and I've been reading models by mark Manson. originally it was just out of curiosity because I've read a lot of his blog online, but the more I read the more I feel like the mindsets he talks about can definitely be applied to female mindsets too (although it is geared towards males). anyways, I was wondering what your guys' takes on it are? I know that it's not a traditional PUA book as it emphasizes compatibility over getting every girl's number or whatever, but I think it's really good and even more than a PUA book, its a good mindset for life in general. im just curious what anyone in particular thinks or what the general consensus on the book is here in the seduction community mostly dominated by men looking to attract women. (PS. if you haven't read I highhhhly recommend, I think its one of those books that has the ability to really change your life/perspective on things.)",seduction
"I've been trying to be more in tune with my sexuality, but I'm feeling fucking wild. Need to know if I'm on the right track?","Hey seddit, longtime lurker here in need of some guidance!

&amp;nbsp;

To give you some background, I'm senior in college graduating in April, and I'm trying to make the most of my final months!  I've always had great social skills, I can approach and have a conversation with literally anyone, and I have a strong self of self, but this never really translated to success with girls. I lost my virginity in a drunk hookup in my sophomore year, and have only had sex once after that (so twice in my life lol). 

&amp;nbsp;

A couple months ago, I came across u/eviiil's post on [how to give off a more sexual vibe as opposed a friendly/platonic vibe](https://www.reddit.com/r/seduction/comments/4r4y79/how_to_give_off_more_of_a_sexuallover_vibe/), and really tried to take his advise to heart, as I felt that this might be what was holding me back. I paired that with Mark Manson's advise in Models, where he talks about stuff like how we should envision having sex with the hot girls that we encounter as a way to get more comfortable with our desires. So I spent time working on embracing my sexuality and made other changes in my life like eating better, joining my school's boxing club for fitness, etc.

&amp;nbsp;

However, I've noticed that as time goes on, my sexual aggressiveness is going off the charts. There are times where I see a girl and get this overwhelming feeling of just walking up to her and being like ""woman, I really wanna fuck your brains out right now"". There's a part of me that feels repulsed for feeling this way, but at the same time, there's another part of me feels like I gotta just fucking go and just let it all out, if that makes any sense. 

&amp;nbsp;

And its not just with random, hot girls I see walking by on campus either. Even my feelings towards my female friends have changed. I'm looking at them like they're completely different people and I basically wanna fuck their brains out too. My masturbation habits have changed too, now I'm more likely to get turned on and jerk off to girls I know as opposed to porn, which just feels so fucking weird, but feels so much better.

&amp;nbsp;

So far, I've been restraining my emotions because I'm scared I'm going off track here, and I'm just struggling to figure out if this is normal and how I can go about handling all of this the right way. Is this type of aggressiveness normal? Have I gone too far/done something wrong? Should I express that level of sexual desire to the women I come across? What do I do seddit?? I feel like some sexually repressed dude who just let everything out in a really short period of time.

Thanks!!",seduction
33M in Toronto - Where do I begin?,"Moved here a few years ago, but don't know many people in the city.  I feel like it's difficult at this age to try to hang out at clubs (especially as a solo individual which I am not inclined to do).  What are some good hotspots or activities here to meet and interact with women (ideally in the 24-33 year old age group).  I've looked at meetups but they've always been fairly uninteresting.",seduction
NEED A PEP TALK!,"hey guys, I am a recently divorced guy in his early 50s, I should know better and grow up right? I can't help myself though when I see these hot 20, 30 somethings running around ... I had a few years right before I met my wife like 10 years ago where I was hitting the ball pretty good, I would say I was getting pretty good at cold approaching and was banging women I could NOT BELIEVE, meaning they were so hot I was pinching myself, asking am I dreaming that I am banging this woman right now? lol ... but, in general, my town TOTALLY SUCKS for game, i rarely see an attractive woman and now my confidence is kind of shot, having been divorced and feeling old, I've also quit drinking so the whole loud bar scene is just annoying to me now, but, let me cut to the chase as to why I am posting right now ----&gt;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

EMERGENCY SITUATION LOL - on my way home I noticed a local bar is throwing a huge event with tents out front and what not, I said, fuck it, and paid the cover and went in and for the first time in a year I saw more hot chicks all in once place that I could handle, but this is the loud party scene and all and the girls all are younger than me, I just choked and went home, this party is going on for about 4 more hours and it kills me I'm being a pussy, feeling old and lame and not working that situation .... if I could somehow flip a switch, even at my age, I know I could walk out of there with at least a few phone numbers of a few hotties, but just would rather Netflix it up and be a bum ....

&amp;#x200B;

I WISH I COULD JUST FORCE MYSELF TO GO DO THIS ... just looking for others who can relate to all this, especially on the age and sobriety issue?  I just feel like with the not drinking and my age women would be bored as fuck with me",seduction
"Best Course/Book for changing life becoming more Productive, focussed, leader &amp; not a push over?","Hi Guys,   


So I was into PUA for a short time and know some of the basic stuffs.   
I have a girlfriend for a long time and want to sustain that relationship, but at the same time I want to invest myself and be a better version of my self.   


Currently I am facing with these issues:-  (being 100% honest)  
1. Procrastination  
2. Socially less Active   
3. Not a leader   
4. Kind of a nice guy (a push over)  
5. A little less self esteem.   


  
So, what should i do for this? Which course or book should i go for?   


And can Invincible or Status by Jason can help me?

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks :)

&amp;#x200B;

  
",seduction
HK: Looking for wingmen / mates to party,"Hi guys,

I'll be heading to HK this coming weekend and will be there for a week. Travelling solo. Looking for wingmen and mates so we can go pick up either day game or hitting up bars and clubs in LKF and what not.

I am in my late 20s. Asian descent. Decent looking and built.

Hit me up if you're interested. ",seduction
Why does every girl ask me if im a virgin?,"Context: I'm a 21 year old college student. I've had in multiple occasions come across women and men who automatically assume I'm a virgin. While they're unfortunately right, how can they just tell? Why are people so ballsy to say that too?
I was at a Halloween party just recently and a girl I'm really into, but consider each other friends, asked me in front of all our friends if I was a virgin. It got awkward real quick, I blew it off by saying, ""that's sounds like a personal problem for you"" laughing it off. 

Has anyone else experienced a way where their vibes are just screaming virgin? It's honestly destroying my self confidence and I have class with this girl every day practically...",seduction
Should I stop being friendly?!,"I'm a person who appears so decent,wise and respectful from a distance, When I get comfortable and friendly around people, my hyperactive, super funny(maybe over joking) and very talkative side appears.
The point is that I feel that when people get friendly around me , the decent, wise badass impression goes away, they trrat me in a different way that they used to when I'm formal with them.
The point is that I get friendly with people so fast, I'm super sociable.
Should I stop being that friendly ?
or should I be less friendly or adabt more slowly or should I keep being myself !",seduction
How To Stop Being Needy. Why Neediness Is The Mother Of All F*ck Ups And How To Avoid That Mindset.,,seduction
What happens when you tell someone that you like them?,Good idea or nah? Real talk,seduction
Post a picture with my female friends on social media?,"does it create a good impression for future girls viewing my instagram? (I already have a few pics with male friends) ‭‭

Just started university and didn’t talk much to girls before uni so soz if this is a dumb question :p ",seduction
I'm in a weird spot in which I don't know how to advance from.,"We've already texted for two weeks, and I have already double texted her, she doesn't seem bothered by the double texts at all actually. She does sometimes not answer my text, she has done it three times already and she also let me know that she sometimes does that because she's not constantly looking at her phone or she's simply busy with life. Should I continue to double text? Or should I stop this time and wait to see if she texts back on her own? I really like this girl and I would rather not fuck this up. And I feel like I'm walking a very thin line between fucking up and actually being able to reach a point of mutual understanding. ",seduction
How to Car-Flirt? (Starting a date by driving to her house),"This post is about physical escalation, flirting, and logistics of being in a car with your date. 

So you get a girl's number and you get her on a date with you... Two options logistically speaking are: 

1: Meet her at the date location. 

2: Drive to her house and go to the date location together.

___________________________________________________

This post is about doing #2: **how do you proceed with physical escalation?**

After you drive to her house/apartment, do you guys prefer to sit inside the car and text her and wait for her to get in? Do you prefer to knock on her front door? Do you prefer standing outside your car, texting her, and waiting for her?

Sitting inside your car and waiting for her will probably be the most platonic ""friend"" thing to do, so I would probably not do that one. (It's also hard to hug her when you have your seatbelt on so at the very least, unbuckle your seatbelt so you can hug her.)

So I'd probably wait for her outside my car and hug her as a greeting, lead her to the car, and then maybe open her door (Some guys open doors. Some guys never do. Take your pick. It really doesn't matter.)

__________________________________________________

Cool. So that's settled. Good way to start off the interaction.

**My question for this subreddit is the following: In the drive to the date location, what flirting/teasing/physical escalation tactics do you guys do?** 


",seduction
"During meditation, I had this realization about an ego trap I would always fall into","They always say here not to put a girl on a pedestal, and its true, but I had a deeper realization about why I used to put a girl on a pedestal. This would occur usually when I met girl who was attracted to me and I was attracted to her. I would be kinda weird (though there's no way I'm alone in this guys, come on) and stalk her Instagram photos and practically drool over the pics. ""Oh man her body is perfect, her skin is glowing, her smile brightens up the whole room, and SHE is attracted to ME?"" And THAT is where the ego trap hides. 

I would refuse to admit that a girl possessed a single flaw because I was stroking my own ego in telling myself that a perfect girl is attracted to me. If I were to nitpick a girl's physical flaws and realize that she isn't actually a perfect 10, then I would be hurting my ego, so that is why I unconsciously upheld the illusion (or rather delusion) of perfection.

Just thought I'd share this realization in hopes that it may help some others realize that they are caught in this cycle.",seduction
"The #1 thing that stops me from cold approaching a random girl is the fact that my face would turn really red, anyone else experience this? What's a good way to stop this from happening?","I don't even necessarily care about the rejection part, I've cold approached once before, turning really red, I actually got the number , but I feel like it makes me look really unconfident and embarrassed, which is probably true.",seduction
"What does being ""polarizing"" mean to you?","This word is tossed around RSD and pickup forums a lot, to me it means making sure you are grounded in your masculine energy so you can basically strong-arm your way past any bullshit she might toss at you. I'm 24, I look a few years younger than i am (i look 18-19) so being polarizing with college girls has been a bit harder. But it's mostly psychological, i just remind myself of all the shit i've been through and how i've been living in the real world since i moved out at 19, so rationally, there is no reason i should be intimidated by daddy's little girl who went off to college and now acts tough like she's hot shit. Thoughts?",seduction
Has anyone ever been cold approached by a girl?,"I had girls talk to me in school or whatever, but never had a girl actively cold approach on the street. I'm walking down an empty street and this girl is just standing using her phone. Look wise she was super average. Anyways I walk past her and she starts following me. 2 minutes later she makes a comment asking if there's a garbage near by. I'm like yeah one is right there and she's like oh thanks.  Then asks where I'm heading and I say got to meet a friend, she's like I'm just going home. Idk if that was a sign she wanted me to come over or if I'm just overthinking it now. We talked for a bit and then when we had to go our separate ways she asks for my number and I'm like yeah sure. Gave her my number and we walked off. 

Never had a girl on the street talk to me first and then ask me for my number. Anyone ever experience this? Have to say it was fucking awesome to see a girl do this on her own!",seduction
Experience using mode one recently?,"For those who read the Mode One book. What are your thoughts on it?

I reread it and have been applying it and the reactions are 1000% way more harsh 

Talking to a 3 set and telling them I might have a crush on them and immediately after 2 of them started literally running way. The other 1 seemed to not want to leave when they did but think the pier pressure just had her leave too. 

The next set got a fairly hard blowout too. 

As someone’s who’s been gaming a while the rejection seem really harsh so wanted to know what others thought ",seduction
"Field Report: 5 Sober Approaches during Night game, All failed","3/5 of the approaches the girl had a bf. One was two girls where I tried to open with a compliment, but they didn't stop walking, they did say thanks though.

The most interesting encounters was this girl in sort of like a fitness outfit. My opener was good and natural, and I offered to buy her a drink. She was coming along with me, but her story  signaled all these red flags for me. She was homeless, looking for work, had 3 kids, her man or w/e was in prison. I mean, I basically evacuated the set on this girl, but I have abandonment issues from childhood. One part of me looks at this as self rejection, another part realizes why my brain wasn't so comfortable in this situation, and maybe I was just rejecting her here, as crazy as that sounds.

If you were in the same position, what would have you all done? Lets say she is pretty hot like a 8/10, good body, young. long brunet / reddish hair. Have you ever evacuated a set because of some type of childhood trauma triggers?

Even though all my approaches failed I have some positive reflection on the experience:

* I considered different ways I could have approached some of those sets. (improvement for next time)
* all 5 approaches were sober, which is a win to me, I sometimes get a drink or two but rarely too many. (I hope to keep it that way)
* It was the most sober approaches I've done in one outing.

I've also noticed a really big weakness in my game. When I am getting somewhat uncomfortable in an interaction I part ways. Some nights I have been able to be the last man standing, but I think too often I am avoiding situations because I don't always have the best thing to say. I just need more time to develop myself and perhaps recognizes that while I'm improving my social game I'm not always gonna be the perfect social butterfly.

The last topic I wanted to bring up is resilience with approaching. Does it make sense to look at approach anxiety like lifting weights? The reason I say this is, I feel worn out after those 5 approaches, and yet I hear about others doing 10+ multiple days a week. Do you need to recover some after a night, and the next night it becomes easier?",seduction
Need some quick tips - gonna go to Halloween party in a few hours.,"Meeting at a friends house at 7-8 then going to his girlfriends for the party. We are all college seniors above drinking age so it should be fun and wild with lots of booze.

However, I have always been shy and awkward, and have never actually gone to a college party before. The only party I've ever been to was more like a small get together of stoners in high school.

Gonna leave in a few hours, need some quick tips on how to acclimate and not panic. I can sometimes get really anxious in new environments, but I have been studying seduction inner/outer game for 2 months now and feel like I have some more control. 

This is really gonna be the first time I try to be outgoing and talk to girls and have fun and potentially escalate, I was just hoping I could get some encouragement or tips that you guys have from personal experience when it comes to house parties. 

Thanks in advance.",seduction
This sub has helped me become so much better at getting interest.. but I need help closing the deal,"I’ve had confidence issues for as long as I can remember. I’ve always noticed that I would behave VERY differently around women I was attracted to, which looking back at it now probably means I was adjusting every facet of my personality to please whatever attractive girl who gave me the time of day. 

I went through a bad breakup last winter which made me question my self worth harder than I ever had. I eventually found my way on this subreddit. Because of all of this community’s posts and insights, I now have no fear when it comes to talking to a girl I’m attracted to and being 100% genuine and authentic. 

A bit of background: I’ve worked as a night club DJ for 4 years now (I’m aware that puts me in a great advantageous position.. I only started taking advantage of it recently). I can spark interest pretty easily and I can usually hook up with around 2-4 girls a night when it’s not my set. 

Here’s my problem, I can’t get one to come home with me.. and I can’t figure out why. I know a couple other DJs that can do it with relative ease and I would like to get to that point as well. 

The way this social situation is set up is usually the girls have to introduce themselves to me. I’ve become decent at using eye contact, tone of voice, and a confident attitude to spark interest. Then I wait for a good moment to start some kind of physical escalation. Usually I can pick up the signs very well as I haven’t had physical escalation rejected yet. 

More often then not, they clearly show signs of wanting to hook up, but I haven’t developed any plans to convince them to finish their night at my place. I usually suggest they come back to my place after a while or physical escalation/hooking up but I keep getting excuses as to why they can’t. So I just get their number or SC instead. 

So what can I add, take away, or improve on to get better results when the night is over? Is there any tips you can throw my way? Any help would be appreciated!

TL:DR - can finally get girls’ interest and have had really good success with kino as of late, but I need help accomplishing the final step.. bringing a girl back to my place!",seduction
​Post-Breakup Game SOS,"So quick story short.

I just got out of a more/less half a year relationship a week ago. It hit me like a truck, I fucked up bad, I let myself fall for this girl and I've sped a lot of time with her, sometimes it almost seemed like she was the main thing in my life rather than my career. Anyway I learned from that, never happening again. I went out yesterday to bunch of parties, I do calisthenics  so I figure I'm somewhat attractive , I noticed women looking at me and smiling, BUT **I did absolutely  nothing**. It wasn't that I didn't think I could get them, I literally had no drive  to do anything, but then again I had a bit of fear in the back of my mind. Literally one girl tired to dance with me, and I danced for like 2 minutes maybe, then left. I was completely out of it. Best way to summarize it would be : I gave 0 fucks about any girl in there, ones or tens, didn't matter.

&amp;#x200B;

Is this normal post breakup? Or is this something else? Or am I being a little bitch?  Should I push myself to talk/flirt with women even if I don't feel like it?",seduction
Good looking but boring?,"So I know I’m fairly good looking, I get checked out noticeably by fairly attractive chicks and have good body language and am good at getting chicks on the dance floor, but it seems whenever I talk too much my attractiveness goes way down. 

For example. Brought a chick back from a club one night. We slept together and the whole next week she drunk snaps me, texts, etc. next week rolls around and she BEGS me multiple times to go to a hockey game with her and friends. So I show up and we chat for a bit and after the game she says she’s going back to her place to get changed and will meet me at the bars. I then got ghosted and she deleted my snap😂

That’s a more extreme example, but seems to show a pattern, I’m attractive when aloof, but seem to mess up the talking parts, I guess I’m just boring, or I lower my “mysterious ness”. Any thoughts or advice to similar stories?

PS: And I don’t think it’s my voice, I’ve been told I have a good one",seduction
What are the indicators that I should walk away after a successful approach?,"I went out alone to practice game last night at this local bar. I get to the bar and start talking to the first people I see to get myself in a social mood. I see a seat empty next to a girl who I thought was kind of attractive and who was there to watch a World Series game with her friend (who was a guy) and did somewhat of an indirect approach to strike up the conversation and later on showing intent by saying ""i actually find you mildly attractive"" with some added push-pull in between. 

A few minutes in and I notice this girl is just talkative as fuck so i let her talk a bit whilst interjecting when I get the chance to neg or push-pull based on her reactions or what she's saying. It took me a while to physically escalate but when I did it was moving smoothly. At the peak of the sexual tension we made out. 

After a while [2 to 2-1/2 hours] I noticed her attention was going elsewhere and the sexual tension was dissipating really fast; I was trying to build as much comfort as possible to eliminate the need for a Day 2 but it worked against me. I was able to number close her but then I was ghosted thereafter. I noticed my major mistake was staying too long.

What indicators can help me determine when it's time to go? I'm a low-intermediate player and seem oblivious to this.

TL;DR: went out alone, met this girl at the bar table and did some push-pull that went ""well"", made out with her, and lingered a bit too long which killed the attraction",seduction
Infield In London &amp; Berlin - Picking Up British &amp; German Girls,,seduction
What to do when you feel like you've reached the top?,"Hi all.  Mildly successful secret seductionist here.  Simple question, I feel like I've hit my peak with my last pull, how do I say ""fuck it, I'm going to keep aiming higher even though it may never happen lmao""?  
&amp;nbsp;  
Just kidding y'all.  Always say that because you will always get a hotter piece.  Keep grindin.",seduction
"""Do not go chasing butterflies, tend to your own garden and the butterflies will come.""",A quote which I think is relevant to this subreddit.,seduction
I don't have the energy for clubs,"I mainly club in Toronto, and lately every time I club I just get really bored and tired really quick, most clubs I go to are filled with guys and play music that I don't jam to, even though I like a wide range of music. I like to dance but most clubs are so packed there's barely any room to move, and most music is just trap music or all base. What's the alternative though? ",seduction
Do you guys ever find yourself just randomly not taking opportunites and feeling stupid later?,"Quick context: I'm backpacking south america solo, had a girlfriend back home before that. (We broke up before I left, as many couples do.) 

I am in a college town and was at a nightclub a couple nights ago.
A girl joined our group who was a great dancer, and I told her so, and she was instantly into me. Started dancing with me, being super affectionate, not wanting me to leave, introducing me to her friends, etc.

Well, the night goes on and even though I find her cool and attractive I get really ambivalent for some reason don't make a move to kiss her and bring her to the hostel (and I'm quite sure that I could have at many points.) At one point I walk away to come back and see her making out with another dude so I thought ""well, that's the end of that"" but I didn't really find myself caring all that much at the time. I presume that she decided I was boring since I wasn't making a move and just went with someone else.

When I first got here I was so keen on meeting girls that I wasn't really having fun because I was focusing on that so much, so I decided to relax a bit and not be in such a rush. I think I have been so caught up in focusing on myself, chilling out, and not feeling like I have to prove something, that I don't take opportunities that I do get. I've been kicking myself since that night and hoping that I get another opportunity soon. I was really wanting to meet girls and then one falls right into my lap and I don't go for it.

Have any of y'all had similar experiences? Just suddenly getting really ambivalent all of a sudden? What did you do to overcome it?

",seduction
How to Daygame in 5 Minutes | BEGINNER TUTORIAL,,seduction
How to Stop Worrying | Outcome Dependence (why you have it and how to fix it),,seduction
In a nightclub setting; what are some conversation topics that lead to sexy flirting?,A short list of like 3 topics would be nice.,seduction
How to kiss a girl?,"Hello fellas.
This is a problem I been getting lately, at concerts, parties or when hanging out. I have overcome most of my anxiety and can approach girls without much awkwardness and can get conversation going, so there have  been quite some instances when I get to approach a girl and I know there is some chemistry going and I know that if said or do something I could get to the next step you know, like today, was at a party with a friend of my friend and we were talking and laughing and I know they are very open minded about sex and stuff (usually I hang out with people like that) and it started raining so I got my umbrella and there were two girls and me talking very close, a little drunk so it was a bit intimate (this is an example of other instances where I know that if I did something we could do more than talk) but nothing happened, because I did nothing for it to happen.

So what should I do? 

Can I kiss you? 

I don't know, and it has been frustrating that I have missed many opportunities .
",seduction
What do you think of parties(usually fraternities) that allow only women or specific individuals. Is that a bad way to meet women?,"I’m asking because I’ve noticed maybe I have no morals but I’m at a point my life where I don’t really want competition when trying to get with women. So if I’m hosting a party with a ton of people I would must rather more women than guys. I’ve been told that’s not a good thing to do, even by people who encourage me to talk to women(they were women). But I felt like I’d ask this community just to see people’s thoughts. I’ve just been in charge of hosting parties with my roommates and there’s always girls or whatever wanting to invite their plus one who happens to be a guy.  

For example I was discussing with some people if we should allow plus ones and something that came up was like only if it’s their significant other but the way I see it is that then we should invite singles as well. Maybe I’m just lonely or thirsty but something about partying with a bunch of couples doesn’t seem fun.",seduction
"Is it okay to start talking to and potentially date a ""friends"" sister?","Reason why I wrote ""friends"" is because we aren't really friends. He was in my graduating class of high school, we graduated last year and we never hung out outside of school. In school, he would talk to me randomly out of no where. For example, one day I could pass him in the halls and he wouldn't even notice me and other days he would come up to me in the lunch line and talk to me. We knew each other cause of mutual friends and he took an interest in one of my hobbies and wanted to know more about it but he didn't really succeed with that. Would it be weird or anything to dm his sister and start talking to her? I asked my good friends their opinion and they said they do not think its weird and if I want, i should ask him first, but i feel that would be awkward to message him for the first time in like 1.5 years asking if i can talk to his sister.

&amp;#x200B;

About his sister and me, we have never talked to one another in real life or anything, we just follow each other on instagram and that is literally it. Also, I say DM his sister because she is still in HS and like i said earlier, i graduated last year, so i cant talk to her in person...",seduction
How does seduction change when you transition into your 30s?,"I'll be turning 29 in a few weeks, and it has really hit hard me lately how old i'm getting and how fast time is passing by. Through my 20s I never really fathomed that this time in my life would come to an end eventually, and now that 30 is getting close I wonder how my life will change, and to be honest it gives me some anxiety and is actually kind of scary. My early and mid 20s were pretty unsuccessful with women. I graduated college a virgin and lost my virginity at 23, and my mid 20s had some success, but it was lacking because I had to work on myself. The past couple years I've had some success with dating, sex, socialization, etc but I'm still not happy with myself and still have more to improve. 

&amp;#x200B;

My concern is that your 30s are a different time in your life, and I'm not sure what to expect. Can I get as many women as I could in my 20s? Can my sex life be just as good or better? I think about this a lot now, and I think worrying about it is going to take me back a step. Basically I feel as if there was a lot of lost and wasted time in my 20s, and I don't want to have the mindset of ""making up for lost time"" because of it. What is lost is lost and that is hard to accept and move on from. 

&amp;#x200B;

I'm looking to hear from others in this sub how seduction has changed as they got older, and what myself and all of us can expect. 

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
I Want to Share my Most Successful Technique With you All (The Option),"This technique is a fundamental staple to my game and I wanted to share it with you all, as I've had the most success with it. I'm sure it has a more technical name, but I like to call it *""The Option""*. I rate the level of difficulty for implementing this technique as Beginner-Intermediate. But it can be implemented in advanced ways.

&amp;nbsp;

When having an interaction with a girl, and you are going for the close with her, always: **blatantly give her the option to leave or not continue with the interaction**. 

&amp;nbsp;

A good example of this would be asking a girl for her number. ""Hey, so it's been pretty fun just talking you seem pretty cool, to be honest. Do you want to trade numbers?"" She replies with, ""I don't know"" or ""Ehhh"". This usually signals she's unsure about whether she should continue and/or feels pressured to respond. I would respond with, ""Alright how about this, I'll hand you my number shoot me a text if you want to. **You don't have to though, totally up to you.** I just figured it'd be pretty dope to hang out etc. etc."" 

&amp;nbsp;

The bolded phrase is giving her the option this is the key point, and It does two things:

* First, it takes the pressure off of her because ""Purportedly the phrase weakens the target’s perception that her or his freedom to say ‘‘no’’ is being threatened"" [(Carpenter, 2013)](https://www.researchgate.net/publication/234839851_A_Meta-Analysis_of_the_Effectiveness_of_the_But_You_Are_Free_Compliance-Gaining_Technique)
* Secondly, it shows your comfortable with yourself, and that not committed to any sort of outcome (or maintaining your outcome independance)

&amp;nbsp; 

This method works when applied correctly and I've used it with probably 80-90% of my approaches if not all of them. From my experience, most women love when things happen organically since romanticism is so prevalent in the U.S. many have the idea that romantic interactions should happen much like a movie script. Where the guy is cool and calm and confident, this technique definitely gives you that sort of aura. Also, I want to mention that the exact wording can be varied you don't have to say EXACTLY one phrase. 

&amp;nbsp;

*""the exact wording of the technique has varied, but it always emphasizes the targets right to say ‘‘no.’’ For example, Gue´guen et al. (2011) found the phrase ‘‘But obviously do not feel obliged’’ (p. 36) is just as effective as the standard ‘‘but you are free.’’ The studies that have varied the phrasing but consistently emphasized the target’s freedom have uncovered no substantial differences in the technique’s effectiveness across the variations in wording.""*
 [(Carpenter, 2013)](https://www.researchgate.net/publication/234839851_A_Meta-Analysis_of_the_Effectiveness_of_the_But_You_Are_Free_Compliance-Gaining_Technique)

&amp;nbsp;

 Most recently I've had a girl tell me this: 

&amp;nbsp;
Her: ""You know, when first meeting you I wasn't really sure if I should hang out with you or not it was a little forward but you said something that really stuck out."" 

&amp;nbsp;
Me: ""What?""

&amp;nbsp;
Her: ""You said that I could text your or not, you gave me the option to leave, a lot of guys are controlling or power hungry so they don't do that but you, you're different. 

&amp;nbsp;
Me: (Fuck yeah) 

&amp;nbsp;
Her: ""What was that?"" 

&amp;nbsp;
Me: Nothing I just had a seizure don't worry about it, wanna hit the hot tubs? 

&amp;nbsp;
(End Scene)

&amp;nbsp;

All in all, this tactic can be applied in all walks of life. In a business transaction for example, when a buyer seems interested and then starts to walk away, the seller will chase the buyer hoping to not lose the sale. More importantly to us, I find it most useful when you're getting ""frozen out"" or when you're trying to have sex with a girl and she's not having. It might be slightly more advanced but you can say something like this: ""It'd be cool if we fucked (or had sex), but if not the doors right there, you can leave when you want, or we can just hang out and not fuck too. Play some video games, snuggle. Whatever you wanna do."" 

&amp;nbsp;

Women love this shit sometimes. Sometimes they want you to take control and say ""no let's fuck right now."" But most of the time they want the option on the table, here's the thing though *they want the option* they don't necessarily want the activity. 

&amp;nbsp;

I hope this helped you guys out if you didn't know this, and if you did know this I'm glad I could remind you about it! I love game and seduction and I think attraction is extremely important when trying to get any goal your after when it comes to seduction. Whether that be a relationship, casual sex, a cougar, or whatever you're into. Whatever it is *you must know how to attract the other person* it is a fundamental part of relationship psychology. Feel free to message me anytime you have any questions I'd love to help!

&amp;nbsp;

Caio Bellas,

&amp;nbsp;
Fear

&amp;nbsp;

Side Note: /u/Innergamedude posted a really great meta-analysis study that talks about this technique in terms of communication and is centered simply around gaining compliance. I wanted to highlight this study just for your reading. **I recommend reading this if you have the time, but of course, you are free not to read it.**

[Link to the article] (https://www.researchgate.net/blog/post/read-this-but-of-course-you-are-free-to-refuse)

&amp;nbsp;
[Link to the research paper] (https://www.researchgate.net/publication/234839851_A_Meta-Analysis_of_the_Effectiveness_of_the_But_You_Are_Free_Compliance-Gaining_Technique)

&amp;nbsp;

Edit: I've made a ton of edits and I'm gonna make a ton more probably, also added some evidence from a meta-analysis 

&amp;nbsp;
Wow upvoted to #2 in r/seduction! Thank you guys I appreciate all the support :)



",seduction
"""Afraid of commitment"" translates to??","Met this girl and went out on a date, things went really well. 

She told me she's inexperienced and want to take things slow. Fine. But now after the first date, she is being flaky whenever I ask if she wants to hang out. She still texts me every single day about random shit and I heard from her friends that she talks about me a lot, but she has become less flirty and responsive. Her friends have warned me that she is afraid of commitment and has friendzoned every single guy who has tried to be with her. 

&amp;#x200B;

What do I do? I feel like if I keep pursuing, she will back off and I will lose her. 

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks. ",seduction
"When you're in a relationship, how do you get over the desire to go out sarging?","I've been with the same girl since June and I love her very much. However, I can't shake this desire to hit the bars and do some approaches. When I'm out in public and I see a beautiful woman, even women who are less attractive than my gf, I feel bad that I can't go talk to them.

I got into game 2-3 years ago and it has led to more personal growth than anything else in my life. Since June I've tried to focus more on my career and other aspects of my life, but it just isn't the same. 

Do you have any tips for getting over the desire to game?",seduction
2 lessons I learned last night,"TLDR: 1 - If a girl start dancing with you, just ask for her name, she's already into you.

2 - White-knighting leads to nowhere.


I'm a 26 year old guy and i've only recently started my seduction path. I'm still too shy to actually do anything, but small steps like last night matter to me, even if it leads me to nowhere.

Last night I went out alone, just to put myself out there. I started the night on a bar where a coworker also part-times, got myself a few free beers and just warmed my dance moves. Brazilian funk is not my thing and it clearly showed to the girls around me, as they showed absolutely no interest in me.

But after that I went to my favorite bar, as it passes hard rock, punk and metal, and just started headbanging and dancing. Lots of energy.

Queue the girl that started to dance with me. I smiled and just kept headbanging. Did nothing. And eventually she started dancing with other guys. I eventually asked for her name, but at that point it was too little too late (also I still have no idea what to say after introductions). That lead me to lesson 1.

A bit after, one of her friends was leaning against the wall. I just went in and asked her if she was alright. She said she was tired and about to leave. Me, being the Nice Guy, told her that I was going to take her home. We talked for the duration of the walk and nothing. And that lead me to lesson 2.

Thank you for reading and I hope my mistakes help you somehow.",seduction
"the ""asshole"" guys aren't always assholes...","If you go out a lot or hang out with partiers chances are you've come across the guys who are really bold, loud, and often obnoxious. In my earlier days i used to feel more threatened by them or as if their behavior was actually an indicator conflict....more recently however i've just found that these are just the hardcore partier type and sometimes they are simply testing your social comfort zone. same with girls too, i think they are just trying to see whether you are something they want to fuck with. thoughts??",seduction
GAME ON,I noticed recently that the gym has some godly works on display. These women are incredible solid 11’s and their rocking it! They are practically naked perfect specimens their symmetry is incredible....perfect waist hips butt and breasts......living action figures if you will....and their are plenty of them.....so I wondered would it be a bad idea to game the gym.....daily....I can work out and game at the same time.....what do you think? Bad to game in the same place all the time or not? ,seduction
[HELP]😭😭,"I've been not in a relationship with any girl before in my life ...but from this month I've joined a new college where I get to see lots of girls...I feel so much anxious and nervous when I feel like approaching a girl..
1)when she's with a friend.

2)when she's alone.

I don't know how to approach.... please help me 😭😭😭😭😭😭😭",seduction
"Kino problem, question","&amp;#x200B;

Usually i grab their hands and talk about how smooth or dry their hands are, or i check the jewelry and comment on it. 

Now my problem is the next time, could be the same date or a second time we meet up, sometimes its all good from the hug and thinks just go smooth,

But what do you guys do when the mood just isn't there from the start on a second third or whatever time you see her, to be really physical, I figured i just need to escalate again like at the first date but i cant keep repeating the same gimmicks on the same girls , i recently had a girl say to me, yeah yeah we know about the dry hands LOL.

&amp;#x200B;

Suggestions?

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
Sex Will Only Ever Be A Temporary High,"There are two types of happiness - stimulation and fulfilment. 

**Stimulation** describes the temporary highs you get from sex, drugs and alcohol, as well as  engaging in hobbies or media consumption.  **Fulfilment** is the long-term satisfaction you have with being yourself. 

I got into pick-up artistry thinking it would provide **both** types of happiness.  

Yes, more sex is something we all want from practicing this art. But I thought sleeping with 9s and 10s would also make me feel better about myself. I'm sure I'm not the only one...  

# That's not how it works though...  

Pick-up artistry brought me lots of adventures. It made my life way more fun. It brought a lot more stimulation. It improved my social skills and taught me more about masculinity. It led me to better friends. It even helped me develop the bravery to travel the world solo.

It was these things that brought the fulfilment. Then, the 9s and 10s started dropping their panties. A lot of people think the fitties precede the fulfilment, but it's the other way around.   

Don't make the mistake of thinking your self-image will skyrocket the second you stick your dick in a model-looking chick.

# Here's how I learned this... 

I still remember how I felt after sleeping with my first '10' in Bali, then another woman the next day. This achievement was supposed to be the key to permanently feeling amazing. It wasn't. Other than feeling a bit disappointed they were gone (both tourists heading back to their own country), I felt exactly the same. Luckily, by this point, 'exactly the same' was a pleasant hum of self-esteem.)

The point is: **you'll never find fulfilment in the external**, whether it's money, status or women. You just end up wanting more... 

Sex with a great girl is like eating a great meal. You really want it if you're starving and it's really stimulating at the time. Yet, after you're done, you'll soon be back at your baseline mood. This really hit home when I found myself feeing horny within an hour of the second woman leaving.   

Making a '10' your girlfriend won't complete you either. 

As Eckart Tolle says: *""If you cannot be at ease with yourself when you are alone, you will seek a relationship to cover up your unease. You can be sure that the unease will then reappear in some other form within the relationship.""*

Then, once the relationship ends, you go back to being the same little bitch. The only relationship that will fulfil you is the one you have with **YOURSELF.**

# This is good news

This knowledge should be freeing, not depressing. 

It should allow you to only want the '10' for the stimulation of the sex, love and affection. 

Whether you get her or not ultimately has no bearing on your self-esteem. 

It's only the process of chasing her that helps bring fulfilment, as well as other things like friendships, health, hobbies and passions.

Once you realise this, 'approach anxiety' and 'oneitis' may seem kind of silly. 

# See for yourself

I still believe this game we play is one of the best ways to achieve fulfilment. But I now realise it's the lessons we learn from playing that fulfils us, not the fruits from winning.   

Maybe you have to get your first lay or your first 10 before you truly believe this message. I'd heard it from RSD instructors in the past, but only understood what they meant after the that crazy weekend in Bali.  

***I've co-launched a Telegram group for men who want to became amazing with women. Hundreds of guys sharing their success stories and getting advice on their sticking points. A real brotherhood. If you'd like to join, drop me a PM with your Telegram handle.*** ",seduction
Every mans worst words to hear from a woman when you try to set up a date:,"“I’ll let you know”

If I had a cent for every time a woman has said this to me from when I started dating, I would be going on holidays at least twice a year.

I know what that statement means but it’s just frustrating when they say it because 9.9/10 they will not let you know. Just wish women could be more honest about rejection. 

Only one woman I can ever recall DID in fact let me know a week late and I was astonished she did so.",seduction
What to do when you've gained the reputation of a sleazy guy?,"So all throughout my 18th year ive hooked up and slept with girls from clubs in bathrooms, one night stands and had a friends with benefits. 

Alcohol was involved and i blacked out a couple nights and apparently hit on my female friends in my group (according to them).

Theres nothing wrong with me hitting on them but with my history of getting around with ""trashy girls"" I've had a reputation of a sleezy guy.

Since i turned 19 ive only had a friends with benefits and have been fairly calm. I went out to one of my female friends bday and blacked out again.

This time nothing bad happened but i was ""holding her hand"" when she was walking me home and flirting. 

What hurts is that one of them is a really good friend and said she probably wouldnt recommend me to one of her friends.

Its not like i wanted to get with one of her friends but that just made me feel sleazy

Im looking for something more serious now so what can i do to stop having a shit reputation?

Im 20 now btw",seduction
Overcoming Limiting Beliefs &amp; Self Doubt,,seduction
Is this a good way to go about this?,"I’m acquainted with this guy through mutual friends (who are all gone now) and one of the girls he hangs with I found attractive and interesting when we all hung out once.

Seeming how our mutual friends are gone, would it be weird or ok if I reach out to him and say something along the lines of 

“Hey man, you think I could tag along with you and the crew, as I would like to get to know girl better”

He nor anyone else is seeing her and he has no intentions with her as he is kinda seeing her sister.

Any tips on going about this?",seduction
What to do when you’ve run out of things to say to a girl,"So I spend a lot of time coaching guys on how to not run out of things to say to girls. I show them the right mindset to have to keep their brains bubbling with conversation topics, and how to notice things about the environment or the girls they’re talking to that they can use for inspiration. All of that is essential stuff for any man to know.

But having said that; the fact is that until a guy has properly internalized those teachings he’s still gonna find himself completely lost for words at times and he needs to know how to navigate those situations. So just what the hell do you do in the moments when you realise you’ve got absolutely nothing to say and can’t come up with anything even slightly interesting? Well I’m gonna tell you that in a moment; but first, I’m going to explain exactly why guys fuck things up when they go silent because I promise you it’s not for the reasons you think. Also; when you know where you’ve been going wrong in the past you’ll be able to understand exactly why the solutions I’m giving you are so crucial. So are you ready?

&amp;#x200B;

**Here come the pain**

The reason why you often screw things up with girls when you go silent isn’t because you’ve stopped being interesting. Yes, girls want guys to evoke great emotions in them and yes a large part of that means communicating in a way that makes them feel good, but communication isn’t just about what you say. It’s also about your eye contact, facial expressions and body language. In fact, 93% of all communication is comprised of the above with only 7% coming from the actual words that are said. This basically means that when you’re talking to people, 93% of the message they get from you as well as how you make them feel is down to the vibe you're putting out rather than what you've specially said.

So what the hell has this got to do with getting tongue tied in front of the hot Latina in short shorts at the college cafeteria and having her slowly lose interest in you?

Well it’s got everything to do with it. You see, when you run out of things to say, you’re not just going silent but you’re starting to inwardly panic too. Stress hormones flood your nervous system and your brain goes into fight or flight mode as you’re frantically searching for the perfect witty line to say and calling yourself every disgusting insult under the sun for coming up with jack diddly shit.

And guess what happens next? That panic and turmoil starts to show right on your face as plain as the text you’re reading right now. Fear bulges from your eyeballs which are finding it hard to maintain contact with hers, your breathing gets quick and shallow, and your body goes stiff and rigid like a rotting zombie as every cell in your body inadvertently communicates to this girl that there’s some-thing massively wrong with you. Now one of two things is likely to happen at this point, either she’ll realise that you know you’re not good enough for her and end up agreeing with you (if you think you’re beneath her then why should she argue? Who knows you better than you?) or she’ll just think you’re weird. Either way, like I just said, she’ll start to lose interest in you, so here’s something you really need to remember:

&amp;#x200B;

**The problem isn’t that you’ve gone silent, it’s that you’ve started acting weird**

That’s the reason why you’ve screwed up it up with girls in the past. Because you let the fact that you had nothing to say damage your confidence. But there’s a couple of things you can do to make sure that this doesn’t happen to you again and I’ll list them here.

&amp;#x200B;

**Option number 1 - Admit it and hashtag own it**

I know this is gonna sound crazy but there’s absolutely no reason why you can’t just look her honestly in the eye and say:

“You know something? I’ve got absolutely nothing to say.”

Being completely honest and free from bullshit will drain the anxiety from your system and stop you from looking or acting weird in front of her. Also; it’ll ironically give the two of you something to talk about!

You might think she’ll judge you or decide you’re a loser because of it but unless she’s a complete bitch she actually won’t. She’ll just go:

“Really? How come??”

And will actually respect the fact that you had the balls to admit to it. Just remember that girls need to feel comfortable in your presence and by admitting to an insecurity you’re showing them that they can trust you. Also, there’s no reason why your running out of things to say has to be this weird and uncomfortable thing. You can have fun with it and treat it as something amusing. You’ll think of something to say soon and it’s not the end of the world. Anyway, this brings me onto:

&amp;#x200B;

**Option number 2 – Embrace the silence like a hashtag man**

As I’ve said before, it’s not running out of things to say that’s unattractive per se, it’s getting weird about it, so try embracing the silence. Say you and this girl are in the middle of a conversation when your mind goes blank then just shut the fuck up for a while and do so with a confident air about you. Keep your posture powerful, take deep breaths and **KEEP TELLING YOURSELF** that all’s good and that you’re in control. If you and her are making eye contact then hold it confidently, hold it like a hashtag man, and look her deep in her corneas without any fear whatsoever. She’ll wonder why you’re not saying anything, yeah but once she feels that strong and confident energy coming from you she’ll assume that all’s good and that you know what you’re doing. She’ll also probably get a little bit turned on by the excitement of not knowing that you’re thinking but feeling this strong and powerful vibe of comfort coming from you.

In any event you can ride the silence out until something pops into your head and then carry on the conversation like nothing happened.

&amp;#x200B;

**Final thoughts**

In my personal opinion (and it’s just my opinion) hardcore newbies should use option number 1. I say that because it’s much easier to admit to not knowing what to say than to go through the mental effort of holding yourself in a confident demeanour when you you’re feeling anything but. However; the downside of option number 1 is that you’re going to lose a little bit of attraction when you admit to not knowing what to say. Yes she’ll be comfortable with you and no you definitely won’t have ‘messed anything up’ because she’ll still want to get to know you, but the truth is that her direct level of sexual attraction will decrease a little, at least from my experience.

More experienced guys should use option number 2 because like I said earlier it actually has the opportunity to raise her attraction for you by creating a sexually charged moment that she doesn’t quite understand. But its downside is that it’s kind of a high risk and high reward strat-egy that hinges on you either successfully projecting confidence at a time when you’re probably not feeling confident at all, or having come to terms with the fact that you’ll occasionally run of things to say and not giving a shit when it happens as a result. Assuming you haven’t made that psychological switch then you’ll need to consciously adapt your body language in real time but without actually knowing what confident body language looks like then that will be difficult. The choice is yours.

Ciao for now, humans!

&amp;#x200B;

**I've co-launched WhatsApp &amp; Telegram groups for men who want to become amazing with women. Hundreds of guys sharing their success stories and getting advice on their sticking points. A real brotherhood. If you'd like to join, drop me a DM**",seduction
"My favorite author, Robert Greene, dropped a new book","Yes, ""Models"" is a good book, but let's acknowledge Robert Greene. 

Robert Greene is my favorite author. I wish I had read his books when I was in college, but I started reading them after I graduated and was in my first ""career job.""

He dropped a new book a couple days ago, [The Laws of Human Nature](https://www.amazon.com/Laws-Human-Nature-Robert-Greene/dp/0525428143)

Just reading the description makes me think this will be his best book. I ordered the book and will come back with a review after I read it. 

If you haven't checked out his other books, you should. 

Seduction should only be a small part of your personal development journey. 

You should be looking to improve yourself in all aspects for true confidence. 

I can guarantee you, seducing pretty girls and having sex gets old after awhile. Especially if that's the only thing you do. 

Expanding your mind and learning how the world works helps you manipulate situations, especially when seducing, in your favor. 

[The art of seduction](https://www.amazon.com/Art-Seduction-Robert-Greene/dp/0142001198)

This was the first Robert Greene book I read and I think many people here have read it. Great book because it breaks down the seductive types and details the process of seduction. 

The real golden nugget of this book is, it's not just about seducing for sex. Its about seducing, period. Politicians, advertisers, even that co-worker or classmate are trying to seduce you for their benefit. 

Seduction is all around you. 

[48 laws of power](https://www.amazon.com/dp/B0024CEZR6/ref=dp-kindle-redirect?_encoding=UTF8&amp;btkr=1)

This was the next book I read and it changed my life. 

I had never thought in terms of ""power.""

Power dynamics are always changing and can be manipulated in your favor or against you. 

I've read this book a few times all the way through and regularly go back to skim certain chapters. 

Many of these laws can be applied to seduction because a power dynamic exists. 

For example, ""Always say less than necessary"" or ""Make others come to you, use bait if necessary.""

Thinking in this way allows you to ""scheme"" things in your favor. That's why some people view this book as controversial. 

Like I said, ""I wish I knew about it sooner.""


[Mastery](https://www.amazon.com/gp/aw/d/1846681561/ref=dbs_a_w_dp_1846681561)

I believe this was the next book I read. 

It's about mastering a skill and gaining power from the skill.

He breaks down the process of becoming good at something, then creating something new because that's what masters do. They innovate. 

He mentions things like, ""the 10,000 hour rule"" and explains how obsessive you must be to master a skill.

[The 50th law](https://www.amazon.com/gp/aw/d/006177460X/ref=dbs_a_w_dp_006177460x)

I like the rapper 50 cent, but I was thinking, ""I want to listen to his music not read his book.""

I was completely wrong. 

This is a book co-written by 50 cent and Robert Greene, that basically applies the 48 laws of power to 50 cent's life.

Not too many bigger success stories than 50 cent. He went from dirt poor to a net worth of $155 million at his peak. Supposedly, $20 million now but we don't know for sure. Still, a lot of money.

More interesting are the stories 50 tells about his controversial antics. 

The common person just thinks, ""50 cent is crazy."" But, he actually plans out these antics to reach his goals.

Great read and also helps with that 48 laws of power mindset. 

[33 strategies of war](https://www.amazon.com/gp/aw/d/0143112783/ref=dbs_a_w_dp_0143112783)

This was my least favorite book by Robert Greene. 

It's so long and dry. I mean just plain boring. 

If you've never read a book about war, then this will be informative. 

But, if you've read books like, ""The art of war,"" it just seems to fall short.

I'm heavily into strategy it seemed like a rehash of things I already knew.

The one thing I like is the strategies are broken down so you can easily read a chapter that could apply to you. 

Everyone experiences confrontation and these strategies can be really helpful. 

Read it for yourself because I consider myself an expert at confrontation. 

I just wanted to give the guy that changed my life some props and make the point that seduction should be a small part of your personal development. 

Developing yourself fully, makes you better at seduction and makes seduction easier. 

Gaining so much insight through these books will give you such a realistic prospective and understanding of how the world works, you'll always feel like the smartest person in the room and know what to do in those tough situations. 

Now, to start reading the new book about human nature. 






",seduction
Escalating texting to better banter,"I met this girl last week, we hung for s few days and made out but never closed the deal. 

Been texting but her texts are a bit dry. She always respond pretty quickly but it’s either closed answers or just relatively boring (on her end) she’s super hot and likely talking to a bunch of guys but I’m just not sure if I should just leave her alone for a bit until she either picks it up or try something new

At one point in time I called her out on it for “talking my ear off” when she kept on doing lame replies and that resulted in her calling me",seduction
Help me evaluate my situation,"&amp;#x200B;

Long time lurker here since the time I was a needy, depressed, insecure loser. Since that, I have come a really long way and you could say I'm quite the opposite of what I used to be really. So after I could finally love myself I went for improvements in my dating life. As I am 24 and still a virgin I am still new when it comes to that.

&amp;#x200B;

After hundreds of hours of reading and exercising things like eye contact, speech, etc., I now found this girl I am really attracted to. At this point you probably will tell me that it's just one girl of millions. While I also do think that's true, keep in mind I live in a rather little to medium sized city and do not travel a lot since I do have quite a lot of work to do at university and am rather picky when it comes to people that I really want to do more with than just small talk.

&amp;#x200B;

Let's get to the gist of it: I can't really decide on what kind of level I am with her at the moment.

It started off pretty well. I met her at university in one of my classes, we talked a lot and as I made her laugh all the time I guess we both had a good time. Checked her relationship status discreetly ,got her number and continued flirting. She told me that she does not like guys that do not go for what they want. So after classes I went for the close in person and got a ""date"" (we'll get back to that later). The day after she wanted to postpone the date.

At this point most of you would probably advise me to abort. As I thought we had pretty good synergy though, I just felt the need to continue. 

After that, we could not schedule another date. We did however find some free time between classes which she proposed we could use instead. I told her that I'm not about bridging the little gaps in her schedule. After some more exchanged words she told me that there might be a misunderstanding and while she might be single, she is currently not looking for a relationship at the moment because of bad experiences in the past. But she would not have anything against a meetup just as friends.

&amp;#x200B;

At this point I am probably the only guy that would keep going, right? And surely, I did.

&amp;#x200B;

I told her that I am all about having fun together right now and that there still might be atime for that later. 

So we agreed on the ""date"" and it actually worked out wonderfully. We both had a blast because apparently we really enjoy each other company and conversations. She also went with me into the woods next to our university without really questioning that, showed me her tattoo right beneath her breasts for which she basically had to strip her shirt, told me her stories with her ex-boy friends -which were the typical asshole or nice guy stereotypes - , explained me her busy schedule, was really receptive to my physical advances ( I can basically lean in until our heads are pretty much ""kissing"") and later said that she really enjoyed that time.

&amp;#x200B;

Keep in mind this all happened in less than half a week.

Now after this whole pulling I had to do some pushing. So I told her that I really enjoyed last time and if she wants we could do it again when she's free. I also kept away from her in classes on purpose.

After two days she actively searched for me in class and wanted to sit next to me. I made some more physical advances and she doesn't seem to mind with one exception: If I touch her leg with mine she immediately pulls it back.

The next day she again looked for me and came over. Same stuff basically but still did not ask me for a date. 

Which is where I asked her and got a ""whatever it is now"" set up for next week now in the evening after our classes in university.  She told me to text her the time and date again for confirmation so she won't forget. She does know I live right around the corner.

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

Now at this time, I am thoroughly confused at what point I am here right now. I watched the Coach and other channels and reread stuff in my books looking for answers but did not find anything fitting to that situation.

I also do not know what to do really at the ""date"" as it will be 8 PM and she won't be able to drink because she still needs to drive home.

Did I fuck up at some point?

I am really looking forward for any suggestions and feedback and keen on implementing them.

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
Am I bothering women?,"This is the single greatest fear I have when cold approaching women.

I feel like they just go about their life and I come up and want something from them. And they think ""leave me alone"".

And there is only 1 in 10 chance that they want what I am offering(a chance somewhere around there).

How do rationalize or get this negative thought out of my head?

Opinions? Thoughst?",seduction
Girls leave when they see there friend?,This is my 2nd week going out and I have noticed that all the girls I talk to just simply leave when they see there friend without saying bye or anything at the club. What does this mean? Are they simply just not intersted? I know my game is really bad because this is my 2nd night but what can I do to prevent this from happening? My friend said that I need to be friend there friend or something. I think my openers are pretty good but maybe it’s cause I am stuck in interview mode?,seduction
Why You Should Love Rejection,"I had no idea that I was about to endure the most excruciating rejection of my entire life. I approached a girl standing by the bar and introduced myself:

Me: Hey, how’s it going?

Her: Fine. But I don’t want to get hit on.

Me: That’s cool. I’m not really hitting on you, just meeting new people.

Her: (No response)

Me: Okay. Well, I guess I’ll go find my friends. It was nice to meet you.

Her: You want to know something?

Me: Sure.

Her: (staring me dead in the eyes) You have the body of a twelve year-old and a woman will never love you.

There wasn’t a hint of sarcasm in her voice when she said that. And if I’m being honest, it hurt, a lot. But you know what, harsh rejections like that have had a profoundly positive impact on my life.

The more rejections you go through, the less power rejection has over you. I’ve had women tell me things like:

“You’re a 3 and I’m an 8, go away.”

“Why do I never get approached by attractive guys?”

And you know what? I’m grateful for all those harsh rejections, they made me a stronger, more confident person.

In this article, you’re going to learn why you shouldn’t just accept rejection, you should look forward to it.

As soon as you accept that rejection should be embraced – and even anticipated – you will not only be more successful with women, but more successful in life.

&amp;nbsp; 

##Rejection Is Like Muscle Growth
 
&amp;nbsp; 

When you lift weights, you are intentionally putting yourself through physical pain. The more you damage your muscles when you work out, the stronger your muscles will become.

Rejection works exactly the same way. The more you get rejected, the more confident and attractive you will become. 

In exercise, this concept is easy to understand: we can see with our own eyes that lifting weights leads to muscle growth.

In success with women, it’s harder to see the connection between rejection and success. You might see a guy in a club pull a beautiful girl, but you don’t see the 10 girls who rejected him earlier that night.

The guys who have the most success with women also go through the most rejection, period.

Partly this is just basic math. I’ve approached thousands of girls, and I’ve been rejected thousands of times. But I’ve also slept with more attractive women in the last few years than most guys do in their entire lives.

On an average night out, I’ll approach about 20 women – and out of those 20 approaches I’ll only go home with one of them. Technically, 19 of those approaches ended in rejection. (Do I remember those rejections when I’m in a bed with a beautiful girl? Hell no.)

Let’s be brutally honest hear, the 19 rejections I go through in a single night is more rejection than the average goes through in an entire year.

Most guys develop a crush on a girl from work or school, then they put all their efforts into that one girl – for months, sometimes even years. They don’t approach any other women or ask anyone on a date during this period of several months.

These guys aren’t getting rejected, but they also aren’t getting laid.

If you’re not getting rejected regularly, that’s the primary reason you’re not getting the success with women you want.

It’s easy to think you’re struggling because of your looks or your job or the fact that you still live with your parents. And sure, all those factors play a role. But the root cause of an unremarkable dating life is that you’re not taking enough action.

Most of us rationalize by telling ourselves that we need a new job or to move to a better city or that we need to get in shape, or whatever else. Truthfully though, none of those factors matter – at all – unless you can say you’re getting rejected by women regularly.

Imagine an overweight person were to say, “I want to start working out, but I need to get a promotion at work first.” They would sound ridiculous.

The same is true when a single guy thinks he needs to focus on anything other than going out, approaching women, and getting rejected. If you want a better dating life, you must throw yourself into discomfort – because discomfort and growth go hand in hand.

&amp;nbsp;  

##The Truth About Rejection
 
&amp;nbsp; 

If you’re not getting rejected, you’re not playing the game.

That might sound harsh, but it’s true. Forget all the articles, all the Youtube videos, and all the forums… unless you’re interacting with women in the real world and getting rejected.

(The only content worth reading if you’re not getting rejected regularly is content that shows you specifically how to go out and take action.

Challenge based programs like: Simple 30, Rules of The Game, and The Trial:Transform Your Dating Life In Eight Weeks are examples of content that can help someone who’s just starting out.)

Nothing is going to help you succeed with women unless you start putting yourself out there. In fact, consuming this content is mental masturbation unless you’re practicing in the real world.

Imagine you’ve decided to learn guitar. You start watching guitar tutorials on Youtube for several hours a week. You’re learning from these videos, but you don’t think you’re ready to start playing guitar yet.

You keep watching video tutorials until you’re ‘ready’ to play the actual guitar. Several months go by and you still can’t play a single song.

Learning about how to attract women without going out and risking rejection is just as inefficient as learning about how to play guitar without practicing on a real instrument.

Why am I ranting about this topic so aggressively? Two Reasons:

Nothing else matters until you make this mindset shift. Once you accept that rejection is the only way forward, you will make progress. But until then, everything you do is a waste of time.

This is the most common reason guys don’t get better. I’ve personally coached dozens of guys. I ask each of them how often they go out and approach women. You know what the most common answer is? Never. They haven’t taken any action, even though they’ve spent months (if not years) absorbing online content.

&amp;nbsp;  

##My Failure
 
&amp;nbsp; 

I know how important it is to start getting rejected in the real world because I focused on content without taking action in the real-world. I was 16 when I read The Game, by Neil Strauss. The book taught that I could start approaching women to find an awesome girlfriend. This was a life-changing moment. I wanted nothing more than to make that happen.

But I was afraid. Really afraid. I knew that my first attempts at approaching women would be awkward. I knew I would get rejected.

So, I told myself I needed to learn more about how to pick up women before I started practicing it in the real world. I bought several of David Deangelo’s programs, I read The Art of Seduction (among other books), and I became absorbed in the world of online dating advice.

But I didn’t go out. I didn’t approach a single woman. Not until I had spent over a year “learning.”

I can honestly say I wasted hundreds of hours consuming content when I should have been taking action.

If anything, all that content made me worse rather than better. I had so much theory in my head that I became confused and overwhelmed.

I want you to avoid making the same mistake I made. (Or, if you’ve been making that mistake, I hope you’re able to finally snap out of it.)

Yes, rejection can be painful in the moment, but you should love it anyway because rejection will transform you:

###Face enough rejection and you will no longer care what other people think of you.

###Face enough rejection and you will no longer wonder “what would have happened if I approached that cute girl?” Because you will approach her.

###Face enough rejection and you will have more success with women than most guys can even imagine.

###Embracing rejection isn’t an easy step to take, but it’s the only step worth taking.

PS: If you want, you can follow me on Snapchat to see daily infield footage (approaches, pulls, etc.) Username: AveryGHayden",seduction
Need Need Advice Cold Approaching- Really Want to Change,"I need some help guys. I know what I need to do but I haven’t been able to do it. 

Some background on me: I’m a 25 year old, kissless virgin. However, I’m not your typical virgin at this age. I’m an engineer with a great job, extremely athletic, tall, average to above average fashion sense. I can hold a conversation with pretty much anyone and am decently funny. I am a little awkward but I’ve come to terms with that and am just accepting it as part of my personality. Basically, I think I have a lot going for me.

So, given this, I know I need to start approaching women in real life. Like right now. I get matches with dating apps but I feel like the best way to get over my hump is to just approach. 

I enjoy drinking a lot and love the idea of approaching women at bars. My issue however is that I’m introverted and mild mannered. Don’t get me wrong, I can talk and crack jokes. But I feel in a bar setting you need to be very extroverted, high energy, and loud. I am none of those things. I’ve noticed I make a really good second and third impression on people, but not a good first impression. I really want to fix this. I have some mental disorders that contribute to this (bipolar disorder ect) so I’m often scatter brained at first. Not using this as an excuse, I’m just saying. I know I can overcome this. 

Should I still just approach? Should I change anything? I know I’m probably overthinking this but approaching in a bar setting makes me really uncomfortable because of the loud setting and I can’t really talk. At this point I don’t care about rejection, I need to get out there. But I want to do it smartly if I can. I also don’t have many friends to wing for me so I feel it could be a bit awkward going alone? Thoughts?

Any help would really be awesome. I’m trying to improve this part of my life the best I can ",seduction
Tips on getting laid during Halloween weekend,,seduction
Story Of My Last InField (Last Year After School ),"Last year I was in the 10th grade, I stayed after school one day and I began to approach random girls. I would tell them each the same story and they would all laugh, I would their names ( Then forget About Them) Then hug them or shake their hands if they didn't agree to a hug. I spoke to like 5-7 girls in about  20-30 minutes after the first couple i felt a little more confident, then these random guys started cockblocking. 

&amp;#x200B;

I want to start daygame Again but insecure about my cleft lip and that kills my confidence a bit.  Thats why I never really ahd a girl before and never kissed somebody

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

please help

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
Why Leaving Your Comfort Zone Will Double Your Game (Bonus Infield Clip),,seduction
"Finishing models. Man, what a nice book","Sup fellas, I'm about to finish Models by Mark Manson and I remember  one of you posted some notes about the book on an Evernote notebook.  I Know it was here but I wasn't able to find it  Any of you has the link or file? Thank you! ",seduction
Having trouble escalating,Hey I’ve been having trouble escalating through text usually I’ll talk to a girl for a few days and nothing happens. How can I escalate so I don’t keep hitting a dead end,seduction
Why do girls date/fuck chodes?,I've been talking to a few friends of mine who described how certain guys they were talking to were employing terrible game and these described it and made fun of them for it. But despite this they still say they want to fuck/date these guys.  Does falling into a girls blueprint exempt you from bad game? If you don't fall into a girls blueprint how much can good game turn it around? ,seduction
Kicked out of shopping centers?,"has anyone else ever been kicked out of shopping centers for talking to a girl? I was thrown out of store the other day after talking to a girl about the Halloween decorations. she maintained a pleasant casual demeanor until the end of our conversation, showing no signs of feeling uncomfortable. I actually had no plans of asking for her number, and had no plans of ever seeing her again. but she abruptly ended the conversation by saying ""BYE"" and I was later grabbed by two male police officers and escorted out the doors of the store. I was mortified, shocked, &amp; humiliated by this. 

Has this happened to anyone else, and if so.. What's going on in this country where women feel it necessary to have officers apprehend men for just because the men are talking to them? ",seduction
So the good looking guy in my friend group is a virgin but the obnoxious one who pees on cars gets laid all the time?,"In my friend group there is this really attractive guy that almost every woman compliments on his looks. I have even heard women talk about him in another room saying ""Omg *friend* is so hot."" The main problem is he is kinda awkward and quiet which women seem to really not like since he is still a virgin. Well I have another friend who is objectively average or less than average looking. His teeth are crooked, he is overweight, and he just has no interesting features. Also his personality is playing video games for 100s of hours, peeing on people's cars at parties and shouting out memes in real life. He is the one who gets laid somehow in our friend group. He even somehow convinced a goody two shoes virgin to 69 him on their 3rd date. It makes no sense to me. I guess it goes to show aura matters more than what you look like or even what you actually say. But just objectively speaking this guy should not be getting laid this much. Maybe a relationship or two but the quantity of women he gets is a little ridiculous for who he is. 
Can anyone explain this to me?",seduction
What a look means,"Hello,
So on confident days which aren't very common I smile more and walk confidently, the whole set that the subreddit pushes for and I steal a lot of sustained looks and smiles. But most of the time I feel somewhat depressed so I look sad/mad. Those days, the majority, I look at a women in the street or on the bus and they look at me quickly and then look away. I would think it's obvious that this means that they aren't interested but they always look up or from the other direction they are looking at to look at me. Even if it's for a milisecond and then look away. So I'm wondering if this means that they might think I'm cute but see me in an unattractive or simply uninterested mood so they look away. What does the sub think?",seduction
How Do I Learn DayGame?,,seduction
"Seduction in Auckland, New Zealand.","How many of you have been here before? If so, what did you think of it? How would you rank the quality of women, the logistics to move around and venues? ",seduction
I am going through RSD Julien's PIMP,"And I'm pulling my hair thinking why did no one tell me about it before. Why are you telling me now after I've committed those mistakes hundreds of times.

&amp;#x200B;

Great content. Excited to see what I become after I've established those principles in my life.",seduction
Just got rejected on my first date ever. 24M. Feel like shit.,"Where do I even begin? A little backstory about me: I'm kinda a shy/passive dude who never really put myself out there. At 24 I've never had any girlfriends or even single date. Got sick of where my life was at so I hired an escort 4 days ago. Lost my virginity. Cue splurge of confidence.

A week before I had arrived to a new country for vacation and decided I wanted to try tinder as an experiment. I wanted to prep myself for the real test back in America. I worked on getting a few decent pics of myself and set up shop. Just one match. The day I lost my virginity I bought a boost. I got so many more matches than I could've imagined. With my newfound confidence, I messaged a few girls. Some replied, some didn't. One wanted to be fwb then ghosted me. Then I get matched with a girl. Her bio was interesting and she preached honesty and so I leveraged that and instantly we click. She was amazing. She was cute and just my type. We had deep conversations and sooner or later I'm smiling like crazy. First day we just chatted and flirted. Second day we chat some more, flirt some more, and I gain the courage to call her and wish her a goodnight. It goes well. The next morning I'm feeling this girl and want to set up a date. She said yes. I had no desire to just have sex with her. I wanted something serious with her. I really liked her. I had plans that day but she suddenly implied she wanted to see me. I declined. I had plans the next day but promised her I would cancel plans to meet up with her.

I'm somewhat nervous because she seems out of my league but I felt comfortable enough to be with her. I couldn't believe I was going on my first date ever. So I see her and we exchange brief hugs and greetings. First couple of minutes we're awkward but soon enough we got to talking. First red flag I should've noticed was when I asked what her type was, she essentially wanted a bad boy. I'm the complete opposite. I always try to be nice and avoid confrontation. She's the same way. So we get to a restaurant and order some drinks. Conversation was flowing smoothly and only a couple awkward pauses. And then I fuck up. You see, during my chat with her on tinder, I opened up a lot and told her about shit that I don't tell my close friends or even family. I told her I never had a girlfriend. She was really cool and understanding at the time. So my dumb ass decides to open up more because I assume that this foundation of trust and honesty is leading somewhere and is only doing me good. Wrong. I told her about my tinder history (I even physically show her my matches) and my mom having cancer (teared up a bit), among other things. Again, she's super understanding and thanks me for my honesty. We head out and give each other a full on hug.

After, I fuck up even more. I ask her what she thought of the date and our potential. I told her to be straight. There is some attraction but she leans toward no. She says our personalities are too similar and we agree too much. I get it. Opposites attract. She asks to be friends. I basically tell her that since I'm leaving in a few weeks, I don't see how long distance can work, let alone a long distance friendship. I was a bit harsh I'll admit. She says she understands my side. I admit to her that I think I potentially fucked up something good. She tells me this is just life. I go out to drink with friends and find out she unmatched me on tinder. We talk on another app too but so far she hasn't said anything. I left out a ton of details but this was it. Even though I got out of my comfort zone, got stronger, and gained new experiences, I still feel like shit.",seduction
Simple Mind Hacks I Use To Overcome Limiting Beliefs For Success With Women,,seduction
When to text back?,"I saw her on Tuesday night, (She looked really sick), said she would text me Wednesday, never did. She texts me back 2 days later with a ""Hey!!! I know I've been MIA for a bit. How are you doing???"", I am bit stuck on when should I reply, and more so do I just talk about random crap? (\*Kevin Heart\* ""HELP MEEE"")",seduction
In Search of Kansas City Wingman,Interested in finding one or two guys in Kansas City to work on both night and day game. Push each other to open sets and hold each other accountable to meeting goals. Message me if interested.,seduction
relevation #2,"two of my biggest problems:

1. basically just being too thin skinned (taking everything too serious, from girls and otherwise, simply because i hadn't had the valuable life reference experiences that made what everyone say from this point onward invalid. for example: look anxiety. i am 24 but i look 18 or 19. girl / guy says i look really young. you have to be able to get to the point where you stop fucking identifying with the other person's words and identify with your own inner vibe, which honestly comes from your soul. i've had the life experiences of 24 years around the sun. period. 

2. waiting for permission from others to act cool/confident/masculine, as if it's some sort of thing you have to meet certain requirements to do. fuck that, just do you. ",seduction
Feeling Burnt Out,"I have no idea if this is the right place, but I guess I wanted to vent a bit. Let me preface this by saying I'm 27 and fairly happy in most aspects of my life. I have a good job, close friends and family, a few serious hobbies, and live an active lifestyle. That being said, I'm finding myself very unfilled in my dating life. 

For the past year I've been single and dating. For the first 6 months or so, I was all about the seduction lifestyle. Would meet girls at bars, on the apps, and through my hobbies. Had fun, got laid, whatever. I keep everything no-strings and would generally only see girls 3-4 times before ending things. 

Eventually this started to get boring and I would start dating girls for a bit longer and doing more 'couple-y' types of dates. I met several girls that were very interested in relationship who I was also fairly into, but then something fairly minor would happen, I'd lose interest, and end things. 

Even more recently I've met 2 girls who I was very interested in. The first one eventually asked me where I saw things going, I gave a vague answer and then slowly faded her out. The second girl I have now been seeing fairly seriously for about 2-3 months. She seems like the exact type of girl I'm looking for, and we've been getting a long great. But.... She happens to be out of town, and I'm getting this urge to end things. I don't even know why, but i just find that I have no interest in talking to her or hearing from her. 

I guess I'm not even sure if I have a question. I'm just feeling frustrated because the rest of my life seems pretty good, but I'm finding myself unhappy regardless of what I do dating-wise. Not dating at all, being in a relationship, and just trying to get laid all sound incredibly unappealing.

Sorry for the rant. ",seduction
Wingman in Tokyo,"Are you located in Tokyo?


Need a wingman? I'm American but I speak Japanese ok.


Pm me if you want to go game together.

",seduction
Become the best version of yourself with the power of forgiveness,"Have you ever known someone who’d been massively taken advantage of but still had it in them to just let it go? Maybe they caught their girlfriend being quad-teamed by the college basketball team, had their best friend steal $10,000 that was meant for their mom’s medical bills, or maybe they were just being bullied by people who thought they were ugly. In any event, whatever it was that happened to them just didn’t matter because they could just forgive it and get on with their lives. I’m sure you’ve known someone like that before.

Well if you’re like me then you most likely thought they were out of their fucking mind. If you’re like me then you’d not only find it impossible to forgive people like that, you just wouldn’t want to either. If you’re like me you’d spend hours, days, weeks, months and maybe even years wanting the very worst for that person and scheming various ways to fuck them over in any way possible. If you’re like me then once they did that to you, their misery became your happiness and you wouldn’t be satisfied until they’d paid with blood for what they did.
 
But maybe you weren’t quite as hardcore as all that. Maybe you didn’t fantasise about committing swift, brutal revenge upon the prick who’d done you wrong. Maybe you just held strong grudges and never ever forgave them? Well regardless of which one of those is true I’m sorry to say this but by doing that you hurt yourself way more than you could have ever hurt them. Have you ever heard this saying? 

**Holding a grudge against someone is like drinking poison and expecting it to kill them instead of you**  

Well if you haven’t then now you have and again I’m sorry to have to say something you don’t want to hear but it’s really true. I wish I could tell you that it’s possible to hold hate deep in your heart for someone and have it not affect you negatively but I can’t with a clear conscience. And I don’t just know that from my own research, I also know that from personal life experience too. All the years I spent hating people who’d fucked me over and wanting the worst for them did nothing but turn me into the kind of person who was angry, paranoid, vengeful, full of hate and weird to be around. And while you might not have as much venom in your heart as I did, the fact is that the hate you do have has contributed to you being unsuccessful with girls, finding yourself on a seduction forum and then reading this post as a result. You might think that your lack of sexual success is all about your looks, finances or money and yeah those things do play some role but nowhere near as much as you think. The main factor is you, how you feel about yourself, and how you make others feel in your presence.  When you walk the earth with a soul that’s consumed by a black hole of negative energy you repel people (girls) away from you like two positively charged ions. If you want girls to like you, you better start liking yourself. It’s really that simple.
 
**We are what we think about**
 
When you stalk the streets with anger, resentment, hatred and venom in your heart it just brings you down. It makes you less happy and more angry, less joyful and more despondent, less free and more rigid, less inspiring and liberating for others to be around and more uncomfortably awkward for them to have to tolerate. 

Even if you’re not actively thinking about how much you hate someone at any given moment, that misery is still there festering away in your subconscious, affecting the way you act and hence how you come across to people. Take a moment to think about the people you’ve met who you’ve most and least wanted to hang around with. Now I’m not talking about how attractive they were, I’m just talking about their personalities. Did the people who really made you think ‘Wow there’s something about this person that just makes me want to be around them!’ strike you as having had unresolved beefs swirling around in the back regions of their brains? I highly doubt it. In fact it’s the lightness and freedom they had which you didn’t that attracted you to them, isn’t it? You saw in them something that you weren’t allowing yourself to manifest and that’s what made them so captivating.
 
**So like I said, it’s time to let all that negative shit go, bro**
 
I did something called the Landmark Forum a few years ago. It was a 4-day seminar about shedding the bullshit of the past to create a brand new future for yourself, and one of the things they made us do was contact people we had beefs with and settle the scores. 

Throughout the weekend we got in touch with abusive dads, alcoholic moms, sisters we hadn’t spoken to for 15 years and all sorts of other assholes from our pasts, and trust me, the results were insane. Scores and scores of us were in floods of tears because we’d finally been able to drop emotional baggage we’d been clinging to for years. There were hundreds of us in a huge room with a mic at the front and people kept getting up to talk about they felt lighter and had a new zest for life. It really shocked me to see how many people said that they didn’t realise they were carrying around so much misery until they finally let it go.
 
But that brings me into you so, here’s what you’re gonna do. You’re gonna forgive the people in your life who’ve done you wrong and you’ll do it in a number of ways
 
**1: Call them up and forgive them in real time**

This speaks for itself so I don’t need to explain it to you but I’m pretty sure you really don’t want to do it so remember this; you’re not forgiving them for them, you’re doing it for you.  You’re forgiving them so you can drop the heavy steel chains you’ve got wrapped tightly around your neck like a fucking anaconda of misery and be free, confident and happy. You’re doing it so you can radiate the natural and charming energy that will make girls (and other humans) gravitate to you. You’re doing it so you can be comfortable and happy in your own skin and enjoy the experience of being you. Also, as an FYI, see this as training to help you become the kind of strong and daring person that naturally gets girls sexually aroused. Girls like guys who have the balls to do things that are uncomfortable but necessary. Guys who step up to the plate and do the things that other people are too scared to even think about. Doing something like this is only going to help you in the future by turning you into just that type of person. Oh and one more thing, you might find that the people you call are moved to tears so don’t be surprised to be met with floods of teary eyed thank yous.
 
**2: Forgive them in your mind every day**

Every night before you go to bed (or whenever the hell you want to do it) spend 5-10 minutes thinking about the people you need to let go of and forgiving them. Literally think to yourself:
 
*I’m forgiving my sister Claire for always embarrassing me and calling me a worthless loser who’d never amount to anything at the family picnic.*

And work your way through your list of assholes until you’ve covered everyone you can think of. I wish I could tell you that all you’ll have to do is say those words once and feel nothing but love in your heart for those people but that’s not the case. This could take a few months of daily practice but it will happen if you stick with it. The more you practice daily forgiveness for the people who’ve screwed you over, then the more happy and confident you’ll become. It really is that simple. But on that topic; there’s one more person you need to forgive which brings us onto your third exercise.

**3: Forgive yourself every day too**

It’s not enough for you to just forgive other people, you also need to forgive yourself for whatever it is that you think makes you a piece of shit. Forgive yourself for being too fat, too lazy, too boring, to hyperactive, too shy and for doing things in the past that you now regret. Forgive yourself for stealing from your friends, cheating on your exes, manipulating people and lying to them. Forgive yourself for the things you’ve done which nobody knows about but you.

Forgive yourself for all the things that you think you’ve done wrong which you’ve been subtlety punishing yourself for throughout your life. And before you say that you’ve got nothing to forgive yourself for, be real and admit to yourself that you do. The reason you don’t have the success with girls that you want is because you deep down think there’s something wrong with you and whether that’s down to something you can’t help like your looks, or something you did in the past, you need to come to terms with it, forgive yourself, and move on.
 
If this [this guy right here](http://www.topnews.ru/upload/img/ecb7346c7c.jpg) can be living life happy, free, and radiating good vibes wherever he goes then so can you
 

 
**DM me to join our WhatsApp &amp; Telegram groups for guys who want to be amazing with women.**
",seduction
How can I smoothly initiate a make out session?,"I’ve been seeing this girl casually for a couple months now. We get along decently. We’ve had sex before. Multiple times. We’ve kissed before having sex as well. 

The problem is I’m still awkward when it comes to initiating making out. Especially if we’re hanging out without having sex. There will be times I go over to her house we’ll cuddle. Even give topless back rubs. Only to get nothing but a hug at the end of the night before leaving. But we don’t make out because I don’t initiate. I’ve only once awkwardly asked “do you want me to kiss you?” And she said yes and it was a short kiss.

How can I smoothly initiate making out with a girl that I’ve already kissed and had sex with? Like mechanically, any pointers?

Could it be that she’s insecure about kissing (since she’s got braces)?",seduction
Are there women that have standards for men approaching them?,Like requirements and if you don't meet the requirements you're out of the question.,seduction
"I have such low self-esteem and confidence socializing with girls and guys from a crap, bullied, social upbringing that it almost feels like I'm lying to myself trying to better those traits. What are actions I can take to build pure confidence?","I struggle with socializing and confrontations with everyday interactions, not even seduction. Growing up I always compared myself to others and saw the negative aspects of my life. I've been bullied a lot to the point I was always seeking approval and now it's showing in my interactions today.

&amp;#x200B;

I'm terrified of approaching women because of the fear of rejection. And it's directly linked to my need to feed my self esteem with approval I have trouble even standing up for myself in everyday situations. What can I do?",seduction
In field,"I’m staying at a backpackers, met a hot French girl. Gamed very hard, recited mystery stories as my own. Kiss closed. We’re going to have sex in the shower that night but didn’t.

Today I bumped in to her heaps and the chemistry fizzled. I think I regressed to blue pill: I made her a hot chocolate and brought it up to her in the lounge (without her asking). I felt so uncomfortable though sitting on the couch with her and with others around. I didn’t put my arm around her because I felt awkward. 
I actually left before I even finished my drink because I felt so uncomfortable getting her a drink and regretted it because it felt cringe. I also felt pressure like I was ruining it. I’ve seen her everyday for 3 days. I think I am too much of a sire thing for her now.

Any advice on how to finesse sex in the shower. We were in the bathroom drunk last night and she said to my friend that “I’m about to fuck him in the shower” but then she said she feels odd about her boyfriend back home. Also it was a little obvious I was gaming her.

Plus I was ultra confident and horny last night and so polite and proper today. Downbuzz vibe.
I don’t have oneitis. A new girl arrived in my room and we’ve been chatting tonight.
",seduction
How do I deal with this?,"Hello all, I might go on a bit of a rant and if there is someone willing to listen, I appreciate it.

I'm not sure what to do. I met this girl on tinder and after putting in some effort, she gave me her snap/insta/fb/number. We snapped often and started a streak on snap, we called for hours, and we facetimed. During this time she expressed her feelings for me as I expressed my feelings for her as well, she gave me hints such as needing someone to cuddle with, needing a dick appointment, having dreams of me giving her hickies, etc. After talking/snapping/calling for 2.5 weeks, I went over to her place and we watched a movie in her bed and we cuddled. One thing led to another, and I was giving her hickies, she was grinding on me, and some other stuff. This was her first time doing anything and I was her first at everything. I made sure she was comfortable every step of the way by asking her if she was comfortable and she said yes. She asked me to cuff her and of course I asked her if she would like to be my girlfriend in which she said yes. The next day after I went home, she was saying that she misses me and couldn't wait to see me again. I was in a call with her when she said her mom was calling so I told her she could call me later, well, she called me around 11 pm saying that she thinks we should end it. I was so confused and shocked and hurt, it didn't make sense to me that everything went well and the next day she wants to end it. I asked her why and she said that she felt that we did too much on our first date and she felt like we were going too fast, which I understood but then she also mentioned that during her call with her mom, her mom asked if she did anything with me in which she lied and said no. Her mom said "" Good, that's my girl."" and I'm guessing she felt guilty after that conversation with her mom. She said she felt ashamed for what she did and she said I brought her bad memories when she was abused as a little kid which I had no idea about before that moment. She said she did the stuff with me just to please me and that I took advantage of her or manipulated her... I tried to be understanding and tried to see if there was another way to approach this problem and she said that moving on and learning for her mistakes was the only solution. She said there were no other options and I disagreed and she ended the call and said she'll give her final decision tomorrow morning. I woke up the next morning and saw that her decision was to end it and move on but later on that day she said she missed me and she felt conflicted over the whole situation, I was kind of angry because I felt really hurt so I gave her my opinion and my view on the problem. I guess I said somethings that she didn't want to hear because she said "" Yea, we're over."". I became pathetic and confused and desperate. I kept texting her letting her know how I felt and she messaged me back saying that I need to stop trying to manipulate her to come back to me and that I need to stop contacting her. She blocked me on everything, I had no way of contacting her anymore. I felt really hurt and even though it was a short stint, she said that she didn't want to consider me as her first for anything and that I hurt her a lot. For some reason I felt really depressed and hurt over this breakup and I felt worse than when I ended my 1 year relationship. I know I shouldn't have but I messaged her friends and I made another account to DM her. I honestly regret that I did that and I didn't realize that I was being a creep at that moment, I just wanted the pain to go away. Her friend called me saying that I need to stop contacting her and telling me that what I had with this girl was nothing and that I need to learn and move on and not do what I did to other girls. At this point I'm still not sure what I did to her, I took all the blame, I apologized for things that I probably shouldn't need to. I ask if I can talk to the girl and she said yes, and I just broke down like a bitch. She called me a fucking dumbass and said that I was so dumb and that I need to stop contacting her and stop being a creep and move on. After hearing that I finally got the message that she didn't want anything to do with me. Even though it was hard, I tried my best to focus on myself and just distract myself. I spent time with family, went to the gym, played my favorite sports, hung out with friends, joined new clubs at school, etc. I felt extremely better and couldn't believe how much of a loser I was after the breakup. However, this girl still has my hoodie (she asked me to bring her a hoodie so she can remember me when I was not with her). I texted her friend saying that I would like my $65 hoodie back and I still considered it to be my property and as petty as it sounds, being a college student this hoodie costed 1 shift at work. I sent her the address and she replied saying she would send it. It's been 1 week and I'm willing to wait a month but what should I do if I don't receive it by then? She still has me blocked on everything and I don't want to contact her friends because I don't want to look like I'm trying to get the girl back or look like a creep again.  


Although I've been gradually moving on and healing, I can't help feeling a bit depressed when I go to bed and when I wake up. During the day, I'm occupied with school work, friends, or hobbies so I feel great during the day and I guess when I go to bed, I'm alone and I just stare at the ceiling staring thinking about the whole situation. I guess there's a part of me that still that still wishes to be with her. I think I have oneitis.",seduction
The Illusion of Beautiful Women,"I went on a walk this weekend and thought long and hard about a relationship I fucked up with my ""dream girl"". The reason she qualified as my dream girl is because of these superficial reasons:

Why are guys scared of girls?

# 1. Beauty

# 2. Social proof/Status

# 3. The need for external validation (feeling unworthy)

&amp;#x200B;

**1.** Men and women are attracted to each other for different reasons. It all comes down to our primal instincts.

Men are attracted primarily by beauty. ""Big ass, big tits, shitty personality? I'd fuck her!"".

Women are attracted to behavior. ""He's such a dick! I want to fuck him!"".

As men, we need to put in a lot more work to be attractive to women, unless we are deemed a natural (which in itself is just naturally carrying certain personality traits and behaviors that women like) its gonna be hard to attract women based off of just looks.

Too many guys are emotionally attached to the beauty of a woman, we have been programmed to be sheep and put girls on a pedestal just because a girl has good looks...that's ridiculous. The girl didn't earn our attraction, we just gave it to her because she's cute, before we even knew what her name is.

^(This is what I did with my ex, she hit me up first because she thought I was really hot, but I gave all the power to her right after because I thought she was the most gorgeous girl in my school... Don't do that.)

**Her beauty does not make her better/more valuable than you!**

&amp;#x200B;

**2.** Do you know what privileges a good looking girl gets? Way too many. Free drinks, invites to parties, modeling offers and the loving attention of all the pussies that wanna fuck her and date her for no other reason than the fact that she's hot.

Women tend to get a lot more attention than us men, and we give in to it and follow the crowd. A hot girl will draw a lot of discussion, Instagram followers, and other forms of superficial things that will feed her ego and confidence. Now, the funny thing is that only a few girls actually end up being really confident because of this. Most girls are not that confident, they can just control their nervousness better than most guys and they don't have to put in much work to get attention (this is from my personal experience with girls and seeing the behavior of many of them).

So, a girl is drop dead sexy, and she has a lot of phony disciples. What's next? Well, to repeat what I said above, this particular chick will get tons of invites to parties, exclusive events, and all this other shit that will give her experience in things that you would like to be doing. Remember, this is not earned because of who she is, only her good genetics.

Now that I have laid out all the things that could be feeding this girls ego, do you understand that this is all SUPERFICIAL? That babe you've been eyeballing all night is experiencing a temporary bull market in regards to her status, eventually younger, more attractive girls will drown her out.

**Look past all the bullshit**, focus on what really matters in a women if you are looking for a relationship, and if your not, then **don't be impressed with all the false accolades that a girl has**, they don't mean anything, and aren't worth anything when it comes down to it. Funny thing is that the less you care about a girl, the more she will want you.

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

**3.** Seeking external validation is the one way to destroy your sense of self worth. I had to learn this the hard way after I put too much value on my ex. It fed my ego to know that such an attractive girl wanted to be with me (at the time I had low self-esteem) and I tried too hard to not lose her. I became needy and my personality was severely inhibited when around her. I felt unworthy.

The solution: learn to validate yourself. Validation should only come from within, nowhere else. I'm in the process right now of eliminating any negative beliefs about my unworthiness, but ever since I started studying personal development and reading a ton, my confidence has grown substantially. Never stop learning, it will make you more interesting and you will naturally rise above the majority of guys who stay complacent throughout their lives.

&amp;#x200B;

**Conclusion:** Don't ever be intimidated by the social mask that a girl has on. Look through her ""reputation"", through her looks, and you will find that she is just another regular human being who has issues of her own.

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
How do you handle chaotic teens?,"Are girls of 18 radically different than 25?

In my (31m) experience they seem less mannered and more chaotic. They think far less about how they come across than older women. Also seem to think they know everything.

It is much harder for me to read them. I often think they lack interest and than suddenly they want to meet up again.

When hooking up they firmly criticize all kinds of things like my bedsheets and choice of furniture whatever and than praise my wallpaper or coffemugs etc.

What bothers me the most is the texting. They seem to forget about me a few days to be enthousiastic days later.

How do I handle teens? 

Opinions thoughts?




",seduction
How to date random girls in collge,Hi I am a first year college student I have never been on dates. I have a Lobby in my college where girls are sitting by themselves. How do I get a date with these random girls sitting in the lobby?,seduction
What material do you apply in set?,"I sometimes read people say 'game is about just going out and applying the material, analysing where you went wrong and trying again, like a video game''

This makes game sound kind of robotic and like a super power where, once you've mastered it, you can bang a new super model each day

But on the same hand, I read almost non-stop here things like ' 'what you say doesn't matter'', ''there are no rules'', ''game is all about inner game'' etc, so i'm curious about what things people in the first group go out and apply in each set so that they can 'learn'

Are we talking about things like opinion openers, remembering to 'neg' the set, disqualifying yourself, qualifying the girl etc?",seduction
Couple wants to pick up together..,"My (bi) girlfiend and I have been opening up our relationship for the past 2 years with other women. We've had a few nights that seemed to just happen (right place and right time), and have recently been going out more with the idea to go out and pickup. 

Haven't figured out what the best approach to this is. We like to go out to bars/clubs. Any people have experience with this and can share their success/tips? We find that we have a hard time approaching / breaking off a girl from her friends (girls aren't ever out alone). And have only had success with girls who are out in pairs.",seduction
How do you stop being jealous?,"There is this guy at work, he is good looking and he was telling me about his experiences with women. He showed me a picture of his fuckbuddy that she recently sent and you could see that she had an amazing ass and was really hot. He said he's been her first and has been with her for 3 years, even though they are fuckbuddies, they have made the decision that it's ok to date, but not kiss or do anything sexually with others. But he still gets nudes from girls he said even without asking, and they all just seem to flock towards him. He said he even made a video of him fucking a girl (with her consent) etc.. he even had a fight with his fuckbuddy this weekend cause she went through his phone while he was asleep and found girls sending him dirty texts, nudes and videos etc... 

I couldn't help but feel jealous, im just as old as him at 22 and don't even have much luck, the only luck i had was online sexting lol. And i almost started to feel 'hatred' towards women (and i don't want to become one of the incels - if thats what you call it), so i was wondering how i could overcome this jealousy of guys having all this experience, all the ladies just for the taking, while i am not even remembered, ghosted, or don't get likes/matches on tinder.

Thanks in advance",seduction
How to pick up a girl from the train commute,"I commute to work every morning and there's a really hot girl I see on the train every morning. She gets on 2 stops after I do and then stays on the train after I get off. We don't know each other.

How do I approach her? Can it REALISTICALLY (I know everything is possible in theory) be done, given the context?",seduction
"Friendzoned by a girl, but wants to be fwb","So this girl I know said she wants to be just friends for now because she has a boyfriend, but she finds me attractive and wants to hook up with me and be friends with benefits. I had history with this girl, and at one point were sort of ""dating"". Now we are just friends that sometimes talks and hangs out with each other. Sometimes things can get pretty sexual though.  

We will probably hook up and have sex again in the near future because she still shows signs of attraction and asked to fuck, though she could be really hot and cold at times. When in person, she is really nice and caring but she never texts me first.

What I need to learn is how to make her more invested in me by having sex and meeting up with her. Maybe I should even get a little romantic with her. I don't want to rush this though, I want to slowly gain her interest without me having to do much since I have other things to work on. I want to slowly build up her attraction until the point where she wants me more than I want her.

Any feedback for me will be appreciated. ",seduction
Oneitis = Lack of Purpose,"Oneitis is seeking **fulfilment**, and often **purpose**, within another person. 

It gives the sufferer a reason to be alive in this cruel and unforgiving world. A meaningful identity as the lover of this woman. 

So many people seek relationships because they have no purpose or identity without one. Sadly, many pick-up newbies have never even had a sniff of female attention. So, when that one woman gives them this glimpse of meaningfulness, they become addicted to the daydream of what it would feel like to her boyfriend. 

This gives the purposeless man something to live for. He is often convinced this woman is more special than any other. That's usually just the purpose-seeking brain playing tricks. In the pick-up community, we call it **oneitis**. Yet, these feelings could often easily be passed onto ***any*** woman who offers this glimpse of fulfilment. 

These feelings of self-importance that stem from the fantasy of being in love with your dream woman are addictive. This is why the sufferer holds onto them for so long, even without a sign of the feelings being requitted. Often, the sufferer won't even make a move on his oneitis for fear of these pleasant daydreams being exposed as pure fantasy. 

# What happens when you get your oneitis woman??

The extreme neediness attached to oneitis means the sufferer rarely gets his girl. Purposelessness and low self-esteem don't do a lot to get the pussy wet.   

But what if he did?  

Do his feelings of unfulfilment and incompleteness disappear - or are they just hidden by this beautiful external thing he 'has'?  

What happens when his external source of happiness shows signs of leaving? Often, he reacts with anger, extreme jealousy, possessiveness, emotional manipulation or even physical retaliation.

When she does leave, the withdrawal symptoms are similar to a drug addict going cold turkey.

Now, he faces the prospect of going back to pick-up from an even lower starting point.

# How to avoid oneitis 

Oneitis is an addiction. Every addiction rises from a refusal to face real-life pain. 

To avoid it, you need to face up to what's making you feel incomplete without a woman, then make a plan to fix that. 

Know you can't seek purpose in someone else. Find something that you love to do. Try new hobbies. Build friendships. Make a difference in your community.  

Game is an incredible hobby (if you choose to see it that way). It's one that's highly recommended if you're prone to oneitis. Approaching tons of women will help you see that they're all flawed. It'll stop you projecting perfect qualities onto a particular one.  

However, having a purpose other than chasing pussy will also help attract more of it into your life.

David Deida nailed it when he said: *“A man’s highest purpose is his priority, not his intimacy. Your woman knows this. Deep inside, she really wants it to be this way.”* 

The true masculine has oneitis for his highest purpose, but allows a woman along for the ride. 

Even when that special woman comes into your life, you should worry about the impact she'll have on your true purpose, rather than jump at the chance of her becoming it. 

***I've co-launched a Telegram group for men who want to become amazing with women. Hundreds of guys sharing their success stories and getting advice on their sticking points. A real brotherhood. If you'd like to join, drop me a PM with your Telegram handle.*** ",seduction
Discreet Voice Recorders that aren’t your Phone?,Anyone ever use some?  I’m not going to post any of my recordings... I’d like them for myself... any advice or specific model i should choose? ,seduction
Should You Drink Alcohol When Talking To Girls? What To Say If She Asks,,seduction
Confusion about self-acceptance vs self-improvement,"This is a bit of rambling post so apologies for that, but I am seriously confused and could do with some help. I feel totally at a loss as to what to do and I don’t really know where else I can post this.

For years I have felt shy and awkward and frustrated, and often people would take the piss out of me for it. But all of my attempts to fix my situation have not only failed, they have just made things worse. In trying to be “cool” I just covered up my real self with this fake façade which pushed most of my friends away and now I have virtually no one. I didn’t really realise this at the time, I thought I was just doing what I was supposed to do to improve my situation, but actually I was trying to live up to some ideal of perfection and be someone that I’m not.  

Now I am in an absolutely dire situation and I know that something needs to change but I don’t know what. I don’t know whether to go in the direction of improving myself and becoming a more attractive and outgoing version of myself as RSD/the pickup community suggests, or to accept and own and love who I am as my parents and other books suggest. This is the really frustrating thing, different people tell me different things, like my parents say “there’s nothing wrong with you, you don’t need to change, you just need to get out there and find someone who’s right for you”. And books on overcoming low self-esteem tell me to stop demanding so much of myself and cultivate an acceptance of myself as I am. But that runs polar opposite to what RSD/pickup teaches. They say you should always be improving yourself and striving to become more attractive and outgoing and “cool”. And I feel utterly lost and confused about what to do.

I feel like I can’t talk to anyone about this because of the shady reputation pickup has. My family would just dismiss it out of hand and tell me to “stop reading that stuff” or something like that. I also feel like I couldn’t bring it up to a therapist for the same reason. So this is really the only place I can think of to post this. 

It seems either way I am in a difficult bind. If I do keep aiming for that confident self-ideal and it turns out to be impossible or unrealistic, then I have wasted my whole life feeling miserable and chasing something that I’ll never get. On the other hand, if I just accept myself as I am and it turns out that that confident self-ideal was attainable, then I condemn myself to a life of loneliness and throw away the chance to live my social life to the fullest.

I feel like I need to resolve this confusion as soon as possible because time is ticking. I am 25 now, have struggled with low self-esteem and awkwardness for most of my life and almost nothing has worked. In fact I am actually having suicidal thoughts over this issue. Which is not to say I would go through with something like that, but I often *feel* suicidal if that makes sense. But yeah, something seriously needs to change and I seriously need to figure out what direction to go in to fix my life, because at the moment I feel utterly lost and hopeless. Any help or clarity on this problem would be greatly appreciated. 
",seduction
relevation - rejections are ESSENTIAL in order to get better,"so rather than feel pissed off because some random girl just blew me off when i sent her a pic of me on a whisper hook up message, i suddenly had some sort of epiphany where I realized that in order to build the energy to APPROACH (my whole thing is that i am just so shy in the first place), you HAVE to get rejected because ironically, that will build up momentum because you will literally have nothing to lose by doing the approach. Which is a very, very powerful masculine energy. You will also become less dependent on the outcome naturally.

&amp;#x200B;

I have this feeling now like abso-fucking-lutely everything has been in my head, the shyness has been for nothing, the weirdness has been for nothing, all of it, because it's really no big fucking deal. and it excites me to know that i am losing the fear to most importantly, take DIRECT ACTION in the game. no more of this fucking app shit, no more just trying to make eye contact with a girl, no more being nice, no more small talk. ACTION, you see what you want and you make the approach and use those skills as you go. I think I'm finally seeing the light

&amp;#x200B;

edit: \*\*\*revelation. i'm baked out of my fucking mind",seduction
A harsh truth being a late bloomer that now gets laid every weekend.,"Growing up, I was always an outcast, moving around too much as a kid and never really fitting in. It was not until after college (graduated a virgin) that I really came into my own and turned my life around to the point where I was eventually getting laid every weekend. Before I got to that point, I had some guy friends I could rely on but after I hit that point, I came across a harsh truth I have to share with you guys.

**You can almost permanently say goodbye to male friendships once you get to that stage.**

Before you go bananas, let me make my case.

Most guys out there suck with women and even life, I mean absolutely suck. A lot of them will marry before the age of 30, settle down, have kids or best case scenario get into some kind of an LTR. Most guys are not willing to do anything with their lives, they just want to live the mundane miserable life they have of clocking in and out of a job they hate. The vast majority of guys are living an unfulfilling life in terms of women and just life goals that they have no passion for, they suck. You will get a lot of whiners that wish they could make a change but they just complain, never doing a thing.

If you had friends like these, expect them to turn on you once you start getting hot girls. Most of all, expect a lot of your guy friends to pressure you into that marriage route and if you don't go for it, expect them to use every nasty tactic to get you there. Crabs in a bucket 101!

*Now are there guys out there who get laid a lot and still have quality guy friends?*

The answer is yes but most of the times, these are former high school or college athletes or former frat bros who were popular on campus. A lot of these are guys who were already in their prime during those years and just happened to luck in with the right crew. After college, it is almost near impossible to form high quality male friendships because most guys who are cool guys are either settled down with kids, have a girlfriend or are tight knit with their college crews.

If you hit your prime after college, you can almost certainly kiss goodbye to male friendships. Most guys will envy you and want you to die, plain and simple.

**So what is there to come of it?**

I would say these days I am very much in my hobbies and my friends are almost all women. Occasionally I might meet a rare soft touch friend who is good for maybe a drink but I have to keep my distance. Most of the times I am out with a couple of girls, often some sleazy dude with no game tries to either chat them up or be buddy buddy with me but I know it is not my friendship he wants, he just wants to get one of the girls and I am not giving it to that guy so easy.

In truth, you have to pick whether you want to make good friends with guys, at which point you give up your pursuit of the player dream or you chase it and realize that most men are going to be your enemy.",seduction
Shit test,"This is a very subtle shit test that I learned while going out on dates with women. You both are at a mall/store when you go one direction and the girl goes the other direction. DO NOT FOLLOW HER. This is subconsciously submissive and will look like she is the leader or your mother that you are just being dragged along. Just wait for a moment watch where she goes, then slowly walk in the direction you were suppose to go in the first place and she will come back....

Havent tested this before but wrote this in my notes because it was a light bulb idea. Comment what you think...",seduction
Tell boss that I'm in Vegas but not for gaming women?," I arrived here in Vegas this week and intend to stay until at least this weekend. My software engineering job let's me work remotely so I'm working here during the day and gaming at night


I haven't told me boss yet that I'm here. I'm not sure if I should tell him the truth now or risk not mentioning it. If I told him I'm here, I'm worried he's going to find it strange I'm here for a few days and I'm not here to gamble or sightsee. If I don't tell him, something may come up where I'm forced to tell the truth and I'm worried that will get me into more trouble. For example, maybe I will get an IT-related problem and be forced to admit that I'm using the hotel's wifi

During our team's weekly conference call, when the other engineers went on vacation they talked about it a bit. I'm concerned if I tell them I'm in Vegas, they'll ask me questions about gambling which I can't answer because I haven't even gambled here yet 

Any advice on this?

EDIT:  I meant to clarify that I may stay here on a longer-term basis (such as at least a month) depending on how I like it this week. In that case, I would need a better excuse as to why I choose to stay here, right? ",seduction
Late Night First Date,This girl wants to get drinks at at 11 pm on Saturday.. Has anybody ever had a first date at 11:00 pm on a saturday? is this just a booty call cuz if not I dont want to waste my saturday night..,seduction
An extraordinary dating life requires doing extraordinary things,,seduction
Does she know I’m interested,"Been speaking to a girl on and off for 3 years. Small talk every few months. Invited her out to see fireworks with me 1on1. Only met her like twice in real life in our social circles which was like 3 years ago lol she agreed to go out with me.
Should I pay for the tickets  ? Does she know I’m romantically interested in her ? ",seduction
How did ur friends w benefits relationship start?,"Did u go on a date first, fuck then text her then directly ask or did it just happen after a series of hook ups?

I wanna hear your story ",seduction
How to switch from depression to positive assumptions about the world,"Hey guys so this is my situation  


My whole life i was depressed, but shit went serious when my mother got cancer. I started drinking gaming and didnt study at college. I was really sad. Things went worse. Her situation was worse as days passed. She died. When she died 2 months i was like fucked up. These months negative thoughts became part of me. Now im meditating 3rd day, work on my social skills because i didn't go out as i wanted the last year and didn't talk to people at college. Now i started studying harder, but those negative thoughts keep popping up when facing a challenging situation. I used to have sick flash game, not really great results, but better than now. I want to become better that i was. I feel extreme anxiety and i got stuck up when i need to talk with random people at college. I noticed this is because of my negative thoughts. I pump up before going to college, but that feel eventualy goes away, so i need to work on my beliefs. This is temporary solution, but what do you suggest? I will fake it till i make it, but im open to suggestions",seduction
Unable to approach despite not feeling usual approach anxiety,"Hey guys, 

I discovered the seduction community a couple of months ago because I have zero experience with women and have been very introverted and lonely my whole life. During the past few months, I have been obsessively watching Youtube about seduction such as 21 Convention videos, Zan Perrion, Brian Begin, Matt Artisan, James Marshall, etc. I have worked a ton on inner game as well as learning technique and I feel like I have a whole new mindset on life and am excited to make connections with women and start having relationships.

At the start of it all, when I first learned about the concept of approaching and started thinking about approaching as I saw girls I was attracted to, I was absolutely terrified. I didn't know what to say, I would start sweating and get gasping breath and heart rate increase just from the thought of approaching. As the past few months went by and I've increased my overall interactions with people (men and women, non sexual and non seduction, normal interactions) and improved my inner game, I no longer feel this approach anxiety. 

For the past week, I have had numerous great opportunities to approach where I felt none of the physical sensations of anxiety, knew what I was going to say generally, and was in a good headspace/energy. In theory, I should have been able to do several approaches the past week. 

However, something is still holding me back, and I don't know what it is. Yesterday as I was standing at the bus stop an amazing girl, just my type, was walking by herself across the street. I saw her, thought about running across the street, saying a simple opener like ""Hi, I saw you from the bus stop and you are just stunning, what's your name?"" When I thought this, I didn't get anxious or nervous, I felt confident and good. Yet, my feet didn't move. A few seconds went by and she was walking further and further away, and I was just standing there confused. Why didn't I approach? I tried figuring it out. Was I shaking? Was my heart beating fast? No. I didn't feel nervous, I didn't have negative thoughts or scenarios in my head. I felt great. Yet, I simply didn't approach. I was stuck standing there, and I just don't understand it. 

Would appreciate some input guys. I have no idea what to do at this point as I feel like I know all the theory and techniques, I understand the proper presence, body language, and tonality needed (which I've been practicing in my normal everyday conversations) and I didn't feel nervous. 

What is holding me back? Any ideas? I just don't get it. ",seduction
How do you escalate in the middle of a date and when she visits your place?,I mean like touch. ,seduction
Finally got the number of a cashier from my college´s cafeteria. How should I proceed?,"Long story short, I got her number after weeks of half-assed attempts to try to talk to her in the cafeteria.

She is 22 and I am 23, she will quit in January to go to college herself (not there)

We took the same bus and I sat next to her, talked better there than any of my previous attempts, got her number. About time.

But now, how should I proceed? 

How often should I text her? As I will probably see her evereday in the cafeteria. 
Should text be the main form of communication since I can´t really engage in convo at the cafe?

Should I go for a ""date"" as soon as possible or should I built more trust?",seduction
Cross paths with cute girl daily for the past week - how to approach?,"On my way to work I have noticed a cute girl, and we cross paths on the foot path most days. 

&amp;#x200B;

I don't know if she has noticed me, or if she keeps looking away from me, or what her deal is but I would like to approach her. 

&amp;#x200B;

I'm am just so scared of opening her, I don't care about rejection at this point because all I'm worried about is making that first move. 

&amp;#x200B;

What opening line do I use? Is it worth opening if we havent made eye contact?",seduction
Book / movie related suggestions ?,"I’ve read almost the all of mystery method, good and interesting but I’m look for more interesting and practical information :) any suggestions please ?",seduction
Is there a female version of this sub or a forum that I could possibly be redirected to?,"Hi. I’ve searched this sub and I’m having trouble finding applicable information for women towards men, especially in further relationships. Can you recommend me a sub or a forum or perhaps a book?

Thanks.",seduction
Shit test or no?,"Yesterday the girl told me two interesting phrases, and one of them, it seems, she said seriously.
1) You act like a child.
2) I do not like so ironic people.
Second she spoke with a serious face, as if she waited for a real answer from me. What does it mean? Shit test?",seduction
How to get a girl to stop ignoring you - Text Game Simplified,,seduction
[FR] doing magic at the club,"Hey fellas, I’d like to share my latest experience from the weekend. Maybe it's not very Pick-up'ish but who cares :)

And, after going back to the top after writing this wall of Text, I do apologize for doing so but I tried to be as accurate as I remember that night.


Introduction

Me: 27 years old, average build and long brownish hair
she: 20 years, long blonde hair, pretty petite and two piercings, some necklaces


Intro

There was a big party going on in town and some of my friends and me decided to go there and have some fun on the dancefloor.

I arrived pretty early but the hours where dwindeling fast while we enjoyed our favorite DJ’s.


The girl

Some time has passed when I noticed a girl sitting close to me on a bench and short time later, she joined the dancefloor around me.

Usually I don’t rate girls but only for you I'll give her a solid 8/10. 

More time passes by while we still have some distance between us on the floor, she makes, literally, the first move and advances towards me, circling around me while keep dancing. There wasn't much of a conversation but alot of eyecontact and alot of synergy in our dance.

Then she asked me if I'm the guy she did saw a month earlier in her hometown and, by a miracle, I also recognized her from another event. We instantly started laughing and hugged each other.


Escalation 

Nothing more was needed, I took her hand to let her spin around me and I did the same.
Our dance created a connection and the signals where clear. ""Take me."". And so I did. I'd put my hand hand around her waist and pulled her to one of the exits from the floor which leads to another unused room, I gave her a last spin to let her be in front of me, back against the wall. Both hands at her booty, no resistance, and kissed her.

Then I knew, she wanted me. Badly. All of me. She also felt, what my body was telling her and she made no shame of it and touched my pants above my dick. I got green light and grabbed one of her tits. 

She gave a little moan and we continued to make out.

Then the music did stop on the floor which was the sign that the next dj will start playing soon and I didn't wanted to miss ANYTHING. So we stopped and I tried to calm my strong staying solider so nobody will notice. I let her go first and went outside to get some fresh air. Due to delay from the playtime, I had no fucking clue what time it is, my cellphone was in the bag from one of my friends, like all my stuff, like every time. I only could guess but then it didn't mattered no more to me since that was the distraction I needed to go back on the floor.

I found her where I ecpexted her but did a detour to get a refill on my drink. Only to get even more calm and thought of the next steps. How far can I push this tonight? Since there was absolutely no chance I could get her to my place and vice versa, I had important stuff to do on the following day and her hometown is a bit far, to take the train and drive back to get to my appointments.

I quickly decided to use my Know-how of the club and mentioned to her that I knew a way, to be completly shut down from the other guests in a storage room.

She thought about it and wanted that I show her. And so I did. I showed her the entrance. There was a small fence to replace the door and I know it has no lock. That I told her.

I could guess the risk and decided it was not worth it since the night was still going and the hallway was very busy and I didn't wanted to be seen by the security or club staff, going by that fence. She felt the same and we walked back to dance some more.

Hours did pass, more people did leave the club. We both looked at each other as we noticed. We grabbed our stuff and left to go back to the storage room but first going to the bathroom to make ourself fresh for the following. 


Back luck in the end?

That fucking storage room was locked. Sure why didn't I thought about this? But now we're in another dark hallway, with almost not enough light at the end of it to see each other. But our hands found what they desired, as did our lips.

Interrupting the make out to tell her ""you had a little taste of my dick, do you wanna see it?"" - she nodded, biting her lower lip. Undressed my pants and underwear and finaly get the full experience. I asked ""wanna suck it?"" - she nodded again. And instantly did get down in her knees and startet to do as I asked and she did it goooooood. 

I let her please me for a while till I decided it's now up to me. I pulled her up and removed almost every piece of clothing from her. Only enough so she would not be cold and started to finger and eat her out while she was standing, leaning on the wall.


The sex 

She came quick and suppressed her moaning. I had my condom ready by then but she said she needed a minute, now to calm herself before the next waves of pleasure that where waiting. But she did grab my dick and helped to get him wet while undressing her pants with the other hand. 

The end of the Story belongs only to your imagination guys. We used that dark hallway as best as we could and always on the risk that some one will hear or see some thing or just walk in. But luckily that didn't happen.

I finished and we cuddled for some time on her blanket. We dressed and walked back to the floor, with out anyone to notice, what just happened and I made sure to leave no sign of it. The used condom and its package went to the bathroom bin and we enjoyed the still ongoing music. 


Afterwards 

Like all good things, the party did come to it's end at some time and it was time to leave to catch my train.

We exchanged numbers and left in different directions.

-



I hope you enjoyed that giant wall of text and I hope you see, magic can happen! 
",seduction
Hot to get selfconfidence?,"Hey, i always read that you have to be confident, but i have literally zero selfconfidence. Can i get more Selfconfidence? ",seduction
[FR] very first two,"Long time lurker, first time poster. I'm new to this (early 30's, divorced) and wanted to try this out. So outside of just approaching for a quick response to, I guess prove to myself that it was okay to engage random women, I've done what I call my first two actual approaches. 

1. A girl I've seen a couple times in the store, finally went up to her and told her I thought she was beautiful and just had to say hi. She said she was very flattered and a conversation ensued. I qualified her as being a whiskey girl (I approached in the booze aisle), she was very receptive, we chatted some more and I went for the close, telling her we should grab a drink together (instadate not an option). She again said she was very flattered but then said she was married. I told her it was nice meeting her and ejected. I prescreen for wedding rings before I approach, but hers was a simple gold band that I didn't notice.

2. Saw a girl in store, approached, said she was beautiful, conversation ensued. Said she was moving to another part of town, was growing berries, talked about massages, just random convo that I was proud of myself for keeping going and not doing interview questions. She was smiling, seemed engaged, but when I went for the close she simply said ""no thank you"". 

I need to work on closing/transitioning to close/feeling the right time to close. Suggestions? Feedback?",seduction
Would you go back the same girl for another go after got cock blocked by her friends,"Went out last night at a club. got cock blocked three times in a row on the dance floor when I approached my targets. Even though I haven't had finished my sentences to the girls I fancied, the lady friends of the girls's quickly grabbed them out of my reach. Very frustrating!! 

I wondered if you could go back to the same girls after you got cock blocked by her friends. If so, any tricks would you take to make you less desperate? Girls love hanging out with her flock of her friends and stay in a group. Not quite likely happens when the girls you like will be on her own ready for you to approach. 

Myself, I usually give my target up after I got cock blocked, even though they appear in my vicinity. ",seduction
Thanks to you guys,"This is going to be my first and only post but I promised myself that I would write there once I had lost my virginity.

&amp;#x200B;

A bit of background on me: I'm a 21 year old student (M) and have been lurking on this subreddit for the past three months, trying to get a better understanding of social interactions (especially with women). Interacting with women is an area where I have always struggled, had never had sex with a girl nor kissed a girl until a couple of weeks ago (with this girl). I set myself to get better at it as I strongly believe that if I put effort on any subject/topic, I can get better at it and I figured it was way past the time to get out of my comfort zone and improve this area of my life. 

I wouldn't describe myself as particularly attractive nor unattractive, probably slightly above average in the looks department. However, in recent months, I came to the realization that a few girls I had met had had crushes on me/were into me but I was too shy/insecure/scared of succeeding to do anything. I am a pretty funny guy and I think my personality (with **A LOT of humor**), confidence (that is until things start getting too hot and I am getting close to the girl at which point I used to wet my pants) and my authenticity/honesty is what attracted them. One of the haha moments was when a friend of mine told me that it was a shame I wasn't good with girls as he thought I could easily attract hot ones with my sense of humor/personality. **This made me realize that I needed to trust myself more.** Like I said however, I could never get to the point where I would get very intimate with the girl, even if she was into me, as I was lacking experience and was insecure about my looks (I used to be fat a couple years back).

&amp;#x200B;

I went on a tinder girl with this cute girl I had matched with a few days before. I kept the texting very light, mainly showing her I was a fun guy with witty jokes and set up the date. On the day of the date, I was somewhat nervous (I am usually a pretty confident guy in all other areas of my life) but decided ""fuck it, what's the worse that can happen"" . I think this was KEY (you guys call this outcome independence, I call it ""**the worst that can happen is I get a good story out of this**""). I was a bit nervous for the first thirty seconds of the interaction upon meeting her until she started laughing and I went back into my regular state. We exchanged a few stories back and forth, keeping the vibe playful, talking about positive topics, teasing each other. 

The date was going well, I was getting all the usual green lights (touching her hair, laughing at not so good jokes, touching me, my thighs, eye contact) but **I was still shit scared and wouldn't go for the kiss**. At one point, we had been talking for like one hour and I knew she was into me and I realized that I should stop acting like a crybaby (read the quote in the end, it came in handy) and went for the kiss. Remember I had never kissed a girl before so I was hella nervous. From then on, things escalated pretty quickly and we ended up at my place. 

&amp;#x200B;

Looking back at it, I made some mistakes: I should have escalated physically, I should have gone for the kiss earlier, I should have trusted myself more. But in the end, it all worked out. 

I definitely did get lucky but I also feel I made a couple of things right: I was funny as **I WAS JUST TRYING TO HAVE FUN**, making fun of her and fun of myself as well, told her a few stories (I notice storytelling is very attractive if you're good at it) and managed to build trust while still showing sexual intent. I have tendencies to be the nice guy so one of the risks was getting friendzoned but I managed to escape that by maintaining a playful atmosphere, even though I was not physical with her; she definitely did help me by being physical. 

&amp;#x200B;

I don't want to keep this post too long but the main two key takeaways for me were:

\- Go there with the **mindset of having fun**, amusing yourself irrespective of what the girl says/thinks (I know some of you hate self-deprecation but I think it's huge in building confidence/rapport while still remaining funny as you're sharing a bit of yourself while still displaying that you're confident enough to make fun of yourself).

\- Go there with the **mindset that there's literally nothing to lose**. Heads it goes well, tails I have one more funny story to tell.

&amp;#x200B;

Anyways, this was my 2 cents, I wanted to thank you guys for your help as your posts definitely did help me and I felt like I owed you one. I hope this post might help others as I know for sure past success stories from late bloomers did help me.

&amp;#x200B;

A final quote that I always bear in mind whenever I'm scared to do something: *""Remembering that you are going to die is the best way I know to avoid the trap of thinking you have something to lose.* *You are already naked. There is no reason not to follow your heart.*""

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
Cute girl in a class im taking but only have the class once a week,"Just as the title says I met a cute girl in an elective class I'm taking this semester. I approached her at the end of the second class(she's kinda shy), got to know a bit about her while we had a pretty good conversation outside for like 7 minutes. It was a long day for both us so I cut it short(kicked myself for not getting contact info the whole week). Last week we talked for a bit more and I found out she was interested in a club I was in so I got her number so we could talk more about it. We texted for a bit but then she cancelled a planned meeting because of due projects and assignments and I haven't texted her since. The next class is tomorrow and I have no idea how to proceed... She lit up while we were talking in person so I was planning to talk to her for a bit tomorrow and tell her straight that I like her and I would like for us to get to know each other better. What do you guys think?",seduction
What are the best pick up courses for each type of game?,"types of game:

Daygame

nightgame

online/texting game

social circle game

&amp;#x200B;

i currently purchased the system by todd, and in my opinion it's very good!! But i think it's lacking something... 

pls share your opinions and experiences",seduction
How to transition from good friends to a couple?,"Like the title says, how do you move on from being friends who flirt sometimes to something more serious and romantic in the face of uncertainty (the feeling of ""is this too fast for her"")?  What do you say or what moves do you make to test the water without losing a good friend?",seduction
Here are the things I changed about my life to go from a miserable incel to a guy that gets laid every weekend.,"I lurk this sub to see the occasional post from the newbie who is lost when it comes to women and life as well as the guy who is miserable about the fact that he just cannot get laid. Well, I used to be you for quite some time and it made me miserable to the point that I was considering suicide, yeah that miserable. Then at some point, I decided to make some major changes given that I was heading into my 20s as a kissless virgin and now for the past six weeks I can say that I have gotten laid every weekend.

Maybe some day I give you guys the life story but here is a little more of an about me.

**So a bit about me now...**

I had a miserable childhood, overbearing immigrant parents, grew up in a rust belt city, didn't even get to go away to college at the age of 18 as psycho mom and dad made me stay near by for college by using emotional blackmail (I actually used to like them back then) and when I did transfer to a real college my life still sucked as I did not fit in socially. Then after college I couldn't find a job so moved back home with miserable parents and realized just how crazy, psycho, broken and low quality these people were. Luckily found a good job opportunity after months of searching and moved to a bigger city where things slowly started to change. 

In many ways, I had everything going against me in this regard. In terms of looks I am 6'1 and I am also Indian so there's that.

Now I am in a situation to where I get laid every weekend, at least that is what has been the case for the past six weeks. Here is what I changed about my life.

**If you do not read beyond this point, read this one thing....**

You must become a PEOPLE PERSON. You must learn to love people and want to have people in your life. You must learn to be comfortable around people and people your own age. If there is nothing else you take away, it is that you must be a people person who is *in touch with modern day reality* as opposed to someone who is out of touch. Plain and simple, that's it, you must be in touch with the modern day world and be someone that gets it and can fit in.

**Get the preliminary stuff out of the way first.**

*Your environment and setting absolutely matters, change if you are not in a major city.*

You won't have much success if you are moving to a suburb after college or some podunk town in flyover country. I don't care if someone posts a guide about it, it is just not in your best interest to do so. People get married very young and they start families fast. I do not care if some guy comes in here talking about the one person he knows who made it work or gives you a step by step list of how to make it work, do not do it. Being in podunk, suburbia and small town USA is not good for your mental health in general. If you are a guy in your 20s, your end goal should be to be in a major city, no excuses.

Obviously in a big city you don't move to a boring suburb.

*Your looks matter but in the way you present yourself than genetics.*

Look like you have been in the gym and actually care about your body. Do not wear garbage clothing and ignore your appearance. Women go out trying to look their best and putting all that time in, why should they go for a guy who has not invested even a bit in his appearance? Whatever your background or height might be, I promise you that if you are willing to invest the time to maxing out what you have, it will yield you results. 

*So does the company you keep, get away from toxic people. Meanwhile, learn to get better with people before doing game.*

If you have toxic parents (like I did!), move the hell out of their house. If you have toxic friends, get away from them. I would recommend joining any social groups for starters in order to fix this. One go to is intramural sports, another is young professional organizations, alumni orgs and also the various other groups your city may have. This one is a bit tricky and ROI in general with social life is low but you find 3 to 5 good friends, its a success.

**Now for the game, which has changed in a big way.**

*You must have more than one avenue to meet women, cold approach is not enough.*

I don't care how good or bold you are but if all you are doing is approaching randoms and hoping something sticks, you're doing it wrong. For one, cold approach has a very low ROI, hot girls will rarely get with a random guy they just met. When I did just cold approach, I had minimal success, most women were out with groups and not looking to chat with some stranger, especially if he was out alone. Add cold approach as a tool to occasionally use but don't rely on it.

*You must be socially connected, no girl wants a loner.*

Obviously a good social media accounts matter but you must be the kind of guy people want to hang out with. If you head out to the bars alone in the hopes of getting laid, you are in a really bad spot. You must work hard to at least fix the social aspect of your life to show girls that you are not some random loner with no friends. Nothing will have girls running far far away from you if you have zero friends, it means people do not want to be near you, same as being a business no one wants to buy from or a store no one walks into. 

*Take good photos for the sake of your career and dating life.*

A big part of my dating success comes from dating apps, plain and simple. I had good photos taken by a friend and those translated to real matches which translated to numbers which translated to dates. Most girls are on dating apps these days whether you hate it or love it, if you're not at least keeping this option open, you're shooting yourself in the foot in a big way. If you can't get matches, go back to the preliminary part and get yourself in better shape or learn to have better pics taken.

Too broke to afford a decent photographer or pay someone to take your pics? Fix that before you worry about fixing anything else, get a fucking job.

**Now for the key pieces.**

*Get a good online dating profile put together.*

This means good photos of you, no selfies! You put up high quality pics of yourself and pics of you doing things that seem fun. As for what we define as fun, no videogame shirts or nerdy crap, by fun I mean pics of you outside on a beautiful day, pics of you with a dog, any pics of you at an exotic location or any pics of you with friends. I hope you worked on your social life as well because that helps in a big way when it comes to getting laid, you must make friends.

*Make friends with girls you have been with, they introduce you to other girls.*

I used to make the mistake of smashing and dashing, bad idea. Instead you simply make friends with girls you have been with and go out to events with them. It works in a strange way because once you have gone out to events with them and met their friends, their friends will want to meet you and some of them will be potential lays for the future. Do not aggressively flirt with them, just be there and have a good enough time.

In other words, don't be those guys who is in it for a grudge against women and just wants to go girl to girl while leaving a bad reputation. Instead, be a guy that actually makes friends with the women he has slept with, they will introduce you to other women. 

*Find a legitimate hobby that gets people into your life and I mean fun people.*

This means no videogame hobbies where dorky guys who have never touched girls will be your friends. My hobby is photography, I have made good friends from it and met girls who have wanted me to take pics of them. A couple of times that has turned into a lay. Right now I have 4 different girls I can call up and chat with or go on a date with, guaranteed to get a lay.",seduction
First Date Success - Questions on Proceeding.,"First, a little background about me. I'm a bit on the autistic spectrum and generally have difficulties with social encounters and whilst I have had relationships before, they were extremely dysfunctional ones in my teenage years.   


I'm looking to try and develop a long term relationship and finally asked out a girl I've been friends with for a year. I took her to see a show and this first date went well; I was quite proud of myself for avoiding awkward silences, making her laugh, carrying on conversations and only stuttering once in a while. I dropped her back home and she said she had a lovely evening and we parted ways.   


However, now in reflection, I don't know if she's ambivalent and was just being friendly or if she is interested in continuing. How would one go about determining this? What kind of hints should I be watching out for?  


A couple times when I asked her if she'd like to do X, or go to Y, she would respond with, ""Whatever you want, I like go with the flow"". Is that a hint that she's not that interested and doesn't care?  


If I wished to proceed from here, do I continue on by inviting her out to another show for a second date? What would you guys recommend? I'm in uncharted waters here and need a compass.   


Thanks in advance!",seduction
"A girl asked me for advice on how to prepare an voice actress interview, how to reply?",She said she had no confidence bc she felt no good than the other applicants,seduction
Met 2 girls but I like 1 more,"I'm travelling and met 2 girls at a coffee shop this morning. We talked for a bit and they showed me around the city.

I got the contact info for girl #1, but girl #2 shied away. I prefer girl #2.

So, how should I move forward with this? I'm going to text girl #1 later tonight, and I'm not sure if I should 1) Ask for girl #2's contact info, 2) Invite them both out, or 3) Just ask out girl #1.

This is my first time dealing with this situation, so some advice would be appreciated. Thanks.",seduction
How to make tons of good close friends,"It’s no secret that making a lot of good friends will get you more girls. From having awesome guys to go out with, to meeting more women and increasing your social status, having a lot of friends does wonders. For me, making friends did not come naturally. I am very introverted and always found myself going out alone, but after I started doing these things more I had more high quality friends than I knew what to do with. Here’s what I would recommend to anyone who is looking to make a lot of new high quality friends:

* **Go out!**
   * You're not going to make real and close friends sitting at home
* **Be more open to meeting people** and spending time with people MAKE AN EFFORT
   * not everyone is going to be perfect or hold your hand
   * I was too quick to judge others before hanging out with them
* **Create events and invite people to things**
   * Even if they don’t come its more likely they will invite you to something
* **Give and more than you receive**
   * You have to GIVE VALUE in order to maintain relationships
   * Too many people do one thing and expect too much in return
* **Group activities** (working towards a common goal is great for making friends)
   * Intramural sports 
      * Being proficient at the activity will help)\\
   * Improv classes
   * Seminars
   * Rock climbing
   * Dance classes (salsa, tango, ballroom)
* **Game guys like you game girls**
   * When you go out talk to guys as well 
      * (Try and find people who are as ambitious and motivated as you)
   * Don’t be someone you’re not (Bragging too much won't work in the long run)
   * Differentiate between an acquaintance and a true friend
* **Be open to new experiences**
   * I met some of my best friends while traveling
* **Online communities**
   * RSD inner circle (This is good for meeting guys to go out with, however you might have to go through a bunch of them to actually meet a guy who is cool)
   * [Meetups.com](https://Meetups.com) (find an event that sounds appealing to you)

By far the best one for me was joining an intramural soccer team. So many of those guys ended up becoming close friends with me, even to this day.

I posted a video about this yesterday which you can find [here](https://youtu.be/27VB1RHmG0E).",seduction
For all the sceptics around this subreddit.,"Yesterday I had to share a lot of my PUA knowledge in my university, not because a couple of guys wanted to know, and neither because I was in trouble and had to share my techniques. No, I was in a psychology lectures, and the whole lecture was about the art of communication, I was the only one who answered in that class, because everything that the professor mentioned I had already learnt from Mystery, so every  time the teacher asks a question lie ""Does anyone think they have an idea what the meaning of rapport is?"" I would give her the proper definition, at the end of the class, we also watched a seminar by a PUA I forgot his name but it was about body language and how to use it to be mysterious and trigger friendliness. Sure, being natural is important, but keep in mind a lot of these techniques are scientific, so use your logic when using them.",seduction
Stop thinking and just do it,"I’m a 24 year old male. I’m a fairly good looking guy who is in good physical shape and I tend to be quiet when I’m in large settings. I have great conversational skills but this usually only shines if I’m speaking with someone one on one. Anyways I was in a class today and saw this girl I found attractive and at lunch I just started talking to her and it turned out she was really into me, this ended up with her pursuing me in turn. I approached with the intentions to just get to know more about her as is preached on here an it worked. I was also in a very talkative mood today and didn’t really care if I got rejected or not or if she didn’t like my story because I was goin to tell it either way. She was actually fascinated by my conversation. Before I left I told her see you in class tomorrow and she went right in to hug me. 

I really need to start doing this more and get out my damn head and realize no one gives a fuck and maybe they might but I can’t make that be the reason I miss opportunities. 

Thanks for all the supportive posts here guys.
",seduction
Mindset vs Action,"Often times I see a lot of posts on the “action” part on how to get women, i.e Get the number, get the date, go back to your place, its great. But its often repeated advice and I already read everything there is to know about “game”. What im trying to look for and what guides stands out to me are the “mindset” of the seduction game. Our beliefs and thoughts drive our actions and behaviors so that always should be the foundation to establish. Are there any good posts on seduction about the “mindset” of picking up hot women? ",seduction
Not even approach anxiety,"AA isn't even my biggest issue, nor is rejection. I can do the cold approach part without a lot of resistance, but where I fuck up is the conversation part. I feel like I just can't talk properly and start to fumble / talk too fast. It's exactly this fear of failure that causes me to lose my confidence in my game. How do I get over this?",seduction
Dont text a girl with low/lukewarm interest,"Call her instead. Pick up the phone and instead of thinking about “Oh what emoji should I send or whats the best cutest text to attract her attention”, just dial the number she gave you and call. She gave you her number for a reason because at least you are somewhat interesting. It makes you stand out from the 10 guys blowing her phone up with “hey hows your day”, you call her directly and have a phone conversation. This takes a little bit of balls but a little goes a LONG way. 

Have a 5-15 minute convo, keep it interesting and about HER (let her do the talking, you strike up the topics and flow), then when you sense the convo is at its “peak”, pop up a question-“What are you doing this weekend?”. Make the plans, set the time and place and you got yourself a date instantly without having to wait. 

You literally cut past all these men that are trying to court her through text by calling. You show her that you are confident, your time is valuable, and that you are not afraid to take some initiative. You know within 5 dial tones if she picks up and is receptive to your move. And if it doesnt work out and she doesnt pick up, then thats okay because you are screening out for people who arent worth your time. ",seduction
I've never touched a girl before.,"So I've never touched a girl before, and I need a little bit of help getting started.

Im unsure why, but I've always had a thing for dry humping, and I've always wanted to dry hump someone. But, obviously, I've never had the opportunity to. 

I'm not ready to go any further, but I wanted to ask you this. Im not a very good looking guy, and I wanted to go to pick up a random girl and (hopefully) get to dry hump tomorrow night. This may sound stupid, but any tips for me?

Thanks in advance!!",seduction
Wingman in Beijing,"Hey guys, wingman needed in Beijing for 25th of October. Please message me if available. ",seduction
Best Ways To Ask A Girl Out?,Hey guys so I've been talking to this girl I met for almost 2 weeks now and I think I've built the friendship enough to ask her out. I hardly see her in person so what are your guys favorite ways to ask girls out over text?,seduction
Getting a second chance,"Hello there.
I have a friend(lets call her Susan)from elementary and we havent seen each other in a year. We agreed to go out on friday around 5 pm. I texted her at around 4 pm if we are still going but she wasnt responding. At around 8 pm i thought she just didnt want to go and decided to go to my best friends house and just play videogames. When I was waiting for the bus, she texted me saying that she's going to a pub in the city centre later and if I want, I can join her. Then, she got on the same bus as I did and she was with another girl. We agreed that I would come to the pub with my best friend. So I get out of the bus to go to my friends house and they went to the city centre. My friend and i decided that he would eat his dinner and then go spend the night with the girls. But.. we got a bit high and didnt want to go anywhere. I left my phone in another room and didnt hear Susan was calling me like 6 times. The next day I apologized via text and asked if we could go out some other time and if she could bring the girl with her again, because she was pretty and wanted to get to know her. Susan told me her friend was dissapointed in me, but was willing to give me a second chance. Up until this point, I didnt know she was interested in me, at least I think she is. Why else would she say ""second chance"". I am guessing she wanted to set me up with her but didnt tell me before hands. Anyway, we are going out again this friday and I wanted to ask you how to approach the whole ""failed situation"" from last friday? And also, you can throw some tips what do to that night. :D Thank you in advance",seduction
Ask a girl why she ghosted,"I've had a few instances where I went on several dates with girls and we had gotten along well and seemed to hit it off, but then randomly got ghosted where I never hear from them again after attempting to make plans. If a girl doesn't respond, I can take a hint, but am always curious on why I got ghosted (in case it was anything I did)

&amp;#x200B;

Would you recommend ever texting a girl and asking why, or just move on + forget?",seduction
What I learned from 100 days of rejection. How to overcome rejection,,seduction
Running into girls that have already been approached?,"This might be a stupid question, but I just want your guys' perspective. So I have been applying pua techniques at the gym, probably not the greatest location, but I love working out. I do a very direct approach with a unique/authentic compliment and just try to open the girl up emotionally which doesn't seem to be extremely difficult overall(obviously not a master by any means).  I always close with at least a phone number (never been hard rejected) and depending on the interaction I will decide to text the girl or not. I have heard it is much better to ask the girl out in person(which makes sense), but it doesn't seem practical at all as I would have to rely on seeing the same girl again at the same time (I go to the gym at 11am almost everyday,usually see the same people there). The main issue I have is with running into girls I have already approached, I don't want platonic friendship, but am I just supposed to be friendly? Is there such thing as a 2nd attempt(highly unlikely)? Even girls who didn't seem interested via text will check me out constantly in the gym and say hi, but yet they don't want to go out? By all means criticize me as much as possible, I just want to improve this area as much as possible.",seduction
How to Get Your Ex-Girlfriend Back [2018],,seduction
"Do you set a time in the week to practice seduction, such as weekends only? How do people manage to balance this with having a full time job?","I leave home at 7A and return at 7PM exhausted every weekday. Practicing is the last thing on my mind from Monday - Friday. After a long day of work I put in my earbuds, drift off into music as I commute back home.

However, I do want to get practice in to get better. Do you guys just save it for Friday &amp; Saturday nights only? Or do you make an extra effort after work to stick around outside to meet people?

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
Boring dates?,"I just had a date with a French girl. And I don’t know what I would’ve done different to have won her over. 

We met via day-game on Saturday, which lead to an instadate at Starbucks. During that date, it was boring honestly. Mainly because her English sucked and we relied on google translate. I was getting such mixed signals. She seemed totally aloof and disinterested. As was I, but damnit, she was hot. And I figured she must have had some interest in me or she wouldn’t be here. 

Anyway, we text a bit, which is a lot easier since she can at least understand me. We agree to meeting up at a park. Date goes the same way. I try to escalate things by holding her hand, but she pulls away. I didn’t even try to kiss her at the end since I know it wouldn’t have worked. 

It was a one sided date and she didn’t ask me anything. Of course, part of the difficulty was the language barrier. But I also think that this issue is something that I face previously in dates.   

I know ultimately we want to girl to chase us. But If the girl isn’t interested, how can you get there? Should we just cut our losses and move on?  

I have just come to a point where it’s gotten stagnant with my dates. I’m usually able to be successful with sevens. But not with 9-10’s. I do my best to just be confident, cool and collected, but maybe I show too much intent directly. I definitely complemented the French girls eyes way too much. 

How have you dealt with boring dates? Where it seems like you can’t escalate and the girl isn’t as sexually interested as you would’ve hoped? ",seduction
"A stalked me down on IG, we spent the night together. This sounds stupid, but how should I formally start a relationship with her?","I know that title sounds retarded.  I’m 22, in Uni for context.  I’ve been in two prior relationships.

What do you guys suggest as far as an eventual way to make this girl officially my gf?  Without trying to sound full of myself, she seems pretty into me and always texts me about wanting to see me now.

There’s gotta be some better way to make things official than “hey, are we Bf/gf now?”...  Again, I’m not gonna try and get in a LTR until I know she’s a good fit for me and my lifestyle.

Help me out here fellas.  You guys are good at this haha",seduction
Finding Confidence,"How do you find confidence when you don't have a past that you can look to as being great. (For instance, you have no dating/sexual experience.) I know I should be trying to create an amazing life with a lot going for me (and I am) but that can take years. What can make me confident each day",seduction
how to stop being nervous/awkward as fuck?,"Stupid shit, i.e. autistic or awkward bullshit that there is no reason for you to do when dealing with girls....

&amp;#x200B;

I.e. -- I am in college. Half the time I study in the lab or library, i WILL get an attractive girl who will set down next to me to go on the computer. I know this doesn't necessarily mean SHIT, but I say nothing, even if i have no earphones in, and after awhile she just gets up and leaves. Is this what you would call ""stupid shit"", and what would your advice / interpretation be? Is her coming into my space invitational, or inconsequential? What I DON'T want is for them to just think i am retarded or fucked in the head 

Someone suggested i just go to a strip club to just practice talking to girls so thats what im gonna do next weekend lol",seduction
How to maintain a sexual frame?,"I haven't had sex with 100s of girls or anything, but I'd like to say when an opportunity arises, I can escalate to sex if the time is right. 

The only issue I have is, which has happened with the last 2 girls, is that I can't maintain a sexual frame.

At first when we meet, up to when we have sex, I have a more sexual frame. I've had one girl say ""I can't say I've talked about this kind of stuff before a first date before, but I like it"", and another say ""you always get what you want. It's so hot"".

But after we've had sex for the first time, it's like I turn AFC mode and start doing needy shit... like texting them every day, sleeping over and getting breakfast with them in the morning after dates, etc. I always worry about seeming like ""that guy"" that just fucks a girl and treats her like an object, just expecting sex. But at the same time, maybe I need to get it out of my head that wanting sex a lot isn't so bad. I end up acting like I'm pursuing a relationship and I feel as though it is off putting at times. I want to be able to maintain a sexual frame at all times, while also being able to actually have fun with the girl (hang out, not necessarily exclusively, etc).

The one time I had a girl around for the longest, was some girl I met online. Little bit heavier set, not fat necessarily. We met the first night at her house and fucked. Then I texted her sometime the next day about the sex, went to her place again and we fucked more. It was basically just this for a good few months: only texting to make plans for me to come over, maybe a random convo about some anime or something, not going on dates...

How do you maintain a sexual frame throughout a relationship?",seduction
"Need to get rid of my ""don't interrupt people"" mindset - how?","I tend to do well socially, I don't have much of an approach anxiety and in a way am a bit of a social butterfly.

But this mainly works for me in ""closed"" events. Even if I don't know anyone there, I have no probs starting to talk to people and groups.

Out in the public, at venues, I have a problem, and I think it's first and foremost that deeply ingrained ""it's rude to interrupt other people"". These people are there with their friends and - since this is Switzerland - likely to an extent not keen on meeting new people, is my thought. So when I do approach new people ""out in the wild"", I subconsciously communicate that ""I'm sorry, I feel bad about doing this"" and have a terrible body language the moment I need a good one the most.

How do I deal with that mindset?",seduction
Meet more people at parties,"How do you guys generally go meet tons more people at parties?  I am currently in high school, and I’ve gone to a decent amount of parties but girls always either already have an entourage of guys just following them or they are in groups of like 10+.  

Im just wondering what do you guys generally do or say to start conversation with these groups?  Is it worth my time or is it better to just wait with my group until smaller groups show up?  

",seduction
"Just had a pretty rough approach, feeling quite shitty now","There's this girl who i haven't really spoken to other than brief hello's and smiles in passing. She follows me on social media and I find her liking my photo every time I post one, to which I respond by doing the same. Today, I was sitting in the library doing homework and she walks by my table and I say hi as always and she smiles and says hi back. She seemed to be searching for a place to sit as the library was packed but by the time I realized that she had passed and had found a seat elsewhere in a pretty uncomfortable-looking spot.

I scolded myself for not offering her a seat at my table where there was no one else and several vacant chairs. I thought to myself, ""surely I'll have another chance to advance our relationship past just hi-hello's"".

  
30 mins later, I got up to print my assignment and as I was walking to the printer, I see her walking up to it to use it as well. She had earphones in but nonetheless, I decided to shoot my shot.

&amp;#x200B;

me: hey, where are you sitting?

her: sorry? 

me: where are u sitting? 

her: oh by the couches table thing. 

me: oh, come over to my table! 

her: uhhh

me: you saw where my table is, right?

her: uhmmm, yea i saw it earlier

me: oh, well come over!

her: ok if i feel uncomfortable where i am i will

me: sounds good...

&amp;#x200B;

And with that I walked off with all my dreams and hopes crushed. Not sure how I could've better played this situation or made my intentions more clear but damn, that hurt.",seduction
I just sat through the most awkward 45 minutes of my life...I think I need serious help,"I (22M) am a senior in college on a coed college sports team that meets in the morning. [On this team, there was a girl (F19-21) that I developed a crush for.](https://reddit.com/r/seduction/comments/9pknc2/update_about_a_girl_i_thought_i_was_interested_in/) Unfortunately last week after a couple of weeks she decided that it wasn't for her and left the team.

While she was on the team she did seem shy and lonely, and this does seem to be a legitimate case. As someone that has never been in a relationship, never truly asked anyone out, etc., this was ""attractive"" to me, because I would rather date someone ""average"" than a social butterfly, for a variety of reasons. That's one of several reasons why I refuse to use dating apps. Plus everyone else has much more experience, and I prefer in person interaction.

Perhaps this was low hanging fruit that just wasn't for me. Last week after a race we were talking, and she seemed interested in my schedule and background on the team. Of course I asked questions as well. Was she being nice? I don't know. There was also another guy on the team that was getting ""close"" with her, but IMO because he's foreign and does not adhere to social standards well, he may very well have scared her off. I don't know for sure.

In the conversation(s) she mentioned that she commutes and we had similar schedules. Therefore I decided I would go to this particular common area where she hangs out sometimes to talk to her. 

I did this successfully Thursday, but was very nervous and gun shy and had a somewhat awkward conversation. Friday she leaves the team. I try to go back to this area to find her, she isn't there.

Today, I do the same. This time I will just be doing homework. I go before my class, and then afterwards. To my surprise she comes downstairs to the area and we make some kind of eye contact. I immediately feel a rush of fear, but not adrenaline, as I take propranolol to deal with anxiety. After a second, I turned away and kept doing my homework. I erroneously thought she would come sit near or next to me, but I was wrong. She sits at a table 10 feet away.

This entire time my head is down in my lap using the computer. I don't look around once, I'm practically frozen in place. All the while trying to figure out what the next move is, because I don't want to be seen as a stalker.

By 1:00 it's too late. She goes back upstairs to leave as I feel a rush of relief.

Honestly, I don't know what just happened. I don't know if anyone here can even help with me. I probably have a sense of scarcity, but this isn't what I planned. The whole thing is so stressful that I think I'll just give up before I get in trouble.",seduction
How should I approach someone on the move?,"So I see this girl every single day at school. I’ve seen her from the start of the semester (about a month ago ) but only recently did I actually notice her. I find her attractive and would like to know her more but every time I see her she’s arriving to school in the parking lot while I’m walking to my car about to leave. I’ve my friends I was going to approach her and they advised me not to because they said approaching her while she’s on her way to class or heading somewhere already may annoy her a lot. That honestly made me question whether or not I should do it. I’ve thought it about though and I’ve come to terms with the fact that I find her attractive and would like to just take a shot with her. I don’t see her at any other time throughout the day except for those few seconds. So it’s essentially my only shot.

How should I approach her for the first time though? What should I even say to her? I was considering just mentioning that I seen her everyday and would just like to say hello. 
Not sure if that sounds weird though.


Thank you all for any extra input on this situation.",seduction
Your idea about her silence,"So imagine this:
You see this girl. Maybe you already know her quite a bit. You just want to chat her up, nothing serious. She has changed her hair color. It's light blond now.
So you casually walk up to her and say: ""Nice hair. Did you change it because it's getting cold outside?"" In that exact moment she puts her earphones (God, I hate those things) in.
She smiles slightly, you cannot tell if she understood you or not, and turns away. 

What do you do?

This happened 3 times (Everytime a different scenario, but same outcome) this week. I start up with a conversation (and I know that the first sentence is just to start the interaction) in a slightly negging fashion and it dies immediately. 
I don't want to run after her, this would make me look insecure and seriously .... I don't think I care so much about it. But I don't want to let the conversation immediately die, because that also looks like I am insecure and that grinds my gears.

So, I'm interested in your approach ... What would you do or say in this situation?
How would you handle it?",seduction
Post-mortem Feedback is appreciated,"Here's my case and could you answer my questions at the bottom 

I asked a girl from my social circle for a date for the third time . I only did it three times because I can tell she is interested . Also, I know she has a boyfriend so I was giving her enough time to weigh her options .

It was in-person. She said she was busy . I pushed her a little bit telling her this would be my last time to ask her out. I get no confirmation from her but "" Yeah sure, but I need to check on blah blah. I will try to make it though"". Please note, the day I proposed for a date is a week ahead to give her time.

Honestly, I had the gut feeling she was not going to make it so I never confirmed with her.

I took this as no and never confirmed the date. Guess what! On the morning of ""the supposed date"" day, she put herself in my orbit and started conversation with me with her eyes wondering about the date, but she never explicitly mentioned it. For weeks, she would put herself in my orbit and gave me puppy eyes multiple times . She even followed me one time and put herself in position where I can talk to her.I never brought up the date again for two reasons :
1- I was waiting on her to mention it.
2- I thought she might have missed my attention and she couldn't believe that I have not confirmed the date with her and she was trying to get my attention back. (maybe I was insecure)
At one point, she gave up which made sense .

Do you think I went too extreme ? Should I have just brought it up again?

Part of me is thinking she was afraid of rejection if she brought the date up since I have never confirmed it.
Other part of me is thinking ""You bitch had a week to confirm , you can't just give me puppy eyes and expecting me to bring the date up again ""


I am relatively new to the game and I like to look back and break down my mistakes.

She is 24 yo and I am 28 yo.
She is Latina (first generation )
I am middle eastern (first generation)",seduction
Let's talk 'attraction material' and 'no girls',"With basically every 'successful' infield i've ever seen, the girl is somewhat receptive towards the approach. Never has there been an infield where the PUA opens some stunning girl who isn't remotely interested in him and ignores him etc, and he then bangs her.

What do you do/say, when a girl is either ignoring you, or just is not attempting to 'engage' at all when you open her. Maybe you open with an opinion opener or an observation or you go direct (depending on your 'game' teacher), and she's just not remotely interested (seems to be the case for young hot girls), looks away from you, tries to walk away as you start speaking etc.

As far as I can tell, the answer is things like negs, cold reads, DHV stories, but in my experience, these don't actually work.(on uninterested girls, at least)

Let's share ideas and stories in terms of ''attraction material' etc for when a girl isn't playing along. 

If we are to believe in 'game' I think maybe we shouldn't just accept that they are just 'no girls'? Otherwise is there really such a thing as 'game'? (if it only works on girls who think you are handsome or whatever, then I don't really see the point in it lol, since at that point, just 'being yourself' is always enough)",seduction
Went for it boys,"Was on a train today and there was this girl who I knew I had to hit on. God the nerves when there was no seats and I had to stand next to her. The train stopped for a scheduled stop or something and i knew her next stop was in 5 mins. We talked briefly but not much connection. I thought fuck it if I don’t I’m gonna miss an opportunity and I’ll regret not saying anything so I fucking went for it and said to her ‘hey anon you’re really pretty, have you got a boyfriend?’ Heart was racing, cheeks were on fire. She said no and looked directly at me so I said do you want one for 5 mins where she thought about it and gave me her phone to put my number in. I knew it was all over but damn the rush was fucking amazing I have never done something like this before and it really put me out of my comfort zone. I realised although I said it timidly and was quick to give her my number and leave to find a seat, these are things I can change and with time I’ll be way more confident and won’t be so timid. I don’t expect to hear from her but I feel like a god.",seduction
how do you figure out what you want?,"Been thinking about this lately because of a girl I met. She clearly is looking for a relationship and I thought I was at first since I've been single for a year but the more I see her getting attached the more I am disinterested. 

This is making me think maybe I don't want a long term relationship, but I'm not sure how to figure out what I want.

",seduction
Camera Kino -- Women Love Cameras. Here's What To Do About It.,"Have you ever noticed how much girls love to pose for the camera? It’s a fascinating phenomenon. Society has literally trained us to start posing the moment we see a camera. 

This is especially true for women. The minute a camera appears they start primping and preening. They purse their lips and arch their backs to accentuate the butt. They make sexy faces and hand gestures. And the most interesting part is that they do it all without ever really thinking about it. That’s our Snapchat, Instagram, Facebook society for you…

So how can you use this information to your advantage?

**Snap Pictures of Everyone You’re With – No Permission Necessary**

Imagine if someone you're with pulls out their camera and says “hey let’s get a picture over there” or “hey quick selfie” or something similar and then just raised the camera. What would you do?  You would just smile and pose. You wouldn’t even think about it.

Did they ask your permission? No. They just assumed it was fine and proceeded accordingly. 

This is exactly what you can do with girls you’re attracting. After you’ve been talking with a girl for just a few minutes, you can generally consider yourself to have the green-light to break out the camera. 

The best part is that cameras almost always put women into good moods. 

**The Selfie**

Snapping a selfie with a girl you’re attracting is a simple way to start escalating kino. You should easily be able to get two touches with any selfie. First, in the picture itself. Second, with a hug, high five or a push/bump after the picture depending on what you say. 

Examples:

**Next To Each Other:** This is the typical selfie position. Hold up your phone with one hand and wrap your other hand around her shoulder. 

**You In Front Of Her:** This could happen in a situation where she’s standing on something which makes her taller than you. Or it could happen, for example, if she’s sitting on a bar stool and you’re leaning on the bar – you turn away from her and lean back “into her” for the selfie. Now she’s behind you. When you lean back, get as close as possible. If your body (your back) can touch her, great. In this situation it’s very possible she will put her hands on you (perhaps on your shoulders, on your hips or her arms wrapped around your stomach).

**You Behind Her:** In this situation you’re basically holding your arm out over her shoulder or you can give her the camera to take the shot. Either way, put your free hand(s) on her hips. Pull her in just enough so your bodies are touching. 

After the selfie, take the camera and check out the shots. Then say something that will result in a second touch:

\- “Good one. You look amazing.” Hold your hand out for a high five. 

\- “Good one. I look amazing (referring to yourself).” She rolls her eyes. You give her a slight push (a nudge away on the shoulder – or butt-bump her with the side of your butt – like if you’re standing side by side). Then you can pull her back in with an arm squeeze or hug and say something like “Awww it’s ok, you look pretty good too.”

**Getting Her Number Without Ever Asking**

If you take some really good pics, chances are she’s going to want them. Frankly, even if they’re not that good, she may still want them. This is a perfect way to get her contact information without making a big deal about “asking for her number.” 

In order to give her the pictures, she’s going to have to give you some way to contact her. If she gives you her number to text her the pictures, great. If she gives you social media, then just casually ask for her number after posting the pictures: “Hey what’s your number by the way?” Asking at this moment often feels very logistical to her. You’re already adding her on social, so asking for her number is just a natural thing to do.

If she asks “why” or “why do you want my number?” Just say with complete confidence: “for the hot date we’re going on later this week.” Then just look her with [The Smirk](http://dailymanup.com/attract-women-girls-alpha-male-body-language-eye-contact-smirk-pua/). Don’t say anything else. If you do that with the proper confidence, she’ll give you the number. 

**For When The Moment Isn’t Perfect**

Sometimes you may feel like the attraction isn’t quite there yet. Maybe you haven’t been talking to her long enough. Maybe the mood isn’t ideal for pictures. In these cases, pulling out your phone to take a picture with her might seem weird.

So here’s what you do: take a picture of something else first and then transition into taking pictures with her. 

Spot something nearby and just say something simple like “look at that” or “let me get a picture of that” and then snap a few shots of whatever you’re looking at. When you’re done, you can easily transition into taking a selfie together. If she responds well to the selfie (which they always do), then you can snap a few shots of her.

With this approach, you pull out your camera for another reason (i.e. to take a picture of something else) which makes the selfie seem like an afterthought. It’s perfectly normal to “think of” taking a selfie with someone else when you have your camera out already. 

**Social Media**

Another benefit of taking lots of pictures with girls is maximizing preselection. Every picture you take of you and chicks together should be posted to social media. You want girls to see you in pictures with other girls. And girls who know you for any period of time (like in college) are going to stalk your social profile. So get your pictures up.  

**Getting Into Cameras**

Photography isn’t a cheap hobby, but it’s a fantastic hobby for getting laid. Here’s a go-to date you can use with every girl: “Hey I’m going to shoot some pictures of \[insert anything here\], you want to go?”

As I said, women love photography. They love cameras. Anything that involves cameras is interesting to them. Plus, this date makes *any place* you go more interesting. Because you’re not just going there to be together and talk. You’re going there for some interesting purpose and being together and talking just occurs naturally without it having to be the focus. 

That makes everything easier. Plus you’ll naturally get lots of pictures of her along the way which puts these two ideas together in her mind: (1) looking sexy and (2) being with you. 

Golden. 

Also, women like to start taking their clothes off in front of cameras. Also a fascinating phenomenon. I’ll save that topic for my next post on cameras. 

Check out more great articles to [up your game here](http://dailymanup.com/how-to-attract-women-turn-girls-on/). ",seduction
Does it work?,"Say you're talking to a friend and ask that person to close his/her eyes for you are gonna give that person a surprise. When that person's eyes close, you lean in and kiss that person. Is it an acceptable way to let a person know you like that person or is it crossing a line? You really like that person but that person doesn't know that. ",seduction
I'm not attracted to white guys.,"I was out drinking with a couple coworkers, and one of them said they weren't into white guys. She didn't say it about me, it was just in a conversation I was listening to,  but it definitely made me feel that it's a pretty common shit test for dudes of all ethnicities. I'm not sure how I would approach it without validating myself. 

What would be your best response to this statement? 

Edit:  Was texting a latina girl and she said she doesn't go for white boys. I replied

""I don't like white boys either, we have something in common""

She replies
""Omg I'm dying 😂😂😂😂😂""

Now we are about to get a beer.
Its a shit test. ",seduction
How do you talk to someone thats already having a conversation?,"my main problem is really just trying to talk to people in a conversation. i cant seem to jump in without seeming annoying or interrupting them.

also, i have a small problem with stuttering, it's like my mind is thinking faster than i talk and i end up stumbling on my words. how can i fix this and how can i jump into convos?",seduction
How To Deal With A C*ck-Block,"When you approach a woman by herself or in a group, there’s a possibility that somebody will “c*ck-block” you at some point in the interaction.

However, if you approach the group and introduce yourself to everyone, then the chances of someone c*ck-blocking you will become a lot less likely.

Truth is, you can be c*ck-blocked at any moment so you need to know how to deal with them gracefully or else you risk losing the women you approach.

There are two ways that I deal with c*ck-blockers.

1) When someone tries to interrupt your interaction with a woman, you can simply ignore the c*ck-block, cut the interaction short, and quickly go for the contact details.

You can say something like, “Alright it was nice to meet you, I got to get back to my friends, but do you have Snapchat/Instagram?”

If you had a great interaction up until the c*ck-block then you can go for the phone number. If the interaction wasn’t the greatest, it’s more likely that she will give you her social media info than her phone number.

2) Another way to deal with a c*ck-block is to address them directly. The proper way to address the c*ck-block is to be nonreactive. If a c*ck-block approaches you and says, “hey man that’s not how you pick up a girl”, you can respond by smiling and saying something like, “yeah you’re right, show me how it’s done Casanova”. 

The way that you deliver your response to a c*ck-block is more important than what you say. The c*ck-blocker and the woman you approached should be able to tell that you’re unaffected by the c*ck-block and it’s simply not a big deal to you.

When dealing with a c*ck-block it’s best to respond in a casual and relaxed manner to avoid any arguments or any unnecessary drama. If you’re experienced in social situations then you can confront the c*ck-block in a more aggressive manner, but you will be risking possible embarrassment if you’re unable to put the c*ck-block in his/her place.",seduction
One of my funniest tinder experiences.,"So I matched with this girl on tinder. She seemed interested and we had some good conversaton. She told me to chat somewhere else so I wrote her on massanger. After two days of texting (date was already planned on next week) she suddenly stopped responding. After one day of nothing I asked her to know what the problem is (not exactly this but similar).

 And then she replied : I don't want to deal with someone who don't add me to his friends on facebook.

Yep... I did not do that because I wanted to wait until the first date. But now I glad that I won't date with her. 

Am I the only one who find it hilarious? :D
... Or it was a noob mistake? 
",seduction
I THINK I JUST CREATED A NEW GENRE OF GAME (Fr/technique),,seduction
Dont understand the book models,"Hi,

I believe that this book is the only thing you need to read about dating, as it explains everything logically and clearly. 

However there are things that I dont understand or are contradictory:

The first half of the book is all about being invested more in yourself than the perception of others. But how can I achieve that?

The other thing is, your intention when speaking to women should come from a non-needy point, you shouldnt speak to her to get validation.

In the second chapter he describes more practical techniques, for example that its important to lead the women on the date, how to dress and body language etc. But isnt doing this just doing it for the sake of getting her to have sex, and furthermore gaining her validation?

Its really confusing for me, because the non neediness makes 100% sense to me.",seduction
Review for 1-on-1 with Beckster,"I had what I feel like was the most life changing experience (in regards to game) in the 4 days I spent with Beckster and I cannot thank him enough for it, who has treated me like a friend and a younger brother, but also had some tough love when it was needed.


A bit of a back story about me: I was born in a Muslim country - and lived there most of my life. No girlfriends, not much female friends really. And to make it even worse, even shaking hands is considered not okay - so imagine having to do kino…


I started travelling and socialising more and more. But that just brought me to maybe an normal introvert level of social human being. I ‘almost’ got laid many times, but I didn’t even have enough confidence to do anything about it. I discovered game and it was a big revelation to me. Then I actually got laid once.



I hired a coach for 2 weeks, and it went kind of OK/not that amazing - but I personally don’t blame it on him because I wouldn’t approach when he would ask me to, I wouldn’t kino, etc etc. On the other hand, I saw him get laid once in a month, where as I have seen Beckster get laid 3 nights out of 4, with 3 different girls, two 8.5s and one 9.5 (we’re in Russia…..everyone’s hot and this 9.5 is Russian 9.5…) and he constantly gets texts from girls sending him pictures and/or asking to meet him (from Finland, where he spends a lot of time and from Russia). 



After my first coach, I got some better balls and got 5 lays and a girlfriend for 2 months or so, which I broke up with because she was in love and I wasn’t even close. But because of this period, a lot of drama and such, I was broken and I had no game again.



I went to Russia for the World Cup for about 40 days and seeing some of the hottest women on the planet and not being able to do anything about it made me feel even more worse. I did not even approach once in these 40 days. That’s how bad my AA was.



I came back to Russia again - and this time I had given up on getting laid but was just here for the experiences (learn some Russian, go around the biggest country in the world, do the trans siberian, and learn skydiving). Looking around, I saw a bootcamp by Beckster in both Moscow and St Petersburg. So I decided to contact him and we figured that he would coach me 1 on 1, which was a bit more expensive than a bootcamp. I really wasn’t sure about it because Beckster had not much feedback on the internet, even though he claimed to be gaming for over 20 years. Mystery and him were best friends….but that doesn’t mean this guy would actually have game, and even if he did, he would be a good teacher. But it was pretty much my only option in Russia.



I met up with him directly at somewhat of a high-end club venue in Moscow. He gave me some basic tips, and just did a lot of basic stuff with me. He said he does not like to “make a plan” the first night, but actually game first and make a plan/fix problems later because it makes way more sense. He would ask me to open, and I would obviously not do it, and then he would do it just to prove it’s possible. Then I would open and get rejected, and he would be there to fist pump me saying “amazing job, now get blown out again and don’t worry about it”. And each rejection made it better. He was also gaming at the same time, and I saw him go from knowing no one to knowing every hot girl in that area, and later in the night, every hot girl would smile at him just passing by. Girls were opening me asking “Is he your friend?”. The amount of social proof he built was amazing. But his game was very much about having fun with everyone and working the room. 



And being a theory junkie, he was in my mind the ‘clown who doesn’t get laid’ in the internet terms, even though what he was doing was very very impressive. I had never seen anything like it…. And then he got laid. Consistently. He would close every girl’ IG/WhatsApp too. I have seen a few good PUAs in action, but I had never seen anything like this.



We exited the club and went to another venue opposite to the current one. He then did it all from scratch again - and built a lot of social proof just by having fun. I opened a few more sets here too but nothing sticked. One of the coaches who works for Beckster was also gaming in the same venue, and we met him, and then proceeded to leave the club to another after-party place with 3 girls. Now this coach and Beckster both had a girl, and I wasn’t doing anything with my girl even though she was there and all I had to do was take charge.



I wanted to leave and Beckster came with me. While I was mostly a spectator this night, and tried opening sets but failed, I saw first hand what really good game looks like and I had consumed quite a bit of information.



The next evening, we met again, and did some street game / Daygame. I would hesitate on each approach, but eventually he would convince me to do it. I did a couple of approaches where I was pretty much ignored. He then gave me pointers, and told me to stay at an arm’s length, not lean in, smile and be more happy, stand up tall and talk loud and clear. I then approached a 2-set just to ask them “where can I get a scarf”. And they smiled, and helped out and told me about a mall close by. I could have moved forward in the set and they were both still smiling at me, but I said thank you and ejected. Beckster was there to give me a high five. I then approached 2 more sets, and was exhausted. We went and sat down at a coffee shop nearby and he gave me a debrief, and gave me a list of quick fixes I could start doing right away.



After chilling out for a while, we went out for night game. I was more confident this night, and had a bit more of an idea on how night game works.



He gave me a lot of tips to improve confidence. One example is just walking on the road - notice the IOIs you get from random girls…and see how they pump your state a bit by bit. I noticed this on my 3rd day after we went shopping and I fixed my posture, etc…it was crazy, girls were actually looking at me and giving me eyes. I felt like a changed man. An attractive man. We went out at night and saw a one-set passing by and he asked me to open, and I did. She smiled, it went well…I closed her IG and asked to hang later. We then proceeded to go to a few bars, had some good chats and ended up in a club. I was obviously in my mind, and wouldn’t approach when he asked me to. So he did the approach again just to prove it doesn’t matter. We just hung around the club, talking, having good chats and occasionally opening sets. I also opened a lot of sets myself. Eventually, we pulled 2 girls to our apartment. It was a set I opened. It was my pull. I couldn’t believe it.



Beckster went to Finland the next morning and I was obviously worried that my ‘game’ would end there. But it didn’t. I joined my language school and was the ‘social guy’ who talked and laughed with everyone. It was the first day. I had never felt this confident before. I was the guy who would keep his head down in and walk straight to class in my earlier years.



Then came the Friday and it was the night to go out. I was really sick, but I thought what the heck, a vodka shot should kill the germs. I gamed the club, and met girls. 7s and above only. I got 5 solid numbers, where girls were really really down to hangout. To give you an example: when taking one girl’s number because she was leaving to another place, I said “I’ll call you” and she said “I really hope so”. This was an 8 in a tight cocktail dress. My mind had ongoing fireworks. Out of the 6 numbers I closed, one was not that interested, but 5 really were. None of these girls were below 7s.



Then I opened a 2 set, and went to another place with them. This was a 6 and a 9 (yes, an actual 9). I wasn’t worried about her hotness and I wanted to game. So I opened another 2 set while these girls watched, and I laughed with them and had fun. And I told them me and my friends are going to another place to have a drink, you can join us or stay here, but you should join me at the afterparty at my place later. They were down. This was a high 7 and a 6.5. I took the 7’s number, who had the perfect blonde Scandinavian look that I like.



We had our drinks at the other place, and me and one of my wings now had 4 girls to take back home. So we took them and bought same alcohol on the way. Turns out the 9 was swooning over me and she worked hard to keep me away from the other girls (lol). She’s an IG model. My “Scandinavian  looking” girl came to me while I was making out with the 9 and said “It was really nice meeting you, me and my friend are going to leave now.” Me: “Oh are you sure, I hope to see you again”. “Me too, you have my number, call me any time”.  And then I got back to my 9 and had sex for the next 8 hours and got possibly the best BJ I have ever had. And then she cooked me breakfast. At my place. My wing was with her friend in the other room.



Going from a little sad man who wouldn’t approach to a guy who was wanted by so many hot girls - and then laying an IG model who has dated two millionaires and has travelled on their private jets….I really cannot thank Beckster enough. This girl is checked out my almost every guy and girl on the street when I am walking with her. I have never felt like this before, and I am looking forward to what my future in the game holds. I am an average looking brown dude - who would have thought…



I have left out quite a bit of information here about what else Beckster did for me (such as fixing my fashion, style, tinder profile, etc)…but I think I have made my point. I did my mental masturbation to all the RSD woowoo about abundance mentality for the last year, but learning Beckster’s style of game and actually having girls fixed a lot more in less than 2 weeks. Onwards…",seduction
"Do you ever seduce smart women such as lawyers, doctors or engineers? How?",,seduction
Went to the club with my girlfriend. What to say when other guys try to talk to her?,"Can I say something like ""Hey man, that's my girlfriend."" Or what do you guys say in these situations? ",seduction
Control your body,"So I was out last night with a female friend and two female acquaintances. We were dancing and having a good time, I wasn’t there for pickup or anything. There were a lot of guys there trying to pickup women, kind of creepily hovering around the corners of the room until they got sloppy drunk and then jumping into the middle of a girl gang. The thing I noticed about these guys was they had no body control, they had confidence but they moved like sloppy drunks with big stupid grins on their faces. Their fake smiles hurt my face to think they could hold them that long. I guess what I’m saying is control your body a little, don’t get so wasted, don’t throw yourself at women.",seduction
How do you develop eye sex?,I’ve noticed that I’ve gotten into it a little bit without realizing it and not trying to be sexual 90% of the time. I met this girl who everyone thought was very flirty but a lot of times she didnt mean much from it. The same could be said when I watching this guy at a bar. How is it that you develop this skill or at least what makes the eyes so sexual to people?,seduction
I don't care about girls. Is it something wrong with me?,"I'm 16 and I never had a girlfriend nor cared to approach a girl, it's a waste of time in my opinion. Most guys my age seem to live just to go out with girls and it makes me wonder if there's something wrong with me. I'm also a bit of a loner and an introvert, I prefer to spend time alone. I socialize at school but after I'm home I prefer to spend my time by myself.

For example, most guys start working out so they can get laid, I started working out so clothes will look better on me. Anyone else feels the same as me?",seduction
[FR] Flying Solo at the Club,"After my fourth time going to the club solo this past year, I’ve finally conquered my moby dick. And by moby dick, I mean getting some random girl to grind on me. 

About me - I am 29, average height, a brown dude but never really felt that hinder my game as I am confident with my looks. I used to post here a lot more often, but then a girl I was seeing found my reddit account and wasn’t too excited about my day game field reports. So I deleted my account. Now I am back. I have little to no experience in club game, I mainly do day game for the past year and a half on and off. I would categorized myself as probably an intermediate in my game. 

The club - Last night I was feeling pretty good before heading to the club. I had approached about a dozen girls, had an instadate with this cute French girl, where we literally had to use google translate to understand each other. I was trying to get her to come out with me to the club, but it didn’t pan out. 

I came to the club with the mindset of just having fun. I wasn’t planing on taking anyone home with me or even think about women 24/7 while I was there. Although I never went to the club in college or when I was younger, and I totally thought it was super stupid my first few times, especially when you are sober (I don’t drink), I can now say I like going to the club for the sake of going to the club. 

The night before (Friday), I had gone to the club but invited a girl who I meet via day game the week prior to join me. So most of the time I was dancing with her, and then by myself. 

This time, I came into the club and sat by myself around 9:30, which was definitely early, but I am a cheap son of a bitch and didn’t want to pay cover. I thought I would look like a loser, just sitting there chilling, avoiding using my phone, bobbing my head and looking out to the universe. But I think this actually boosted my confidence. It creates that mentality that I didn’t care about what other people thought of me. I was just going to do me. 

Eventually i walked to the bar closer to the dance floor and away from the lounge. I wanted to find some people that looked like they were having a good time and just join them. I find it easier to join a group of guys because it’s easier to be friends with guys than women that think I am trying to game them. I ended up hanging out with this flamboyant black guy. 

Eventually I went out to the dance floor. I just went with the mentality and dancing and having fun. The reference I had in mind is that dancing scene in American Horror Story hotel, where the dude is dancing to Drake after killing Lady Gaga’s ancient lover (you know if you know, otherwise check it out on YouTube). 

I legitimately had fun doing this, I don’t really know if people noticed me or not. Maybe, was hard for me to tell. I would flirt with women by singing lyrics to them when they were near, it might amount to a smile but not much else. 

It started to get late and at that time I decided to just do some approaches. I would chat up random women at the bar, say ridiculous things like you have the eyes of a snake, etc. it would lead to some small talk but I wouldn’t sense mutual attraction. Day game is so much easier. Women far more attractive than I would find in the club would be estactic I was talking to them, whereas in the Women in the club would act like I had leorosy when I asked to dance with them. 

So eventually as I straight up asking women, I told this one girl who looked a bit like Megan Fox that she was gorgeous. 5 mins later I ask her to dance. Before I know it, she’s grinding on me. That was way too easy. It gets hot fast. With her taking her hands and having me grab her boobs. I think I turned her on with me grabbing her waist and thighs tightly. I kiss her neck, rubbing her kissy over her dress, biting down her back and her neck. Wouldn’t think my first grinding sesh would be this hot,  but here we are. But it clearly wasn’t hot enough, after 15 mins or so, her friend took her. She ends up grinding on some other dude. A bigger black dude. But hey, doesn’t stop me. I show her my phone in tr middle of her grinding with the other guy and she says no. After that, I ended up going home. 

That was probably way longer than this needed to be, but I wrote this all while driving (don’t do this). ",seduction
Introvert approaching methods,"Hi everyone,

So I've been reading a lot lately on how to approach woman, but my problem is that they're very direct. I understand that it's unavoidable, but it's to soon now (and yes, I've tried). My problem is that in this field, I've got the social skills of a sea-cucumber.

My question is: aren't there easier methods to start (preferably the introvert-type ones)? I've tried approaching a woman, giving her a genuine compliment en get on with my day, but even that gives me the shivers. I've read only that you have to make eye contact first and if you smile at each other, you can try, but how do you make proper eyecontact from distance?

Does anyone have any pointers on this subject?",seduction
How to make high quality friends as an adult,,seduction
Does being tall help??,I’m 6’3 and a senior in high school. Im wondering if me being tall would help attract girls at least a little bit. I’m just bad at noticing signals of attraction. ,seduction
The Top Ten Pickup Artists In The World (Part 4),,seduction
Why You Should Aim To Feel Like A Pathetic Anxious Pick-Up Newbie,"I'm five years deep in the game. I'm paid to write by a few publications to write dating advice and work as a confidence coach.

Yet, last night made me feel like a complete pick-up newbie.

This post is about why this is a GOOD situation which you should aim for!

# The background

On a night out earlier this week, I found myself in some area of Hong Kong full of people, but they were all sat down having quiet drinks with friends. 

I told myself I couldn't approach here and that my logistics sucked anyway, so I went home. 

This grated on me though. Because obviously that's bullshit. I've approached in environments like that before, even if it is tougher to weasel large seated sets.

So I went about fixing that.

Last night, I went to an area of Bangkok which is mostly full of these sit-down polite chit-chat venues - and I spent the night ONLY gaming these sets. 

Honestly, I haven't felt like such a pick-up newbie in ages. 

I would hesitate for 10-15 seconds before opening. I would eject early. It was an unremarkable night.  

BUT I did open some sets that I never normally would...that's progress! Most were large mixed sets sat at some table. My favourite was a group of four Thai girls who were sat eating outdoors. A couple of waiters and even a policeman were watching, but I managed to sit and join them for a while ;) 

Now, next time I see a hottie in one of these situations, I'll be more likely to do a better job of gaming her.

(I'm actually going to go and game in polite chit-chat venues for the first couple of hours again tonight)   

# The point of this story 

It doesn't matter at what point you an approach makes you anxious...

* 9s and 10s
* daytime sets 
* mixed sets
* without your wingman
* gutter game
* public transport
* seated polite chit-chat sets
* making out with her boyfriend sets
* whatever it is!

...you will always be anxious about these types of approaches until you go out and DO THEM. No amount of theory is a substitute for this.  

If you're doing approaches that make you feel like an anxious pick-up newbie, that means you're growing and improving. 

It's worth expanding your comfort zone like this. After all, you never know where you're going to spot your dream girl...

***I co-launched a Telegram group for men who want to become amazing with women. There's hundreds of guys sharing their success stories and getting advice on their sticking points. A real brotherhood. If you want to join, drop me a PM with your Telegram handle.***

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
Do you consider evacuating sets? Ran into an unexpected scenario,"I think my game has actually improved, but I'm still practically a newbie at closing. I've focused so much on sparking attraction that I never stopped to consider if I should hit the brakes occasionally.

One issue I realized is in small bars people know each other a bit more as regulars, and maybe using this as my playground has been hurting my rep lately. I'll probably be avoiding this place for a bit but... onto the set in question:

&amp;#x200B;

This was maybe the 3rd set of the night at a small bar. This lady was chilling on her own at a table, so of course easy situation to approach as a lone wolf. I find out she has kids, and I wasn't terribly surprised. I still kept up some banter, but I also found out she was a wedding photographer that took time do photo shoots for a lot of the patrons at the bar. Well last night I was actually feeling some regret for asking a girl for a number the night before that actually may have been a good match, so I was a bit trigger happy tonight. So I asked this girl, we will call her Stacy for her number, and told her I would roam some.

I think we chatted a bit more later as well, then she went off for a bit saying she would be back. I hung out for a few minutes at this table, then I went to roam. I start another set, and Stacy shows up and sits at the adjacent table as I'm starting off. Well, she waves and I wave and say hi, but keep talking to the current girl. Well, I think this whole thing weirded out the current girl sheila, as she said she was going to go meetup with her friends.

I go to continue talking to Stacy, although I don't think I even addressed what elephant may have been in the room at that point. I think I even tried to escalate, but she got pulled away by the DJ, who was friends with another guy at the bar that seemed to like Stacy, which is a whole another side story but I was trying to not make this post too long.

So at the end of the night when I left, for a moment I feeling a little bad at how the night went, but I also realized I had a  lot of good sets and interactions in the night too,  so overall I was happy with how my game has improved.

However, I'm a bit perplexed by that whole Stacy situation. I was thinking I should have just evacuated the set when I found out about wedding photographer + divorced with kids + on the older side. That scenario just seems overly complicated. Also why was she the one flagging me down? I hear about girls hating neediness, but she comes to interrupt my set?

If I get a number that night, but I'm still hanging around, what is the etiquette here? I mean, I could still push for a close even with the number I would think, but if I am not super into the girl, how is that going to impact my game at that location if she is around?  Maybe I just lost my composure as I need  more experience with these tougher scenarios...

What makes this difficult is I can't tell how much the reason she left was the jealous dudes DJ friend getting her away vs did I fail some sort of shit test. The other difficult point was, I had a hard time gauging if she actually wanted sex that night based off of the girl or was I just rejecting myself by putting in reasons, such as a girl like that wouldn't have sex the night I met her.

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
Couple of questions after nightouts at clubs,"After a few of nightouts for the last few weeks, I have a few questions about general tactics of opening a group set.

a.) how to approach a fit girl when she hangs out a group of men.

It happened last week. I saw a very fit girl who was with a brunch of tall men (over my height 5'10) . I so wanted to approach her but got intimidated by her friends and was worried that I would get bullied by  them. I gave up.

In the late evening, when I walked pass her by chance, I looked at her with a smile and she reciprocated with a smile back. IOI? Thinking too much?  I didn't approach in the end. Scared!

b.) Should I go back to talk to the same girl after I initiated a one-way conversation with her at the start?

It happened last night. I tried to let go my approach anxiety talking relentlessly to girls. With an opener of praising their efforts making themselves look good at the clubs, it seemed that most of them were welcome me at first. It didn't mean they like me or some sort, but at least up a point I could hold a conversation for a few seconds.  Stumbled trough though; however it didn't go what I planned. Awkward moments, forgot to smile when I approached, went behind from the girl's backs to approach, waited too long and stuttered... you name it you have it.

I have two occasions after I had a one-way chat with two girls. I thought they were not keen on me as they didn't ask my name or other questions keeping up our conversations. However, when I was on a dance floor, saw them in my vicinity and caught them looking at me. IOI? confusions? Thinking too much? No chances?

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
11 Great Places Where You Can Meet Women,"No, a girl won't magically appear in your life if you stay home all day browsing forums, jacking off to porn, or watching Netflix all day. If you want a girlfriend or simply want to get laid, you actually need to get out there and interact with women.

Which is why, i'm going to give you 10 possible places you can go to if you want to meet women.

So without further ado, here is da list!

**Volunteer Somewhere.** Volunteering can be a good place to meet like-minded people, and even people you want to date. A good place to volunteer is somewhere with a high concentration of women and ties in to your interests.

If you're sporty, you can try volunteering for the special Olympics. If you live in a decent-sized city with a decent-sized college or university, the majority of the volunteers are college students between the ages of 18 to 25. Track &amp; Field, Volleyball, and Tennis are good events to volunteer for. Volleyball obviously has lots of girls, and track &amp; field has many volunteers so chances are you will meet girls.

If you're into animals, you can try the humane society.

**Various online dating sites.** There's the traditional mainstream apps such as Tinder and Bumble which has many users and is predominantly a hookup app. However if you're not having much success on there, there's always other online dating sites/apps you can try.

There's a phone app called MeetMe, which is similar to Plenty of Fish except it is only for the phone and has a decent amount of users. There's also another dating app called Coffee Meets Bagel.

There's the traditional dating sites such as OkCupid and Plenty of Fish. There's also Zoosk and match.com

There's niche dating sites. TasteBuds is a dating site which matches you with people based on shared musical interests.

**Find Meetups In Your Local Area at Meetups.com**

Meetups.com is a site where people post their groups around your location to which anybody can sign up and go to. For instance, St Louis web developers get together, The diehard lovers of tennis group, Alexis Texas fanclub, etc... Chances are you might find a group that interests you, so you should check the website out,

Hey, you might meet the love of your life. ;)

here is the link. [https://www.meetup.com/](https://www.meetup.com/)

**If you're in college, through taking classes and asking them out.**

Chances are if you're taking a class with at least 20 or more people, there's a high chance that there's at least a couple of cute girls in there. So why not take advantage of it? 

**Also if you're in college, by joining college clubs**

You probably won't meet the love of your life joining the chess club or world of warcraft club.

Depending on the size of your college, there may be dozens of college clubs that you can join and chances are there is one that ties in to your interests. You may meet some cute girls in there.

**If you're religious, join a bible study.**

There's youth groups for those who are still in high school. But there's also college bible studies and even those for adults 30 or older.

**Salsa/Dance Classes**

The great thing about dance classes is that they are usually dominated by women. And even if you don't meet anybody, at least you have learned how to dance, ladies love a guy who can dance :)

**Meeting girls through your friends**

Chances are if you're like me and all of your friends are either nerds or animals, then this likely isn't an option.

However, if you have friends who are either popular or know lots of people, then this can be an option. For instance, let's just say you're somehow friends with a sorority girl, well sorority girls typically have lots of ""sisters"". Maybe you can convince her to set you up with one of her sisters.  You'll basically be a part of the family.

**The Dog Park**

First off, you need to buy a dog first. (or steal your friends dog just for the day) and then head off to the nearest dog park.

Believe it or not, your dog can be your greatest wingman (wingdog actually) You just train him to run up to attractive girls and sniff and bark at them, then you rush on over and apologize for your dog's ""misbehavior"" ;) It's easy to start a conversation as well. All you have to do is ask her what kind of dog she has, your two start talking about your dogs, then before you know it, you're asking for her number.

**Hitting up random girls on your friends list through Facebook**

It's simple, just go through every attractive girl on your friends list and write them saying, Ayyyyyy gurl, lemme get dem digits. Don't worry, you'll only end up on Bye Felipe just a couple of times.

jk, don't do that. Facebook is not a dating site.

However in the near future, Facebook will be launching a dating feature on their site. You'll finally be able to hit up girls without being a creep.

**Through Daygame/Cold Approach**

What is day game? Day game is basically a form of cold approach where you are going around and talking to girls throughout the day time. (bars, nightclubs, and online dating is not day-game) For instance, you're at a coffee shop and you see a cute girl sitting by herself and you go talk to her, or you're walking down the street and you see this cute girl and you talk to her and get her number, these are examples of day-game.

Why consider doing day-game? Well when you only try to meet people through either common connections or common events such as work or volunteer, chances are there are only a handful of girls that you may get to meet and there is no guarantee that they will be single and actually like you back. However, with day game and cold approach, there are hundreds of women you could talk to and potentially go on a date with. And unlike online dating, you're not competing with dozens of other guys for her attention.

I'm not saying you should do day-game. You will probably get rejected a lot, but if you get good at it, you might have some success.

**Get rich and famous**

If you get rich and famous, you don't even have to chase girls, the girls will chase you.",seduction
Dealing with flaky tinder matches?,"From time to time i get matches that hit me up and show interest. I game them and then once the conversation (even a good conversation) dies a bit out they flake and never reply again. 

Especially the girls that are openly looking to fuck are flaky as fuck. I don't know what to do with them, it's like rolling the dice. They openly show they want to get laid but then when i try to set up a meet they flake out and don't appreciate the forwardness. ",seduction
"Looking for Daygame Wings in Washington, DC",,seduction
Is There A Cleanly Defined Process For Seduction?,"I'm looking to hear anyones thoughts on seduction as a process, with steps and stages. 

I'm a marketer and I train in Jiu Jitsu and something that totally simplifies both activities is having a simple model to follow. 

For Jiu Jitsu:

1. Take opponent down. 
2. Pass guard. 
3. Establish mount/side control. 
4. Submit the opponent. 

For Marketing:

1. Get attention. 
2. Establish interest. 
3. Generate desire. 
4. Incentivize action. 

It's simple, but an effective guidance system to ensure you know what you are doing at every step. You know where you are at any given stage and know what the next step is, without missing steps. 

Clearly both fields are much more complex, but as a rule of thumb, these frameworks make it easier to do the right thing at the right time. 

If anyone has a defined process, I'd love to hear it. ",seduction
What to talk about when someone introduces you to a girl? Im awkward in that situation,"Yesterday I was at a party with a friend, we were going to the bar when a girl touches my back, I stop there and she asks whats my name, I answer and she tells me ""cool, I wanna introduce you to my friend, she is single by the way"" so I give her two kisses (Im spaniard, it's the common thing to do here) and then is when my awkwardness kicks in, I don't know what to say and luckily my friend didnt notice any of this and he kept walking to the bar, so I told the two girls that I had to go one sec with my friend and I would come back later. I didn't come back, obviously lol. Then a random girl started a conversation with my friend on the bar and the friend of this girl started talking to me, we ended up in a conversation talking about myself and my awkwardness, luckily I was drunk and I didnt give a shit. But today, with no alcohol in my system I see that I might have a problem. How do i solve it? ",seduction
"For what occupuations does the ""don't flirt with the waiter"" rule not apply?","You often hear that you should not mistake a waiter's or a bartender's friendliness for thinking that she's suddenly in to you - it's her job to be nice. While certainly a good tip, what are the exceptions? Is this true for all customer-facing professions, or would you say it doesn't apply as much to some others (e.g. cashier in a grocery store, working in a flower shop...)?

EDIT: I must have expressed myself poorly. I was asking what professions to approach, not what professions to \*become\* :) ",seduction
How do I fucking know?,"If I'm going outside with a girl for a normal hangout (not a date), how do I know if it's expected from me to escalate since it's not a date?

How do I know if I'm friendzoned even before the meeting? 

If I want something more with a girl, I know I gotta escalate from the first meeting, but it's freaky because I don't know her and how could we like each other if it's too early. But on later meetings it's late to do something and I definitely get stuck in a friendzone...

*This is like fucking nuclear pshycics to me I swear...*",seduction
wings northern new jersey,"We have various spots we hit up for daygame in Bergen/Passaic. 

We night game in Hoboken mainly. 

Interested in joining us? 

Text Tony @  (973) 531-7679 ",seduction
Tokyo Daygame - Need Wingman,"Are you in Tokyo and interested in going out and doing some daygame? My Japanese is ok and I'm looking for a wing to go to some daygame approaches.

&amp;#x200B;

If you're in Tokyo pm me!",seduction
Practising at raves?,So next weekend I'm going to London for a DnB rave and I want to get some practise in. Is there anyone who has had practise talking in these environments? ,seduction
How to rate women attractivness?,"So we all hear the one to ten scale. When I was younger it was the very good looking women. So, somthing like Megan Foxx. As I grew older and I have been doing salsa dancing for over 8 years. I noticed that the women that I dance with, that turned me on the most, many times where not the priettiest women. I remember dancing with this Spanish girl that I though was not at all attractive. Also, she had a terrible breath. But boy getting close to her body and rubbing it felt like paradise and until this day I regret not asking her out.
One other instance, is that I have looked at many WWE divas and to be honest they all look very good but none does it for me. However, one DIVA goes by the name of Taeler Hendrix, and holy she is smokin. i would smash that until a black hole is created and that is the end of the universe. The wierd thing is many people call her a butter face, and the funny thing is that I actually like her face even the funny looking teeth she has. And here comes my question, how the hell do you rate women. 
Younalways hear if you are a seven do not aim at a nine. But, sometimes I even like the fours, fives , sixes etc... It is always how turned on I am by the woman and it is so difficult at times to know to rate them? How do you rate yourself or rate women to know who is suitable or who is not. And do you think the rating system is flawed? Usually black chicks are not ranked high, but Inhad some incredible experince does that make them not tens. I find sometimes white women that are a little thicker with gorgeous butts or breasts but decent face really smokin. Infact I noticed many times I dont like if the women has like a photoshoped face where it is close to perfection. I think for this reason I do like Audrey Fleurot more than Scarlett Johansson.
Lets put this out there, I am not good at all with women, put that in mind and am mot trying to make a point. I really feel that the rating system is a bit flawed because it is not well explained. There is a lot of hype about zhollywood actresses, models and I believe I see far more attractive women everyday but somehow these womens are labeled tens and most attractive women in the world.
To me a ten is the one that turns me on the most wheather she is a land whale, average looking or the hottest woman in the universe. I want to know how to rate myself, women so I could know who is and who is not out of my league. If the league is non existant why is it preached?",seduction
Should I ask her what she thinks about us and if we are exclusive?,"I recently met this girl I like and consider us to be “something.” We’ve hung out a 3-4 times, most of which we go out and then she ends up coming back to my place and we stay up all night watching movies, talking, lots of sex, etc. The thing is, she is graduating from Uni in 2 months and I am not sure what to do about things between us. I don’t expect any type of real relationship with such a short amount of time, but I want to hear what she thinks about “us.” I don’t truthfully know for a fact if she’s hooking up with anyone else but I would lean towards the side that she’s not based on a few random convos and how we’ve hung out every weekend since we met. 

I want to tell her I like her and would be down to have a little exclusive “fling” before she graduates. Do I just let things happen or should I bring it up to her low key and see what she thinks? ",seduction
Life Is Like Pickup ...,"Life is like pickup, if you don't take the risk now, it's gone forever.
",seduction
Went out to get laid and conquer my fear. Going back home beaten by it,"Well I went out to get laid aaaand that didn't work. Idk where this fear came from because I use to be able to approach any women but now I'm stuck when I see even an average looking girl. 

How did I get this way??

I use to be really good with women and something happened. 

I went to a bar. Saw a girl i thought was cute and walked past her and said excuse me as I walked past her. Thats all I could muster. 

They say nyc is easy but for me it's hard af. 

I'm just not getting it. 

I won't give up tho but damn this is frustrating 

I use to be into pua back in college. Got out of it cause I was confident and was doing good with women. 

Then I moved to NYC and haven't been laid. Smh. 

So wierd how this fear is in me. I'm literally stuck in it. ",seduction
Why am I a social person in a social gathering but fucking nervous during cold approach?,"In a social setting like a party, group projects etc...I have no problem socializing with others, male and female, and I tend to get cracking jokes pretty quickly. But in a cold approach setting, I get fucking nervous. My mind just freezes and I think about the perfect interaction in my head. I can’t express interest in any girl I like for shit. Why am I like this?",seduction
I do the same things with every single girl and it makes me mad that I do it. But I never change. Need help,"With nearly every girl I want to get with, I have the same step by step process but it never gets me laid. I literally only end up making out with them because I didn’t make a move soon enough.

Despite being on a bed with them, full bodies touching, having straight eye contact, I never make a move until it’s too late. EVERY TIME. 

I know when she wants to hookup, but here’s the thing that I hate the most about my approach. I wait until the very end of being with her to kiss her. I talk and talk for hours but never make a move. My conversation and escalating are smooth, but never hooking up with them.

The reason I’m posting this now after this happening with at least 10 girls is because this is the LAST STRAW. Tonight, as I walked out of her place after talking with her for far too long on her bed, I finally kissed her and asked if we could continue back inside because I finally made a move. She said “No, you should’ve done that hours ago!” and I left in self-frustration.

Why can’t I just stop talking and start making the move earlier? I always end up getting much less than I want because I pussy out.",seduction
How to make a girl more interested and invested?,"I know this girl that I have a sexual history with, we were fuck buddies/casually dating for a few months but then we decided to take  a break apart from each other. Since we started off as friends in the beginning, we started talking again just a few weeks ago and immediately rebuilt our connection. I'm also trying to get her to become my potential girlfriend in the future so I'm just keeping her interested for now.

We were pretty close friends so she used to tell me how she wanted love in her life, and how she always had a feeling of emptiness in her. I tried filling in her desires and make her be with me because I was attracted to her, but we ended the ""relationship"" because she told me that she was getting bored of me and that I needed to be more mature and dominant to be with her. (she's a bit older than me)

I think she noticed how I became more well put together and overall a more attractive person after our little breakup. We hooked up a few times recently, had sex, and she seems to be interested in me but still acts a bit cold at times as well. 

How do I increase her attraction to me? What kind of tactics should I use to make her have a deeper interest and relationship with me? Any advice will help. Thanks.",seduction
Grocery Store Number Close - Curly Haired Cutie! (Uncut Infield Footage),,seduction
How To Approach A Girl In College (Without Creeping Her Out),"##There are thousands of attractive, single women meandering about any college campus. And they’re praying that a cool guy like you will approach them.

Okay, maybe that’s an exaggeration. But it is true that, in many ways, a university campus is the best place to meet and attract beautiful women.

If you go to a club or bar to meet women, there’s loud music, the women are drunk, and you have to navigate group dynamics. On campus, however, the environment is quiet, the women are sober, and you can have 1-on-1 conversations with girls.

Perhaps most importantly, women in clubs get hit on all night by creepy drunk guys, so they’re going to assume you’re just another loser until you prove otherwise. On a university campus, however, girls are almost never approached – so they’ll be impressed that you had the courage to approach them.

University game isn’t universally better than clubs, but there are enough advantages that it’s worth trying if you’re enrolled in a medium to large sized university. Hell, it’s worth trying even if you don’t go to college but you’re age appropriate (what exactly that means is up to you) and live near a university.

Campus game is notably different from nightclub game: you need a different strategy to get the best results. In this article, you’re going to learn exactly how to approach a girl in college (without creeping her out).

&amp;nbsp;

##How To Approach A Girl In College Tip 1: Calibrate Your Approach

&amp;nbsp;

Women don’t expect to be approached while they’re on campus. Because of this, you can startle a girl when you approach her during the day. It’s important that you make your approach as non-threatening as possible. Here are a few ways to accomplish this:

A. Give her some personal space when you approach. If you’re catching up to her from behind as she walks past you, walk faster than her to get a few feet in front of her before you approach her (also make sure to give her a few feet of space to her side).

If you approach from behind a girl or from too close to her side, you will most likely startle her (if you do make a girl feel a bit nervous, it’s not the end of the world, just apologize before launching into your opener). By giving her a few feet of space and getting in front of her, she will be much more comfortable talking to you.

B. Acknowledge that what you’re doing is a bit unusual to make the girl more comfortable with your approach.

I do this by saying, “Hey, I know this is random, but…” (before launching into my opener)

Or, if the girl is studying I’ll say, “Sorry to interrupt, but…”

Saying something like this lets the girl know that I respect her feelings and am willing to leave if she doesn’t want me there.

Simply walking up to a girl on campus and introducing yourself is going to impress her – but it can also make her feel nervous, that’s why giving her space and empathizing with her will make your approach go more smoothly.

&amp;nbsp;

##How To Approach A Girl In College Tip 2:
##Let Her Know Why You’re Talking To Her

&amp;nbsp;

Women rarely get approached on campus. But if they do get approached, it’s usually one of two things:

1. A petitioner.

2. A religious recruiter.

To clarify that you’re not trying to show her the ways of Jesus, you should make it clear that you’re approaching the girl because you’re interested.

My favorite lines to open with during day game are:

“I like your style so I had to introduce myself.”

“I thought you were cute and I had to say hi.”

(here's an infield clip of me using the above line: https://youtu.be/5IBvHN-r9C4)

A direct approach is particularly effective during the day. In a nightclub, girls assume you’re approaching because you’re attracted to them, but on campus, girls need to know why you’re talking to them – otherwise they’ll assume you’re some weirdo.

Being approached directly can actually be a powerful turn-on for a girl. However, you don’t want to be too complimentary or she’ll see you as low value. Attractive women want guys they have to work for: a challenge.

After my fairly direct approach, I make sure to challenge the girl with some teasing, push-pulls, and by getting her to qualify herself. Doing this allows me to make her wonder whether I’m attracted to her, which in turn, makes her start to chase me.

&amp;nbsp;

##How To Approach A Girl In College Tip 3:
##Make The Conversation Emotionally Engaging

&amp;nbsp;

Men tend to prefer logical conversation. We talk to solve problems or transfer information.

Women prefer emotional conversation: sharing feelings excites them. When meeting a girl for the first time, you’re going to have a much more impactful interaction if you lead the conversation away from logic and towards emotion.

It’s fine to ask a girl a basic question like, “What do you study?” But after asking such a question, you should make the conversation emotionally relevant by following up with something like:

“Do you love it?”
“Is that a passion of yours, or are you doing it to get rich?”

Doing this will bring the conversation towards her emotional experience, which is far more engaging to her than talking about facts.

You can also ask start conversation threads with emotional questions like:

“What do you do for fun?”
“What are you passionate about?”
“Have you ever been in love?” (you’ll usually want to be a few minutes into the conversation before asking this)

Or,

You: “I’ve always wanted to ask a girl this question, but never have.”
Her: What question is that?
You: What do you think women really want in a man?

Any of the above questions will spark a memorable conversation that will go beyond the surface level niceties that most first meetings get stuck in.

&amp;nbsp;

##How To Approach A Girl In College Tip 4:
##Get Her Number

&amp;nbsp;

Most girls you meet on campus have somewhere to be within the next hour. As such, you won’t be able to pull many girls straight home with you from university.

To be fair, it is possible to pull from day game, but when you’re new to approaching girls on campus, it’s best to focus on getting girls’ numbers and setting up dates (because it’s a more efficient use of your time).

Once you’ve approached a girl and had a few minutes of emotionally engaging conversation with her, you can get her number and make plans to hang out again. To do this, you can simply ask, “Hey it’s cool talking to you, we should hang out again, would you like to get a cup of coffee later this week? 

So long as she says yes, you can follow up by asking, “Cool, what’s your number?”

If you made a good impression and she’s single, there’s a very good chance she’ll meet you for a date – from there it’s easy to move your relationship with her in whatever direction you want.


&amp;nbsp;

##Wrapping Up How To Approach A Girl In College

&amp;nbsp;

Approaching women on campus is intimidating to most guys. So intimidating that almost no one does it. This means you can easily stand out from the crowd and make a strong impression.

If you message a hot girl on Tinder, you’re competing against 100 other guys who messaged her within the last 24 hours. If you approach a girl in college, you’re showing her that you’re an outlier: one of the few guys with the courage to meet in person while sober.

Sure, meeting women in college isn’t always easy. And yes, some of your approaches will be awkward (especially at first).

But if you’re willing to endure the initial rockiness, meeting women on campus will be incredibly rewarding.

Not only will you meet and have sex with beautiful women, but you’ll also find that the thrill of approaching women during the day gives you an adrenaline rush that swiping right on Tinder just can’t match.

If you want, you can follow me on Snapchat to see daily infield footage (approaches, pulls, etc.) Username: AveryGHayden
",seduction
Seduction &amp; internal character change,"For quite a long time the slightest rejections would burn me with fury of a thousand bunsen burners. My ass would feel sore like it had been butt fucked by those earthworms from tremors. I would sautee in the self-hate, self-pity and resentment I built up from not getting the girls I wanted.

But now, although I'm not successful I understand just like everything else this is a **LONG GAME** - It isn't for those who are feeble at heart. 

Seduction helps you understand where the hell your reality is at the moment and lets you check it. Yes I am not the most attractive man nor am I as attractive as I believed but It's allowed me to tailor solutions based on my circumstances and look at my character objectively. 

It's led me to pursue different hobbies and become a more interesting person overall. It's developed me as a person to be more respectful to myself &amp; even have a stronger backbone. I wasn't even half the person I was before.

As with never before It's allowed me to understand rejection is not rejection. It's not evil or horrible. Yes painful but It's a shock to reality - It's an understanding yes you need to develop as person especially for yourself.

Pursue seduction for purpose of character &amp; love. Otherwise it will eat you alive if you solely pursue it for 'goals' like '10 F-closes a month' etc. 

I finally understand from rejection that I need to embrace it; learn from it; continue to pursue whatever I need in my life despite obstacles. 

**This is a message for the men who have zero women in their lives; WORK; WORK;WORK even when nothing seems to work. You'll eventually make it and if not you can still be proud of yourself because you're always better than you were before. TRUST ME THE MORE YOUR STEW IN BUTTHURT THE MORE INTERNALLY YOU WILL FEEL DEPRESSED**

 ",seduction
"Need help with virginity, frusturation and dance-floor game","I've just accepted that my game/dancefloor game sucks, and that I need help. Whenever I go to a nightclub, I can guaranteed that a fairly decent girl will dance around my proximity. And I actually notice and pick up the signs that she's interested. This is where it is downhill. As girls hang around in groups, when a girl comes close, she would normally have her back turned towards me and moving in. The thing is, there's girls in front of her but looking at me. I get very self-conscious that they are looking at me and judging/laughing at me. So there's that issue there. There's also the issue of what do you do to get the girl? Sometimes I just say fuck it and put my hands on her hips and we get into that slight grind. It sometimes results in a make-out, but more often than not it doesn't. Like just placing the hands there just feels kinda lame and awkward. I don't get how people I know (18 year-olds) can just go clubbing, get girls using a similar method and get results. Like I'm doing the same stuff that works in my city, but it only works 1/5.

&amp;#x200B;

Another area I need help with is when I see girls that I know that I've made out with. For example, there's this one girl that I made out with at a party a year ago. We made out for like an hour and then I had to leave. Now whenever I'm in the same club as her, she's always dancing around in my area, and I've caught her out on numerous occasions checking me out. When she's dancing around (sometimes facing me, sometimes not) it's like I go into my shell and just act like i'm blind drunk to try and hide the fact that this interaction is awkward because she's into me, I think she's cute and I'm not able to do a thing because I suck ass. It's just so frusturating when you're a virgin and you've had girls hand themselves over to you on a silver platter and you can't do a thing. 

&amp;#x200B;

I just want to get somewhere with women. My friend who I work with everyday and drink with on weekends is now seeing this smoking hot girl who's pretty well a nympho. He just keeps talking about the stuff they do all the time because I went a long time not really caring about my virginity status, but now it's driving me insane. Just want to get it over and done with. I think clubbing would be the easiest way to get it out the way. I just need to get it out of my system. I know this is a bit of a rant, but any help would be appreciated.",seduction
I'm wondering,on which date do you guys make out with a girl? Is it insulting if I go for the kiss or escalate on a 1st date? Which date is the latest to do something? Like 3rd?,seduction
"What's the deal with ""picking up women""? Is it a valuable skill?","Hey all, I'm not hating on day/night game and I understand that social skills are important, however I don't get it.

""So what do you in your spare time man, have any hobbies? soccer? music?""

""nah bro I just pick up chicks""

Do you know how sad that sounds? imagine spending your life going around trying to figure out how to pick up women just to sleep with them, that sounds shallow as fuck.

Now now, I'm not trying to slander pick up game, honestly I am interested.

I would say I am an out-going guy, I have a few really close guy mates, yet most of my friends are female because I just find I have more interests with them than guys. (I like fashion). However I never needed to go around trying to learn how to ""pick them up"", I just became friends with them naturally, in the right place and the right time, I didn't try and force anything and when I did approach women I liked, it never seemed to work for me and they just brushed me off. So I let things happen naturally now.

So my question is: Is learning how to pick up women actually a good, valuable skill to learn as a man in life? or is it just for people who lack social skills and can't hold a conversation with a rock? and if it is valuable, what about it is worth learning? I would actually be inclined to learning if It's actually beneficial in life and I hope I can get a more in-depth understanding as to why picking up women isn't just some shallow passtime to do.

Thanks!",seduction
How to Approach Any Girl With Confidence (3 Openers That Work!),,seduction
Conference/Travel Game/General Failure To Close Woes,"Note: Wall.  Of. Text.  TL;DR:  Can engage and generate interest.  But not the right interest or not enough.  (?) 

Hey everyone - 


I get sent (or send myself) to a tech conference 3 or 4 times a year.  It seems to be a very on time for me in terms of approaching women or anyone else.  I have found that the badges are very useful, if you walk up to someone and say, 

'Hey, [name on badge]!  What it like at [company / location on badge] using [technology I am at a conference for]'?  

Or

'Come on [name on badge]!  Sit with us already, me and [person I met two minutes ago] have been waiting for you!  Sheesh!'

People like being asked to talk, and respond extremely well to you using their name.  I can open the fuck out of tables of people, tables of women, women on the street, women at happy hours, women at party nights, whatever.  Zero point zero anxiety regarding approaching and I definitely seem to get a percentage of them engaged with my personality and we can chat, and bullshit, and dance, and karaoke, and whatever.  I've been told I am an amazing story teller, thanks for coming to our table and shaking things up, 'what makes you tick', blah blah.  The point that is bugging me here is that I'm not getting cold rejected; people, including plenty of women, want me to spend a few hours with them at a festive environment.  

But I cannot fucking close for shit.  I know that the logistics are more difficult in a time compressed environment, but it is getting a bit frustrating to break way out of wallflower mode, start conversations with a zillion women, run around with them half the night, get numbers, clearly be a point of general laughter, generate what *seem like* IOUs, and then seem to have generated no actual sexual intent.

A few months ago in California I cold approached two girls and convinced them to crash a party with me that I wasn't invited to, and did not have the address for. (We got in and got drunk)  Hung with them the next two nights and got shot down when I invited the target to stay out for drinks with me when her friend went to talk to an old buddy.  Why'd she give me her cell phone and meet me out at a speakeasy if she wasn't interested?  Why hang out with me half the night?  The girl punched my arm fifteen times when I said something funny, looked at me anytime anyone said a joke, and was genuinely interested in my responses to any question.  I ask her to stay out without her girl-buddy, and she disappears.  

Last week another woman bailed with the third wheel when I went to the bathroom after spending a few hours on my arm and wanting to talk about 'deep stuff'?  She was drunk AF, and I'd changed tact to just getting her home safely, but it still burned a little.  Why be so touchy and flirty?  Why lean into me and ask me about my history after knowing me an two hours?  It's so weird, I've had a million women *not* want to ask me about my history, or poke my chest after a joke, or text me back, and these women seemed interested, but my results are exactly the same as had I done nothing.  

My results at cold approach in normal life, not travelling, are largely similar, but above a zero success rate.  (But I get a lot more opportunities, and more hot women, while traveling due to logistics and demographics).  Basically I seem to be someone who can break into a group and become a crowd favorite to make things a more fun and interesting place, but have no ability to convert that ability into sexual currency.  

Fitness is on point, and extremely on point for my age bracket.  I am complimented on my style of dress with some frequency.  I do not smell.  Have no facial deformities and am average height.  It does not seem to matter.  



",seduction
How to find a wingman?,"I'd been going through very difficult depression for a long time which I'm luckily now out of and feel like going out and making up for lost time. Unfortunately none of my friends are into it or they are not in the country. Anyone know if there are any online places to search for wingmen or any tips? Also, I suppose as a longshot, I'm in Edinburgh if by chance anyone there is reading this and interested",seduction
Got ditched last night,"Last night I went out solo to a bar to practise. Fast forward a couple of hours I'm doing the cologne opener on a couple of girls, ones a 7 (charlie) and the other a 7.5 (hayley) they respond quite well and are dancing with a couple of other guys. Fast forward to before midnight and I approach them again and ask them about a few more spots in the town. Charlie invites me along to another nightclub and they both ditch the two guys they were with. We get inside and dance for maybe half hour or so and they say they're going 'to the toilet'. I just had this gut feeling they were ditching me so I talked to a few more people in the club, after I leave I see them both with the same 2 guys they ditched earlier!

Now I know I haven't got good game but are some girls just cold?",seduction
Am I bad in conversation or are we just incompatible?,"Hi sedditors,

I just went hone from a date and habe a few questions. I asked a girl to go out for a tea. She agreed happily and went, however she told me that she has had a boyfriend for 1 year. Normally  I guess i should‘ve left right there because she saw it as a friendship thing, although i stayed because i thought it would be good to work on my social skills, because it‘s only the 3rd date Ive ever been on. (Took me long to get over anxiety.)

The thing is, when we talked (this happens often to me) and I make a statement about a topic or say my opinion girls tend to start to look weird as if I‘ve said something completely unrelated to the topic or offensive. When I make innuendo or try to talk about something sexual sometimes girls give me a strange look also.

Is it just because we lack chemistry or because she already has a boyfriend? Or am I just too hypersensitive and misinterpret their gestures and mimic?

Thanks for your advice.

tl;dr Went on a „date“ and girl gave me strange looks due to unknown reasons.",seduction
Im about to tell you my secret...,"This might not work for everyone but it definitely works for me, one little thing tho, This works a hundred times better when im a little high

With that being said this is what i do, i use energy, im pretty sure a lot of you have heard of this, the thing is you have to FEEL good, so you can transmit that energy, you have to feel it! Im talking literally, ask yourself this, what do you feel when you have physical contact with a person? Do you feel that electricity going trough your body? What are you saying with your physical touch? Its like a magnetic force pulling each other when you have good energy... 

You can try this, try to go with the least amount of time possible without any type of physical contact, as much as you can, and every time you touch someone or someones touches you try to pay attention to what you feel...

Well im not sure what to think, but i can feel a persons touch at all times, i know when they do it on purpose, and when its an accident, and their intentions... if you touch her with that creep feel, she knows bro, you cant hide it,

Tl tr : use energy wisely, and spiritual energy too!

If you want to ask questions you can ask, im not the best at this, but i have my own way of doing things",seduction
I walked out of a date today,"Background : not a frequent visitor here. 24yr old. Good looking with decent muscularity. On the surface I've got a lot going for me: cool hobbies, international awards etc. Just like any human, I've got my sticking points and one of my biggest one is women. My problems with women is 100% my fault. Had some traumatic experiences 2 years ago that set me back as well 99% my fault. 1% evil humans. But now I'm trying to fix it in a very aggressive fashion. 

Today, I went on a date. Met this girl randomly outside a friend's apartment. Then also matched with her on tinder. Weird.  Set up Chipotle because I'm on an aggressive diet and it fits my macros. Bar is 10mins walk away so I had a place to pull for follow-up drinks. She's wearing a sexy dress, has nice tits and looks hot.

Red flag 1: she opens with this is her first Chipotle date. She likes being taken to nice restaurants. I laughed it off casually 

Start with casual convo. I'm immediately physical with her( she looked sexy so I kinda wanted to too lol). Shes pretty chatty with is entertaining and fun. After the usual crap, which took a while she talked a lot, I vector the convo onto sex and dating.

Red flag 2: she mentioned she isn't into hookups and all guys she's met at school are douchebags who just want sex.

I play it off pretty easily. Back to playing with her hair and her left hand and talking about me.

Red flag 3: she said she's had her fair share of douchebags and now she wants a family oriented guy with a career. ""I don't want to sleep around anymore and want something more slow and stable"" I told her haha I'm poor lol sucks for you and then she says ha no I know u have a great career in front of you. You are an engineer. 

This is where it hit me. Like a punch in the face. I felt anger building up inside me.  After like 5 minutes, I excused myself to pee and then walked out the restaurant. I literally walked out of the date. Luckily my burrito bowl was almost empty so I didn't lose on any gainz. She's sent me some angry texts which I have ignored 

Learnings :

1. Why I got angry? I felt she's not thinking of me as someone she wants to have sex with but someone who can support her and be a future wallet. 

2. I think I shoudnt have just walked off. I could have pulled to the bar and maybe make things sexual. Build more experience. I get better on every date (I'm good not bad by any means). 

3. I felt angry for 15 mins after because I just couldn't stomach why I am not her first priority and just good for a long term relationship. Why doesn't she think of me as sexy? It could be an actions not words thing and I should have stayed till the end and she probably was down to fuck me but I let emotions take control of my mind and walked off.

Actions items:

Lets face it, I'm anxious about being treated as boyfriend material. I need to work on getting that feeling out of mind. I know I'm in control, I know I don't want anything serious for at least two years. She can't force me. but I have to work on not gettinf affected by words and focusing on what I want and not what I don't want 

Any opinion, advice and feedback?
",seduction
7 Major Daygame Mistakes You Should Avoid,,seduction
How to Have John D. Rockefeller Confidence,,seduction
Sliding into DM's on insta,How do people meet girls in Instagram?   What do you ask and talk about before getting their number?,seduction
Why come I feel confident in cold approach but uneasy when comes to social warm approach?,"Never realise its a problem until recently, I need insight /advice.

Okay cold approach is the idea you went to a stranger with no connection whatsoever and you open her with idea of generate attraction through window of few minutes you had, if your lucky or skills are tight enough you can have instant date or pull on same day.

I'm would say I'm an intermediate at cold approaching/daygame. Here's the problem

Going to a hot girl? No problem I might get nervous but I can pull it off. Going to that group of woman? Unnerving but manageable. However, talking with this gorgeous girl you know through mutual friend at an event? Yea small talk and banter but after that I'm afraid of talking to her again. 

I can open any girl at any event to clarify where mostly everyone know each other. But after some banter I will like""see you around"" and not dare to talk to her again. Even if she find me and said some inside joke, I would sarcastically reply and just.. Really closed off like I don't want to further engage. Which is not true like I really want to continue talking but I just can't.

I don't know why is it because deep down I felt like ""I'm a loser I have nothing to offer so I don't want her to find out?"" which I know is bullshit I had approach countless woman where half find me interesting and some turn to dates. So what's going on? Why are hot girls of social event of mutual friend are so scary? What is wrong with me",seduction
"When she wants to break up or wants a, “break”","Caution somewhat of a read hope you enjoy it
Also im on mobile

I don’t know who needs to hear this but this happened to me very recently hopefully this helps out anyone in a similar situation but here it goes.

when your girlfriend breaks up with you or wants a break because she needs, “space” or is, “too busy”  or is, “no longer in love with you,” don’t buy that shit. Don’t sit around patiently waiting for her, don’t reply to her text if she ask you how your doing or is trying to make small talk. 

Instead what you do is fuck the nearest bitch next to you, or go out with the boys and pull as many girls as possible. You do whatever it takes to get your whilly wet, of course make sure it’s within legal parameters.

yea it’s a shit test by far the biggest  one a female will give the lover of her life to see if they really are suited for each other, woman use break up either to separate or to test and depending how you take it will result on how she views you from here on out, and if you love her I’m sure you’ll do anything to fix the situation( I know I did) either way it does not matter, listen closely. SHE IS BREAKING UP WITH YOU WETHER YOU LIKE IT OR NOT. The best thing to do is to show her is how royally she fucked up by letting a stud like you go, and trust me she will regret it.

By the time she wants you back you’ll be balls deep in five other bitches trust me she’ll be back on your doorstep trying to be no.6
Either way my dudes just remember she broke up with you so why the fuck do you have to be sorry? 

In closing I know it sucks regardless. If it was 6 months, 1 year, or 5 years relationship. Her seeing you move on and living life to the fullest as if the happiest life ever is revenge enough for her leaving you. Trust me she will regret it, for throwing you away. However if your a woman beater and a serial cheater and she left you, then yea my dude this post ain’t for you sorry my guy move on stop beating bitches and cheating, either way stay ahead of the game my bros good luck with these hoes.",seduction
What should you say if she says she has a boyfriend?,This hasn't happened to me but I'm wondering what I'd do in a situation like that. How would I make it not awkward?,seduction
Cold Approach - Fast Walking Girls,"So where I am when I see girls alone walking by themselves they're always in a hurry to go somewhere. Either they're on there way to meet someone, or go to work, or somewhere so they're walking very fast. My usual routine is to swing up right in front of them so they have to stop and be like ""excuse me miss"", which is when they notice me and take of their ear phones and are like ""yes?"", so then I open and talk to them for 30 seconds, but then they're like I'm on my way to meet my friend I can't talk right now, or that they're in a hurry to get to class or some excuse about where they're on their way to. 

&amp;#x200B;

So what is your approach to girls who are in a hurry? I was thinking I need to throw in a time constraint like ""can we talk for just one minute?"" or ""actually I was on my way to meet my friend but I just wanted to talk with you for one minute"".

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
For girls with vulnerability,"Is there any way other than the long run game for girls who are mistrusting? Or in other words, is there a faster way to plant trust other than spending too much time with them?",seduction
Any good YouTube channels to follow on how to approach girls?,I get it that I should just go up but watching how some reputable guys do it would boost my confidence on how to ask,seduction
Im unable to concentrate on what the girl is saying on a date,"(Im a guy) Im able to concetrate when im having a deep discussion with a dude, but when its a girl i space out constantly. How do i fix this? I think it might be related to the attractiveness of the girl, but i've only ever talked to 2 girls in my life for more than an hour.",seduction
What are some of the best cheap first date ideas that aren't mainstream?,"Does anyone know or has a list of any first date ideas that aren't drinks or coffee while also being free or inexpensive? And for price range, was thinking 10 bucks max. (Other than pool/art gallery/ice cream etc)",seduction
At what point do you give it a rest?,"in the past month and a half i've met three different girls i potentially wanted to date. i hooked up with two of them. the last two drifted off and we stopped talking, which really sucked both times.

last night i got drinks with a gorgeous girl that i had just about everything in common with. it went really well. at the end of the night, i walked her to her car, we made out, and i told her to text me when she got home safe. 

she did, and said she had fun. we texted briefly this morning, the conversation completely died and here i am yet again feeling like ass. i literally never go on dates where i have so much in common with the girl, and she's genuinely curious to learn more about me. i really wanted to make something happen this time that's more meaningful than just casual sex.

from mid september until now i've had a lot of fun casually dating around. i'm over it. i don't want to be single anymore, and i'm kind of tired of going on dates. i'm wondering if i just give up and let go, and work on myself for the time being. getting crushed like this consistenly just sucks and i'm not getting to where i want to go",seduction
"How to proceed after ""Maybe.""","I'm a traveling performer and have had a lot of success with

1)match with girl on app

2)invite girl to show as my date

3)smash the performance

4) smash the date

Now part of this is giving her all the details of the show before she agrees and what occasionally happens is I get a ""maybe"" which fucks up my shit because I refuse to invite more than one woman at a time for fear that both will say yes and both show up, so I can't move on until I get a firm answer. I could invite multiple women and come up with excuses for  the other women/let them down but I don't like doing that to people. Not to mention they usually have details about the show by then and could very well come anyways and make things awkward. 

&amp;#x200B;

I would love to tell them ""I don't do maybes, what is your answer?"" but that would be counteract my lighthearted and playful banter that precedes that point. What are some ideas on passing this ""maybe"" shit test? ",seduction
No girl friends. Never kissed a girl. Where do i even start?,"You may be saying, that im over exaggerating the no girl friends part, but nope. Literally one girl friend who i talk to once every two - three months. School social life sucked because we were segregated so only guy friends but now im in university and i dont even know how to speak to a girl i remotely find attractive. I crush on every cute girl i see, its honestly a bit pathetic. Ive been to one party in my life. I think youre starting to see where i stand and how i feel. Ive got tons of guy friends, maybe one or two who i consider close. I started browsing this sub like 2 months ago, but everything i read, i feel doesnt apply to me or my situation. Im 19 years old, second year of uni. I study abroad in Germany. Where do i even begin fixing my situation? Even if by some absurd chance, a girl likes me, i have 0 experience dating, im a virgin, have no girl friends to go to for help. Its getting frustrating and theres no one to blame but me.",seduction
not going out again until i am confident/congruent enough to approach,"After a year of occasionally going out, getting drunk, and failing to initiate conversation with young women, i eventually realized it was pretty much just the whole ""definition of insanity"" thing, doing the same thing over and over again, etc. So after meditating on my inner state, I realized that there truly is no point in going out unless you are actually going to approach / talk to at least one girl. So I've made it my goal before the end of THIS year to get to that point. Baby steps, if you will. If anything you save yourself money, a beer gut, and just save looking stupid by sitting or standing there, saying nothing, and then leaving.

&amp;#x200B;

It sounds pussyish but i'm mostly intimidated and butthurt because i look 24 and girls say i look 19, which i assume means i ain't gettin any no way no how. Then again, harry styles / j biebs though, so who tf knows anymore. ladies be cray 

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
How To Have A Conversation With Women &amp; Spark Attraction,,seduction
"Shot my shot and failed, how can I improve?","So this is basically how the text went 

“Your cute as fuck, what’s up I’m *me*” 

“I’m *blank* and ty” 

“Do you go to * insert high school* ?”

“Yes” 

“Also loving the Jew fro” 

“Thanks lmao” 

“So what have you done before?” 

“Wdym” 

“Have you ever done some crazy illegal shit” 

“Yes” 

“What about sexual shit like sending nudes?”

“Yes” 

“I just wanna know cause you got that cute twink vibe, and I wanna know what’s up”

“Hahaha Lmao”

“Wanna send nudes again?”

*left on seen*

Keep in mind I’m a complete beginner I think this might be the first time I’ve ever tried to flirt with someone I didn’t know, so what do y’all think I could improve next time? ",seduction
If you want an extraordinary dating life you must do extraordinary things,"  

Too often I hear guys telling me that they want to be able to bring home the hottest girls on a regular basis. Then I ask them what they did last Saturday and they will tell me they stayed in and watched TV. 

This boggles my mind. Regularly dating and having sex with hot girls is possible but most guys won’t ever be able to experience it. Why? Because most guys live an ordinary life and do ordinary things. This is not easy and not for everyone. If you want to be like everyone then do the ordinary things. But if you want an extraordinary dating life you have to do extraordinary things.

When I was coming up I was your typical guy. I was 23 and maybe had sex with like 10 girls and only 2 of them I was really proud of. I knew doing the typical routine was not going to work for me, so I started going out. A LOT. I went out 5-6 nights a week every week for more than three years, while I had a full time job. After a year of failure, I began to start seeing success. 2 years in I was regularly bringing girls home. In the third year I started getting threesomes and dating girls I had only dreamed about. 

Almost no one at my previous company had the experiences that I did because no one was willing to go out that much. Today I know a few people who have done what I have done but none of them were working a 9 to 5 job. They were either coke dealers, promoters, or they just had a lot of money to burn. 

I am writing this because if anyone here aspires to achieve what only 1% of men can claim to, then you must do things that only 1% of men are willing to do. If you are not willing to do that then you need to adjust your goals accordingly. 

This is my [YouTube channel](https://www.youtube.com/c/TheSingleGuy)",seduction
How do I improve my luck with women and get them to be more receptive?,"I usually never have luck cold approaching. They usually are indifferent and cold, and are never friendly. If they are friendly, I find out that they are taken. If I do talk to them, they stop talking or block me. 

How do I get women to be more receptive towards me? Or improve my luck? I have a social life with female friends and meet women commonly, but they are always indifferent or taken. ",seduction
How to incorporate approaches with friends,"Hey there I’m 16 and fairly new to the whole cold approaching thing.

What me and 2 other friends are doing is making it a somewhat of a competition.

Well I’m 6ft and probably the best looking face wise, my friend is 5’10 pretty good body and other friend who’s 5’6 is pretty good looking and does well with girls.

So we all have our strengths and weaknesses.

So what we’ve been doing is basically going out together wherever and seeing who can get the most numbers/Snapchats.

We’ve all seen each other’s methods and we’re slowly improving the amount of closed success rate by giving each other ideas and criticism.

Just an idea for those who have friends and don’t want to go out alone to approach.",seduction
Currently in a college club with more than 6 girls. How does one fit in?,"Hey! I tried looking for advice on the search bar but didn't find anything revelant to my questions.

I'm in a College club that has about 6 girls and two males (including myself.) I have found it difficult to fit in. There are two in specifically I'm trying to talk to but I'm realizing we don't share a lot of common interests. Yes we have a connection with the club, but I'm trying to find any other common interests to take off from there.

The other dude seems to be doing great with all the girls in the club as he is hilarious and so outgoing. Meanwhile I'm quiet and don't really talk. So to end this, how do you guys fit yourselves or act in a group setting. I participate in all of the events but I feel like I am not going anywhere.",seduction
How to approach a girl you've already gotten with before,"So I've hooked up with a girl about a year ago when me and her used to go to clubs alot. She was interested but when it was clear i just wanted to hook up only we didnt talk much after
Now we are 20 and even though we are still young we dont go clubbing that much. I ran into her last night at a club and caught up with her and didnt really hit on her. I am interested in something more than just a hookup with her atm. How should i ask her out again? Should i ask her on coffee date since its more mature or ""less hookupish"" or go for drinks as i did last time but might risk her thinking i just wanna hook up with her again? ",seduction
"Feeling stuck, I have a hard time finding a place to rent because of a criminal record.","Title pretty much speaks for itself. After being down in the gutter for a long time, I got my shit under wraps and got a decent job, a car, started working out again, started socializing again, etc. I want to start dating again, or at least get back to having sex on a regular basis. Yet here I am living with my parents at age 24. I have a felony drug conviction and other charges for theft and this makes it very hard to find somewhere that will rent to me. This is fucking with my confidence because its something that is mostly out of my control. My parents house is small with thin walls and they are older and my moms always been weird about me having girls over. Can anybody relate to this? Any suggestions on what I can do or where to look? Cuz I feel like this is really holding me back but its not something I can just change because I want it to.",seduction
Paintball date,"The adult in me wants to make sure she has fun

But the kid in me wants to light her the fuck up 

So my question is how to recover after you’ve gone too far and pissed her off?

UPDATE: she’s dead",seduction
LA night game. Anyone down? PM me,,seduction
Genuinely wondering,"Hey guys, So I asked this cute girl out for a date next week, she said yes, it's set for next week. 
My question is how much should I talk to her from now and next week? Text her everyday or keep it very light, if light how light? 
I feel her attraction level is  high, as she's the one that's been starting convos, and she made it quite easy to make plans with... Any suggestions? Would highly appreciate it ",seduction
What should your tinder bio text look like when targeting one-night-stands?,"I'm getting a lot of matches and I could fill up my weeks with dates no problem. I have success closing on 1st / 2nd dates.

The only problem is (with some exceptions) these girls want me to be their boyfriend. How do I write my bio to communicate I am here only for sex not for relationship? ",seduction
[21M] Approaching this girl effectively,"Hi guys, I'm not a native English speaker so this post won't be perfectly written, I'm sorry about it. I'm also sorry about the length too but I wanted to be specific, it's something that stresses me a lot and that I would like to solve definitively. Thank you all in advance if you'll read it all, I'd really appreciate it.

I don't know this girl in person but it's like 5 years that I like what she posts on Facebook (we are friends on FB because we both live in a small town and it was common years ago to add people you barely knew), and I've found myself to think about her quite often. 

I finally decided some months ago to like one of her posts and use it as an excuse to message her via private chat and start talking about that particular topic, which was related about important decisions in life (she was struggling and so was I). She answered my message and we started talking about our path, what is better to do, what do we like, why we made some decisions etc. I felt like she was interested in the conversation because she replied with long messages and at least I have the certainty that I didn't look like an idiot (which was the main reason I didn't want to use Facebook, but find her in real life was impossible so I went for it). Then the conversation moved towards an end and I made a joke but she didn't reply. I didn't say anything else, I didn't want to be that kind of guy, I accepted it. 

This all happened around June. In August, I decided to give it another try and told her ""Have you come to any conclusion?"" Regarding the topic we were talking about (make the best decision for our lives), but she never replied. Maybe initially because I think she doesn't have messenger on her phone so she has to take her computer in order to use the messages, but some time later she visualized it. 

A normal person wouldn't even bother with this at this point, but the fact is that I don't do this kind of stuff at all anymore (just when I was 15/16), so the fact that I still think about her makes me aware of my great (maybe stupid, who knows) interest towards this girl and I think I should make the last try. She has changed uni (the thing we were talking while we chatted) so I thought that maybe it was a really stressful period for her and this could have added to the reasons why she didn't reply, a guy was not in her interest at that moment. Plus I have one recent photo of me now, which I didn't have at that time.

What can I do? I don't wanna over think about this anymore, I don't wanna her to pop up in my mind anymore, I want to cut it. If I was really honest I would tell her ""I know that a guy randomly appearing in a chat isn't the best way of approaching someone and that these things are normally done at 15 yo, but I really like the content you publish and i was also very interested in exchanging opinions about that particular topic. I know this may sound really weird due to the people that normally do this kind of stuff, but... would you like to take a coffe with me?"" or something like that. Maybe it's too explicit but at least I would tell her the truth. I don't know if at this point sending her another ""normal message"" would be effective, but I think I risk being judged as an idiot (or needy, or boring/not so interesting because ""i have to"" catch girls on Facebook), but again... What else could I do given the fact that I want to try it for the last time? Any suggestions?
",seduction
I feel unable to attract a woman or keep a conversation for 20 seconds. How can I find a single girlfriend? What should i do?,I was told several times that i'm good-looking and cool. Some called me a hottie commenting on my profile pics. Yet I don't have the courage/confidence to go up to a woman and say 'Hello.' ,seduction
I (16M) am thinking to much instead of doing,"Hey guys, I've been on this subreddit for a while and I really like it, but I have a problem.

As you can read fromthe title, I am thinking way to much instead of doing. For instance, thinking about how and when I approach a girl instead of doing it. This happened today, and now I'm really regretting that I didn't go and talk to her.

I always ask myself the question how to approach her, and what to ask her. Especially what to ask her when I get to approach her and to keep the conversation going.  Then I'm sitting there thinking about that and just not doing it. 

I think this has to do with a lack of confidence or something, I don't know. Maybe because I haven't had a girlfriend in a long time (like 5 years or something). And it is really bothering me.

But now I'm sick of this behaviour and I want to fix this and I could really use the help of you guys. Is there any advice you can give me to do more instead of thinking?

",seduction
Difference between moving over and giving up?,"Riddle I felt to naïve to solve. Or maybe they are the same thing, I find myself stopping when I feel like I made more than 3 mistakes, thinking to myself that I better move over instead of putting too much attention, but lately my friend have been saying that I’m simply giving up and using this as an excuse.",seduction
It may not be a big deal to most but I walked out on a date who was late.,"So this girl is super hot and super coo and we work in the same military command and we've had fun as friends but never sexual. I did the dumb thing and said ""We would be better off as friends"" instead of letting her know I'm interested. I decided after a weekend at a cabin getting a ton of IOI's to go for it.

 She invited me to a movie and ice cream last Thursday (bad date I know) but flakes that day. I give her a pass because she found out she was having to have knee surgery, and that would bump most people out. 

We schedule for monday and she flakes with no good excuse. I blow it off and yestersay ask her to meet at a beach bar at 6 today and she was stoked. I told her if she flakes we are fighting (playful banter)

So she texts me saying she's gonna be 10 mins late cuz laundry. I was gonna be late anyways so I figure whatever. She texts me at 625 saying she's on her way. I have a moment of debate and text back ""Don't worry I'm going to finish my beer and leave."" I was upset. As I'm paying she walks in but by then I didn't want anything to do with her. I say I'm leaving. She asks if I needed to go I tell her ""No. I've just been waiting awhile"" and just leave.

It may not seem like much but the AFC in.me would want to stay cuz she's hot and even considered turning around. 

My big takeaways as I'm thinking about it is that 
1. Escalate attraction if I see it. 
2. Don't get emotionally attached. The fact I got upset is bullshit. Life is too short. I keep telling myself we are good friends but we only talk at work and have hung out twice outside of work. A real friend wouldn't flake let alone twice.
3. The process is painful but worth it. I appreciate this group and how its turning me into a real man. ",seduction
How not to depend on wings,"Hello Everyone, does anyone else have this problem?? The problem of depending on wingman ( in my case chode friends who arent into pickup) to game. If you look at my previous post on my profile. I stated that i in a new country and its really hard for me to game alone. I get inside my head to much. What would you suggest i do?",seduction
I quickly get bored of women I meet.,"So thanks to this subreddit, I have been regularly approaching women I find attractive, or just the people I find interesting/need as a social circle or help at college studies I have just started. The problem is that the interaction is always completely dull and dry from the moment it starts til the end when I do not even bother asking for a number or facebook etc.. I really don't know what would be the cause of this.

 Am I not attractive enough? Am I boring?  Am I going about this the wrong way? Is the other person boring despite my hopes? Am I just coming along in an inconvenient time?

&amp;#x200B;

I always lead the conversation and throughout I maybe get asked 2-3 questions back as engangement in the span of 20 mins. I must say I do not really look for any signs of interest or attraction (either because they never happen or I am just too blind to see them). The only thing I notice is the woman I am talking to rarely ever is turned in my direction or looks at me. I also do not escalate, mainly because of some unpleasant experiences with the opposite sex I've had in the past.

&amp;#x200B;

I would really appreciate some help, I feel like I can really advance further.",seduction
Update about a girl I thought I was interested in...,"I made a [post](https://reddit.com/r/seduction/comments/9ozdqm/helpi_think_a_girl_may_be_interested/) detailing a somewhat shy and lonely girl that recently joined our coed sports team. Well she has just left the team because it wasn't a good fit. That's understandable.

However, because of my anxiety and lack of dating experience, I had planned out all kinds of scenarios as I saw this coming. I also believe she may have been scared away by a creepy player on the team.

She said she usually hangs out in a common area of the student center before class. I believe that's the only way to get in contact, other than fishing for phone numbers and instagrams. I don't want to be a stalker, or look like I am trying to coerce her to join the team or something.

What should I do? What would *you* do?",seduction
First night game in a while,I'm still learning the ropes with this and I'm going out tonight solo to do a bit of night game. How would you say I go about this as opposed to day game? ,seduction
"[FR] A Noob's First Field Report - Update To ""Taking a MILF from Bumble out tomorrow""","Hey friends, just wanted to do a little field report to force myself to reflect on the date I just had and how I can improve.     


**Background:** I'm a 24y.o. male, maybe slightly above average looks, skinny-tall, well dressed. Late bloomer in the women department, lost virginity at 21 y/o, have had 2 girlfriends since then (one for few months, one for a year). From those relationships was able to build my confidence with women, but now that I'm not in a relationship anymore I want to learn how to be more smooth, have more successful dates, etc. It's been about a year since my last breakup and since I've only had a handful of dates that didn't go well at all. I was not confident, not able to escalate, not willing to be openly sexual. Social anxiety. I've been absorbing as much info as I can from this subreddit over the last week and it was finally time to put some of my new knowledge to the test. ***The key thing I have wanted to improve is how to escalate.*** I'm really not good at being sexually forward and I've never been able to turn a first date into an F-close. The confidence isn't as much of the issue, I can act confident well if I'm in the right mindset.     


**Pre-date:** Matched MILF on Bumble. Very quickly, within 2-3 messages, asked for number to get drinks. Got number, set up a time and place (wine bar), didn't text until morning of date. Asking if we we're still on for that night, she responded she wouldn't be able to make it as she had a lot of shit to finish for work but would like to postpone to a few days later. Minimal texting between then, finally get to the date.     


**Date:** She texted saying she was running a late, a pet-peeve of mine but anyway I was already at the wine bar so I grabbed a glass and walked around. Saw two gorgeous MILFs standing in front of the wine dispensers (type of place where machines pour your glass) glancing over the wine selection, so I went up and said ""You guys look just as overwhelmed as I do!"" I'm comfortable with this type of opener, as I try to make these types of comments to everybody to be more social. They laughed and mentioned how ""There's so much to choose from!"" We chit chatted a bit guessing each others nationalities, was getting major smiles and eye contact from both but I was a bit overwhelmed about what to continue talking about and how to address two girls at once, so I ejected by saying ""I'm going to find the person I'm waiting for but if you guys find a wine you really like, I want you to come tell me!"" ***I was fairly happy with the interaction as it got me some momentum, but I really would like to learn how to keep that conversation going longer and how I can escalate it, esp with 2 women and only 1 of me.***    


My date finally shows 30 min late, no biggie I'm a bit tipsy now and talked to some cuties which is a big improvement for me already. I'm feeling confident, standing up tall, using a slow deep voice. We get some wine and chit chat, going over basics (FROG - Family Recreation Occupation Goals). Find out she is from a rather conservative country, moved here in 20s, etc. I ask some great questions for emotional connection but her answers were fairly short and dry (ex: do you remember what it was like the first time you stepped off the plane - her answer: humid). Regardless my goal was to get better at escalation so I made sure to sit very close and tried some things to escalate (she was fidgeting with her earring so I pushed her hair back and messed with the earring for a sec, she had her nails done so I grabbed her hand and complimented them, she had a bracelet so I grabbed her arm and the bracelet and asked her about it, I put my hand on her knee/upper leg, held her hand, etc). ***I felt like I was really escalating the right way on a first date for the first time in my life, it didn't feel awkward or forced at all!*** She seemed okay with most of the kino but started hesitating towards the end. There was a good amount of social friction, I work in health care and talked about it a bit since my life revolves around it, she said she didn't believe in medicine etc. We had nothing in common! She started taking my hand off her leg towards the end but didn't do that before, maybe to signify she wasn't going home with me. I didn't even bother with a kiss. I asked her to go to another part of the wine bar which was more private, thinking it might be easier to kiss her there, but when I asked she said she would ""rather be where there's more people."" At the end hugged good bye and she said ""keep in touch."" Not sure if I will try to pursue her anymore, she may have just been shy/conservative and didn't want too much from first date.



**Overall:** Didn't score but I made good improvements today. I was able to escalate a lot better than I have before, and I opened a gorgeous set of girls although I didn't know how to capitalize on that. Looking forward to more dates to keep learning!",seduction
How To Develop ‘Killer Instinct’ – (5 Steps),"All of us are born with the Killer Instinct. The instinct to be single-minded and ruthless in achieving our goals. We’re also born with the instincts to nurture, to flee in the face of overwhelming adversity, to reach out and grasp things that are placed in front of us, and many others. 

As we grow up, societal influences and personal circumstances have significant impact on which instincts are nurtured and developed, and which instincts fade away into some dark corner of our subconscious. 

In modern society, the Killer Instinct is often **not** nurtured. Gone are the days when we need to “take” in order to survive. Throughout history, if you wanted food, you had to go *take* an animal’s life. If you wanted protection, you had to *take* another man’s life.

Today, food and protection are, for the most part, taken for granted. As we grew up, food appeared on the table. Your father wasn’t guarding the front door with a rifle –- on the look-out for plunderers from the neighboring village (well…maybe for some of you he was). Even if you got 5th place in the tournament, you still got a trophy (so where’s the Killer Instinct to win?) 

The point is that these days, the Killer Instinct to get what we want -- whatever it takes -- is often not nurtured. Then we grow up, become interested in women, and find that women tend **not to** “just appear.” We have to actually do some work in order to get them. And without the Killer Instinct guiding us relentlessly toward our desires, this is where many guys struggle (and sometimes fail). 

**How to Develop the Killer Instinct** 

As I said, you have the Killer Instinct inside of you already. The key is to develop and nurture it. 

Before we get into the 5 Steps, I’m going to warn you: You’re about to read some harsh shit. I’m not pulling any punches here. This article is about the Killer Instinct, after all. It’s not about the coddle-me goodie-two-shoes instinct. Let’s go.   

**Step 1:** **You Must Cut Ties with Everyone Who Sucks Your Energy and Focus**

You have no more time for energy vampires and time wasters. People who burden you with their grief, their whining and their complaining. People who suck your vital energy with their negativity and pessimism. 

How many times have you picked up the phone for someone you don’t really want to talk to? 

How many times have you woken up with a plan, only to let someone else pull you in a dozen different directions? 

How many times have you let other people’s messages, emails, thoughts, opinions and beliefs distract you and drain your life force as you waste time trying to explain things to them, rationalize things to them, convince them of your position?

How many times have you let some woman string you along, playing you for the fool, while you chased her around, thought about her, coaxed her, spent time and energy suffering from pathetic oneitis?

No more. All of these people are wasting your time and energy. Achieving what you want with women, whether that’s 1 special relationship, or a fuck-harem, requires energy, focus and time.  Jettison these time wasters and soul suckers from your life. Whether they are family, friends, ex’s, acquaintances, co-workers or whatever else, dump them. 

From this moment forward, you only have time for one thing: whatever the fuck **YOU** want to be focused on. Not what they want you to be focused on. 

**Step 2: Kill or Be Killed**

Throughout history this was literally what you did. If you wanted something, you had to kill everything in your way to get it. You win, or they win. That’s it. And winning usually meant you chop their fucking head off. 

When it comes to getting what you want with women, you are going to apply the exact same FIGURATIVE concept. You are going to chop the figurative-heads off of anything that’s in your way.

What’s stopping you right now? You want 1 special relationship? You want a fuck-harem? What’s stopping you? 

Approach anxiety? Can’t escalate? Afraid to touch? Don’t know how to flirt? Can’t hold a conversation? Look like shit? Can’t find a bi-girl who pulls threesomes for you? Blah blah blah?

Identify what the #1 problem is and chop its fucking head off. Whatever it takes. Kill it before it kills you. Don’t know how to fix it, ask me. Reach out to me. I have solutions for everything above and more. 

Whatever you do, just don’t sit there doing nothing.

**Step 3: Battle While “Weeping”**

The moment you start nurturing your Killer Instinct, you’re going to discover something interesting: some people aren’t going to like it. The sad truth is that most people don’t want you to succeed. Why? Because it just exposes more of their own failure. Some people, like those you dumped in Step 1, are going to be mad at you.  They may say harsh things. They may insult you. They may try to rain on your fucking parade. 

In addition, your interactions with women may not go smoothly at first. As you start tackling the problems you identified in Step #2, it’s not always going to go smoothly. You’ll probably get rejected. You’ll probably have some awkward moments. You’ll probably go into a conversation fully prepared, and then some verbal-disaster comes spewing from your mouth. 

All of these things – from former friends being mad at you, to women rejecting you – may cause some heartache. I’m not saying you’re going to literally “weep.” But if you let these things stop you. If you let them distract you from your relentless, single-minded pursuit of what you want, then you’ll be weeping on the inside, whether you like it or not. 

So battle through it. 

**Step 4: Actively Examine How You Spend Your Time**

Start asking yourself these questions regularly: 

\- Is this serving my purpose? 

\- Is this wasting my time? 

\- Is this someone else controlling my time without me realizing it? 

\- Is this what other people want me to do, or what I want to do? 

\- How can I better utilize this hour?

\- What specific thing do I need to accomplish today in order to advance my purpose forward?

When you get in the habit of asking yourself these questions regularly, you’ll likely find that you’re wasting a lot of time. Time that would be better spent honing your Killer Instinct and attracting the women you’ve been wanting. 

**Step 5: Develop Your Killer Instinct**

Pick one thing to give your sole-focus and pursue it relentlessly until you achieve your goal. 

If it’s attracting women, hotter women, more women, a harem of women, then pick that goal. Learn everything you can. Practice everything you can. Take relentless action. Dump the people that are in your way. Dump the things in your life that are wasting your time. Identify the things that advance your purpose and give them all the time, energy and focus you just created by chopping the figurative heads off of all the shit that’s in your way. 

When you're finally ready to dominate your life and get the women you want, then check out [my website](http://dailymanup.com/how-to-attract-women-turn-girls-on/) for more great content to hone your Killer Instinct. ",seduction
American Girls vs European Girls. Which ones are more open?,,seduction
[Request] Please share Say Hello by Christian Hudson.,"Hey guys, I'm just starting out and I've heard this is one of the best programs for beginners. Please share it if you have it.

Thanks in advance.

P.S. Suggestions for other beginners programs are also welcome.",seduction
"Is it normal for relationships to become less flirty, fun, and “shit test” once two people start dating? Is it normal that it’s more deep and serious?",,seduction
How To Have A Magnetic Personality (Simple Mind Hack),"**Positivity**

You know how some guys just seem to be magnetic around women. Before I started getting into pick up, I was not magnetic with women. I was shy and nervous and scared. Like many guys are.

Then one day I was taught a very simple trick. A mind-hack really. A friend of mine told me that a magnetic personality is really just a positive personality. Unshakably positive. Like literally radiating with positivity. No matter what the situation. He pointed out some examples of people that we mutually knew. 

I thought about the people he mentioned, and I told him I agreed. Yes, these people always seemed to radiate positivity. The happiness and excitement they had was contagious. Like they could literally enter a stuffy room and within a few minutes everyone around them was smiling and laughing. Now that’s magnetic. 

But there was a problem, I told him. These people were positive because they were successful already. All of these guys were successful in business and successful with women. But at the time, I wasn’t. So how could I be unshakably positive, when I didn’t have something to be positive about?

**The Re-Frame** 

My friend told me that in order to “hack my mind” into positivity, I needed to reframe everything that happened to me as a positive thing. Everything.

And not only “say” it was positive but also give myself a reason. Even if the reason seemed ridiculous. Because at the beginning, when you’re first doing this, sometimes the only reason you can come up with is ridiculous, especially when you’re re-framing something you’d normally consider negative.  

For example:

Flat tire – I’m so lucky this happened because now I have an hour to relax and listen to this podcast while the tow truck is on it’s way. 

Rejected by a Girl – Look how amazing I am. That beautiful girl almost went out with me. 

Spilled my Drink – Wow I feel like a king. I didn’t even have to clean that up. 

Missed the Bus – This is great. Maybe they’ll be a little hottie on the next one I’d have otherwise never met. 

Ran out of Coffee at home – What a lucky morning. Now I can stop by Starbucks and ask out that barista I saw last week. 

**The Result**

By reframing everything into a positive light, you will instantly start to feel happy in situations where you would have previously gotten annoyed. Keep doing it and that happiness and positivity compounds. You start feeling great. 

When you’re feeling great, you start acting like you feel great. People around you sense your positivity. It rubs off on them. They start enjoying the positive vibes you seem to be letting off. Women are particularly responsive to these positive emotions.

Then the most amazing thing happens. The negative things that you have to reframe start occurring less often. Positive things start happening. Now there’s less need to re-frame and the positivity compounds yet again. Not long after that, you find yourself being magnetic with women, and with people in general. 

With this hack you can see that developing that magnetic mindset isn’t a bunch of hocus pocus and visualization. It’s simply re-framing every event in your daily into a positive light until the positive things just start happening on their own. 

For more mindset, pick-up and seduction articles to up your game, [check out my blog here](http://dailymanup.com/how-to-attract-women-turn-girls-on/). ",seduction
It's not awkward at all,"Hi! Just a very quick field report: was dancing with a girl in a club, getting closer and closer, just having a good time. I felt a bit uncomfortable as I was trying to escalate (maybe fear of rejection, lack of confidence or just shyness, I don't know), but I decided I won't pussy out so I went in for the kiss.

She dodged it.

I didn't succeed but it was a good experience overall. I knew what was going on, she knew what was going on, she just probably didn't feel like it. The main point I want to make is that it wasn't awkward at all. Up until now I always waited until I was sure, leading to some moments where retrospectively I could have went for something and I didn't. I thought I would cringe from a rejection like this, but the thing is, regret is much worse.

I'm saying this for those who have a problem with this part, not only approach approach approach, as is the motto of this sub (maybe after ""don't shit where you eat""), but don't forget to escalate escalate and close close, too. Regret is worse than rejection with these two, too.

In the end it was getting late and I had to be somewhere in the morning, so I went home and she stayed with some friends. I don't think I'll pursue her, as I'm fairly busy nowadays, but I'm sure we'll meet again sometime.

So, point is, regret is worse than rejection not only in the case of approach, but at any stage.",seduction
Finding a girlfriend in college,"Hey guys, ill keep it short, how did you find your girlfriend in college? Would cold approaching work? I feel like if im walking in the opposite direction of a girl, its too awkward to just turn around and talk.",seduction
Ms. Slav: the latest updates [FR],,seduction
How To Become More Attractive To Women Overnight By Improving Your Style,"One of the fastest ways to increase your overall attractiveness to women is to improve your style.

If you don’t have a natural eye for style, then the best thing you can do is ask “hot” women to help you with your style. Most hot women have a great sense of style and they’d be happy to give you some tips.

If you have female friends or a girlfriend who dresses well, then go ahead and ask for some style advice.

Ask them what they think of your style and how you can improve it.

Tell them that you want to be more attractive to women, and you’d appreciate any help they can give you with that.

**Ask A Hired Gun**

If you don’t have any female friends or a girlfriend, you can go to a mall or an outlet and ask the hired guns for advice on your style.

You can literally go to a store like Express, Guess, or the Armani Exchange and have one of the hired guns pick out an outfit for you.

Try it on and take pictures so you can see what you look like with a new and improved outfit.

Do that 3 times in 3 different stores, with 3 different hired guns, and suddenly you will have 3 different looks you can use to increase your attractiveness to women.

If you have the money to buy the outfits right then and there, go for it, if not you can go to a discount clothing store like Burlington, Ross, or Marshalls. You’ll more than likely find similar outfits in those stores for a lot less.

**Learn From The Celebs**

Another thing you can do is start reading magazines like GQ, and pay attention to what male celebrities, and professional athletes are wearing when they go out.

Celebrities and professional athletes usually have stylists who help them create their looks, so you’ll get some great ideas if you pay attention to how those guys dress.

**Know Your Archetype Style**

Another thing you need to look at is what kind of archetype do you want to represent. It’s one thing to dress nicely, but it’s another thing to communicate your personality with your style. 

If you wear a black slim-fit shirt, black skinny jeans, and black boots, you’ll give off a rocker/bad boy vibe. On the other hand, if you wear regular-fit blue jeans, a white t-shirt, and some brown boots, you’ll give off more of a blue-collar, “workman” vibe.

If you’re not sure what archetype to go for, I recommend you check out some celebrities and athletes who you resonate with and look at their styles. You will find out that these celebrities and pro athletes dress in congruence with their personalities.

For example, a guy like Lebron James will wear loud and bold outfits to match his personality where a guy like Kobe Bryant will wear something simple and stylish which is more congruent with his personality.

The goal is to communicate to women that you understand style, but you also understand who you are and you’re able to express yourself through your style.

If you’re more of a businessman, then your style should represent that. It’s probably going to look awkward if a businessman dresses with a preppy college student style and vice versa.

Looking good is important, but you don’t want it to look forced. If style is not something that comes to you naturally it’s best to get help from someone who does have a great sense of style. The other option would be to spend some time really educating yourself on what the current trends are, and how you can improve and update your style.

You don’t need to break the bank to look good. You only need 3 go-to outfits you can use when you’re going out and you can mix and match with those 3 outfits. 

As I mentioned earlier, you can shop at discount clothing stores or even a Goodwill and you should still be able to put a nice outfit together. Use the outfits you created in the mall/outlet to help you find a similar outfit in the discount shops. If you’re unable to do that, then have a female friend tag along with you or if you have a male friend who is good with style, have him tag along with you.

Style is something that can be fixed literally overnight, and it can make a significant difference in your overall attractiveness to women. If you’re not getting any compliments on your style, then chances are you have room for improvement. So, go out there and update your wardrobe.

Your style is one of the first things a woman will notice about you, and if you want to leave the best first impression possible, then make the effort to present yourself as a man who “gets it” when it comes to style.
",seduction
Popping the question,"Here’s what I’m going into... I’m hosting a party with my roommates where 100+ people may show up and hella pretty girls. I’m already planning on having a pretty girl (my friend) be my wing woman because that’s more effective I think. I need help with the general interaction. I need pointers on how I should execute the approach to girl I’m interested in (who may be in a group) during the party and how to close. Should I have my friend walk away? Or should she say something about the girl I’m interested in and me? 

I greatly appreciate all of your contributions. Much love. ",seduction
The answer to any seduction question you've ever had,"Confidence.

That's the simple answer. 

Truth is, when it comes to seducing woman, confidence is crucial. Women view confidence as your ability to be successful. I know you're thinking, ""they look for successful men because they have more money, false.

Women look for successful men because they’re confident. Confidence makes you relaxed. Being relaxed makes people around you relax. Everyone likes that feeling. Especially women. 

Helping her feel relaxed leads to her being comfortable, which leads to sex. 

First, think about all the reasons you're proud of yourself. Pointless competition's you won or getting accepted into junior college. Don't overlook any reason to give yourself props.

Next, find something you love to do and do it everyday. Little goals over time add up to huge success and even more confidence. 

Getting better little by little instills true confidence. 

Last, work on your body language to project confidence. You can find many guides about nonverbal communication. One of my favorites is [what everybody is saying](https://www.amazon.com/What-Every-Body-Saying-Speed-Reading/dp/0061438294) by Joe Navarro.

Also, [Bang](https://www.amazon.com/Bang-Most-Infamous-Pickup-World-ebook/dp/B003ZHVEDM) has some good body language knowledge. 

That's a good way to build your inner confidence in a nutshell. I have more on these types confidence building habits in [my book.](https://thehimalayaplaya.com/101-powerful-habits-proven-to-boost-your-life/) It's free this weekend. 

Here's the real reason I wrote this post and what worked for me. 

The previous information should be practiced, but here's how to be more confident faster. 

Imitate confidence. 

I recount my history as a lame in this [post](https://thehimalayaplaya.com/becoming-himalaya-playa-part-1/) where I reference a guy named Stan.

In short, Stan got all the girls in high school. Stan became my best friend. 

Stan was really confident, so I would often watch his interactions and body language, how he spoke, etc.

What helped me most was his mindset. 

I would talk to a girl and think, ""What would Stan say?"" 

""What facial expression would he make?"" ""How would he stand?""

After awhile, I was able to put my own spin on things Stan said to make it my own. 

What if your best friend isn't the cool, confident guy? 

Imitate a celebrity. 

In the book by Napoleon Hill, [Think and grow rich](https://www.amazon.com/Think-Grow-Rich-Napoleon-Hill-ebook/dp/B01I9ND4CA), he writes about speaking to successful people in our mind which influences us. 

Regardless, if you know the person in real life or not. He actually says, ""Living or dead.""

So, embody someone you admire, and think about how they would handle a situation. 

I used to be a musician. My group toured 3 states doing shows, so we were pretty decent. 

I wrote most of the songs and they were good songs. But, when I started writing, they sucked ass.

My friend that got me into music writing said, ""Pretend you are your favorite artist and think about what they would write.""

So I imitated or embodied my favorite artists for awhile, then my songs got better.

Then, I put my own personality or voice on what my favorite artist would do and my songs became local hits. 

Here's another good book about this concept called [steal like an artist](https://www.amazon.com/Steal-Like-Artist-Things-Creative-ebook/dp/B0074QGGK6)

Same with my game.

I started imitating my confident friend Stan and lost my virginity. Then, I put my own personality into things Stan did and got laid way more.

It helps to imitate confidence, but make sure you're still working to build your inner confidence. Imitation confidence is superficial and can falter.

True confidence is unbreakable. Check out my confidence building habits in my [book that's free this weekend.](https://thehimalayaplaya.com/101-powerful-habits-proven-to-boost-your-life/)",seduction
How do I stay ready?,"So I've recently been talking to more people on campus, and it's been going fairly well. Today there was an event in the main building, so i went just to try to meet people and be seen.

Well in the span of maybe 5 mins i saw several girls who seemed receptive. One was a pair, who walked right at me, forcing me to walk between them. One of them said hello as she passed by, i said hey and smiled. Then i heard laughing in the background. Right after that, i saw a girl i had a class with awhile back, we held some eye contact as we passed. There were a couple, less obvious interactions as well.

So basically my question is: how can I stay ready for all these opportunities? Will it come with more experience?

(Any advice on the situation where a girl is walking towards me is appreciated too. For instance, with those 2 girls, should i have turned around? Or if a girl just smiles should i turn around and stop her? I've heard it could be bad if people constantly see me chasing down girls on campus.)

Thanks",seduction
"I need a starting point, but don't know where that is","Hey there,

&amp;#x200B;

So maybe some of you have seen my earlier posts in which case, welcome back I missed you. 

So I'm a 23yo male, 1,95 meters (6.3 feet) tall, I think i'm a 7 or 8 in terms of looks depending on the day, I train twice a week and am starting to buff up a bit, I have asperger syndrom but it's only really a factor if people expect things from me (I can talk to random people just fine, it's weird I know) and I'm 100% amazingly bad with talking to women. 

I can talk to them over text just fine. But irl I don't get the other gender at all. I stumble over words, get nervous and either don't speak up at all or speak softly which makes me come over as meak. 

I want to get better at talking to women so I can work on getting some game but I have no clue where to start. Throwing myself into the deep end might not be so good i.e talk to more random women, as I keep failing and not learn much (In my eyes). Night game isn't really my style, I can't stand clubs and I don't drink so no liquid courage for me. 

Any tips or starting point to learning more would be appreciated a bunch. If any of this sounds weird or you need more info, just ask. Writing this at midnight might not be the best idea.

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks in advance and here's hoping for a new world opening up for little old me.",seduction
(Mr Olympia 2018) How To Approach Fitness Cuties,,seduction
"Stop what you're doing and ask yourself, am I mentally healthy?","I hope to help anyone with this post, as well as to realize for me how much I've accomplished up to this point in my life. I'm 28 yr old M and have been in the [/r/seduction](https://www.reddit.com/r/seduction) community for at least 8 years now. I've recently reflected on all of my saved posts, books I've read, approaches I've been made, and comparing the value they've brought me to that of talking to my Therapist for the past year and a half, and I've concluded, that if I could do it all over again, I would've have given my 8 years of ""seduction"" experience for starting/talking to a Mental Therapist sooner. Before I dig in a little deeper of why that is, let me give the disclosure that this is not applicable to everyone and may not be applicable to you. Just because my experiences have led me to believe that seeing a therapist earlier would have been more helpful then other resources, does not mean that this is the case for you. That being said, I believe that many of those that come to this community likely have self-esteem, confidence, among a cocktail of other personal issues, and that a Therapist can help understand/remedy those issues. That said, let's dig in.

&amp;#x200B;

For the past year and half I've been seeing a Therapist, 2-4 times a month. When I first started seeing him, I didn't know exactly what I was doing. I've always been someone that looks to grow myself, and I knew that I might be someone that has suffered from a troubled past. Really at the time it just kinda felt like another way to add to my overall holistic well-being. Fast forward a year and half, and I'm having trouble coming up with all the words to describe how beneficial my therapist has been for me. I believe that the work I've done and will do going forward will help me to be more successful in my interaction with my career, friends, family, and yes **women.**

&amp;#x200B;

It's cliché - but you don't know what you don't know. For me personally, I didn't realize I was ignorant about my lack of self-esteem, traumatic events from my childhood and adulthood, and answering the *why* to why my body does what it does when interacting with colleagues, women, etc. In my opinion figuring this stuff out first is by a large multiple more valuable then reading Models by Mark Mason 100 times. (Not to knock the book, it's amazing and I highly recommend it!) All I'm trying to argue is that having a stable mental foundation is critical in your walk down the path of life. I believe that it should be the first thing that is targeted in everyone's path to be 'good with women', even if it means in the short term you get less of the sex. Think about it like this. It's in **YOUR** best interest to get a healthy brain first. All of your future chances of success, however you define success, become significantly more likely when your brain is in a healthy place. On top of that it's an extremely rewarding process getting to know yourself and improve who you are.

&amp;#x200B;

Finally, if you aren't in a place yet where you can see someone that can help, whether it be for financial/any other reason, I'd urge you then to not give up. To remember that at some point in the future this is something that you'll promise yourself you'll revisit. Timing is important and if now isn't the time, that's O.K. What isn't O.K. is to give up or to decide that this is something that isn't for you. Remember that this is a long-term commitment to your mental health.

&amp;#x200B;

I hope this helps someone. I know my journey has been rewarding learning about myself and why I react the way I do to certain things. I think I originally came to this community wanting to get better with talking to attractive women, and now my goals have changed to more of wanting to help myself. I believe that if instead of focusing on the women aspect, if you change your value system to focus on yourself, everything else will fall into place. If you have any questions feel free to write and I'll try and respond.

Best,

Guy on the Internet",seduction
"How To Overcome ""The Butterflies"" And Approach That Beautiful Girl • u/magnetradio",,seduction
Looking for a wingman to go out with in Tel-Aviv,"Basically what the title suggests. Most of my friends here in school either don't go out, have a girlfriend, or resort to dating apps to meet chicks. Because it's fairly difficult around here, I guess many of them are discouraged. But I need someone to challenge me a bit. ",seduction
Newbie looking for a coach/mentor/wing in the DMV?,"Recently  move to Baltimore, Maryland  and realize time is of the essence. 

Im 29, only had one girlfriend  my entire life, had sex with three  chicks  total but by accident (more of them pursing me). Needless to say  time is running  out. I've been in and out of pickup  theory for years and made no progress (mostly due to being in a long term relationship)  since 19. 

Approach  anexity flows strongly  through me, in fact I only ever approached one girl in my life and that was in high school, lol she laughed at me.

Anyone wants to hangout, drink for free and share stories with an old newbie? 

I promise, I'm actually  a pretty  cool guy. I traveled the world, workout,  and dance. I just made the mistake of wifeing up the first girl that seemed remotely  interested  in me.",seduction
Wingman in Tokyo,Hey is anyone here in Tokyo and interested in doing some daygame/nightgame? pm me if you're in the Tokyo or Yokohama area!,seduction
A New Perspective on Game of being in Frame,Hey bros. I had some thoughts about gaming that I wanted to share with you. I’ve been reflecting on my inner game and outer game recently and I noticed a lot of my advice hasn’t been taken seriously. I can’t stress how important my rules are to the success of your game. That why I’m offering my best selling online bootcamp ever Text to Succex for a new low price. DM me for details!,seduction
When your partner does not value you,"Seduction can be fun and for many of us we prefer it if it lasts forever. However if at some point you make the tough decision to enter a relationship. Make sure that before you can enter a relationship safely, you realize that if you ever run into a partner who does not value you, you must let go of that person. At a glance this seems like a common sense statement. However, due to codependency and cognitive dissonance this is not always the case. Unfortunately, I have seen some formerly successful PUAs fall into complacency and even develop need behavior such as codependency. I hope this is not the case with any of you.

&amp;#x200B;

Here is my video exposing this matter:

&amp;#x200B;

[When your partner does not value you](https://youtu.be/ePN-EBj_7Ac)

&amp;#x200B;

Enjoy!",seduction
Going to the club with a friend tonight any advice?,I met a friend thru a hobby and surprisingly follows PUA and basically a noob like me. This is my first time i am going to the club and i am 20 and might be my first time approaching girls as well or approach together. I am honestly kinda nervous and excited to go. any advice? ,seduction
Finding a place to be intimate with my girlfriend,"My girlfriend and I are struggling to find a place to be intimate with each other. I have my own apartment, but her parents are extremely religious and are not allowing us to be alone there. Even just cuddling can be really awkward with her whole family crowding around in the house. We have tried parks but our backs get painful after laying down in a park for a while. We did it once at night before in a park but it was really cold and it will be even colder now. We are both quite frustrated by this as she does not share her parents' views on how we should be acting together and what we are allowed to do. This is a somewhat long distance relationship, I live about an hour away so just quickly sneaking over to my apartment isn't an option unfortunately. Any tips on what we can do to find a peaceful private place for us to fool around?

Edit: I'll add this for clarity sake, we are both 19 and ""intimate"" for us does not mean sexual intercourse, but we do have oral sex sometimes. ",seduction
Quick question on hugs and hand placement.,"Hey all, this is something I've been thinking about for the last couple days. 

When you hug a girl, wither with the one armed side hug or both arms, do you put your arm(s) around her shoulder, upper back, lower back, or closer to her hips? I realized that recently I've been doing the side hug around the waist/hip area for girls that I'm interested in sexually, and the shoulder for friends. 

Do y'all do the same thing or have any other comments in how girls should be hugged? Just wanted to hear some other opinions.",seduction
Losing virginity on Tinder - Question,"Hello, I will be trying Tinder to lose my virginity. I'm 22 years old.

But there is a complication: I live in a small village about 20 miles from a big city. There is almost no chance to meet somebody from Tinder here or in other villages around, so I have to go to dates in that city. Where should we go after the date to have sex? Because I just can't tell her to go by train with me about 20 miles to my home to that little village. Even if she agreed (I would be very surprised), it would look like this: Waiting for the train on the train station... the journey... going to my home to the other side of the village... urghh.

Should I go with her to her home? - Again, it already decreases the chance to succeed, maybe she wouldn't want to take me to her home. It would be just much easier to invite her to my home, if I lived in that city...

Should I buy a night in a hostel in advance for that day and then just hope that the date will go well? It doesn't sound so good to me, it would surely kill the vibe for her. - Finding out that I bought a night in a hostel in advance just to have sex with her. It sounds desperate and strange...

Or should we be looking for a hostel after the successful dinner or something? It just sounds terrible...

I will appreciate any advice, any tips on how to do that. Thank you.",seduction
Getting the Day 2 after Number Close,"So I've gotten pretty good at daygame by cold approaching random girls and flirting and getting a number close. I'm not having a very good conversation rate with getting the second meeting though.

&amp;#x200B;

So what is your texting strategy to get the first meeting? Like I don't want to spend a lot of time texting back and forth because its a waste of time and you become a text friend. Usually I will go out and get a few number closes during the day and then text them all around 9pm ""Hi xxx, it was interesting and nice meeting you today"". Then the next day try to get them into a text conversation and ask them to meet for coffee. Most of the time I get some excuse through text.

&amp;#x200B;

What I have found does work is if you can call them and get them on the phone with you. Then ask them out while they're talking to you and its hard for them to say no rather than through text, but its hard to get them on the phone in the first place because you can't just call them out of the blue you have to text them first or they wont pick up.

&amp;#x200B;

So what is your text game strategy/time line/routine to setup the day 2 after getting a number close?

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
Making Conversation In Class?,"Hey guys,

Fairly straightforward question here, but what would be the best way to converse with a girl in my class and ask her out? I don’t have a problem conversing once I’ve started, I’m just not sure how to initiate a conversation in this setting.

To provide some background, this is an art class I’m taking a college, so there is no group work that would instigate conversation. Additionally, we’re seated on opposite ends of the classroom.",seduction
Why You shouldn't add a Girl on Social Media (if you're a noob),,seduction
Did I pass the shit test in our text after the date?,"So met this girl on POF. She's 35, I'm 28. She is a single mom who's a tutor I'm a single dad who is a Staff NCO in the Navy. Overall the interaction went really well. It started off with her telling me shes going to be ""Mexican late"" I told her I was displeased, but I would give her a pass because we planned it last minute after my own schedule changes.

Overall the date went great, had a few beers, played a few arcade games, I escalated kino right off the bat. Kissed her about an hour in, told her I wanted to go home with her(cant go to my house cuz a shitty living situation. My ex hasnt moved out yet) she said not gonna happen, I ignore it. Talked the last hour of me rubbing her ass and inner thigh, making out and she had her hands on my knee. 

When the brewery closed we made out in the parking lot. She told me to text her if I wanted to hang out this weekend, or we would have to wait 2 weeks(she has kids every other weekend) I decided an hour later to schedule something for this weekend since its already Wednesday and I already has the rest of the weekend filled. Still learning the game. Over consider the night a success. 

Me: 
Saturday at 6 at your place for movie night? Figure you cant be late at your own house :p (I asked this cuz she said she hates movie theaters and said maybe next date we can watch a movie at her house)

Her:
 lol
No
Not happening 
Sorry

Me:
Lol how about the bar with 91 taps

Her:
101

Me:
Yeah that place

Her:
K

Me: 
6 o'clock don't be late

Her:
Hijole

Me: I'm white idk what that means(we joked about race that night. I'm white shes latina

Her: wink emoticon

Me:
Lol deal
See you Saturday! Goodnight!

Her:
No
No
Not if you think you're getting some

Me: I enjoy spending time with you. Sex is just a bonus

Her:
OK deal

Me:
See you Saturday

Her:
Goodnight


I didn't reply back. I didn't get a yes or no, but I'm not gonna reply back.  How do you think I did? Any pointers as far as the communication, or when I should confirm our date? ",seduction
Is it normal to engage in a realtionship and fall in love later ?,I honestly don´t know. Never had a relationship or felt love so I wondered if this was really normal?,seduction
Field Report - Buffalo Ny #Karaoke,"Alright, so we live in a strange time. There is a greater movement happening and it is in OUR domain -seddit. Just be aware- Also this comment has little to do with my post- 

Field report/ Life report

I have been into this for about 4 months. I am a naturally social person off of a recent 8 year relationship. Putting myself out there is easy. I don't have the common noob problems. I have different noob problems. Tonight I learned in practice two lessons. 1) PROPERLY read the room. 2) ""You play too much"" - Evil Stiffler

The girl that I spent 90% talking to was cute. Really cute. She was also single. Here is what happened.

I accidentally sat on her coat. We talked. We vibed. She was wearing a cherub sweater (a cherub is a small angel you might find in a cathedral), her breast were large, her body was tiny, her nails were long and well groomed, her smile was cute and short, her look was strong, glasses, she was eatable.

encounter 1- good- We are hanging out at the bar- Chit Chat

I traded glasses. A routine I've done before a few times. I think I've done this too many times because she was almost ready for it. weird 

encounter 2- she bought me a shot (with her social group)- HEY/ HEY/ HEY!!! (I make friends)

encounter 3- I took her to the women's room. Made a comment about gender equality and went inside with her. She digged it but legitimately had to use the bathroom so I left. Pee break

encounter 4- She opened up much more. I talked to her about Karaoke. She talked to me about social anxiety. Saying that she would never ever get up on stage. (I asked her to do back up) But man alive. Guys, she was into me. And she was really cute. She grabbed my hand. I held it. I walked away at one point and she grabbed me back. I made a move (smallish) she backed off. She said it was her. I tried to give her social outs. She said I ""I hope you're not done"". I played around that. Our verbal flirting was pretty heavy/ sexual. 

I went up to sing- Clint Eastwood - Gorillaz

This is when she wandered off. I meet her again outside smoking. I  was not looking for her but run into her while doing push ups with another girl I also met that night. Then I do some pull ups- on the canopy. Just jumped up and did it. It was fun. I'm into it and actually as far as I can tell so is she, she looked visually impressed. It's in her eyes. (I also have been working with people directly for the last 7 years and have gotten good at reading body language because of my work) - Side note it's 1:30 am in Buffalo on a Wednesday night. We've all been drinking. This is a good time for dicking around.

I know at this point most of you will have thought that I've peeked and I'm trying too hard. In reality I am self amusing now and have been all night and not too concerned. Honestly the attraction seeps out from here. My night is essentially over. 

I make two more passes. But it's done. I've already found out the information early on. I needed a different approach. Perhaps one that is out of my current level.  

I'm walking this one off and not even flustered. I spent some time-sink on this approach but learned some things about yet another type of woman. I have tremendous respect for all men trying to do what I am right now. This game is hard. More than that it's not a game. It is essentially YOUR life and the interactions with the lives of others #theirlivestoo.

I'm doing my best to leave the camp site better than I found it. To stand up for myself and be bold. To have fun and above all not take myself too seriously. Some days it can be hard. Tonight was easy and fun. I had an attractive girl who was down with my shit, talk to me, while I was cool as fuck. It really does not get much better. I feel good.

If I had to do it again... maybe I'd bring less high energy. But honestly writing this now I'm not sure. I tried and I did it from a place of comfort and flirtatiousness. I don't think at my level I could have played this better.

We live in a very tricky spot right now gents. Our reputation is on the line. That said- Women still, as from a 1,000 years ago, want the same thing. Something our culture has repressed in us for the past 100+ years. Everyone wants a good lay and the emotion commonly known as pure love.

Please let me know what you think. I am always trying to improve and I welcome all criticism. I would be happy to provide more details if commenters ask (provided I can remember tomorrow) 

Good night space cowboys -JOB",seduction
Do you guys tend to be picky when doing approaches?,"I find myself backing out when I'm about to do an approach. I see a cute girl, but then I notice a characteristic of her that I don't particularly click with. Like for example, a solid 8 walks by, but she's a total basic bitch, with the uggs Starbucks and everything(not my type at all) so I let her walk. Is it me being picky or am I being a pussy?",seduction
The Uncanny Similarities Between Game And Door-to-door Sales,"In 2010, I worked as a door-to-door salesmen selling broadband.

Recently, I thought about the many similarities between these and trying to pick girls in a nightclub. 

The key similarities are:

# There are lot more nos than yeses.

This is what separates the chodes from the champions - in sales and pick-up.  

Most people take the nos so personally that they have a shit attitude when they meet the customer that would have otherwise said yes... 

# You are being judged within a few seconds  

Yes, you're partly being judged by what you look like. 

But, you're mostly being judged by your vibe, voice tonality and body language. 

If you're having a fun awesome time, people will listen to what you have to say. 

If sub-communicate that you're having a shit time and everyone on the street is rejecting you, there'll be another door immediately slammed in your face.  

(The point on looks is mostly to do with how you present yourself. Fashion, grooming etc. We had people of all demographics slaying it in the field.) 

# It's more about your personality than what you're actually selling 

The cool, fun salesman with a rubbish product, is the metaphorical 5'4"" guy with good game.

The unconfident lame salesman with a good product is the metaphorical 6' 3"" handsome chode.

The first guy makes more sales...

# The law of state transference

The 'number one rule of pick-up' is arguably also the number one rules of sales.

""Whatever you feel, they feel""

There was this one ditzy blonde woman who absolutely SLAYED in the field, even though she barely knew anything about the product. 

She was just fun to be around. She'd show them how much money they'd save. It was so simple.

Meanwhile, experienced salesmen who got sick of the job would struggle, despite having all the sales knowledge in the world. 

# There will be plenty of people that could have bought, but didn't for logistical reasons.

A lot of the time, the rejections are about them not you. 

If their fat friend is over for dinner, she'll block the sale just like she blocks the fuckboys in the club.  

If the homeowner is about to leave for an urgent appointment, they don't have time for you. 

There are as many women tied into broadband contracts, as there are tied into relationships... 

# Your best opportunities are at the end of the session 

We worked 14.00pm until 20.00pm, but most of the eligible buyers wouldn't get home from work until 18.00.

The first four hours would mostly be people who aren't eligible for the product. The last two hours would be where the sales are made. 

Yet, there were so many where I had a 'state crash' from all the rejections before those final golden hours rolled around - and made 0 sales as a result. 

The same happens with pick-up newbies who get pissed off because of all the rejections they accumulate before 'pull o' clock' when the girls are ready to go home. 

Heck, RSD Madison estimates that around 30% of pulls are likely to be girls you meet AFTER the club closes. Except most newbies have gone home to cry-masturbate way before then...

# You get better, the more you practice

With game and sales, there are a limited amount of obstacles and objections to overcome.

The more you practice, the easier they are to overcome. 

# What can we learn from all this???

The point I want to get across is that 'good game' is all about having an awesome personality, which remains on point no matter how much rejection you face. 

Also, if you're good at game, you'd probably make a lot of money in door-to-door sales. :) 

***I co-created a Telegram group for men who want to become incredible with women. There are hundreds of guys sharing success stories and getting advice on their sticking points. If you want to join, drop me a PM with your Telegram handle.***",seduction
"Sometimes when I approach girls, they reject me saying they have a boyfriend. But they will talk my ear off for the next hour without me contributing at all. Why are they wasting my time like this? Out of spite?","Do you guys ever get this? Usually I’ll approach a girl, she’ll say she has a boyfriend as what I assume is an easy rejection, and then I’ll go “ok no problem, see ya” and walk away. But sometimes they’ll go “oh sorry I have a boyfriend, but blah blah blah” and will talk to me forever, I usually don’t even say anything they just keep going. Are they wasting my time out of spite? Just lonely? Are they actually attracted to me and want to talk but they know they can’t actually date me so they just enjoy the attention? ",seduction
Taking a step back from seduction,"I never thought I would be the one, being in only my third year of college but having a body count that typically dwarves my peers, to be told that I have a personality disorder, specifically Borderline Personality Disorder, one that specifically affects one ability to form relationships with others. For the last two years or so, silently and from different accounts, I have read and studied and practiced the techniques of this subreddit, and, honestly they came pretty easily. Growing up with abusive parents I never really got much Love and I don’t know what it feels like, or exactly how to feel it, leading me to jump from girl to girl with only one notable relationship. I also came home to an unstable home, and I had to act a certain way each day and anticipate and react and put on masks to protect myself and my siblings from my mother and father. Seduction came easily because I was playing it too much like a game, too manipulative, and that’s why with both my recent diagnosis and the mental health post today. I’m sad to say goodbye to a community that was the reason I went from being a 300 pound virgin lard to a fit athlete who is the one all his friends ask for advice from. You guys really helped me a lot to come out of my shell the first time, albeit in an unsustainable way, but you guys are the reason my high school and early college years were enjoyable, and I hate to go, but right now my current journey and focus is finding out who I am and fixing the pathologies in my brain, so, until then, keep getting laid, and those of you who are lurking like I was, go out there and do it because if someone like me can succeed in attracting women than anyone can.



",seduction
How to fundamentally destroy Fear .,"*You mentioned fear as being part of our basic underlying emotional pain.* *How does fear arise, and why is there so much of it in people's lives ?* *And isn't a certain amount of fear just healthy self-protection?* *If I didn't have a fear of fire, I might put my hand in it and get burned.*

The reason why you don't put your hand in the fire is not because of fear, it's because you know that you'll get burned. You don't need fear to avoid unnecessary danger -- just a minimum of intelligence and common sense. For such practical matters, it is useful to apply the lessons learned in the past. Now if someone *threatened* you with fire or with physical violence, you might experience something like fear. This is an instinctive shrinking back from danger, but not the psychological condition of fear that we are talking about here. **The psychological condition of fear is divorced from any concrete and true immediate danger. It comes in many forms: unease, worry, anxiety, nervousness, tension, dread, phobia, and so on. This kind of psychological fear is always of something that** ***might*** **happen, not of something that is happening now.** ***You*** **are in the here and now, while your mind is in the future. This creates an anxiety gap. And if you are identified with your mind and have lost touch with the power and simplicity of the Now, that anxiety gap will be your constant companion. You can always cope with the present moment, but you cannot cope with something that is only a mind projection -- you cannot cope with the future.**

Moreover, as long as you are identified with your mind, the ego runs your life, as I pointed out earlier. Because of its phantom nature, and despite elaborate defense mechanisms, the ego is very vulnerable and insecure, and it sees itself as constantly under threat. This, by the way, is the case even if the ego is outwardly very confident. Now remember that an emotion is the body's reaction to your mind. What message is the body receiving continuously from the ego, the false, mind-made self?. Danger, I am under threat. And what is the emotion generated by this continuous message? Fear, of course.

Fear seems to have many causes, Fear of loss, fear of failure, fear of being hurt, and so on, but ultimately all fear is the ego's fear of death, of annihilation. To the ego, death is always just around the corner. In this mind-identified state, fear of death affects every aspect of your life. For example, even such a seemingly trivial and ""normal"" thing as the compulsive need to be right in an argument and make the other person wrong -- defending the mental position with which you have identified -- is due to the fear of death. If you identify with a mental position, then if you are wrong, your mind-based sense of self is seriously threatened with annihilation. So you as the ego cannot afford to be wrong. To be wrong is to die. Wars have been fought over this, and countless relationships have broken down.

Once you have disidentified from your mind, whether you are right or wrong makes no difference to your sense of self at all, so the forcefully compulsive and deeply unconscious need to be right, which is a form of violence, will no longer be there. You can state clearly and firmly how you feel or what you think, but there will be no aggressiveness *or defensiveness* about it. Your sense of self is then derived from a deeper and truer place within yourself, not from the mind. Watch out for any kind of defensiveness within yourself. What are you defending? An illusory identity, an image in your mind, a fictitious entity. By making this pattern conscious, by witnessing it, you disidentify from it. In the light of your consciousness, the unconscious pattern will then quickly dissolve. This is the end of all arguments and power games, which are so corrosive to relationships. Power over others is weakness disguised as strength. True power is within, and it is available to you now.

So anyone who is identified with their mind and, therefore, disconnected from their true power, their deeper self rooted in Being, will have fear as their constant companion. The number of people who have gone beyond mind is as yet extremely small, so you can assume that virtually everyone you meet or know lives in a state of fear. Only the intensity of it varies. It fluctuates between anxiety and dread at one end of the scale and a vague unease and distant sense of threat at the other. Most people become conscious of it only when it takes on one of its more acute forms.

&amp;#x200B;

This is directly quoted from *The Power of Now* by Eckhart Tolle.",seduction
How can you approach during colder weather/winter?,"Should you adjust your approach to include statements of empathy, be more direct, since the both of you don't want to be cold outside for too long. I assume the 5 second rule should be in play here. Does anyone on this board have experience with approaching outside during the colder months?",seduction
Dating Really Fit Girls: How Do I Overcome Feeling Insecure About Being Overweight?,"I'm currently dating a couple of girls with really excellent bodies. One is just genetically gifted and the other is an absolute gym freak. 

I'm about 10-15kg over my ideal weight. I'm training hard to get in better shape, but it's going to take time. 

Does anyone have any methods, mindsets or hacks for overcoming this sense of insecurity?

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
"Insight into past behaviour (girl likes guy, guy likes girl, girl loses interest)","Hey Guys, 

As the title suggests, this has nothing to do with my future actions but rather what I have done. Recently I've moved to a new school (postgrad) and I've been doing pretty well for myself. Hooked up a few times with randoms at parties, and then out of nowhere this really cute girl comes out. I met her at a party and thought to myself she can't possibly be interested so I don't spend that much time talking to her. Fast forward a few days, we cross paths in the subway, she recognises me comes up to me and starts talking. That night she had a party, she came and pick me up at the bar where I was with friends she did not know, we went to a party and spent the whole night talking. Fast forward the next day, we had a party with friends in common and she told everyone she wasn't coming, but then when I called her I managed to make her change her mind. Anyways everything seems to be going well, and slowly but surely we start talking by msg/snap ... and I have a good feeling about it. But then I ask her out like on a proper 2 man date, and the excuses start to follow ... I keep at it, I ask her out again same thing ... yet we keep talking ... then a couple days from a huge party I start getting a really bad feeling and feel her slipping through my fingers. I had 0 expectations for the party given how the past few days had been, but for some reason, the party went great and we hooked up. By the end, I couldn't manage to see her again at the party and ended up msging her telling her hooking up at parties was nice but I'd love to see her outside too. I guess what follows had to happen, she told me that although she was into me, she was just looking for fun and not a relationship. The thing that bothers me is how did things go south so fast in a matter of days, she went from being almost over attached to nothing. I just can't wrap my head around it and not knowing what I did wrong (for future plans) pisses me off more than her blowing me off. 

Any ideas ?

&amp;#x200B;

PS: For context, she's the only one I wanted to settle down with, my other hookups were just that  hookups, purely casual and I didn't see myself with those girls at all.",seduction
5 questions I ask every girl when I'm out at a bar,,seduction
Female coworker who I've never had a conversation with asked me out for coffee...interpret?,"Been at the same job for a while. I just turned 24 and have only been cold approaching women since March of this year. I'm wondering if maybe the confidence is starting radiate out - I went from being a guy who assumed 90% of women find me ugly to having a female coworker ask me out of the blue to go for coffee. We're on the same floor and she's very new-- again, I've only introduced myself to her but that's it, no real conversation. She emails me yesterday randomly and I was a bit perplexed, but agreed because shes around my age and attractive. I have a feeling I've seen her check me out before. How would you guys see this?",seduction
Just want a little advice on the right way to spark some jealousy,"Posting here because it seems more suited than r/datingadvice


I asked this girl out from real life, she's single. Originally said yes with enthusiasm but then flaked day before. Made up an excuse. She added me on FB and liked a photo of mine. I stopped texting her cause she ignored my last two texts.


I think I can get her off the fence.


Iv'e got a tinder date this weekend with a girl iv'e been hitting it off with. I usually expect the flake with tinder girls but I think this one is keen on me. Its a spot walking distance from my place too! I really like this first girl and was wondering what the best way is to show ""what she's missing out on""?.

I'm gonna have to keep this on facebook btw.
",seduction
She ignored my text messages,"So there is a girl that I have a huge crush on and we are both part of an organization. We have seen each other about 5 or 6 times during events. Recently, I was flirting with her and told her that I liked her hair and took some pictures together. I sensed that  she got blushed and smiled. She then send me the pics that we took and I replied that I really liked how we looked. She agreed.

About a week and a half later, I texted her letting her know that I’ve heard about a nice place that I wanted to try and that I would love to go with her. I asked to see if she was available during a specific day and time and she went totally cold from there. She never replied

I don’t know how to take it. Is it because she is not interested at all or could she just be playing hard to get? Also, we are friends on FB and we sometimes like and interact with each other posts.

I would probably see her again during our next event in about a month or so. Should I try something else then?

I would greatly appreciate any comments and thoughts",seduction
Good dancestyle for clubs,Hey guys I dance Salsa and think about starting to dance Bachata and Kizomba. Do I have a good repertoire for clubs then? What am I missing? Clubdancing without rules looks and feels retarded to me. (Well clubs in general look dumb to me but I'm just corious),seduction
How do I escalate?,"Yo, this is big, how do I escalate with a girl which I know likes me? How do I start getting sensual with her? Any tips? I'm really inexperienced, and she's practically begging for it. What do I do? How do I sieze the sittuation, seal the deal?

We currently only have time to meet up for a couple of hours in public places, so Netflix&amp;Chill is out of the question. How do I escalate into holding hangs/toying around, hugs and then move on from there? 

Any advice would be greatly apreciated. ",seduction
How do you guys find the time?,"(Throwaway to avoid identifying info.) 

&amp;#x200B;

They say you need practice to get good at anything, but how do you guys ever find the time?

I work six days a week, and between the working hours and commute it totals around 58 hrs/week. I have a boxing class two or three times a week plus some additional runs and workouts taking another seven or eight hours. I have to basic stuff like make/eat breakfast and dinner and basic hygiene. Another 7-10 hours right there. And sleep:  Ideally 56.  My one day off a week is usually taken up with family obligations. Literally the next day I don't (yet) have a major obligation is November 11-nearly a month away.  

&amp;#x200B;

How do I practice day-game when I never have time during the day? How can I practice night game when I need to be home by 10 PM every day? Even if I do experience success I fear I won't have time for even a FWB let alone an actual relationship. I can't meet people at work or even at the gym (only 1 woman takes my class and she has a bf). 

&amp;#x200B;

I don't know if I need to just man up, but it's so hard to get any practice or momentum or even motivation when I can't get the ball rolling. ",seduction
Subconscious placing women on a pedestal,"I still keep placing pretty women on a pedestal, eventhough, I know their shit just stinks as much as ours does. How can i get rid of this subconscious thought pattern?",seduction
How do I slide in dms,So basically I wanna get some nudes but I’m honestly a pretty awkward guy so how do I go into a girls dms and flirt my way into getting her to send nudes or how do I just flirt in a text convo in general ,seduction
Girlfriend's lack of initiative or my unrealistic expectations?,"Heys guys. Trying to figure out what my situation is ... I'm trying to be reasonable and do my due diligence to make sure I'm not actually the root of the issue. Because if I am, I am more than happy to address it.  So thoughtful feedback is appreciated. So I've been dating this girl for about 5 months now. She is a dancer, and I am a producer, so although we are not in the exact same industries, there is a lot of overlap therefore we can talk shop, and ultimately understand the other's lifestyle. Or at least I think so.  We also both live in the same area and see each other a lot. Anyway, she has a crazy schedule that is often times is unpredictable (auditions etc). Which is 100% okay in my book. Because I am also fairly busy and am pretty low key. 

&amp;#x200B;

All that considered I feel she doesn't show much initiative for the relationship. Outside of always wanting to text me (which seems to be big the most important thing for her), the number times where she has led the charge to hangout, or suggests a solution to something is something I could probably count on 1 hand. This isn't to say she doesn't want to hang out, she does. And we do a lot. But the entirely of the relationship relies on me bringing the relationship to her. Like a measurable example is who's apartment we stay at when we are together. I would say for every 10-15 times I stay at her apartment, she stays at mine once. I also live in a much nicer area (objectively, trust me), closer to both of  where we work/spend most of our time. And on top of that, it is always me who asks to come over, or have her over. Every. Single. Time. Simply put, if I don't take the initiative, we don't hang out. 

Another example is after work, I will go to her work/where ever she is in the city, to meet up with her. She will tell me a time, I will show up on time, and every single time I have to wait outside for at least 10 minutes for her to come out. Sometimes closer to a half hour. It only occurred once where I had train issues, where I was late and she had to wait for me. She was really upset. And I just couldn't understand the hypocrisy. And I pointed it out. 

&amp;#x200B;

Okay cool, at the end of the day making me wait/not coming over much isn't really 'that bad'. But I think the most frustrating part is how she interacts with others in her life and how she responds if I non-combatively bring up something that bothers me. Its crazy because for her rommate (for example), she will bend over backwards to make sure she is avail to meet their family or get to know their friends. But I had to pull teeth to get her to meet mine. She has met my friends oncer and my family twice. My family is the least intimidating family in the world. But whenever I try to  address the things that bother me, trying my hardest to be reasonable, I almost feel invalidated for bringing them up. Like it causes her too much stress. SO usually I end up apologizing and saying this isn't relationship threatening, I just want to grow. 

&amp;#x200B;

After all this, there has not been a single tangible example where she has tried to better her self, or address what bothers me.  Therefore, I am thinking of cutting ties with her. Asking someone to meet me 50/50 or even 60/40 seems fair, but right now it feels maybe  90/10. She is a great girl and I really like her, but I just don't feel she is ready for a real relationship or is willing to take the initiative to build one. 

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
I throw on random cloths when it's time to workout. Have I been killing my gymn game?,"I never been one to game while in the gymn. To me the gymn is about iron, so I throw  on mismatch cloths that feel comfortable  and  workout..

However recently  single, I notice while looking around the gymn that most guys wore matching and fashionable gym gear. When lifting I rarely pay attention  to others,  but I dont recall seeing the guys hit on chicks in the gymn, so why the fashion  show?

Am I missing something? I'm the type of guy that is fashionable  in clubs and bars but when it comes to the gym  give me some high white socks, over sized XL yellow shirt with a hole or two and I am ready to go.",seduction
Help...I think a girl may be interested,"I am a 22 year old senior in college. I have no dating or relationship experience. In fact, I have never really asked anyone out.

There's a girl on the coed sports team I am on that joined and appears shy and lonely but interested. Though it seems she will hold a conversation with anyone if they give her the time, the other day we walked back from practice and had a conversation.

We both commute, so that's a topic of interest obviously.

The team has been planning socials, and she seems particularly interested or concerned about the timing of these. She said she just doesn't want to drive out to them, and I agreed, but I think she is implying something else.

As my previous posts have indicated I have ADHD and social anxiety. As a result, I spend more time thinking about what I will say, trying to appear less ""needy"" and wondering if I am wasting my time because she is in a relationship and is just being nice. I was burned once and refuse to be burned again.

It just seems like there's a huge window of opportunity, even though she isn't ""conventionally"" attractive. She's probably just under 5' and I'm 5'10"" but it doesn't bother me. If I gave her a number it would be a 6/10. It's her interest that attracts me the most.

She keeps wondering what my school and work schedule is like...I don't have class from 8-11, and practice is before that. Neither does she. We both work in the evenings as well.

The thing that I am trying to do is figure out a way to get to know her during these off periods, without appearing needy and without jeopardizing my reputation on the team if I get rejected. 15 minutes ago I saw her in the campus center (where she says she normally takes a nap) and I was very nervous just walking up to her. As a result, I did do it, but I talked in a ""shy"" manner, just saying I was tired from practice and asked what class she had next.

I don't know where to start or where to turn. I have a tendency to say stupid shit that I later regret. I can't have this happen here. 

I also want to reiterate, I DO NOT want to be burned again by someone that wants to have casual get-to-know-you conversation, and then mentions a boyfriend in the middle (whether he is real or not). My social skills just aren't adept enough to decipher whether a girl is single or not.

Please help. It seems this is the closest I can come to an organic relationship without venturing into the cesspools of online dating. Most other women around my age are experienced and cunning with dealing with guys. I feel as though I am driving without any directions.",seduction
Field Report / Outer game resources?,"I already know a bit about inner game, you know the ""enhance yourself"" / ""bring out your best self stuff"". I have a copy of Models. I read a summary of the first few chapters someone posted here, but I haven't read the book cover to cover (I rarely do with any books). I briefly looked at it. I'm trying to work on these things. I think I understand key concepts, and I am working on them. Still socializing and breaking out of my comfort zone. I know inner game is usually where people start. I've gone to dating events, I've gone to meetups, and I've done cold approaches. I'm still having a hard time. I haven't met anyone I really like yet. I have met some people, but they turned down my number, and most of them ended up as friends on facebook. I think I need to work more on building rapport, then finally asking for or giving the number. The biggest problem is I rush things. How long should you talk to a girl? The funny thing is one time, I was talking to a bar tender and it was a really long nice chat and I thought we connected, but she didn't contact me. On one occasion I also made a terrible attempt at kino. I've been experimenting a bit anyway. I still suffer approach anxiety and neediness, but it's way better now than it was.

The good news is my life is a lot better. I've picked up hobbies and I'm doing stuff I enjoy. The past 10 or so months have been among the best in my life. My life is active now and I'm networking and meeting people and doing things I used to be afraid of, trying different activities. This is beyond school. While I was in school I made the terrible mistake of only focusing on my studies. That isn't to say studying isn't important, just that I should gone out and tried different things, joined clubs, and tried to meet more people.

Anyway....I want to start looking into outer game. I'm going down a path of selflessness now. What are some good books or other resources for outer game specifically?
",seduction
Daygame Field Report Self Reflections - Feedback Requested,"So I keep reading and watching YouTube videos that say after you go out for a daygame/nightgame session you should reflect on your approaches and think about what you have learned. So I went out with a new wing today and think I learned a few things which I wrote about in my journal. I have copied and pasted my journal entry below and would like to get your guys feedback on my thoughts.

&amp;#x200B;

What did I learn today?

&amp;#x200B;

1. Direct is good but need to have the right totality and attitude. Cannot be asking to talk to them but rather saying “I saw you walking and I thought you looked very nice, so I just wanted to say hi and talk with you” rather than “it is ok if I talk to you for a minute”? The tonality needs to convey flirty-ness. Like the one girl who was waiting for her boyfriend to come out of the bathroom. I didn’t even have to say why I was there exactly but she just kinda knew from the way I told her that I thought she looked very nice. Then I told her that I was flirting with her straight out after she said she had a boyfriend and that I thought she was very cute. I think she liked the interaction it actually probably made her day. 

&amp;#x200B;

2. Girls who are waiting for someone are easy to approach since they’re standing in one place, but are bad to approach because they’re very preoccupied looking for their friend to show up which is usually their boyfriend at least half the time. It works sometimes thought so maybe should not completely avoid it because I did meet a few good girls who happened to be waiting at the train station for their friend.

&amp;#x200B;

3. Need a frame breaker for girls who are in a hurry to go somewhere as it seems like most of them are. Maybe going back to tonality and approach if I make it obvious why I’m stopping them then it will catch them off guard and they will want to talk with me more.

&amp;#x200B;

4. Going out with a wing really helps in doing approaches even if the wing is just watching me from far away. I feel the need to perform for my wing and not look like a pussy so I will stop girls I normally would not stop, in places where I would not stop them, where I would normally let her walk by me thinking if I should approach until ten seconds have passed by already and she is too far away for me to get up in front of her and stop her. So it makes me bolder to go do more approaches just to show off to my wing, which in turn breaks the barrier in my mind and once I’m on a roll its like doing approaches left and right and it feels so easy. When I go out by myself just making the first one or two approaches of the day seems so difficult to break through and I let a lot more opportunities slip by that when I’m with a wing I will go for just because I know we have a limited time and I need to get it done.

&amp;#x200B;

5. Point system. I lost track of how many approaches I did today (at least 7 that I talked to and opened a few more that didn’t hook). I previously would set a goal of 20 points for a day. Each open would be one point and each number close would be one point. So I would have to end up talking with around 15 girls and a few number closes to reach the 20 points. It also makes me do more approaches just to try to get points rather than thinking about it in my head should I approach this one? Shouldn’t I approach her?

&amp;#x200B;

6. If I’m closing a snapchat, wechat, LINE always make the girl add me and send me a message with her name. That way she will see the message I made her send me and know who I am (rather me adding her and then her having to accept the add request later which she probably won't. lost a good one today because of that). When getting a phone number/whatsapp close just hand her my phone and have her put her number in and send her a message before she walks away. Setup a shortcut on my home screen to add a new phone contact so I can easily go there when I need to give her the phone.

&amp;#x200B;

7. I really really need to talk more about meeting up for coffee and the Day 2. I’m just number closing by saying you seem cool lets be friends and then mentioning meeting up for coffee before I exit the interaction. My two options are first suggest meeting for coffee and then try to number close after she agrees to it (for the purpose of setting up the Day 2) which will probably get me more rejection and less number closes, or second option is get the number close then ask her “do you like drinking tea? what type of tea do you like?” then really hammer in the idea of meeting up for tea or coffee and try to get her schedule right then and there and try to setup the logistics before I exit the interaction (basically try to pressure her into setting a time and day to meet right then and there so its harder for her to flake later).

&amp;#x200B;

So I have been out doing daygame with wings three times (with three different wings) and each time I have performed more and done way more approaches then when I’m out by myself and in my head making excuses not to approach. I need to go out with more wings and also get better at going out by myself and doing more approaches.

&amp;#x200B;

TLDR: go out with wings more, go out more in general, number close with the purpose of meeting up again instead of “being friends”, go in direct with strong tonality which sets the frame of I’m here in front of you and you’re going to stop and talk with me.

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
Does anyone ever feel lonelier as you get better at seduction?,"I’ve noticed a pattern in my life: the better I get at picking up women and sleeping with them -as in both the quality of each individual relationship and the total quantity- I start to miss the closeness of a monogamous relationship. I have no problem picking up women and were I not constrained by time I would have a different woman every night (young, wealthy, good-looking). But, the more women I date the lonelier I feel because none of them are committed relationships. (Actually some women are committed to me but I am not to them). If you’ve been in this position do you have any advice? Is this a faulty state of mind, perhaps something interpersonal affecting me? ",seduction
Someone should write a guide on how to be inviting.,"As a guy who isn't ripped and usually eats terribly I honestly am pretty happy with my success in my dating life. But the biggest thing for me at the bar is generating interest before they ever talk to me. I think that is mostly due to the fact of when I go to the bar, I don't just sit there. Boredom sets in if I sit and try to start a conversation with the one girl that sat beside me. Checking out every girl with my friends at the bar also gets old fast. 
So I always try to go somewhere with activities like pool ping pong etc. I generally have an amazing time. Smiling even dancing to the beat if I am feeling really good that day. 
Generating a great atmosphere around you attracts people. What usually happens is some girls usually come up and start watching us. My buddy and I usually will look at them but still continue as we want.   Finally, we usually get asked if they can join,  bam two dates for us. 

Then a bunch of guys come over because the girls came over. The girls usually get annoyed at that and will leave when we do.

In conclusion, I firmly believe that being an inviting person is very important. 

I hope this helps someone. ",seduction
Urgent: how to network at an awesome af conference,"Guys, I need urgent help. I'm trying to seduce 50 year olds. Forreal. So usually my networking game is great: I do incredibly well at conferences, conventiins and it's helped me a lot. Today, I'm in a different playing field. My mentor, A C level exec at a major company got me tickets to the biggest business aviation convention in the world. I'm literally the only person here below 35. Everyone I try to talk to makes me feel I'm not bringing much to the table and it ruins my conversations. And also I'm a little intimidated. I just talked to the COO of a company I once applied to for jobs and he's introducing himself and on the inside im like don't fuck it up, get those digits.

Need some urgent help guys. I follow Tim Ferris's rule on developing one single deep relationship instead of fleeting short hello hi""s and that's worked great for me till now. Now, I'm playing with the big boys. Need some help!

Edit: I was psyching myself our over nothing. After like 1hr of loitering around, I got the gist of it. They all want to help out the youth. So I changed the frame of selling myself and my company to wow you are awesome, I need your mentorship. Thanks for all the advice guys! This is my first time dealing with a crowd much much older than me.",seduction
How to attract women with your body language,,seduction
Let’s see is self improvement will bring me more options,"What’s up yall? Lately, ive found that writing on reddit is therapeutic so Im gonna rant a little but Im not bitching about my life... and if you can relate please comment! 

Okay, Im 28, i live with my mom and Gma and  im built like and offensive/ defensive lineman (6’4 300+). Over the past 5-6 years ive made decisions that put me in debt and kept me in the same situation. For the past 4 years ive dated the same girl. She’s loyal to me, a true friend, has loved and catered to me this whole time but Ive never been physically hot for her and she has clingy and stalker like ways that drive me insane (ive also messed with a few other girls so ill take the rap for some of her craziness). For the past year shes lived in another state down south and lately I have been craving something newer and hotter.

Ive come to the realization that the choices i have made in my life are the cause of my current situation and everything is connected. My often poor eating habits have lead to me being unhappy with me body(people also like to make comments as if im the fattest person theyve ever seen), my poor spending habits is the reason i have debt and still live at home and my insecurities from past situations have hindered my progress with everything in my life. 

Should i just go munk mode and not worry about women? Ive been taking the steps to improve my situation by dieting, exercising and paying my debts, but i dont even feel worthy enough to pull any women. Im broke, I live at home and my girl moved away. 

How can I take an extended break from women to get my life together without losing my mind? 

",seduction
"Scarcity is really annoying, how do i avoid it ?","Hello
i’ve good game but litteraly no girl around me atm ( despite friends gf or girl living too far away from my city )

How do i get to know more girls and avoid being hypnotised by only one ( in fact i m actually ) ?

Also met a girl but don’t have the guts to add her on facebook to see her again, should i add her ? ( she didnt gave me her info )",seduction
Date 2 after hookup?,"Long story short, I met a chick at a bar last weekend and brought her back. She’s a senior and I’m a Soph. After a day or two I snap her saying she left some cheap jewelry back at my place and she’s responds with some “oh I was wondering where they were, I’d like them back” BS.
Anyway, in principle we both agreed to meet up next weekend, but here’s where I don’t know what to do. I could A) Do a dinner or B) Just have us meet at the bars again or C) Both. The fact we hooked up and decided to meet again leaves me wondering whether I should treat it as a potential relationship (note the age gap) or if we just are gonna be FWBs. Thoughts?",seduction
Direct Sexual Intent's Relationship to Sexual Tension,"I've been studying socialization, pick-up, and seduction for a long time now, using books and videos, and of course in real life.   There seems to be one particular point that different authors and speakers seem to disagree on:

&amp;#x200B;

At least in early stages of seduction, like when you meet a girl and are talking for a little while (and no one else is around or cares) js blatant sexual intent (e.g. saying something like ""Let's spend the night together"" or ""I wanna hit that sweet booty"" or whatever else)  a good idea or does it kill the sexual tension and turn off the woman?

&amp;#x200B;

I'm still trying to really master the whole ""sexual tension"" thing, including ""push/pull"" and all that and then I read ""Mode One"" the other day (among some youtube videos and such)...

&amp;#x200B;

There really seem to be two schools of thought on this...or am I just not understanding something?

&amp;#x200B;

(by the way, I'm a guy despite my username, as you probably guessed....lol)",seduction
How Field Reports Can Help Cure Your Approach Anxiety,"I swear most people used to write field reports back in the early days of pick-up. These days it seems like a lost art.

Every time I head out into the field, I write down three things that went well and three things I could have done better.

This helps you understand your sticking points, so you know what to read up on and improve upon next time.

**IT CAN ALSO EMBARRASS YOU OUT OF YOUR APPROACH ANXIETY.**

**Scenario A:** You don't write field reports. You see a hottie during solo daygame. You pussy out. You feel bad but eventually forget about it. No-one knew you pussied out, so no emotional leverage to change. Next day, the same thing happens.

**Scenario B:** You commit to writing daily field reports. You pussy out on the hottie. You have to relive that shame when you write it down later. There's also the possibility someone somehow reads that. The next day, when the hottie walks by, you don't want to write down how pathetic you were again. It's EMBARRASSING. So you do the damn approach. Now you have something positive to write about yourself later...

The potential cure for AA is the main benefit of field reports, but it's one that I've experienced yet not heard anyone else mention.

Another benefit I love is that it helps boost your 'make it epic' frame. You want to push your sets further just so you have something more interesting to write about.

Try it the next 5 times you hit the field and see if you experience the benefits... 

***I co-launched a Telegram group for men who want to become amazing with women. Hundreds of guys sharing advice and getting tips on their sticking points (Some of us, including me, share field reports too) Drop me a PM with your Telegram handle if you want to join.*** ",seduction
Building a good Instagram profile,Anyone know good sources for building a good profile on instagram? ,seduction
(Free kindle book) 101 powerful habits proven to boost your life! Improve yourself for more success in seduction.,,seduction
Hooked up... now what?,"So I was swiping through tinder and saw a girl who caught my eye. Checked he profile and it had her insta on it. Sent her a dm and we hit it off. Sometime later we meet up to hang out. She's not local to the area and is living downtown for school. We have a couple of drinks, go out for some fun, head back to her place and chill for a bit. She starts making out with me for a while and tries taking off my shirt. And I pause and say I put on some weight and she says it's cool then. We make out more then she says she's tired. I missed the last subway back so she says I can crash and I do. Couple minutes later I make my way to her and then it starts. I'm still a couple beers deep and it's late. We fuck for a bit on her bed and I'm pretty much falling off of it cause it's so small. I'm feeling not that hard and I say I'm not used to condoms (which I'm not) and she lets me go raw. She was very vocal throughout and as I was hitting it I felt water. I'm assuming she climaxed/squirted a bit?? I pull out and realize it's not feeling the same since it feels watery now and I'm not staying hard. So I say it's all good and ask her if she was. She said she came so she's good and felt bad I didn't get to go. We take turns in the washroom say goodnight and that's it. Woke up in the AM hugged and then cut. 

Now this is the part. She msgs me to make sure I got home alright and everything as a courtesy. I ask the same thing back, but add on it was cool hanging out last night blah blah blah. And she hit me with oh yeah I'm all gooooood 😊. 

That threw me off. At the time I was like okay.. is she not going to respond to the second part of my statement and what not? So I just liked the message and that was that. 

So what now. 

Every hook up prior it was with someone a little older than me so they hit me up asap and wanted to chill again. And tbh I usually flop. Now that this has happened especially after maker her cum on the first try (never happened to me before) she doesn't hit me up again? 

It's only been a couple of days, but I was dying after the first day just to see what was up but left it.

Any input? Thanks ",seduction
How to deal with An 'Alpha' douche Trying To steal your Girl - The AMOG,,seduction
Looking for tips in opening - i work in customer service at my uni,"Hey all,

I work at a store at my university in customer service and i usually have people in my age group ask me for help or i cash them out. I was hoping you guys could help me provide some insight on opening in a situation like this, getting a number or a date
",seduction
31 yr old going out alone on student night,"Im a 31 yr old who likes to go out alone on students nite 
Should I lie to 18 try old girls about my age ?
",seduction
What do do if girl has boyfriend but still interested in you?,"Hey,

Any general advice on what to do in situations where you know the girl has a boyfriend but she still shows clear signs of interest towards you?",seduction
Should I meet a girl twice in the same week for dates if she has suggested it?,"So I’ve went out on 2 dates with a girl. We’re both in our mid 20s and pretty into each other at the moment. Things are going good. It’s early days but I’ve got a good feeling about it for once and I don’t want to mess it up, having been single now for a few years and sick of dating and sleeping around. 

So, I’m usually very cautious and an over thinker. She said she wanted to go to this cool cinema this weekend to see A Star Is Born. I said we could go to the movies anytime, why not do something active during the day like a hike then maybe the film after...
I’m a terrible texter and I typically don’t give girls much attention even when they’re into me. But it’s been different with her. I’d say we’ve texted almost every day for the last month. Which is completely abnormal for me. Should I just go with it? It just seems like it will all fizzle out is what I’m afraid of. 

So she hit me back right away saying, I can’t do Saturday I’m heading out with friends. How about movies Friday and a hike Sunday? I said yep sure that sounds great. But I joked with her about wanting to see me twice in one weekend as if it was a big deal, and I’d have to get back to her. But I did say yeah. 

Can you help me out, am I over thinking this and complicating it way too much? She’s beautiful, I would say maybe slightly out of my league. And a really great girl. We’ve been texting and voice noting each other on WhatsApp a lot since we met in the city about a month ago as I said previously. I picked her up at her house both times. 

For the 3rd time of meeting though is it too soon to meet up twice in one weekend? I just have this gut feeling that that’s wrong. I should resist and say no how about just either Friday or Sunday. Will she respect me more for it in the long run? Is there any down side to me saying no? I like her but I don’t want to appear too keen or showing that I’ll come whenever she asks if you get me. Being too available? 

It’s not like I’m idle. I could be hanging out with my own friends on Friday or going to a football game. Then traveling up to my hometown to see my folks on Sunday. But those are things I do most weekends. 

Help please!

Thanks.",seduction
Meeting up with this girl in some days,"Hey i would like some advice.

&amp;#x200B;

This weekend i might meet up with a friend of mine, she is a girl and I'm a guy. We have hung 1 time before, but it was at a public place and we didn't really talk that much.

&amp;#x200B;

What am i gonna do when i meet her? Hug her, hand shake, say ""hey""?

&amp;#x200B;

Im not looking to get into a relationship yet, i would like to get to know her better but i dont want to friend zone myself.

&amp;#x200B;

Questions?

Any tips what we could do together?

How to start and keep a conversation going and interesting?

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
Approaching,"I have an issue where now i can approach at a bar or during the night time. But, i cannot for the life of me approach during the day. Has anyone had this issue?",seduction
What to talk about with girls that have literally no interests,"This girl I went out literally all of her interests were shisha and hanging out with friends. There was a lot of quiet moments, not as much as there would have been a few months ago so I'm progressing.

I'm used to leaving the girl to talk about herself but she literally has no life other than that to talk. She didn't ask much about me either as there's plenty to talk of but I didn't want to seem like a jackass lol. 

How do I make her talk about anything, or even how do I peak her interest in me so she asks me questions at least. 

She told her friend the date was boring, and it was I was bored as hell too. But I've noticed it's like that with younger girls.


I would be thankful for help to make the date not boring, as in conversation part. How do I make her just talk about any bs so I can listen or make her interested in me. Like say something which hooks her and she starts asking me for more and more.

I was driving fast as I could just so we spend less time together lol. ",seduction
Feeling like shit because I could barely approach girls,"I mean I can say hi but when I went up to talk to them I'd just back off like in five seconds.


Kinda fucks with my self confidence",seduction
Wingman in Hongkong,"yo guys, Im looking for a regular wing in Hong Kong to go out with, both during day and night. I have some experience approaching, so shoot me a pm if any of you are in the area!",seduction
"Would you have responded differently, if so, how?","Basically, was getting very sexual with a girl on the dance floor in a nightclub. When taking breaks from kissing etc. I said ""I like your earrings.""

She responded with ""You're just saying that to get in my pants""

Without hesitation, I lean in and say ""If I was wanting to get into your pants... I wouldn't be saying stuff about your earrings...""

She says ""what would you say then?""

With a cheeky look in my eye, ""I'd probably say something about your really nice bum"" and then I squeezed her ass. 

She smiled, giggled and then we made out. 

I've never done something as forward as this with a girl I had just met before, especially in front of all her friends. Hence why I'm asking for your opinions.
",seduction
"Yo reddit seducers, how do you manage work-life and seduction ?","I would like to know how frequently you go out to meet women in a week or month and how many hours do you work a week?  does anyone here work up to 9 hours a day and if you do, how do you find time for seduction and how many days a week do you game ?

Ltrd: How do I work 9 hours a day and still pick up women daily",seduction
First Date Ended Gross,"So I met up with this girl on Tinder and the date itself was fun and great but when it came to sex I left her feeling gross. She’s a virgin and apparently all of her previous experience was bad so I was glad the actual going out part was good. 

Fast forward, we got more intimate and she wants to have sex. The bad part is that we didn’t have a place of our own that was free so I said fuck it let’s just do it in the car. So I try my best to find the most secluded area and mind you, it was 12am so not a lot of people around. We’re getting into it and I stop because I see a car passing by and I think the guy sees what’s going on. I felt creeped out so I decided that we should stop and just find a better place. At this point I just wanted to go home, I didn’t want to feel that a good date should have to end in sex, especially since it’s the first.

So I said let’s just go home, we could hangout another time. Throughout the car ride she was mostly quiet so asked her what was up. She said  sorry a lot for wasting my time and said she felt gross. I asked her why because it was great that we got to know each other and it was positive. She said she didn’t know why but I think she felt embarrassed or slutty that she almost had sex on the first date. 

I felt kind of bad that she was left feeling that way but I did my best to keep the mood up. If you guys know what’s going on feel free to share because if I meet a girl that I want to give my best at, feeling gross is something I would hate to experience again. I actually felt what she was feeling and it’s pretty terrible.",seduction
Best content I've seen on how to express excitement without coming off as needy,,seduction
Think of this as a field report that needs grading from someone with experience. I'm too young (18) and naïve too decipher everything in life. I know this is really long so I really appreciate your time to help me improve.,"Hi thanks for taking the time to read this, this isn't me in trouble or searching for advice or anything rather than a way for me to improve by learning your valuable opinion. Now lets get started:

So basically, I've been learning PUA stuff from 2 years ago and I used them in my senior year, it worked well and got me laid a couple of times. But since I moved to Uni I've become fully aware that these methods aren't going to work all the time for me and hence I've been mixing them with my natural game and confidence. I hooked up with one chick in my first week but never spoke to her after. I'm kind of bored from hook-ups and one night stand so I'm looking for a slightly long-term partner.

I met this girl two weeks ago in our regular club, and we had some small talk and she seemed quite funny. For example, she asked me if I'm still throwing drinks on girls in that party (because I sprayed some drinks in the air and it soaked some chicks in my friend group and they got pissed, she wasn't with them btw) so I asked her how she known I did that and she was like they've been complaining about it for like 30 mins, so I said ""Bullshit, they probably enjoyed it."" and she was like ""yeah I'd be like"" and she stuck her tongue out as if she's being sprayed herself.  She then told me her name but I instantly forgot about it, we both went dancing with our own friends but throughout the party she'd wave at me whenever she saw me.

Fast forward the next week at the same club, I've already planned that if I see her again I'm going to hit on her. And right when she saw me she friendly kissed me and was like ""Hey beer sprayer."" We had some more small talk then we went dancing, I danced with her for like 3 mins then went to my friends. I later bumped into her and without realising I was running DHVs on her, they were all true stories that I never told in DHV style before but it just happened that we started talking about my favourite drink and ended up talking about my foreskin. Her friends came looking for her and she introduced me to them, and when I acted like I forgot my name, and she was like ""dude you can't be that drunk."" And I was like let me if I'm actually that drunk and try to remember where you're from, and she was like ""dude I'm blond where do you think I'm from."" and I was like ""Well yeah you're blond, you're kinda hot, so you must be from..."" So she giggled, we spoke for a bit more and then we both went with our respective friends. Once we were leaving I started another conversation about if she's going to some other party but she was like I gotta go home, but we kept talking and then she grabbed my hand pulled me away to continue the conversation while she walks home. Keep in mind she was pretty comfortable touching me from the beginning so kino wasn't a problem.

**So then I said: ""I feel a bit disappointed.""**

**She: ""Why?""**

**I: ""Cause I was planning to hit on you tonight but I didn't do much.""**

**She: ""Well you did call me pretty earlier so that was good enough.""**

**I: ""Yeah, but I was planning to level up a bit more, I mean I told my friend about that girl I met last week and she was hilarious so I was gonna hit on her tonight.""**

**She: ""Is that me or some other girl?""**

**I: ""Nah its you.""**

**She: ""Well I kind of have a boyfriend even though we are in the break up phase right now.""**

**I: ""So what?""**

**She: ""HAHA 'So what?' I like that.""**

**I: ""I mean you guys will probably be done next week so when you sort your shit out you know where to find me.""**

**She: ""Well that makes you second in line cause some guy in my class said he'd wait for me until I'm single again.""**

**I: ""You mean I'm first in line and there's some guy in your class giving me competition.""**

**She: ""Yeah but I don't understand why you two would do that, I mean I only spoke to you a bit and you're hitting on me.""**

**I: ""Well you have humour, and all the other chicks around me are basic bitches, could get them for a one-night stand, but that's as far as I'd go with them.""**

**She: ""Well I do make good jokes so I give you that. You do know that one of your chick friends has a modelling contract right.""**

**I: ""I don't really care she sounds so boring.""**

More talk about chicks in my friend group...

&amp;#x200B;

**She: "" You know I haven't kissed anyone since the beginning of the year.""**

**I: ""So where is your boyfriend isn't he here in \*\*\*\*\*.""**

**She: ""No he's in \*\*\*\*\*\*.""**

**I: ""I don't wanna offend you, or make you think that I'm just saying that cause I'm hitting on you but that sounds so stupid.""**

**She: ""Hmmmm, I'm still not over that offending part.""**

**I: ""No I mean long distance relationships never work.""**

**She: ""Yeah that's why I'm breaking up with him.""**

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

More talk, personal stories and a couple of natural DHVs...

&amp;#x200B;

fast forward about 20 mins and after 2 seconds of silence.

&amp;#x200B;

**She: ""I hope you didn't lose your friends, I got to go home now so I dont know if I can carry you home."" (She wasn't sure how drunk I was.)**

**I: ""Ah, don't worry I'm not drunk, I was just a bit high earlier but its worn of. But, Im not done with you yet so dont run away.""**

**She: ""What's up?""**

**I: ""We got a lot more to talk about and I don't think I'll see you in campus.""**

**She: ""Well you can find me in this club every weekend.""**

**I: ""Well I dont always have time to come to this club every weekend for you. I gotta find some other way to contact you.""**

**She: ""And where do you wanna take that?""**

**I: ""I don't know, what can you give me?""**

**She: ""You can have my number or Instagram or-.""**

**I: ""I'll have all of those thank you.""**

**She: ""That's all I have anyway.""**

&amp;#x200B;

She puts her number on my phone, than follows herself from my insta.

&amp;#x200B;

**I: ""You better follow me back though.""**

**She: ""Duhhh, I'm not that type of bitch.""**

**I: ""I kinda figured that so I hope you dont disappoint.""**

We hug bye then I go to some other party as she goes home.

I decided to text her the next day.

*I: ""Aliens are coming to abduct all the good looking sexy ass people tonight! Wear your glasses and you'll be fine, but I'm just texting to say my goodbyes."" - 3:06PM*

*She: ""No worries, I'm wearing them right now 👌."" -5:47PM*

*I: ""I guess this won't work after all. Things would probably be really difficult between us if I'm gonna be stuck in some vial in an alien spaceship. But anyway, how's my dorkie new friend doing?"" -9:56PM*

*She: ""I'm good thanks! How are you?"" -10:22PM*

*I: ""My Liver still works, so I guess I'm fine. You promised to follow back yesterday but you never did, I guess you're that type of bitch after all. 😏"" -11:00PM*

***\*She follows me back on insta\****

*She: ""Guess so"" -11:26PM*

I decided to stop texting there and I went to sleep.

Despite me stating otherwise, I will be going to the club this weekend, so its likely that I'll bump into her. I'd so much appreciate you guys tell me where I went right and where I went wrong.

Thanks you so much in advance.

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
When you’re ready come and get it 👅,,seduction
25 Male constant rejection,"I'm a 25 year old student who had only one short relationship recently and even there while breaking up she said something like ""I only THOUGHT I like you"". Otherwise I have to deal with constant rejection, which is causing more and more frustration, depression and loneliness. recently I go rejected again and the way it happened caused me to get into the depressed state again. First she said no to a hangout, than we went to club with friends, danced together and kissed, she said yes to a date but acted distant during the week so I asked her again after we hung out with some friends, she said yes, but a few days after that she called it off and this totally destroyed me, to the point where I started to have suicidal thoughts, as it was the first time something like this happened. 

I don't really have a problem with approaching women, but my behaviour can be sometimes quite weird (for example when I'm with a girl friend in a club I want to dance or drink with her, even though I don't have any ulterior motives) and apparently quite creepy, as when I truly like the girl I tend to get quite obsessive.

Also while my face isn't the ugliest, I'm a huge nerd and so I don't exercise much at all (tried to go to gym last year, but it was mostly extremely boring).

Loneliness (either the no girlfriend or no real friends type) scarred me quite a bit already and I want to destroy this feeling as soon as possible so I can finally try some long term relationship and/or focus on other parts of my life and so I've decided to write this and recieve some helpful tips or talk with some anonymous people abut what I want to do.",seduction
Daygame as a Latino/Black in the US,"Hi guys,

tl;dr: In the US, specifically in NY, is there something I should do in my first seconds of approaching white girls as a Latino? 

&amp;#x200B;

Background: I've done a lot of approaches and most don't go past the opener. I look heavily like a latino and I like white girls in their 20s. I always go direct, mostly stopping girls while they walk.

Thinking about it, I remembered that a wing, who is black, told me that for him it makes a big difference to hold his hands like a ""good boy"" (as in [this picture](http://www.study-body-language.com/images/173xNxfig-leaf-posture.jpg.pagespeed.ic.0XhGzIUcHj.jpg)) while delivering his opener. In that moment I didn't pay attention because of all the ""alpha male posture"" they always recommend.

&amp;#x200B;

It's a definite possibility that this is bullshit and the problem is just me, but I figured there could be something. 

&amp;#x200B;

To summarise, any body language techniques that would increase my chances of buying the first few seconds of girls' attention?

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
How do you make eye contact when you're dancing with a girl in a rave at a club without staring/looking creepy,,seduction
"In search of wing man on Long Island, NY to befriend to learn together, fail and better each other","Hello my name is B-Rod and I’m 22 living on Long Island, NY and I recently read The Game by Neil Strauss. Assuming close to all of you have done so as well, I come here searching. I’ve been doing a lot of research on what the community has come to today and it doesn’t seem to be anywhere close to what it once was when it was hot and new. That hasn’t stopped me from craving to have these skills hardwired into me, it’s only got me wondering... Where are y’all at?! I think there is a huge huge HUGE advantage that I can take of it being the rarity of the ability to have a normal conversation. Majority of young adults are very socially awkward, so addicted to their phones they forget or simply don’t know how to have a human interaction, let alone move the emotions of a woman! I don’t feel the need to tell much about myself, mainly just my goals from this newly found obsession. 
-Have the confidence to walk up to any girl, remain calm, not choke!
-Be smooth knowing what to say and when to say it to get the conversation where you want it to go.
-Have the ability to control large sets 
-Experiment. Fail. Learn
-Meet new like minded people, fun people. PEOPLE!
-Date a lot
-Become a more complete person

I wouldn’t say that I’m halfway to achieving any of these goals at the moment. Yes these are broad, I keep forgetting that all of us here hopefully feel just about the same way. If not all I need is one AFC like me!:) 

I’ve been off social media for a month now and since Long Island dies post summer time, I’ve felt nothing but lonely. All my friends are lame and don’t do anything, but smoke weed. Turns out though, weeds my only friend. I don’t have an off button, i’m non stop from waking up to going to sleep, I’m always doing my own thing. I don’t want to sit inside and watch netflix or play fortnite, sorry. I’ll be at work or the mall, gym, yoga class looking for girls. I see all these girls have some eye contact here and there, small convos here and there, I know I could be drowning in pussy but i’m just not that talented yet. Gotta learn from the best, gotta learn the new techniques, gotta develop my own game, gotta become an artist. 

Anyone who lives on Long Island, NY or even if you’re in one of the Burroughs, reach out. If you’ve been sarging, I’d love to come out and shadow learn anything i can under a wing. If you haven’t at all i’d love to meet up, hangout talk strategies and start practicing out in the field together. Everything is better with friends!

B-Rod

",seduction
Girl told me I need to be more of a 'jackass',"Well, the other day I met a girl with which we met in a friendly way. 

We were kinda hitting it off, I liked her, she liked me and was kinda flirty, grabbing my arm a lot in the bar when we were sitting opposite to each other, she started some sexual topics, etc. I also grabbed her arm and held her for some time and she didn't mind it, but that's pretty much it.

At the end she was complaining place where she's staying is kinda far away, therefore she agreed when I proposed that she stays at my place. When we got to my place I said she can take my camping mat and sleep on it or with me in bed, which is quite large. She picked mat and I was not opposing (we met over website where people tend to be a bit allergic if you use it for dating/hooking up purposes, therefore I was a bit shy).
Anyway, she left in morning. After that I texted her again and since we won't see each other again I was kinda direct, asking her why she didn't want to get more serious previous night.

That's the reply I got: https://imgur.com/a/Ve1tzYi

What does she mean with being jackass? Be more confident and sure what I want?

Similar situations happened already 4 times lately and I am getting kinda frustrated with it. 

How be more direct with girls which flirt with you? How to make step forward? Can someone give me some concrete examples.

Please don't rip me apart from it. This is one of the light fuck ups, others were even worse, and it's time for me to take action!",seduction
Going on a Trip with 20 girls. (Question),"Okay, so I've been on the seddit for a long time now and I've learned a lot from here. I'm also following Rsdmax for more than a year now, so I know a lot of things about seduction. 

So now I'm going on a trip with 15+ girls in my college, on a hill station. I know 4-5 girls but I don't know anything about others and there are only 5-6 guys on the trip including me. 

So I want some helpful advice and tips that can help me leave a good impression on girls and make the best out of this situation. Also there are high chances of something happening. Lol

Thank you. ",seduction
5 questions I ask almost every girl when I'm at the bar or out and about,"Although no two conversations are exactly alike I find that I end up asking the same questions when I meet a girl at a bar or when I’m out and about. I believe these, especially the last two, are necessary if you are looking to hook up with or at least make progress with a girl. You've probably used these in some way shape or form before.

The first three are just basic small talk questions that you probably already know and use but are good to default to and use to talk about something more interesting. 

**Who are you?**

* My opening line is always different but if I don’t have anything to say I’ll just introduce myself and after this happens now we are having a conversation and we can transition into building some rapport

**Where are you from?**

* The simplest and most basic question to ask. It’s a good question because everyone has an answer for it and there is always a follow up question.

* “I was born in X” ok cool “how did you end up here”

* Now you know a little bit more about your story and it is slowly moving from small talk into an engaging and interesting conversation that you can form a connection with someone with

**What do you do?**

* Another small talk question that you can branch out to and learn more about them

* A good follow up question is how did you get into that?

* This can also give me a good idea if it makes sense to pursue them. If she’s in Med School probably not a good idea

**Who are you here with?**

* This is an important logistical question. Too often my students tell me that the friend “came out of nowhere and cockblocked me.” Well if you had asked then you would have known that the friend was going to come, and you could have handled it better

* This will also let you know if she’s dating a dude in the group

* Ask this question after she’s gotten a little comfortable with you

**What are you up to tonight?**

* The most important logistical question let’s you know what her plan is for the night or the day.

* Is she visiting? Is she crashing with a friend? Does she have to wake up early? Is she out celebrating her husband’s birthday? All these are important issues you can have answered with his question. I try and ask this as quickly as I can after building some comfort or as soon as possible.

* Find a solution to any issues that come up to help you both win

* A lot of situations can be worked with so that you both can hang out and win but if you find out about an issue too late, like she has to leave with her friends early, then it may be impossible to handle by that point. 

Pretty basic and I usually ask at least 3 of these questions when I am talking to a girl I like. If you can’t think of what to say using these as a default can be helpful given that they are simple and normal.

If you found this helpful you might like my [YouTube channel](https://www.youtube.com/c/TheSingleGuy)
",seduction
How hard should I try?,"First off, I’m generalizing, I know all females don’t think like this, but most of my attempts of trying to get a date has failed (I’m only 18 so all hope isn’t lost but I’ve never had a date), but It’s not because I’m ugly or anything. I really want to know what the appropriate level of trying should be. Females tell me they want a guy to try as hard as possible but I notice that the girls I don’t like and pay the least attention to try to get with me the most.",seduction
What I have learned about idealizing a girl.,"English is not my primary language, so excuse me for gross mistakes.

I am a male

A couple weeks ago I meet a girl in a friends party, we talked all night, but not much seduction happened, only simple conversation knowing each other.

We exchanged numbers and begin to talk via messages, here the shit begins. texting was not flowing nearly as well as personal conversation did, I struggled with maintaining interesting conversation topics and she takes to long to reply to most of my messages.

We discovered that both of us was going to a big music festival that was occurring on the next week, so we agreed to meet each other there.

During the week before the festival, no much texting occurred, but I was completely in love, fantasizing about her, things like ""I want a girl like her to be my girlfriend"", ""oneitis"", and that fucked me up.

On the first day of the festival, I couldn't find her, but I was not searching for her either. On this day I kissed 6 girls, more than I had kissed in my life before that day.

On the second day, one of my friends that were with me at the festival found her and called me, she was with a friend, I asked with she would like to hang out with me, and she said that she was with her friend, so I let them alone.

On the third day we met once again, so I and my friends joined she and her friends, we talked a little bit and I asked her to get a drink with me, she accepted.  As we were going get a drink she grabbed my hand and guided me til the bar, I was in shock, I tried to kiss her but gave up in the last second. We grabbed a beer and returned to friends location. We returned to home cause this festival was divided into 2 parts, one on the day, one at night, and the day part was ending.

I was furious with my self(my friends too) because I missed a good chance to kiss the girl that I wanted.

here I made some bad decisions:

1-Drink a lot

2-Call her cell phone, multiple times.

So, later that day we met up again, this time I was alone( left my friend to go after her), but I was too drunk and lost her like 10 minutes after, and couldn't find her anymore.

On the last day of the festival, I was desperate, I had lost 2 chances, and I let my despair govern me. I called her a lot to know where she was to met her, she said where she was, then I faced defeat: she was with another guy. She didn't saw me, and I left to go with my friend for the rest of the last day.

now she barely responds to my messages. I probably lost my chances with her.

Here some insights that this experience thaugh me:

1-Alcohol can fuck you badly:

I lost one of my chances with this girl because I was drunk af. If I was not drunk I could probably kiss her later that day.

2-Don´t be desperate, ever:

desperation only serves to fuck your chances with the girl. When I called her multiple times the only thing that I showed to her was that I was desperate for her, and girls don´t like needy guys.

3-Don´t idealize a girl:

Because this girl was my ""oneitis"", I couldn't have the balls to kiss her, I was too afraid to make a move. the other girls that I had kissed were a lot easier.

So, the festival is over, and my chances with this girl probably are too, I will keep trying for a bit, because, honestly I haven't given up on her yet. But I know that my odds are low.

Later I will write about how my friends helped me to kiss 6 girls at this festival, and what I have learned from that.",seduction
Have any of you pros noticed a correlation between how much a girl shit tests and the quality of her character/personality?,,seduction
My Daygame Experience So Far. Statistics and Lessons,"**TLDR**

The overall summary of my experience so far, is that daygame is transformative. If you can manage just 30 approaches a week (realistically, not that many at all) daygame brings improvements not just in your dating and sex life, but in all other aspects of your social life. Not needing that girl at work or that one girl in your hobby really makes socialising so much easier, as you can just focus on what you enjoy rather than chasing a girl who has inflated sexual market value from being the only girl in the room.

There is no better teacher than experience, and the feedback you get from girls in daygame really does apply to almost all aspects of your life. I joined Seddit a long time ago, and I was inspired by TofuTofu's posts. I didn't really know how to take action, and have actually found Seddit to be more theoretical than practical in recent years. I am hoping that people will be inspired by the early stages of my journey and will join me in growing their skills with women.

Ok, now onto the detail.

&amp;nbsp;

#**Background**

I am 26, male, from England but I live in Berlin. I am 5’5 (165cm), but I have a pretty good body from 8 years of intense rock climbing.

I lost my virginity at 18 to a not very beautiful girl while absolutely hammered at a friend’s party. 8 years later (until the start of summer this year) and I had had sex with 16 girls, so 2 new girls a year. Almost all of these were while travelling where I could abuse my English accent and blue eyes, but the girls in England tended to be while very drunk at a party. From recent conversations I actually think this is above average, but I was still very very unsatisfied with my dating and sex life. I would chase any girl that was attractive and who happened to fall into my life somehow, and it was having a massive negative effect on my self-esteem. Tinder proved a dead end as I have met up with maybe 4 girls with it EVER, and all were much less attractive in person than on the app. I have since deleted it and been much happier.

I started dedicated solo daygaming in August 2018 after watching a lot of Tom Torero’s videos and buying his textbook. I really recommend his content, and I’m incredibly thankful for what he does.

&amp;nbsp;

#**Stats**

#####**Approaches - 183**
This actually averages out to ~25 a week, which is well below my original target of 50. Life gets in the way a little, but any action is better than none. I have also noticed that I suffer from low self-esteem after I have some success which kills my motivation. I don’t really understand this, but I’ll look into it a bit more.

#####**Numbers - 51** 
**Numbers that replied at all - 34**

The lesson from this is to not get too attached to any one number. Also, the first 50 sets I did I had an amazing ratio of approaching to numbers, but almost all of them would lead nowhere (as you will see with my number of dates). Essentially, I wasn’t qualifying the girls (the stage before closing in the london daygame model), and I was just seen as a friendly guy who she had a nice chat with in the street. Since adding “What do you like?” or “what are you good at?” or just challenging a statement she makes (Her - I really like Berlin, Me - Why?) I have had a much higher number to date ratio.

#####**Instant dates - 3**
These were actually all pretty wild, with me really pushing to get the girl back to my apartment. Two of them were burnt out from me pulling too hard, and one turned into a wonderful 3 day relationship before she flew back to New York.

#####**Normal Dates - 5**
As I said, the ratio of numbers to dates looks like it is around 1 in 10, but in reality I think it is probably closer to 1 in 5 since I changed my approach. My numbers are still far too small to draw too many conclusions though. I keep my dates pretty similar, and it has worked out well (as you will see in the next section). Below is my basic date structure, but actually it has only worked as planned once.

We meet at the metro station (&lt; 5 mins from my house) and walk to a nearby bar. We have a drink there and get the chit-chat out of the way. I keep it very light and just have a nice time getting to know the girl. We then finish our drinks and walk to a second bar that also in the local area. The second bar to is very “cool” and has a great atmosphere of young people enjoying themselves (it is also a little more of a sexual vibe). Ideally we sit on the sofa together, but if there is no space then we just take a table and sit very close. After a drink here, I offer the plan of having a glass of wine at mine before I have to get to sleep before work the next day. Once at mine we pour some wine and relax in the kitchen (of my shared flat) before I suggest looking at some photos on my laptop. We move to the bedroom and look at photos before making out and taking our clothes off.

#####**Lays** - 3
These girls were 22, 22, and 20. Two had sex with me on the first date, the other on the second. All of them are much better looking than me, and all are taller than me (one significantly so). After sex we would lie together and talk and joke around (and I also ask what they enjoy in sex, for future reference). There was no indication of any sort that they wanted a relationship, and my impression was that actually, I was the one slowing things down. 

The two that I only had a first date both had the date plan go wrong at some point. After leaving the first bar I told the first girl that we were going to another bar, and she replied saying that it was getting late. I offered that we went to mine instead and she said “that’s fine, as long as you are not expecting anything, as then I would have to disappoint you”. I pushed for us to go to the second bar (to mistakenly try to build things up a bit more) and she told me that actually, we should just go to mine. Half a glass of wine at mine later and we were undressing each other. She told me that we wouldn’t have sex as she didn’t have sex on the first date, but then maybe 45 mins to an hour later she said “we can only have sex if you let me call you daddy”. I reluctantly obliged (it’s pretty weird, to be honest) and we had a wild time.

The second time the date model went wrong was when the second bar was crazily packed. Again (with the reference experience from the first time things didn’t go to plan) I suggested wine at mine. I was surprised when she said yes, and we relaxed with my housemates and chatted for an hour or so. I thought I had messed up by hanging out with my friends for too long, but again when I offered to show her some photos on my laptop she said yes and we went and undressed each other. My assumption was that she was a very reserved and inexperienced girl, but I was actually very wrong. I think I get almost all of these assumptions wrong actually.

&amp;nbsp;

#**Obvious Lessons Learnt**

#####**Fashion**

I have never been interested in dressing well until I started daygame. I have two very similar outfits that achieve remarkably different results. If I wear a tight grey t-shirt with blue jeans and black trainers, I do very poorly on the street. If I wear the same t-shirt in black and the jeans in grey but with leather boots, I do much better. It is worth mentioning that the boots add quite a bit of height, and that all the clothes I wear are TIGHT (again as I am in pretty good shape). My suggestion would be to wear simple clothing that is dark and tight. Think of the archetypal ""bad boy"" in TV and film and emulate him. This really helps put you in the ""guy to have sex with"" box rather than ""guy I might potentially date"" box.

#####**Volume**

Shit happens between meeting a girl on the street and meeting them again. A “flake” can be nothing more than just bad luck. I’ve had girls cancel due to family sickness, exams, injury, laziness etc., and this would suck if I wasn’t out meeting dozens of beautiful women each week. Also, it takes a while to get the daygame model down, and I am still making leaps and bounds in my abilities (~200 approaches is absolutely nothing). Learning how much to flirt and how direct to be can only be done if you are getting a huge amount of volume. With the stats I have at the moment, I need to approach 60 women until I have sex. If you are not doing daygame, how long would it take for you to meet in person 60 women that you find sexually attractive? I’ve been on 5 or 6 tinder dates ever, and they were all very very unsatisfactory. The girls I have slept with in the last month have been young, beautiful, and only after a good time.

#####**Women want and love sex**

This is very obvious, but sex is fun. Sometimes women are just horny and want to meet a cool, non-judgemental guy to have a good time with. I think that hooking up with girls is more about not being an idiot than actually being a cool guy. Having the london daygame model and the date model really help remove a lot of the bad decisions I would make and let me just relax and act normally. The girls were actually pretty keen to move from the bar to my house, from the kitchen to my bedroom, and to take their clothes off. I realise I’ve been so judgemental about women enjoying sex that I have made myself a very unappealing partner. Also, for women, sex doesn’t mean a relationship. These realisations are making my game so much tighter and calmer. When I speak to a girl on the street now I am trying to project the vibe that we could hook up and be friends without any judgement or commitment.

#####**Daygame improves general success with women**

In this time frame I also had a nightgame lay. I was at a techno club, and literally used my normal daygame routine on a woman (she was 31) that was waiting for the toilet. I took her number but she didn’t reply for a few weeks. When she did reply she told me that she was leaving Berlin and moving back to France (even though she was from Taiwan) at the end of the week, so could only meet on the Wednesday. We met up and went to a bar across the road from her house. Things were sexual and fun and we were drinking a lot (I normally have 2 drinks in bars and then maybe one in my house when dating, but she was drinking very fast and we got through 3 bottles of wine in the bar). When we were kissing she told me that we couldn’t go to hers as her housemates are very traditional. She told me that she was working the next day so couldn’t go to mine. Riding on my new-found confidence, I told her to “come with me” and we went to the toilet together. The women’s toilet was a big room with a lock on the door, so I pulled her in there. She stated “you want to fuck me” and I was undoing my belt and pulling my jeans down, to which I said “yes” and we took our clothes off and had sex against the sink.

I’ve met numerous women in my social circle and through my hobbies. I am far more confident in showing my attraction and leading the interactions. Daygame really is transformative.

&amp;nbsp;

#**Less obvious lessons learnt**

#####**I have no idea what female attraction looks like**

The whole time I am speaking with women on the street or going on dates, I am looking for the classic IOIs. Most of the time I don’t see any, and this is really really exciting for me. My belief about this is that women are much better at hiding their attraction, and so maybe any girl I interact with is sexually interested in me. It is my job to find out and to put us both in a place where we can relax together and act on our attraction. I shouldn’t wait for a sign, I should just push the interaction forward and see where it can go.

#####**Seduction (or sexual market value) is independent from other skills**

I used to lean on my rock climbing and yoga abilities very heavily when it comes to meeting women. I used to think that only women who did rock climbing could be interested in me, as this is something they were interested in that I was good at. Since starting daygame I have found that actually no one cares about hobbies that you do that they don’t also do, and that it really doesn’t matter. None of the girls I have been with recently have done climbing or yoga, and we didn’t speak about either on the dates. Instead, it seems that there is a whole other variable of “attractiveness” that is the only thing that is important. I really can’t say that I understand anything more than that, but it is very exciting that I don’t have to be reliant on dating girls that do the same hobbies as me. I have noticed that the less I am trying to impress girls, the better I do.

#####**Men are much more judgemental than women**

When I talk about daygame to people. Women tend to be excited about it, and really interested in hearing more. They want to know what I am saying on the street, what the girls are like, what the dates are like, how the sex is, and what happens afterwards. Men, on the other hand, act very very strangely. They tend to laugh at me and mock me for needing to speak to girls on the street instead of just meeting them in my life normally. Most of the guys are actually very unsatisfied with their dating lives, and are likely just intimidated by the idea that the only thing holding them back from having the sex lives they want is their fear. I should add that this is just my assumption. Perhaps it really is ridiculous that I need to speak to women on the street to have sex.

&amp;nbsp;

#**Conclusion**

I am still very much at the beginning of my daygame career, but I am starting to how everything fits together, and I am getting better results than every before. I have had more new sexual partners in the last 3 weeks than I had in the previous two years. I really love to talk about daygame and share my experiences, but as most men act so strangely when they hear about it, I have to share this new passion of mine here.
",seduction
Hey virgins. Let go of your shame.,"Seriously this is such a prevalent concern on here it's not even funny. It's kinda funny but whatever.

Listen bois. And the following applies to most of the excuses/insecurities you may have. If you think that it's a huge handicap. Boom.

**It Is**

I'll be 22 in less than a month. I lost my virginity when I was 17. Already some of you are groaning ""Ugh this guy got the puss at a normal age"". Yeah well guess what. 2+ years of dry dick and I'll eventually hit that 3 year mark. Do I feel like I gained something from having sex with my ex? Yeah sure. I know where the hole is. Or at least I think I have a pretty good grasp and memory of it. That's the funny thing. That's about as much of an advantage as I have over you, virgins. I think I still know where the hole is. Skills with girls? Nah, fam. I ain't got none of that shit.

That's all just to say that losing your virginity doesn't mean much.

But I get it. I understand. Losing your virginity for a lot of you would mean you finally got the ball rolling since you're not 17. You're probably in your 20s. But let's look at that. Ok so you're 27 and you're a virgin. You harp on that and you stress over it so hard that it just creates this sleuth of insecurities about you. I don't know what to do. What if she asks? Oh god what do I do? Great now you're in your 30s and still a virgin because you wasted time biting your own nails off over that fact.

Let go of your shame. I will actually take a cue to bring up my dry spell if I'm chatting with someone. If someone asks I'll bold face tell them with a big fuckin' smile on my face ""Yeah dude I haven't even gotten remotely close to the puss in 2+ years"". I haven't even touched a girls hand in that time. And I'm shameless about those facts.

You gotta own it. Just like your height, your race, your likes, your beliefs and whatever else. Because if you think that a thing about you is a serious handicap then it is. Yes these things can be handicaps. But they are crippling only if you allow them to be. If you just shrug and be like ""It is what it is"" then those things will lose most of their power. You will take your Ls much better.

And if you think being a virgin is such a huge disadvantage. I also have no friends or social life. If you don't know then let me tell you that people do not want to hang out with people like that. When you don't have those things that's a wink wink nudge nudge ""no one likes me"". Dudes will be like ""that's weird but whatever"". Girls will go ""that's really weird, is there something wrong with him?""

Own it, laugh about it, it's a fact and there's not much you can do other than suck it up and get your ball rolling. I mean people say ""But I'm X years old."" Yeah and if you keep moping you'll be X+Y years old. Do you think your odds will get better by then? Probably not so just relax and get your shit together.

And also don't bang a hooker. Why would you think that it'll solve anything? You stuck your dick into a woman you paid to spread her legs for you? Losing your virginity is more than just sticking it in. It's about the process of getting there. You can't get your ball rolling with what is essentially a masturbation session with a very realistic sex doll. You didn't earn it. You earned money and then you spent it on a fancy jerk off.

So yeah guys. I know it sucks. Yeah things didn't work out quite in your favor. But the most prominent figures in this community also got laid late. They just gritted their teeth and started their grind. And they got results. And you will get your results as long as you work for it. The way you WON'T get results is by going ""I'm a 28 year old virgin. Help me."" Get your ass out there and put it in the fucking work. Sorry. But that's the only way. There is no way around hard work. Only through it.

Suck it up, princess.
",seduction
LMR - Boyfriend but very strong signals. What to learn from this?,"In college, dorm setting. Met HB8 when I was in a pinch (car battery needed to be jumpstarted). She helped me out and was giving me IOI's the whole way through. Fun time, party when my car started again.

Got back after the weekend, and brought her some special beers as a thank you gift. Ended up talking the whole night, a lot of kino both ways, went to her room. She mentioned she had a boyfriend but I didn't really believe it and ignored it. Escalated into a kiss, but we stopped there. She said she's very attracted to me and is afraid of things escalating too much - going out of her control (she even pointed out the beginning of the story, sitting next to each other on the couch, going to her room,...). She concluded that she hates/dislikes being in a relationship sometimes.

This is basically where I froze escalation wise, and didn't know how to progress. She's given me a contradictory message of wanting to be free/have some fun, but also that she's still loyal to the BF. I also hadn't made up my mind internally whether or not I'm OK with her/someone cheating. 

Talked and hugged/petted some more, but nothing sexual. Earlier in the evening she promised to show me some good bars in town. Got a text this morning from her saying she thinks it's not a good idea to do that anymore, but she'd still send me the names etc. So at this point I can bow out and wish her well or push and make her crazy. What do I answer?

Personally I'm fine bowing out in this one, by all means it would have probably just been a simple lay, nothing 'worth' destroying a LTR for. Plenty of 'projects' left that can use attention. But what can I learn from this experience? And how do you walk the fine line between respecting her 'principles' and at the same time acknowledging and acting upon the fact she wants to jump on you?",seduction
Having a deep male voice is better for getting girls?,"Hi, I have somewhat high-pitched voice. And for the past months, I've been lowering my voice on purpose because I think/thought that's the only way to attract more chicks. But as I keep doing it, I find myself losing that enthusiasm that I used to have because deliberately lowering my voice kinda takes it away as I pretend to be relaxed all the time. There's a guy like Russell Brand whose voice pitch is even higher than me and he got more girls than deep voiced guys. What's the right answer? Should I deliberately lower my voice if my natural voice is considered high-pitched?",seduction
How Hobbies Can Make You Attractive (&amp; Get You Laid) - Ft Mike Diretto,,seduction
Something I noticed about game and ageing,Basically when I was in my 20s I had to work really really hard to get laid and talk to girls. I got dumped by girls who were 7 or 8s and pretty heartbroken. In my 30s now girls are actively pursuing me and it's such a breeze to get laid. The exes who dumped me are now 5s and 6s and not worth my time or attention. It seems men get better with age and women lose so much value over time. So don't fret if you're young and awkward. Everything gets so easy the older you get.,seduction
Any suggestions on uk night game [M/21],"As the title suggests can anyone reccomend some videos or methods describing night game techniques? As the title suggests im a beginner but willing to try to improve. My current go to at the moment is clubs, mainly because due to my job ( door to door salesman ) im not always in the location to daygame, although i would like to try it eventually. What i usually do in the club is go to the dance floor and dance with some girls. Or open a group and try to "" win over "" the group, usually i will single out a girl. Use playfull negs and eventually escalate, dance for a little while and then talk in the smoking area. Now this is the part that im not good at yet, the last 2 times i have been out in a club with a girl, things have been going well. We have been making out ect, ioi's. I havent been able to actually get them home or back to the hotel ect. Any ideas?

Just for reference i have read "" The game "" and although i enjoyed the book and did get some good advice out of it but it just seems quite dated. Just to clarify i have only been on about 8 nights out, i dont really get nervous or anything and usually have a good time. ",seduction
First Direct Approach,"I figured I'm somewhat attractive enough to get away with going direct and in a way I like the idea because you cut bullchiting around. This was at a Starbucks close to a college and usually if I'm there long enough (studying) I'll see a cute girl at one point also studying. Sure enough, I notice one girl sitting outside.

So the fact she is studying sort of allowed me enough time to work up the courage. When I decided to leave, I walked up to her and said ""excuse me"", (she pulls out her earbuds). ""I was just on my way out, I noticed you and was wondering if I could take you out for coffee this week"". She had a smile/chuckle look and pointed to her engagement ring to which I said ""oh I didn't see that, well take that as a compliment"" and I walked away.

She smiled throughout the whole interaction and something tells me she felt bad for me because it took courage to do what I did and she had to turn me down.

It was so damn easy though, even though I was rejected. The hardest part was growing a pair to perform the action and once I got her attention, all the anxiety went away. I never directly asked someone I just met on a date and now I have the confidence to do it again. Before I would just ask for directions and would chicken out on the part when I'm suppose to get her number/ask to hangout.

edit: left out location detail",seduction
is there a good way to answer her when she's responding with one word?,"hi guys

so there's a girl i met throw facebook, i got a number and with talked for a while in the whatsapp. we suppose to meet tomorrow for the first time. 

so some time we talk, and than she just answer in one word like ''ok'' ''yes'' ''no'' etc witch make it hard to find something interesting to reply. i would guess that maybe its because shes not very interested, but most of the time she dosnt respond that way and sometimes shes the one sending me a massage, witch would be very weird if shes not interested.

&amp;#x200B;

i think the most likely possibility is that she actually dosnt have anything else to reply in mind. as i said we supposed to meet tomorrow. we talked for a few days before sating a date cause i was pretty busy.

&amp;#x200B;

anyways, do you think theres a good way to answer this type of massages, or a way to avoid those in the first place?

or should i just not reply at all when shes responding this way?

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

thanks!",seduction
Night game with a wing woman Field Report.,"So last Friday night, I went out with my best mate who is a very attractive (8) female, we will call her N. 

I met her at a bar, when one of my dates, was coming to a close, I met the girl in a charity shop the week prior. 

This noticeably increased my smv with the girl I was on the date with.  

So, after the date finished me and N got a taxi to the rave. 

Upon arrival, in the queue, I opened everyone we was next to. I stayed sober the entire night and people were surprised that this was my intention when mentioned. I find my game is much smoother when sober and I do not hide or lie about the fact I am sober. It is usually mentioned asap to avoid being the creepy sober guy prowling around.

I found if N first talked to girls I was interested in, it didn't work. What was better, was either for me to open a girl myself first, then introduce her as my best friend. Showing that if she (an 8) is my best friend I can't be creepy.

Or 

Being quite sexual/flirty with my friend (within limits as we are actually an ex couple) and then opening a girl. Never mentioning that N was just a friend. Eventually I would know if they was interested because they would ask if she was my girlfriend. Upon telling them no, they would instantly become very touchy feely and come closer. 

To summarize, I got 2 girls numbers who live locally, 1 of which was super sexual on the  dance floor with me we will call her V and am seeing her again this Friday. I opened her friend, who then started a girl on girl convo with N. Presumably about me.

 I asked if she could introduce me to some of her friends. She obliged and brought V over. We talked together, I introduced N. Discussed how we was an ex couple but still best mates. She thought this was amazing. 

I danced with her and then just went for the kiss. Throughout the night, she was kissing me, biting my lip/neck, rubbing my dick over my jeans and grinding on me. I never sleep with a girl who is intoxicated unless it is the 2nd meet up. Got to be careful when you're sober. Will probably suggest going back to her place on Friday. Have to wait and see what happens. 

",seduction
"Havent been approaching for a year, how to get over the anxiety? I'm a beginner again",,seduction
How to be less needy?,"I saw a hot girl at the gym a few months ago, perfect body, nice big ass small waist blonde hair, nice tits,  so I chatted her up and it was cool. A few months later, she followed me on Twitter, and messaged me on Twitter and said she thinks I'm way cute. That was on Saturday, and today we snapchatted for like the day and she was already ignoring my snapchats. I feel like maybe I'm being too needy although I dont know how. I never messaged her twice in a row and I was mainly just getting to know her. Should I just move on? How exactly would an ""alpha man"" handle this situation? She ignored my last message and I'm wondering if I should just not give a fuck and meet more women (which I'm already doing). I dont go to that gym anymore so I havent seen her face to face in months in fact I hadn't even thought of her until she found me on Twitter Saturday night. I've already met this other girl that I've been having fun talking to and we might go out this weekend. But the gym girl is the hottest girl thats ever been interested in me, so if theres a way to save this situation lay it on me. I just feel like I'm being too needy.",seduction
She isn't a virgin but.....,"I am M30 she is F25 we've know eachother for years but only these pass few month's we've had sex and our sexual desires are not on the same level, I am into just about almost everything and she just likes the basics lights off, under the covers, no foreplay, no oral, just stick it in and yes i knew she was vanilla before we even started  because We were just good friends (and still are) before we even started having sex and the reason why we started having sex was because of all the dirty nasty things I would text her during the day. She told me she wanted a man who was more advanced than her to teach her all the so called freaky thing's, so we hook up about once or twice a week ....now fast forward six months and I still can't get her to be more open sexually she tells me every time I try to get her to do something outside of her comfort zone she feels dumb and stupid  because she doesn't know how to do it and I understand that's the whole reason why we started this thing yes it's a nsa deal

 What I'm asking my people of Reddit is what can I do to break down this wall without needing the assistance of a wrecking ball",seduction
Build Attraction THEN Comfort (common newbie mistake explained),"Yo!

A simple description of the basic London daygame model is: 

**Open - Build Attraction - Build Comfort - Close**

I've noticed it's an extremely common mistake for people to mix the second and third step around.

# Here's why it happens....

Picture the scenario...

You've gone in all guns blazing with the opener and some opening gambit, and she's giving you nothing. 

In fact, she looks uncomfortable.

Perfectly normal in the first few minutes of a cold approach. Yet, your insecure ass is wishing she'd contribute more to the conversation already.  

So, you go into interview mode....

*""What's your job? Do you like this club? Do you come here often?""*

* It's perfectly natural to try and build comfort when she looks uncomfortable
* It's perfectly natural to ask questions when you want her to talk more...

That's why this mistake is so common in this scenario .(I made it today).

# Why doesn't it work? 

Because she doesn't like you enough to be giving out this personal information, or engaging in anything more than a couple of minutes of polite chatter. 

Imagine if some random guy from the street started asking you these personal questions. It would be weird and uncomfortable. 

Instead, keep building attraction by having fun, sharing jokes, doing DHVs, whatever...

Once she starts investing by asking questions (and the set has hooked) THEN you can go onto these comfort-building questions. 

I still got this girl's Instagram, but I'm betting it will be a flake. I'll keep following her account to remind me not to make that mistake again...

***I've co-launched a Telegram group for men who want to become amazing with women. Hundreds of guys getting advice on their sticking points and sharing success stories. Drop me a PM with your Telegram handle if you'd like to join.***",seduction
Does daygame work on short Asian guys in North America?,"5’6, 25 y.o Asian guy here, got some luck on tinder, had only done cold approach once, and it was when my PUA friend pushed me to an Asian HB3 or 4. It was an amazing experience anyway, i ghosted her after a date cuz she was really not good looking. 

I’ve never approached anyone whom I’m truly attracted to IRL, and since my first approach, I hadn’t done any after. 

I’ve been learning how to dress better, reading related books and hitting the gym, and I have lost 20 lbs since doing keto diet. But it still looks a little hard for a 5’6, medium looking Asian fellow to daygame in North America. What do you guys think?",seduction
One of the better animation style seduction videos I've come across. It seems easier to take good advice without getting someones face being associated with it; I think I prefer the whiteboard animation style as it seems easier to visually understand the concepts.,,seduction
Anyone down to meetup in salt lake?,Location thread is dead here. Throwing this out there if anyone wants to work on their game in the land of the Mormons.,seduction
A Failed Relationship in Numbers [OC],,seduction
Daygame: I think it's a seriously bad strategy to tell the girl you think she's cute right in the opener...,"Seriously though, if it's the first thing you say then it's like she immediately puts her guard up and thinks 'oh great, how can I get rid of him?' 

---

I just approached this girl at a grocery store with ""Hey can I meet you real quick?"" She stopped dead in her tracks, planted her feet and didn't move... Then I stupidly said ""I just thought you were cute and had to meet you"", the second I did she immediately starts inching away from me. This happens a lot and I don't get to practice and get good at this because of it.

---

I guess just don't be so direct right from the open, have a conversation, build some comfort, then do that. Thoughts?  ",seduction
Need advice or help,"Hey guys idk if you guys have this issue but whenever I talk to someone whether it’s someone I know already or new. When I smile my lips start quivering and shaking so I have to force myself to stop smiling which is awkward. This recently started happening and it’s hurting my chances and social life especially with new women. 
Like the other day I was talking to a girl in the gym and everything is fine until I start smiling and my lips start shaking or twitching and I can’t smile any more. 
Any help would be good. ",seduction
Bad night sleep after daygaming (cortisol? adrenaline?),"I was googling the subject but couldn't find much relevant info. 

Yesterday I did 20+ direct approaches over 7 hours, and had a pretty bad night sleep afterwards. This is my personal record doing so many in a day without a wing. From noon / 12pm until 7pm / 19.00. I still felt pretty hyped up and agitated when waking up throughout the night. (No negative approach reactions, just a couple or a few neutral ones, mostly positive)

I couldn't find what's the biological mechanism behind this, is it cortisol related or adrenaline, as in adrenal glands keep pumping adrenaline hours and hours after stopping daygaming? It's slowly getting better, years ago It was taking me just 2 approaches to get so hyped up to have a bad night sleep. I have tested my cortisol levels and my post noon and night time cortisol levels are lower than average so generally it's very easy for me to fall asleep and keep sleeping until morning. Back in school I generally never had problems falling asleep before big exams. But I'd guess any public speaking during the day would have hyped me up in a similar fashion.

Thoughts?
",seduction
"I asked someone out for the first time ever and got shut down HARD, I think she's afraid of me now. Can you guys please help me learn from this.","I think this is going to be a bit of a long post, so sorry for that, I just want to provide as much context as possible so hopefully people can tell me what to do/what I can learn from this. I feel like I should mention that growing up, I had a hard time understanding social cues, but I thought I was much better at that sort of thing now.

&amp;#x200B;

Throughout my undergrad/highschool I never had the confidence to ask women on dates, however I have had a girlfriend and have been with a few other women, I had just never made the first move (girls would either kiss me at a party or ask me to hang out). Last summer I worked with this woman who was absolutely beautiful (like the most attractive person I have ever seen in real life), I wasn't really interested in her initially because a close friend had past away (in hindsight I was probably depressed). Near the end of last summer I started talking to her and realized she was actually incredibly cool so I asked her on a date (for the first time ever), though I didn't explicitly use the word date and looking back at it now I think she might have thought I just wanted to spend time together platonically. What happened was were just speaking after work and she told me a really cool story about what she did that past weekend and I kinda thought (in my head) ""fuck, she's actually awesome I want to get to know her better"" so I said ""lets go get ice-cream and go for a walk Wednesday"", she said she couldn't Wednesday but asked if we could hangout Friday after work instead. I'm mentioning this all because I thought the fact that she wanted to spend time with me one on one, just hanging out and not doing anything specific, made me think that there was a solid chance that she was attracted to me last summer, furthermore she definitely did a couple things throughout our three months together that to me seemed flirty. We ended up not getting ice-cream on Friday, and I took her canceling on me as her not liking me; I only found out this past summer through a friend that she actually had a legit excuse (family emergency). About a week after her canceling that ""date"" (not really a date I guess, I just wanted to get to know her better before leaving) I flew across the country for my senior year of university. We spoke a little on Facebook, her apologizing for not being able to get ice-cream and telling me we should when I get back in town which again I took as a bit of a good sign (she reached out to me, not the other way).

&amp;#x200B;

Fast forward 13 months to a week ago and I run into her on the way to class (I'm going to grad school and she's in her senior year at the same college). I'm hugely embarrassed about how I acted, but I here it is. We both are in a meeting together (brief meet up from our internship, not really important to this story) and then I leave to head to class, she calls out my name and I stop so we can walk together. We make casual small talk about what out plans are and then get into an elevator together (I totally recognize that this is the worst place to corner a woman and ask her on a date and what I did was pretty uncool). 

&amp;#x200B;

I kinda just phase out for about 1-2 seconds looking at her, I know its a clique to say that I got lost in her eyes, but thats honestly what happened. 

She looks at me and says ""what?"" 

It just kinda slipped out and I said ""We should go on a date"". I wasn't planning on saying that, but I did. 

Surprisingly she didn't say yes or no instead she just said ""Why?"". 

This was a total curveball for me and at the time I didn't know what to say so I said maybe the worst possible thing, which was ""Well I'm going to be back in \[city name\] for the next little while"". What I was trying to say was that I thought she was attractive in every possible way, and that now that we will both be living in the same city long term (instead of me just being there for my summer breaks) I would like to get to know her better.

Then she said ""Well I guess we could meet for coffee"", but the way she said it made it sound like she was somewhat uncomfortable/ didn't really want to to. 

I didn't want to put her in an awkward position so I just said ""No worries, just take it as a compliment""

Then a couple more people got in the elevator and I just kinda stared of into space, looked at the time and said something irrelevant like ""well, sorry you're going to be late for class"" and she responded awkwardly with something like ""its fine"".

&amp;#x200B;

As soon as I got out of the elevator I was full of regret, she had told me that she had never been in a relationship the previous summer, and being as pretty as she was I would imagine she would have to turn down guys every week. I started to think (and spoke to a friend about this) that she was probably just feeling awkward about me asking her on a date and that she wanted to get to know me a little better than going on what I imagine would have been her first ""date"", especially considering that I hadn't spoke to her for more than two hours over the past year. 

&amp;#x200B;

The bright side was I new that I would run into her the next day, so I thought really hard about what I was going to say. I was going to say something along the lines of ""I'm sorry for surprising you like that, you know as well as anyone that I don't have much of a filter sometimes, if you're still interested coffee would be nice.""

&amp;#x200B;

But when I tried to talk to her, maybe the worst possible thing happened. Her and I plus three others were talking at a work thing (little thing for all the past interns again, not really important).

&amp;#x200B;

I lightly touched her on the arm and said ""can we talk for a second?"" and she said ""No."". 

Again this was totally surprising and I didn't know what to think, I still can't understand why she wouldn't give me a minute (in a public place) to just let me briefly clear the air.

So then I said ""I just wanted to say sorry"" and she said ""its ok"" and I said ""I'll see you around"" and left.

&amp;#x200B;

I'm going to be at a mandatory event for my program where I will be seeing her this upcoming Friday and I really don't know what to do. Right now my plan is to just be polite with her and give her as much space as possible (i.e. wave at her if she walks by, but don't approach or try to talk to her). Is that the best way to handle this? 

&amp;#x200B;

Sorry for the essay.

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
How Women Lose the Dating Game (Well worth a read),,seduction
Other hobbies that are transferable to seduction,"I love the idea of getting better at one thing to use those skills on another, so here's what I've been doing to help me at both:

-Improv classes (like Who's Line Is it Anyway?) - gets you thinking on your feet, thinking about spontaneous thoughts, gets you to be able to act without hesitation with confidence, and teaches you to be more observant.

-Open mic/stand up comedy- Boosts confidence, many people fear public speaking.

-Movies. Watch their body language and think carefully about fluctuations in the characters' voices. Foreshadowing is often very common in movies, try to watch out of things before they happen.

-Social interaction with friends.  You could just ""autopilot"" and just focus on yourself, or you can focus on listening very intently, focus on thinking about ""What is my friend thinking about? How can I customize my actions and words for their benefit? I may want to talk about or do X, but what do they want to do and how can I help make that happen?"" You can also just focus on a single thing, like ""enthusiasm"" - channel your energy to being a bit more enthuasistic and chipper than usual - or it could be trust (to get them to open up), empathy or anything really.

-Cold showers. You can start warm, but switch it to cold. That discomfort is pretty annoying and it gets a bit easier to deal with each time. It's about intentionally pursuing a bit of discomfort, and it's healthy for you too I've heard (closes your pours, builds up your resistance to cold).

-Dieting. Teaches restraint. Very important in conversation to be open and honest but also being able to realize what you could say but doesn't benefit the other person.  Now you might have really deep inner thoughts and sure you can share those, but the idea is to be intentional about what you do and don't say, rather than just ""doing whatever"" or ""saying whatever."" Most people have a filter which is just ""I will say what is appropriate and I will not say what is inappropriate"" but the idea here is to have a diagnostic based on the person you're talking to and refine it based on them.

-Writing. Could be fiction, could be an autobiography or even a diary. I've found that writing helps a ton with de-compressing my thoughts so I can reflect on them, think about what happened, what my accomplishments were that day, my goals, what I observed that was even the slightest bit uprising, what I was working on and what I could've done better.  For example last night I just hung out with friends (no approaching girls or anything) and I wrote up 6,000 words of reflection - things I could've said, hints to what was really going on, things I noticed but I didn't understand - and before, I'd feel a strong need to regurgitate this info to other people because it's ""stuck"" in my brain (similar to venting but not quite). Today though, I feel like I've fully decompressed and now I can draw back on these experiences more readily.

What hobbies do you find can help with seduction?",seduction
I need help being more social at parties and get togethers,"I'm no slouch but sometimes I notice myself just not being all there when out and about with people. It might just be that I shouldn't smoke weed before going out so I might be overthinking it.

Anyone have advice for this? Or should I just stop smoking if I have plans?",seduction
How do you tell if a girl gets attached too soon and how to draw a boundary?,"So I lost my virginity to a girl I was friends with last semester and she seems to get overly attached too quickly. I want a friends with benefits type of relationship not an intimate dating relationship.
She has texted me almost daily since then but I try to keep the conversation about making plans to meet instead of personal stuff. Tonight she sent a goodnight text. 
She does other thing that seem over accommodating to me which may stem from low self esteem. Like she will apologize for not responding to a text I sent her quickly. She’s hot so I want to keep this going so how do define the relationship to let her know it’s a friends with benefits thing in a way that doesn’t hurt her?  ",seduction
Maintaining eye contact without being a creep,"Hi,

Specific question about eye-contact which is a hard as fuck considering my lack of confidence with women. At the gym, there's a fairly attractive woman who lifts weights too. Except for the one time she asked me to remove some plates from a barbell because it was too heavy for her, I haven't interacted more than exchanging a simple ""hi"" with her when we walk passed each other. She doesn't seem particularly interested in me. 

When it comes to eye contact with an attractive girl when your eyes meet each other by ""accident"", I often hear that a man should maintain until she breaks it.

A few weeks ago, my eyes locked with this girl in the gym while we were both doing our shit and I tried maintaining. She looked away after a couple of seconds and I couldn't help but feel like she must have thought ""the fuck is this guy staring at me for? It's creepy""

So how does a guy actually maintain eye contact with a girl without being that creepy guy who stares? I'm not talking about eye contact during a conversation. I got that pretty well. I'm talking about when we're just locking eyes on random places like the gym, the bus, the bar or whatever.",seduction
How does meditation help you get better with the opposite sex,,seduction
"I'm lost on how to fix my approach anxiety, what's going on?!","I'm at a new university, in my junior year, and have already noticed some increased amount of attention from girls and keep failing to make a move on anyone. I've got pretty decent looks but my confidence comes and goes. Examples of some girls:

* Math class: average looking Asian girl makes an effort to talk to me, eventually asks for my number for ""homework"" and proceeds to never text me. I'm not into her
* Math: much better looking Asian girl I started talking to a while ago. Another day she found me studying somewhere outside, came up, talked for 10 minutes, and got my snapchat. Dumb me hasn't snapped her. She said something about asking me about math, but she never did. Her body language seemed like she was interested though. Now we sometimes talk in math. A couple times, we walked out together and she seemed to keep bumping into me over and over, like 3 times in a 1-2 minute conversation. My dumbass doesn't know how to flirt with her lol.
* Programming: cute Asian girl in my other class I've only talked to once so far last week. She seemed interested judging from some body language/eye contact, and asking me if I could help her with some stuff. Obviously I had trouble hitting on her in a CS class where we were surrounded by a bunch of dudes. Probably need to get her outside of class
* Cafeteria: I approached a pretty good looking white girl, talked for about 20 minutes and couldn't manage to be direct about my intentions. I was close to asking for her number, but at the end a couple of her guy friends came in and kind of ruined the whole mood. I've barely seen her since, but one time she came up to me and said hi, but then proceeded to go sit with a big group of friends, and I didn't join. She seemed really interested in me when I first talked to her. Eye contact, laughing a lot, etc. Still i'm haveing trouble mustering up courage to re-approach.
* Cafeteria: tall girl from Kazakhstan, fairly attractive, started talking to me randomly one day. I wasn't in a good mood and didn't demonstrate much interest. Maybe I can re-do that
* Cafeteria: somewhat tall Asian girl with a group of friends started talking to me in a group setting. Laughing a lot, touching my shoulder a bit, asked for my Instagram, but I gave her my snapchat instead. Haven't seen her since and haven't had the balls to snapchat her
* Cafeteria: hot brunette was eye-fucking me a bit. She noticed me looking back at her, and then her and her friend all the sudden stared at me and were giggling. My dumbass looked away after a few seconds and didn't do anything, haven't seen her since
* Lots of other minor examples of girls giving me looks or smiles where I just stand there like a dumbass. Probably another 10+ examples like that.

So what the fuck is going on with me? Am I really that low-self esteem to not believe this pile of evidence? I can muster up enough courage to talk to people sometimes but never take it to the next level.

&amp;#x200B;

P.S. I'm not someone who parties. I'm not against it and I do drink every once and a while but parties aren't my thing. I'd rather get girls in the daytime situations.",seduction
"[Advice Needed] Stopped to believe in oneitis long ago, yet found someone who presses all the right buttons","Ok let me explain:

Been playing ""the game with my buddies some years back, with some success, however I never felt its the real me.

After some time I went into a very toxic relationship, quite complicated matter, which ended after 3-4 months and damaged my confidence severely, spiraling me down into insecurities.

&amp;#x200B;

Haven't been an active player since, however I'm looking at male-female relationships with different glasses than I did years ago (no oneitis, confidence=attraction, have fun, don't fall for shittests, go for whatever your gut tells you etc).

&amp;#x200B;

Now at current moment - been having a stable and not terribly bad corporate job for some years, last year a girl joined the team that I never really paid much attention to, until recently when we went for those ""team integration"" weekends.

&amp;#x200B;

Something clicked, we understand each other without words, have extremely similar taste yet are able to surprise each other with novelty. It's like you take a clone of yourself, change gender, and have great fun together.

&amp;#x200B;

I made some steps to push it further, wanted to isolate, go for it. I can see clear signals that she likes me (playing with hair, not being afraid to be touched, happy eyes, laughing at my jokes etc), however she ended a relationship recently and is recovering from that and does not want to go into another one yet. I said fine, I understand, and I know it takes time for good things to come in life.

&amp;#x200B;

Weeks pass and I notice I'm getting obsessed, she keeps sending me signals of interest, we're texting on daily basis, there's clear care for each other. Going out together ends in spending fun time, but never ended up in a kiss cause I can't read if shes ready or not. Because we're aligning so well, I'm losing my confidence in what to do or what to say. I began to care more than I probably should, as I view her as a long term relationship candidate.

&amp;#x200B;

How to deal with this? I want to go to next level, but I'm unable to determine the right time. I think she wants but she's not ready - do I wait more, and for what I should be looking here? There's not many chances we're alone in comfortable environment.

(we work together, have our own schedules after work, and weekends are usually already busy with family/social activities)

&amp;#x200B;

I'm definitely overthinking, but maybe you guys will be able to shine a new perspective.

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
Be a better texter,How does one become a better texter and calibrate effectively?,seduction
"Last Minute Resistance and why I haven't seen it in years: Using ""Tao"" massage to make her beg for sex."," 

We all **think we're pretty good** in bed. Ever since we first learned to [**finger-blast**](https://www.xvideos.com/video9797017/teach_your_girl_how_to_squirt_-_tantric_massage_full_) and [**oral**](https://www.xvideos.com/video531677/milf_nina_hartley_teaches_how_to_eat_pussy) at the same time, most guys assume that we're nailing it and there's **limited returns** in going further. I recently **broke through a plateau** by studying the ""[**Tao of Sexual Massage**](https://www.goodreads.com/book/show/265413.The_Tao_of_Sexual_Massage)"". It's a beautiful book, just the kind I would have salivated over as a teenage boy. It exploits three key principles in foreplay:

1. A woman takes a **long time** to 'get ready' for great sex mentally
2. **Pain** is a powerful aphrodaesiac
3. The **anticipation** of sex is way more intoxicating for women than men

How it works:

For a woman to have a **full body orgasm** she needs a **full body service**. The Tao style of massage involves pulling on muscle HARD at different levels of the body to get the blood flowing and draw sensation to those areas. Combine that with an instruction to ""Breathe into that spot"" and you end up with what is effectively a **tantric meditation** before penetration. The whole sequence is contained **within the book**, but this [video](https://www.xnxx.com/video-iouo151/tao_sensual_massage) shows some similar techniques.

The key movements are:

1. **Pinching and drawing the muscle** outwards at the: temples, neck, lats, lower ribcage, abdomen, hips, lateral thighs.

This gets the blood flowing to those areas and loosens muscle knots.

2. **Strokes up the** ***inside*** **of the legs** (woman on tummy), going up and down, LIGHT AS A FEATHER, advancing with each stroke a little closer to the pussy.

It's incredible how wet a woman gets in this position. She's completely submissive to your touch, and she will be aching with anticipation for when you finally *touch* her pussy (this will be after a million strokes if you're clever).

3. When you finally touch the pussy, don't go for the clitoris. **Stroke gently at the most posterior** (close to asshole) **part of the vagina** (This is **not the clitoris**) and make small circles. **DON'T PENETRATE**. Continue to make tiny strokes there.

This will drive her crazy. You're literally stroking the **place where she wants to be fucked**. If she hadn't decided whether to go **all the way** with you, she *will* want to **now** \- because that is the **only way she's going to be satisfied.**

If you follow that sequence for fifteen minutes your woman will be so close to orgasm that when you go in with your penis (it will be the first thing to enter her, just as God intended ;) ) she may **cum instantaneously**.

Conclusion:

Take the time to **honour** **the body** of the woman you are with. Soak it all in and **savour it**. The sex will be over soon but your **passion** for it is what lasts.

BONUS EXTRAS:

Touching that posterior spot is right next to the anus. For most women, drawing attention to this area is a gateway to anal play. If I do touch the anus, I **TELL HER** and **LET HER SAY ITS OK**. You need *conscious* relaxation of the anus to have fun, and you want her ***in one mind*** about it.

Whilst doing the massage, I always tell them ""You let me know if it's too much"". It actually hurts to be grabbed by the lat, as anyone who's done grappling knows. But it **hurts so good** that women will generally go along with it. This extra communication tends to put women at ease and opens the door for really naughty stuff later on.

Using these techniques also gives you the ""doctor's view"" of the body of the chick you're with. If a woman has any [lumps](http://faqhow.com/other/any/how-to-identify-genital-warts), [bumps, or rashes](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Genital_herpes#/media/File:SOA-Herpes-genitalis-female.jpg) that you *see because you're in the area* and don't like the look of, you can always **call it quits** before you put your penis anywhere near it.",seduction
The Leave Behind?,"I’m not 100% if his is the right subreddit but I’ll shoot.

I brought a girl back from a nightclub a few days ago and we “hung out” for an hour or so. Afterwards she left around 4:30 ish. I asked if she had everything, phone, wallet earrings etc. and she said yeah. I joked around saying if she’s lucky we’ll meet again sometime. She told me she has a club competition next week (which is true) but in 2 weeks “She’s all mine.” It’s notable, but I’ve heard stuff like that a lot and it doesn’t necessarily mean anything. Quick kiss and she leaves.

Anyway, I wake up next morning to find both of her earrings (cheap hoops) lying plain as day on my desk. Is this the classic “leave behind” and an excuse for continued contact, or just a simple accident? Guys, if you have any clue, or ladies, if this is something you’d do, I’d love to know. Thanks Reddit ",seduction
"How to initiate, specific scenario","I work as cabin crew. I meet new women each flight. That I am not gonna ever see again, if I dont do anything about it.

Lets say I find one of them attractive, its work environment. Firstly how do I find out whether she has a boyfriend? Without asking directly?

If she doesnt have how do I show intent?
Sometimes the supervisor is really hot. Is that unacceptable to try something as subordinate? I dont want to get into any trouble.

I often just reach out to them by whatsapp but I find it rly cowardish, low selfconfident and weak that I am unable to initiate anything in person and just text them.

It just kills me inside that I dont know how to reach out them in terms of showing intent and trying something. And get rly depressed and selfhate afterwards
",seduction
"What’s the best way to message a girl I met briefly, got along with, had kino but no kissing, and added on Facebook a few days later","She’s a Spanish exchange student, however we both study on different campuses. Met her at a party in our apartment flat and talked to me at length, but she was very shy amongst her fellow Spanish friends who joined her that night.

Normally, I’d rather meet her in person and work from there. However logistics ain’t in my favour, and only have Facebook for now.

What’s a good way to start a conversation and meetup without coming off too needy.

TLDR: texting game",seduction
How do I go beyond “hanging out” among friends to dating?,"I’m a 27 years old guy, and I’ve only had 2 girlfriends ever in my life. Once for a year in college, and I recently ended a 5 year relationship about 6 months ago.

Thinking back about those relationships, I realized that I was pretty lucky with both of these girls. The first was a friend that confessed to me she wanted more, and was frustrated I wasn’t picking up on it. The second one was a new girl in town that started hanging out with my social circle, and one of our mutual friends told me that I was an idiot and she has told everyone else she was 100% into me. If I did not get those blaring bright, flashing green lights in both situations, I would have probably been to aloof (or scared) to do anything.

Socially, I’ve been told that I am overall pretty charismatic and charming... I’ve gotten way further in my career than I deserve to at this point primarily due to my ability to make friends quickly and network. Physically, I’m not the most attractive guy, but I know I am at least average or better (6-7/10) plus I make it a point to dress nice and workout regularly.

Recently, I’ve been trying to expand my social circle and meet new people. I encourage my friends to bring new people to our hang out and outings, or I make it a point to get closer to acquaintances.

Along the way, I have met a handful of really cool girls that I find cute/attractive. However, I starting to see a pattern where all I am doing is “hanging out” and flirting with them in a larger social setting, but never finding an opportunity to get them alone and ask them on dates. Or in the instances where we have a few seconds separated from other friends, I don’t know how to use the opportunity/privacy. I also don’t want to be known as the creepy, desperate guy that asks out every new girl that shows up, but I also don’t want to be the guy that waits to long to ask and feels “friend-zoned.” ",seduction
X-year-old still a virgin,"For the sake of god and all that is holy, please stop obsessing about this virginity thing and just focus on improving yourself and your life.

You'll forget about all your virgin years the day you switch to *the dark side*.",seduction
"I don't enjoy going on dates, not even sure what I want to do when we meet.","Because I really don't have much interest in going to meet people who don't put in equal effort, but that's a lot to ask these days. A lot of the numbers I get can always lead to a date, but I genuinely don't want to go on a date, and I don't like deciding what we're going to do because I honestly don't think there's anything I want to do anyway. I went on 4 dates last week, all were just coffee, talking, making out, some sex, but that doesn't even interest me anymore. I enjoy hanging out with my friends more than anything, it's always a blast. Going out with a girl is a decent time too, but it's always hit or miss. Sometimes they're just boring as fuck to talk to, even though they were interesting at the point where I got their number. I just don't know what I want to do anymore in terms of girls. I've taken a completely different approach and I've decided I'm only going to talk to girls with my main intention being to become friends, because these days I've found that the girls I'm meeting aren't stimulating enough to make me want to fuck them even.

What ways do you guys improve yourselves when you're getting bored with girls? I've been hitting the gym for 7 years, so that's one thing I've been doing. I have some hobbies, mostly involving instruments but I'd like to expand that. I also want to look into reading books, as I haven't read a physical book in many years. 

I'm just kind of bored with life now, because all I've known aside from work and friends is dating. I'd just date, date, date and its made me feel empty (for lack of better term), so I'm not sure what else to turn to to improve myself as a person. Anyone been here? What kind of things would you do to be happy and enjoy your life more?",seduction
Seduction in Big Mixed Groups,"I got into seduction a while a go and I've been making steady progress with decent results but as a teenager, I find that a lot of the time when I'm hanging out with new girls it's usually through mutual friends and we'd be in fairly large groups walking either through a mall, the neighbourhood, etc. which definitely has a different social dynamic to when your one on one with a girl or at a party.

&amp;#x200B;

I realise that it's important to not shy away from the group and act freely conveying you're a fun guy, don't really care, and are comfortable in this situation but I find quite difficult to then spark up conversation with girls in the group you're not too familiar with especially when everyone is almost sparring for attention and its very easy to turn awkward.

&amp;#x200B;

Any advice would be greatly appreciated!",seduction
Ministry of Attraction Night Game Infield,,seduction
This is how I have gotten laid consistently..,"So I wanted to share my thoughts after several years of being in the game. 

First of all, girls are different. Some will sleep with you on the first date, others need more time. But generally, almost all girls will sleep with you after the third date.

Here is my strategy: When I meet a girl, I like to have a nice conversations with her for a few minutes, to 1) find out if I want to spend more time with her, and 2) to get her interested in me. This can be at a bar, cafe, street, anywhere..

After I get her number, I typically message her on whatsapp the next day. Sometimes I message the same day if I met her in the morning or early afternoon. There is no good reason to wait two days or a long time.

I then like to have a decent number of message exchanges back and forth to build comfort. So lets say at least 8 or so messages each. If she is slow, then maybe I could do with less. If she loves chatting, then maybe more.

Within a few days, I ask her out for a cup of coffee, a walk or similar. We just chat have a good time and enjoy ourselves. If I dont like her or cant hold a conversation with her, I make this my first and last date with her.

If i like her, I escalate as much as I can without being pushy. Meaning, I touch her shoulder, arms, if she has a ring on her finger I might ask about it and touch her hand, etc. 

I also tease her and make fun of her if I can. I try my best to make here smile.

After the drink or if we are just walking, I try to walk us past my apartment. I will stop outstide and say, thats where I live, up there. I will then start talking about my apartment, what its like, etc. and then say ""Hey, let me show you real quick!"". I do not ask, I just say and then proceed to open the door. I cant remember last time a girl said no.

When inside my apartment, things change very fast. I continue to escalate as much as possible. If I dont feel it is going anywhere, we just chill and nothing happens. At least now she has been inside my apartment and next time when I inivte her over, her barriers to come are super low.

If things go super well, I normally say at some point.. ""Hey I have has such an amazing day with you.. I think you are super fun. And since its been so much fun, I wanted to ask you something crazy: Can I kiss you?"" If things have gone well up to this point, very few girst say no. And even if she says no, I just ask again later and typically we kiss. Sometimes all we do is kiss. But there is a short journey from kissing to sex :)

Its really quite simple and has worked so well for me many, many times.

Good luck guys :)


",seduction
College Game,"I was wondering if you guys could link me some good college game books. With normal PUA, I’ve been able to get laid up to a certain point. But sometimes I feel like I just don’t get the game in college, PUA isn’t totally geared for it. So can you all help me out?",seduction
Does Race Matter In Attracting Woman?,,seduction
Learning to meet and attract women can save your life!,"Recently I got a realization about what happens when we don't take action to develop the essential life skill for meeting and attracting women.

Let's imagine the average Joe who doesn't do cold approach and is flirting with Jenny from work. Since he doesn't have options and she probably has a boyfriend, he has troubles getting her. Basically he doesn't have a way to satisfy his sexual needs besides masturbation, which massively hurts his confidence.

Additionally, he might spend some amount of time at work and at home thinking about or trying not to think about Jenny which takes away from his focus and will power. Thus, his self awareness decreases and his ability to do great at work. This further spirals down his confidence and he finds himself cutting away his sleep to catch up on work from home but later being unable to properly focus at work, because he is too tired. Furthermore, this causes him great stress and his health starts to take some hits as well.

As a result his life becomes smaller and smaller and his brain shrinks and his health and life fall apart until one of these two outcomes happen:

1. He completely falls off and gets fired from his job, then becomes a drug or alcohol addict.
2. He wakes the fuck up and takes responsibility for meeting his own sexual needs by joining the dating game. Then, he regains his focus, self-awareness and ability to navigate life with intention.

Basically, 1) is a downward spiral and 2) is an upward spiral. I've been in 1) for the past 5 months and just recently started the painful but healthy transitioning towards 2).

Please guys! Be aware of this and take control of your lives!",seduction
The girl at subway,"So where I work theirs a subway and I never go in but today I wanted a sandwich. So i go in and the girl there is at less a 8 probably a 9 outside of work clothes. So I asked for a meatball foot long. She tells me they no meatballs, I make a remark about it and she laugh. So I ask for a cheese steak and she told me they didn't have it and again another remark and laugh.

So we're talking well she's making the sandwich and she is like I'll give you 10% off. Well she was ringing me up she was pulling her hair and smiling everytime I said something.

My question is if she's into me how do get the number and than date from here?",seduction
How long should a date be?,"We plan to get a coffee after school and we have around 2 hours before our bus(we go with the same one).

Is this too long? 

Cuz if it goes bad we're fucked for an hour or so, but if it goes well we can do other stuff like play pool, walk or some shit.

e: we already knew each other before the date",seduction
getting a boner while kissing,"whenever I am kissing my girlfriend or talking long on the phone, my dick starts to erect. The thing is that I am  embarrassed to have a boner on a public place and it is affecting me a lot. If there is anyone who had experienced this kind of thing, please let me know if there is any thing I had to do to stop it.",seduction
I have just realized....,"I have just realized that this subreddit doesn't only teaches you how to attract women but also how to become a better person. 

I went to this subreddit to learn how to become attractive but i never thought that I will learn something more from it . Thanks to this community I learned a ton of things about having a happy and full life. ",seduction
The approach... The Struggle,"Hello all, long time lurker. TLDR of my romantic story is I am now 27 years old and recently single after a nearly 8 year long relationship and therefore am rustyer then the Titanic at this point. I am in a new city with very few ""friends"" none of which are interested in the scene anymore since they are all married.

My big struggle is just opening the conversation, and never feels like a good time, or just plain inappropriate (banks or grocery stores). I feel like I either need to find a good wingman again... I'm not sure since the city I am in is very... Clique-y? People are very weary of newcomers because it's a vacation town and have no interest in investing time with people they don't know because they would probably just be gone within a week.

Are there any apps or forums for men/women who are legitimately looking for a wingman/women?(in my experience a wing women is best).",seduction
How to pull shy girls,"I’m something of an irregular introvert/extrovert. While I can usually get a pull or makeout with the loud-party-animal-girl types, I actually find it really difficult to pull shy girls. I tend to find I have more in common with them however.


Very often, i will get mixed signals from them. I tend to avoid texting as much as possible, but concluded that maybe it’s better to use texting more for these types of girls. I’m also partially worried about coming off to strong.Any advice?

TLDR: build attraction with shyer girls",seduction
5 Ways to Know If You’re: Playing to Win? Or Playing Not to Lose?,"Improving yourself and your pick-up game is an awesome thing to do. It’s fun too. And it becomes really fun once you’re consistently getting more numbers, more dates, hotter girls, etc.

So how is your pick-up game going? Are you out there slayin girls left and right, or are you stuck on something? Maybe you’re seeing inconsistency in results. Maybe you’re getting a lot of 6s and 7s, but for some reason, those 9s and 10s you see everywhere are still eluding you. 

Whatever the case may be, if you’re game isn’t where you want it to be, then it’s time to ask yourself: Are You Playing To Win? Or Are You Playing Not To Lose?

Here’s 5 ways to know:

**1.**  **Hesitation Causes You To Miss Opportunities**

Hesitation in front of women can be good or bad. If you’re doing it on purpose it can be good. For example, if you’re exchanging a few glances with her while you’re engaged in conversation with other chicks (or other people in general), then it can be good. It can demonstrate that other chicks are interested in you and that other people are excited to talk to you. It can demonstrate that you’ve got other things to do and immediately going over to talk to her isn’t the top thing on your priority list. 

When done with a flirty confidence (i.e. she gets the message that you see her, you looked at her just a few moments too long, but you’re busy working the room right now) it can cause a lot of favorable tension and anticipation to build. And it can make her all-the-more excited to talk to you when you ultimately make your way over there. 

However, if you’re hesitation is not intentional, then you’re immediately sending the wrong signals. For example, if you’re standing with friends, but not particularly engaged in conversation, then you’re not “busy.” You’re not “working the room.” If you look at her “a little too long” in this case, but then don’t do anything, she immediately gets the signal that you’re nervous and/or you perceive her as being of higher social value (higher status) than yourself. Women can get that message almost instantly and it’s a total turn off which is difficult for you to recover from. 

So when you analyze your current game, if you determine that you’re still hesitating unintentionally, then this is a critical issue you must address. The “bonus points” you get by being a decisive guy who just walks over within a few seconds of making eye contact (i.e. in the situations where you’re not busy; where you’re not hesitating on purpose) is way more important to attraction than any stumbling you might do during the conversation once you get there. 

When you're playing to win, you either hesitate on purpose, or not at all. 

**2.** **You’re Low-balling Yourself**

What kind of chicks are you bedding these days? 6s? 7s? 8s? If you’re consistently bedding girls in this range and can’t seem to get 9s and 10s, there is only one reason. Really. Only one. 

It’s because: YOU DON’T BELIEVE YOU DESERVE 9s and 10s.

You can say you want 9s and 10s. You can say that you believe it. But somewhere inside of your subconscious, you have convinced yourself that you don’t deserve it. 

Think about it this way. You read a lot about game. You discuss game with other dudes. Have you ever seen anybody say: do *this kind of game* in order to get 8s, but do *that kind of game* in order to get 10s? Of course not. There’s no difference in what you’re supposed to do in order to bed 8s versus 10s. The game is the same.

The difference is what you believe you deserve. When you go out, what you’re most likely doing is seeing 8s and 10s and subconsciously deciding that you don’t deserve 10s. Then you just go after the 8s. 

The solution to this is to start approaching women who are “out of your league.” When you first do this, you’ll probably get rejected. What’s important is to realize that the reason you’re getting rejected all boils down to one thing. You still don’t believe you deserve these girls. And they can sense that. 

However, after you do this a few times, you’ll start to see that talking to 10s is no different than talking to 8s. After that, you’ll slowly start to believe that you deserve (and can get) these girls. Then you’ll get one. And after that, you’ll really start to believe. 

When you're playing to win, you consistently go after the hottest women in the room.

**3. You’re Losing Momentum**

Nearly everything you want to accomplish in life requires momentum. Think about any project, passion or idea that you’ve started, but have then let slip to the back-burner. It just sits there, day after day, and nothing gets done. And it’s all because you lost momentum.

Pick-up is no different. If you want to get good, you need to take consistent action. You just need to keep doing it, no matter the outcome of any particular approach. Every approach will teach you something. Every approach will build your momentum.

If you really want to get good, then make it a point to approach a minimum of 1 girl per day in the midst of your daily routine. Make it a habit. Something you do everyday on the way to work or after school. If you do that enough, you’ll feel like the day is incomplete if you forget to make an approach. Once you get to that point, approaching will be second nature and your momentum will be enormous. 

When you're playing to win, you make pick-up a habit and build your momentum everyday. 

**4. Other People’s Thoughts Are Still Bothering You**

When you play to win, other people aren’t going to like it. As sad as that may be, the reality is that many people hate to see others succeed. They hate it mostly because it exposes their own failures. Misery loves company, as they say. 

You have to come to terms with the fact that other people aren’t going to like seeing you win. These people may be “friends,” co-workers, strangers, dudes in the bar, whatever. These people may laugh at you. They may insult you. They may fill your head with all kinds of pessimistic thoughts about even *the idea* of trying to improve your game. 

If you want to win, you have to ignore these voices and thoughts completely. And realize that the more success you have, the more the negative voices will appear. The most successful people in the world are the ones who also have the most haters. 

By the way, if you want to truly get back at these people, just have massive success. As Frank Sinatra said: “the best revenge is massive success.”

**5. You’re Still Giving A Fuck**

Guys who don’t care about pulling women are the ones who pull women left and right. Guys who want to pull women so badly are the ones who always go home alone. It’s the ultimate irony. Human beings run from what chases them and chase what runs from them. If you want a girl, she runs from you. If you don’t give a fuck, she chases you.

Concerning yourself with “outcome” is like carrying a bag of bricks around on your shoulder. It’s heavy and tiresome. And it makes it harder to achieve the very outcome you desire. So just set those bricks down. Tell yourself that you don’t care about the outcome. Repeat it over and over if necessary. Once you do that, you’ll find the outcome you desire is actually much easier to achieve. [Fuck it.](http://dailymanup.com/how-to-approach-women-attract-girls-get-laid-make-her-want-you/)  

Check out [more articles](http://dailymanup.com/how-to-attract-women-turn-girls-on/) on upping your game and Making Women Chase You, [here](http://dailymanup.com/attract-women-talk-girls-make-conversation/). ",seduction
how do you increase your game,how do you practice talking to people without being awkward or weird i'm trying to better myself in any way i can,seduction
Potentially Friendzoned. Any tips?,"Does anyone have any tips for someone potentially in the friendzone?

There's a girl in my social circle that I get along very well and we have tons of things in common, inside jokes, etc. We used to work together and even then people suspected there was something going on between us (even though there wasn't). Anyway, i find myself hanging out with her more often recently (about once a week), but mostly with our larger group of friends.

I honestly feel there's chemistry between us, but i've never made a move on her. I've made an effort to be more physical (hugs, touching when talking), but i've yet to cross the romantic touch barrier with her. We've known each other for over a year (via work) but only just started becoming closer since this past summer. Is there still hope? If she did have feelings for me do you think I may have lost my window?

I have been known to slow-play a lot of my previous relationships. My last two relationships (which lasted over 3.5 years each) all started as friendships, but to be completely honest I took way too long to make a move.

I'd appreciate any tips/encouragement to help me move this one along!",seduction
Quick Tip On Picking A Spot For Daygame,"If you prefer to daygame in one spot (e.g. sit and people-watch or listen to a course on your laptop, and approach when your type of girl walks by) rather than walk around, it may be hard to figure out what spot to pick, especially somewhere with clusters of stores like malls or city centres (i.e. there's not just one general area to hang out at), or when foot-traffic is sparse (when it's busy everywhere, it matters less where you pick), and places you don't know well.

You can explore and discover your own favourite spots, or if you're time-conscious, you can just ask: Find a female shop attendant, or a girl who seems to know the area (has shopping bags, or looks well-dressed), and say something like ""I'm looking for my friends, but they're not answering their phones - if I was looking for the most ladies fashion and shoe stores in one area, where should I look?"". That'll point you towards the right direction for where girls shop without much grief. 

Change up the question to ""are there any sales or events on that they may be at?"" to get even more relevant recommendations for that time of day.

Ask more than one girl, and pick the places most reliably mentioned, or collate a list of places to check out.

You can even use this as an indirect opener - something like ""If you were shopping, where would you go around here?"". This is especially functional, since girls of a similar look or style or level of fashion tend to visit similar stores, so you're essentially approaching girls who are your type to help you find more girls who are your type.

Happy daygaming!",seduction
How To Deal With Foreign Girls With Little/No English + Infield,,seduction
How do I stop dedicating my happiness to women?,"I have my life sorted out in terms of academics, job and social life. But I keep putting my remaining happiness in women. I remember the months I was dating as some of my happiest memories. I had good times with my exes, and the time we spent together. Although some abused or cheated on me, I still remember the good parts of our relationship. I’m just sad that they moved on to date other people. 

How do I move on and stop dedicating my happiness to women?",seduction
It's So Frustrating Seeing Everybody Else In A Relationship But Me,"I just don't get it, I don't know how to get a girlfriend, or even get a date for that matter.

&amp;#x200B;

When it comes to dating, I am a complete and utter failure.  My whole life, as young as Kindergarden, iv'e been obsessed with girls, so I am disappointed that here I am at 23 years old and i'm still a kissless virgin.

&amp;#x200B;

It seems like everywhere around me, people are going on dates, having sex, and getting into a relationship. All of my friends are in relationships, my whole family has someone, people are posting pictures of themselves with their significant other.   It seems like our society is literally obsessed with love, dating, and sex so for those who miss out on these things, it makes us feel like we're missing out.

&amp;#x200B;

It has nothing to do with looks, i'm anywhere from a 4-6/10 depending on the day and I could complain that I can't get a girlfriend because i'm too ugly, yet I know loads of guys who arne't conventionally attractive with pretty girlfriends and it's not because they're rich.  I could complain it's because i'm too short, yet I also see short guys with cute girlfriends.

&amp;#x200B;

I just don't get it, I don't understand.   Was I meant to be single forever?",seduction
Social circle game getting worse as other forms of game improve,"So I started doing day game about 5 months ago, and night game for a bit longer than that. 

I have no real problems approaching random women, but now I'm nervous to ask out a girl in my class. It doesn't help that 2 of my friends in that class have already gotten rejected by her, I'm not sure if I should make a joke about it or what.",seduction
Why Men Pull Away and What to Do When it Happens?,,seduction
"Lets try it again, guys who actually improved themselves. How did it affect your social life OUTSIDE of dating and attracting women?","I don't want a life story of what you did to improve or what books you read, I want to hear of results. When I say outside of dating, I mean did you like actually make friends or not.

Also, **no high school and college guys allowed, it is supposed to be super easy to make friends in that stage of life anyways**.",seduction
Girl asking for directions,Hey I have a question about an encounter I had. I’m pretty bad at reading people and can’t tell when girls are interested at all. So this week it was homecoming week at my school. I walking pst a parking section and this girl faces me and starts smiling. She’s looking for her friend at Dunkin Doughnuts. We made conversation about what we did during homecoming as she and I walked towards the building she was looking for. She was very friendly and smiling a lot. She was probably just looking for directions but was she interested as well? I wanted to ask for her Snapchat at the end but I didn’t want to be creepy cause she might have just been looking for directions and that’s it.,seduction
Finally asked her out,"So I’ve had a huge crush on this chick for a while - real bad case of oneitis. Fake scenarios in my head, idolizing her, - the whole gambit. She’s real pretty too, probably like a 9/10 and with a awesome personality to boot. I noticed something different with us today, we both got drunk (which is probably what stirred all of this), but basically I let go of her for a while and decided I didn’t have a chance and instead I should just focus on having fun. In the process, I guess a few chicks started hitting on me and she ended up seeing. This prompted her to go into overdrive and start climbing all over me, putting her head on me, the whole deal. We ended up staying awake until 6 am just talking about our life stories and she ended up admitting she had the same thoughts about me, thought about the same made up scenarios, and so on. Obviously at this point I knew I HAD to ask her out so I did, and not surprisingly she said yes. 

That’s not the point of this story though. The point is, I never would of had this chance or experience if I didn’t stop putting her on a pedestal, if I didn’t stop validating myself with her opinions of me, if I didn’t just decide to have fun and see where the wind took me. So morale of the story is stop caring, for real. She’ll see it, and she’ll want to be a part of it. Make your life as interesting as possible, live for yourself, and everything else will fall together after. 

Just thought this story ended up capturing the essence of this subreddit. Unfortunately, this wasn’t a lesson I could learn from here. It was something I needed to learn myself. But I hope this inspires someone to take the plunge too. 

Thanks, seddit.",seduction
Instagram and Facebook pick up,"Before you jump on me with ""dude just meet girls in real life"" I want to be clear.  

I want to text girls on Instagram/Facebook that I didn't meet yet in person, make her interested enough to give me a phone number and meet with me. I don't intend to make her fall in love with me over texting.

Everywhere I look it's the same ""no. Only on real life"" answar to that question and I don't get it. There's no reason why I couldn't talk a bit with a girl, and ask her on a date. It's been done millions of times before... and it's very logical that some lines may not work and have bigger percentage of her not noticing me while other lines can get her attention if she's a single girl not turning down the idea of dating.


So, how should I interact with them on both Facebook and Instagram to have nice chances of meeting up?",seduction
Anxiety in field,"Went yesterday to a huge place, party started at 3 pm and lasted to 8 am. It's in Brazil and i am myself from the Netherlands. I am in Brazil for an exchange. I notice i got attention from lot's of girls probably because i look different. 

But i felt quite anxious, i was there with a Brazilian friend but he made is own plans and went talking to other friends. So i felt kinda lost and lonely. Later on a girl of 35 years started talking to me and kissing. Well, that was nice but she left to go back to her friends later. 

I met some other guys whom i met earlier so i went partying with them. But still i felt anxious and intimidated to the place and language barrier. So i decided to leave the party halfway because my state was not good and i felt tired.

What could i have done... i was enjoying the music for a big part of the night and dancing a lot. But i didn't have really contact with girls. 

Oh yeah i had eye contact a few times with a real hot girl in front of me in a waiting que, then she gave me some strong eye contact i kept looking and smiling as well, she looked away and started laughing with her friend. After that she seemed to avoid eye contact with me. 

Furthermore, there were this two bar girls which showed interest in me, i noticed their smiles and eyes. They also helped me way faster then the rest of the people standing there. But i couldn't really do anything with them...",seduction
Gaming in Barcelona,"I'll be there for the last 10 days of December and I was looking for a wing. 

&amp;#x200B;

Also, should I spend my entire trip there or are there any other good cities nearby for solo travel and pickup?",seduction
[Question] How to ask girl out?,"I know I know. Just say ""wanna go out sometimes"" blah blah blah
But of course if you really like girl she might shittest you like ""oh I don't know my plans"" or ""call me later"" or other shit. If in real life you can do what you want that now you wanna walk with girl and shittests can ruin everything.
SO how to pass all shittests when you ask girl out?",seduction
I have an issue when girls come up to me at bars/clubs,"So I'll be out with friends.. I'll walk into a bar or a dancefloor and a girl (at times really attractive) will move her way to me, single me out and start dancing with me (grinding, dancing etc.) I'm pretty outgoing, and a lot of girls love my personality. Now I get very mixed reviews on my looks, I think I'm a decent looking black guy but my luck with ladies kinda says otherwise (lol). But I have been told that I am good looking from both guys and girls, but also told I'm not.... 

E.g. A couple of weeks ago I walked into a bar and this really hot blonde who was with her friends, singles me out, grabs my hand and starts dancing with me. We had a nice lil convo and I got her # afterwards. Now I know you guys are thinking... Well what's the problem...

The problem is, it never leads to anything... I mean I feel as if that is a clear IOI but I'll chat them up, get their #, but never go home with them. If I text them the next day... No response. 

It got to the point where I thought girls saw something about me that makes them want to fuck with me lol. Unrelated to girls dancing with me, even one of my friends has noticed that random girls we meet out love to play around with me in a jokingly way but not really want to escalate further ""bro why do girls love fucking with you"". I mean this shit happens in different cities and states lol. 

Now that's how I used to think. I've stopped beating myself up and I told myself that ""if this happens multiple times in different places relatively frequently, they must be into you, you just have to have better closing game when it happens.""  So fellas, do you think there's something about me that girls see to fuck around with me or do I just need to close better? If it's the latter, what do you guys suggest?
",seduction
"Losing momentum: mid term study week, steady fuck partner or infatuation for a girl?","So after a successful last week, 4 dates, 2 f-close, 1 k-close and the 4th a beautiful girl I might want to date long term I decided to take a week off for midterms and focus on me.  I have a midterm tomorrow and also working on my resume so I’ve been focusing on that.

Now I did go out Friday with some buddies, clubs we went to were empty so there wasn’t a lot of targets.  Still I feel like my momentum has gone down.  Like my brain thinks different this week.

Could it be I’m studying a hard subject which makes my brain behave differently?  Is the sex I’m having with the 2 girls made me not desperate to go out and get more girls?  Could it be a desire for a possible long relationship causing me to think differently?

My plans is to go out Monday after my midterm to see if I bounce back...  what do you think is going on, all of the above?  How do I bounce back!?",seduction
How to handle compliments?,"I do not know how to respond to compliments. Sometimes they come from a girl that I find cute, sometimes they come from a person that is invisible to me. Some examples are ""I like your hair (I have shoulder-long chaotic wavy black hair)"", ""I like your style"", ""that's cool"", ""you're cool"", even ""you're handsome"", ""you're smart"" etc.

First I want to handle them well, then I want to use them in my advances. Is there any guide, what should I do?

Thanks!",seduction
Women of Reddit Here's how to seduce and turn your guy on!!,,seduction
Using the law of attraction to get girls,"So I been using the law of attraction since 2016  and honestly it has changed my life , I have gone from 10 girls a year to 24 girls in 2017 to 35 in 2018 the year is not over yet but I would like to reach 40 maybe 50. Who else uses the law of attraction to get girls .

I have heard before about inner game but , this has totally changed things for me which is super weird because I didn’t  expect it to but it did .

I just wanna know who else uses the LOA to attract more females and what did you use to increase the chances of hooking up or closing?",seduction
Hong Kong Cold Approach/Daygame - Looking for a Wingman in HK (香港),"Anyone here in Hong Kong and interested in doing some Daygame Cold Approach?

I've  done some street approach here and it seems like the women are very  friendly and nice. I can pretty much whatsapp/wechat close every one.  I'm actually learning Chinese now so its so easy to open them by saying a  few words of Chinese :)

PM me if you're looking for a wing.

Cheers!",seduction
One person to approach 4 set,"Guys I need some material. How you approach 4 girls set in bar/pub alone? What do you say to open? And what routines you use after(tests, games etc.)? 
Thank you.",seduction
Experienced Wings in Hong Kong,"Hey all, I'm from New York and recently moved to Hong Kong and probably staying here for another two-three years. I'm looking for wings who are experienced or who've had some prior success to go out to LKF or Soho with me. I'm decently experienced with game and have been going out \~2-3 times a week for the past 6 months. Ideally, I'd like someone who is equally experienced so that we can exchange tactics and learn together. If you are a pure beginner please wait/develop until you are somewhat good before hitting me up. My style is chill, confident with a lot of work on sub communication and I generally don't like to spam approach. Please send me a private message if you're interested.",seduction
I lost my “game” and now I’m being to nice to her,"Hi dudes and dudets. 

I’ll Keep this short, but there is a thing I don’t get. 

I used to have game back in the days, but somehow I can’t manage to pull the Girl in a long-distance relationship towards me eventhough she wants my Company. 

She is 21 and from Prague and I’ll admit it. She is hot and horny. She created a new tinder account just to find me eventhough we live in the same dorm. 

The thing is that my “cold” heart isn’t as cold as it used to be. 

I wanna get back to the “old me”, where seduction was easy. 

What can I do? ",seduction
Getting Overwhelmed in a Club!? 3 Simple Steps,,seduction
How to connect with women in nyc,"Moved here a bit ago and I'm finding it hard to connect with people especially women. I'm a good looking guy no doubt. I see women checking me out but that doesn't help. 

Part of it ( maybe more) is me I use to be a player back in college and before i moved here i never thought of getting a women as a major hassle and then somehow I became nervous around women , not sure where this came from.  I have  a hard time talking with women. Especially ones I find beautiful.

I've hooked up with a few but never got to a second date. I notice people here are absorbed in their own lives. People are always busy doing whatever  

After venting to a friend she said nyc dating scene is one of the toughest so I shouldn't be so hard on myself.  


When  I moved here I didn't pursue women at all  I just worked n did my own thing thinking of it happens it happens  I did that for a while and nothing ever happened lol now I developed  this anxiousness  

I started by just saying hello or very small talk like pretending to be lost to at least 1 women I find attractive  a day . 

I put it on my reminder list on my phone to remind me,

I use visualization and mental thoughts to help motivate me.

Really I'm not sure what I'm expecting to get from posting this but I figure fuck  it maybe I'll get some good advice or some shit Idk  

Well end of rant  
Cheers ✌",seduction
What was the final thing that pushed you to approach women?,"In other words, what was the ""last straw"" that made you say want to get over your nervousness and approach?

I ask because I'm 23 and have been reading off and on about seduction since I was 18 (started back when Simple Pickup made videos) but still haven't really been motivated to actually follow through and approach more women. So I'm looking for things to motivate me",seduction
Let Me Know Where I Go Wrong?,"Hey guys, I’m new on the forum, but I have been pursuing pick up and seduction for a while now. I’m a sopohmore in a small college town. I need some advice.

I’m a decent looking guy, pretty skinny, short (5’8”, not that it really matters). I really take care of myself. I eat healthy, don’t do drugs (besides an occasional hit of a juul), and I work out 2-3 times a week.

I go out friday and saturday nights solo, and usually I am either sober or almost sober. I am a really lax dude, and I enjoy talking to girls without an outcome in mind.

But I haven’t gotten laid in a while. Every night I go out I go home alone, never with a number (because I don’t ask), and scratching my head because I’m just lost.

I break taking a girl home into time frames. 

The second into the minute (initial approach and getting past introductions). The first few seconds I talk to a girl I can get a sense if she is into me, and typically if she isn’t adding much to the conversation I don’t feel inclined to really push farther. Other times, she is happy and smiling but when I try to push the conversation it fizzles out and she turns her back on me. 

But the strange thing is that if she is into me, and I know for sure she is.. I pull out. Like I will excuse myself and just go. And I don’t know why. I screw up alot of interactions this way, and it confuses me because I’ll be hard on myself for not going for it after the fact.

Turning that minute into an hour (getting to know her and escalating) is also hard for me. I’m a touchy feely guy so I have no problem with it, and I have been doing a good job asserting myself physically by touch. However, the actual conversation part boggles me.

There is a cresendo in the conversation, around a minute to two minutes in, when it’s natural and easy. But then I run out of stuff to say. And then I’m scrambling to come up with stuff and I end up ejecting. When I write it out it seems simple enough to answer my question, “ask her about herself” or “just talk about whatever you feel like”.

I would do that, but in that moment it doesn’t feel.. “right”. And either she or I lose interest.

I just have this deep feeling of apathy and boredom mixed with fear of what might come next (kissing, sex). My mind is jumping several steps ahead, thinking of all the possibilities before it has even happened.

Turning the hour into a close is easy for me, despite me having trouble with the prior stages. When I feel comfortable and I really like a girl I can open up so easily and things naturally go from there.

However, because I eject on most interactions, it requires alot of effort on the girls part. This doesn’t just relate to picking up chicks, this also applies in relationships.

The only success with women I have is when they do alot of the legwork and push past those initial stages. It’s a bad habit, but how do I break it and assert myself more?

tl;dr When a girl likes me I get nervous and pull out. How do I assert myself more and push myself to keep going?",seduction
Solo pick up...,"So I saw the post earlier about solo pick ups. I'm sure it's been covered here before ,but if you have advice or a successful time you have done a solo pick up drop it in the comments. Give specifics was it random? Was it at the bar? ",seduction
Unique Oneitis Situation,"I'll copy and paste my original post down below if you'd like to read it - but here's my current situation: I'm a college student living in an off-campus apartment with a girl (just me and her). The girl is dating one of my guy friends from back home (he's playing junior college baseball 3 hours away). The girl and I don't party or go out very often - we are definitely what you would call ""homebodies."" I originally asked Reddit what I could do to get out of the friendzone with this girl because we will be living together for the next 2 years and I didn't want to be her ""emotional tampon"" for that long. The fact that she didn't see me as a sexual man and saw me more as a gay best friend frustrated me severely. Though I'd love for us to be more than platonic friends, I think the slim odds of that happening are not worth the stress this situation is causing me. It pains me to admit it, but I have oneitis for her. Since she's the only girl I see on a regular basis, I have gotten very attached to her and I've become too emotionally invested in her. I'm asking for any practical advice on how to handle this situation. I want to cure my oneitis and become detached from this girl before I stress out any more. What's the best way to do this without ruining our living situation? Thanks in advance.",seduction
How do I arrange sexual encounters on business trips?,"This is the thing  I've been struggling with for some time now. Where I've been working, we have these conferences/workshops from time to time where people from different branches and departments across the world gather in one place for a few days to do stuff and all sleep at the same hotel, keep socialising etc. Theoretically, this is an ideal situation but I've never been able to actually turn any of the encounters there into sex (or even making out, for that matter).

Usually I just try to meet as many new female colleagues as possible but the conversations keep revolving around what we've been doing on a given day/what the conference was about and whether we liked it/the regular ""oh where you from?"" kind of chit-chat. I've been having real struggles with actually finding a way to see if she's interested in a sexual encounter. Like, how do I do that with someone that I've just met a day or two ago, that I'll probably see for the next few days, without being a total creep and doing a leap from ""oh I've never been to &lt;her homeland&gt;, should I?"" to ""hey, perhaps you'd like to join me in my room?"" ? How do you gradually build the tension and make it a natural question?

It's obvious that in this kind of situations, a lot of both men and women are looking for casual sex but I just don't have any idea how to actually turn that in my favour. Will be grateful for all and any tips.",seduction
Progress vs regression?,"Hey guys, 

For those of you successful with pickup:

I’ve been learning about pick up but I’m at the point where it’s time to take some action and not just read.

After blowout after blow out, everybody talks about you growing thick skin and learning from your mistakes. 

But it must happen where you actually regress, start getting in your head and feeling like total shit.

That’s my biggest fear with learning pickup. Never gaining progress but moving backwards.

Thoughts?",seduction
Looking for someone with good experience in seduction in Birmingham,"Hi guys I'm totally new to the game and I'd like to improve, Looking for someone with good experience in seduction in Birmingham or Coventry !

Cheers.",seduction
"Is what I THINK I'm going for, ""casual hookups""? Or is it full-on bf/gf? How do I do this thing?","Wasn't sure how to phrase that for the title. Basically, I have never really had ""normal"" relationships that starts out with me approaching a girl, going on dates, and/or one night stands.

The past ten years have been me getting involved with girls I kind of already knew (I didn't ask out a stranger) and things got serious pretty fast.

Needless to say, I ended up with a lot of relationships that didn't pan out.

I have been single and working on myself for a couple years now and I would really like to start seeing girls again.

I tried a dating app for the first time recently and when me and her finally met up, it kind of occurred to me that I didn't know what I was doing. I wasn't sure if I was looking for a relationship, or a hook up. It then occurred to me that I had never (successfully) had a hook up. Just those short lived, rocky relationships.

That encounter was awkward and I didn't know how to escalate it and I think I had some bogus idea in my head that if we wanted to go farther it was going to be all relationship-like, and I didn't think I was down for that.

I suppose I need to learn how to know what it is I want, and go for it.

How do I navigate this late 20's dating world? How do I even approach a casual sex thing?

I've been under a rock.

Here are my caveats:
I am almost thirty.
I am busy with school.
I am sober.

What do you guys think?",seduction
So my drink got spiked,"Hey all

I was out tonight and it was pretty good opened a set of three which turned into a set of four. As well as a set of two. Plus I made a brief bit of flirty conversation with a cute bartender all smiles but she was at work so I didn't push it. 

Later on I was approached by some guy who complained about getting girls and I ran him through my style of game. He was a little drunk but ended up calling it ""u/natpref2 style of game"" and telling a passerby about it, which after years of work was a huge compliment.

So, later on I was drinking a glass of water in a club and I started to feel very relaxed. There are two points I think someone could have slipped something in my drink. The glass never left my hand nor did I look away. Talking to two guys I had the feeling I was being misdirected, think a hand shake with eye contact with a subtle motion of the their free hand.

I wasn't really in the mood to keep up with my wingmen so I sat on my own and watched the dance floor for a bit. Having been at work all day before this it isn't really suprising I wanted to sit on my own for a bit. My friends were having a great time so I wriggled back into the chair and got comfortable. Thought about going on my phone but I was happy to just sit and finish my drink. Opened a couple of sets and finished the work week no need to push it, a girl got onto the table in front of me and started booty dancing  but I didn't care I was content. When I finished my drink I let my head roll back and closed my eyes for a second. I stared into the black of my eyelids and though ""I am so calm and happy haha almost exactly how Benzodiazepines feel...""

Fuck. Noticed something off about that guy and my drink. Suddenly I can't keep up. A happy feeling of overwhelming apathy is washing over me. Now I have just let my head fall back so I can close my eyes in the middle of a noisy club. All I had to drink tonight was water and energy drinks, not a drop of alcohol (I try to face my fears sober if you feel).

Now this is where being nice to that bar tender from earlier and not being pushy or a jerk paid off. Though honestly the only reason I went to her was because in my confusion all I knew was that she was familiar and safe. I made my way over to her and when she saw me she asked what I wanted and when it took me around 45 seconds to say ""... uhh... ughhh .. I think ... ummn... my drunk... drink was... spiked."" I couldn't stay awake, I couldn't speak, I couldn't use my phone properly, I couldn't do anything but sit, and I didn't care about any of it I was happily apathetic.  

This bartender went out of her way to get the bar staff to watch out for me while I sat down. Which was fortunate because while on my own one guy tried to offer me sips of his drink and another placed a drink in front of me and then walked off. In both cases the staff told the guys to fuck off and took the drinks away lest I forget not to drink them. 

My friends got me home safe. Moral of the story: really watch your drinks, not all suspicions should be written off as paranoia, be nice to the girls as you never know when you may end up needing them.

What a night.",seduction
"Follow: seddit's first advice worked, need some tips on next steps:)"," So guys , in a previous post I asked on how to ask my teacher (she teaches us private Spanish in small 6 people group ) she's my age 26. I asked her out after class and it worked. We stayed out for couple of hours, and had a good time. The thing is I was using some touching techniques ( like on the arm ) , but there was nothing from here side,  So I'm not sure, how to escalate this to become more flirty ? 

Thanks !  ",seduction
Solo pickup for the first time,"Went out today solo (for the first time, btw). I started the night at around 11:30pm in SF (I know, it's on the later side).

I approached a few times, but honestly there was just a sea of dudes everywhere I went. It's my first time going out solo so it was a little nerve wracking. My approach tactic was to give an honest compliment and then try to start a conversation from there (ie ""I like your earrings."") or literally just say ""hi, what's your name?"".

Anyways, it was a relatively uneventful night (didn't get any numbers or anything). And feeling dejected, I found myself at a strip club at the end of the night.

Honestly, I don't really know where to go from here. I've been told I'm a decently good looking guy, though on the skinnier side (140lbs, 5'9""), but somehow I've hit a dry spell. 

I feel like shit. Anybody have any feedback for me?",seduction
Is my plan good or not?,"I've been thinking of an approach for a little bit and this is the best I've thought of. If it's terrible, please let me know and tell me what to change. 

I'm currently a senior in school and I'm saving this for college soon. 

My plan is to approach a woman and compliment her on something she has, like her shoes, her outfit, hair, etc. I compliment her on those and then I introduce myself and ask if I can sit on the seat next to her given she's already sitting. I then continue talking to her about what I said before, so if I told her I liked her shoes, I talk about if she's a sneaker head or if she's into fashion and all that. 

Then, I ask her what's her major and we talk about that for a minute. I then say, ""I have class soon so I have to go, if you wanna continue this, maybe I can get your number?"" 

Anything wrong with that?",seduction
12 Simple Ways To Boost Your Confidence With Women,,seduction
Day Game Infield Breakdown: My Chode To Pimp Transformation After A Break Up,,seduction
Hooking up with female friends,"I have friends that are girls, I dont act like a nice guy, I may or not be friend zoned by some of them idk for sure but I want to have casual sex with some of them. But I dont want to lose my friendship or connection because of trying to kiss or smash the girl.

**?Is there a way to go about this without ruining our friendship? 

SIDE NOTE: I was looking for answers to my question and I saw a Quora post that said this guy knows this girl who's a family friend. One time he went to give her notes for class st her aunts house. He touched her kissed her and fucked her, and few times after that too. No love just sex

I want this to happen especially its 2018 you know and sex is not so precious as back then.

How can I get a friend in bed and still be her friend? (Go in for q kiss when alone after some touching) 


****please no one give me a link to some nice guy posts, like take it slow and shit not trying to start a relationship ALSO I DONT DRINK 

",seduction
How to Avoid BAD First Impressions,,seduction
How to be more relaxed?,Okay i study abroad in Brazil don't really speak much Portuguese although it becomes better. Yesterday I went to a really cool beach party with a Brazilian friend who speaks English. So sometimes he left me because he walked to other people to talk with. I felt a bit a feeling of nervousity being alone. Although I started talking with friends of him. I still felt not confident. Also I didn't talk too many girls. ,seduction
Meet up with chick after months of no contact,"So I [22 M] was texting this girl [20 F] about 6 months ago, for a while  (she was in another state at the time) we were on great terms (flirting, her saying she wants a relationship,etc (which I wasn’t and still not against). She planned on moving to my state because of school if she got accepted (50/50 chance), in the meantime we would build rapport , so that when she got here , we’d kick it off great.  As time went by ,we kind of lost contact , because I had to focus on my career/purpose and was getting side tracked, as well as not wanting to over pursue something that’s 50/50, and after a while I naturally thought she moved on..It seemed like i ghosted her (which wasn’t what my motives were) but nonetheless..a few days ago , she messaged me , she felt like I was ghosting her and also said that she lives in my city now and that we should hang out , and now we have a date planned.  


When we meet up and get acquainted with eachother, how do I address the “ghosting” thing , if she brings it up. Or should bring it up , how do I go about it? Aside from that , I’m good. 

",seduction
"Seducing this girl, pretty sure she likes me, not sure how to go from here (not got this far with a girl without her pitying me)","Met this girl in first week of Uni, we really hit it off, hung out with her every day in freshers, now we're getting on with our lives a bit and getting to know each other outside of alcohol etc.

&amp;#x200B;

On snapchat I've been snapping her a on and off for a few weeks, always leaving messages 3/4 times the time she takes to reply (she will respond within 5 minutes whereas I'll leave it for like 20 30), doing basic push pull stuff.

&amp;#x200B;

She also after one of her lectures came to the library to see me so that's a thing.

&amp;#x200B;

So yesterday we all went out to the club and had a nice time, she was tapping my arm a bit when I was talking to other girls etc. but not giving me any real attention. Then we went back for afters and she sat next to me on the sofa and kept touching my leg and making expressions towards me etc. 

&amp;#x200B;

So I quite like her, but she's really really attractive and she knows it. She seems to own and be confident in how fit she is, but also quite likes me I think.

&amp;#x200B;

So what the fuck do I do? I'm going to a house party tonight and she's going to be there. I've never gotten this far before without the girl pitying me or fucking it up. How do I progress things? Do I just go to the house party and not make a special effort to talk to her? 

&amp;#x200B;

My instinct is to not push her any special attention the next week.",seduction
Pro tip: Delete tinder and use bumble,"Girls have to message you first on bumble. Weeds out the ones who aren’t interested. 

Tinder is complete trash now. Bumble works, tinder doesn’t. Just my $0.02",seduction
Talking to More Mature and Professional Women as a Younger Male?,"In my experience, women tend to mostly be interested in men around their age or slightly older, and with similar or higher levels of occupational status. Being a young undergrad student, I find that it's a lot more difficult to capture the interest of a woman who has finished school and has a career than it is to interest a fellow student, or maybe somebody who isn't in school and is just working, but isn't working a job that requires a lot of experience. Even interesting grad students seems a lot harder as an undergrad.

Empirical evidence seems to confirm my experience, as a lot of studies show that while males are interested in women the same age or younger than them, with the gap between their ages and the ages of preferred potential partners increasing over time, women, regardless of age, pretty consistently prefer men around their age or slightly older. And studies also show that women highly value financial stability and status in a partner.

So I'm wondering, what are some tips for ""gaming"" women who are older and have their shit way more together than I do?

For example, one woman I'm attracted to is a real-estate lawyer. Though I got her number, I definitely got the vibe that it was only out of politeness, and I never got the impression that I got to a hook point or anything. There was also only so much I could do or say, being at work (she's a customer). And I feel like regardless of what I say or do, there's not really much possibility of an attractive real-estate lawyer being into a mid-20s college kid who still lives with his mum.

I really doubt she'd ever come out for a date, so the only thing I can think to do is invite her out with friends, but to curate the group so that I bring out my friends who are a little bit older than me and closer to her age range so that she doesn't feel like she's babysitting a group of kids. A lot of the friends I have in this age range are interesting people that I love talking to: academics, artists, musicians, etc. I know it's usually seen as a bad idea to invite somebody out to a friendly outing if your intention is romantic and not just being friends, but people tell me I'm smart, interesting, and a good conversationalist, so I'm hoping that the stimulating conversations my friends and I have provide social proof and displays of value that I could use to provide a foundation from which escalating with her would actually be possible. And if none of that works and she's just not interested, oh well, at least we had a good time hanging out.

Good idea? Bad idea? What tips do you guys have?",seduction
This shit is so fucking hard,"I'm doing all the shit this sub says to do and still coming up dry. 

I know its persist, but it still fucking blows.

And it pisses me off seeing better looking dudes have an easier time. 

Seeing people who dont have personal issues blazing through social situations. 

Trying different styles of talking people to still get ignored. 

To pimp out your tinder and come up dry. 

To have people say it's time to ""settle into your own league"" when you're not even aiming that high

To hear about all the girls who you did have success with tell their friends it was a mistake or that they only did it because they were desparate. 

To have everyone to tell you to dress better, get a haircut, all that shit and follow up and still come up dry. 

I know it's just bitching but holy shit. 

I'm tired ",seduction
How can I know whether a guy is making eye contact with me because he’s interested and it’s not just random? I wouldn’t want to be giving longing looks to someone and making them uncomfortable.,,seduction
Trying to find a YT channel,"I'm looking for a YouTube channel where the coach is a short, bald dude and he often has a young women who's a few inches taller than him assist his videos. 

I'm an idiot and cannot remember the channel, his or the girl's name.

Edit: Found it eventually. https://www.youtube.com/user/TheFearlessManTV",seduction
How to enjoy 'game' when you're not seeing any results,"RSD commonly likes to about the the amount of people who give up on the pick-up community. 

Apparently, a large percentage of guys who know about the community give up after the pick-up after a few months.

Having come as far as I have, this shocks and upsets me.

It also confuses me. Once you learn it's possible to improve at seducing women, how could you ever stop trying???

Anyway, here are five tips for people who don't enjoy pick-up, aren't seeing any results and are thinking about giving up.

# 1. Get a wingman

If you've got a wingman to motivate you and share stories with, you'll enjoy your nights out a lot more. A wingman can do a lot to help ease your approach anxiety too...  

Some of the lads I met through the RSD Inner Circle have grown to become my best friends. Why wouldn't they!? They've learned how to become more fun and charismatic, and they love a good night out hitting on hot girls. 

# 2. Enjoy the attention

Everyone enjoys speaking their mind and having someone listen. You guys get to do it with smoking hot girls. Enjoy this, even if she blows you off after a couple of minutes.

Also, enjoy the freedom of the nightclub. There is no other place where you can say what you want and escalate so quickly on hot girls without repercussions. 

# 3. Lose your ego

It's fun to learn 'Ba Ba Black Sheep' from scratch on the piano even if it sounds terrible.  

It's invigorating to learn how to surf, even though you wipe out on the waves time and again.  

It's exciting to see yourself paint a better painting, even if that paiting still sucks.

Yet, people can't seem to enjoy the early days of learning pick-up. This is all because of ego. 

When we do a bad pick-up, it can feel like we're a bad person. That's not true. It's your approach the woman is rejecting, not you. She doesn't even know you. 

Once you realise this, you can start to leave your ego at the door when you approach girls. 

# 4. ""The moment I say hi, I already won""

Stealing the line from RSD Max for this.....but it's true!

I've co-launched a Telegram group for men who want to become amazing with women. Many of these guys are new to the pick-up scene. When they report on their first approaches, they always feel DELIGHTED with themselves, no matter how well it went. 

And so they should! I still feel like that too!

There's an adrenaline rush when you approach a hottie and you're not sure, even when you're really experienced at this. See this as excitement, not nerves.   

Also, be proud that you're taking steps to improve your dating life - by doing something that 99% of sober guys would NEVER do. 

# 5. Be excited that you ARE going to win. 

Game is a skill, just like painting, surfing or playing piano. 

If you practice enough, and are intelligent about improving your weaknesses, you WILL improve.  

That hottie that turned you down? You WILL sleep with girls like that if you stick at this! You'll ultimately make one your girlfriend.

The people that got good at this followed the process and stuck with it. If you do the same, you'll WIN this game. 

This should must be the most motivating factor of all.

***As mentioned, I've co-launched a Telegram group for men who want to become amazing with women. Hundreds of guys sharing their success stories and getting advice on their sticking points. Drop me a PM with your Telegram handle if you want to join.*** ",seduction
Sidestepping the pitfalls of overconfidence with plausible deniability - Expressing confidence nonverbally reduces the risk of social penalties,,seduction
Opening with direct flirt or flirting through conversation?,"Hey all,
So I get that if you're walking in the street and see a beautiful girl you can't have a full on conversation right there so a quick ""Hi, I think you're really beautiful"" and asking for a number is the way to go.


When you're in a bar or club though, or speaking with a friend of a friend etc, I've always started with regular conversation and made it flirtier and flirtier. This has worked well but lately I've been noticing dudes come up to my girl friends in clubs and just open with ""I think you're really beautiful"" and THEN having the convo.


I don't know how well this works because I get distracted having a good time so I wanted to ask you guys.. bad strategy.",seduction
5 Ways To Create Sexual Tension With A Girl,,seduction
What does it mean for a girl to be embarrassed about rejecting you,So I was this game with a group of people and I happened to reveal that this girl who was also in the group rejected me before.  She looked really embarrassed please tell me what this means. Is this an IOI? ,seduction
Few days of cuddling but still LMR,"I met a girl while traveling solo and we now travel together since 1 week.
Each night we cuddle, kiss and all of that but no sex.


I was pretty awkward the first nights because I'm still a virgin but last night I tried to get down on her for the first time and got LMR. I tried again and this time she got angry at me for not respecting her boundaries, she sounded serious.


Now we are still cuddling and she even lets me do things like kissing her inner thighs but still won't let me remove her panties.


Is it some kind of friend zone i got into?

Any chance of closing this deal?",seduction
A great exercise that will make you more attractive to girls,"So before I say what this exercise is, I’m gonna explain why it works, which goes a little something like this;

**Girls like guys who are confident and assertive**

While we like beauty and signifiers of youthful fertility, they like to see personality traits which suggest that you’re respected in the community and will be a great protector and provider for them. Loosely put, confidence is one of, if not the best possible way to convey those things to a girl. It shows that you both trust and have mastery over yourself, and that you believe in your ability to handle challenges and step up to the plate when the chips are down. And trust me, that’s a really important thing that women need to know about you.

Imagine if you went to a doctor with stage four lung cancer and he said:

*“Yeah, I might be able to help you, because I’m an OK surgeon, I guess; but really and truly I probably won’t be able to because I’m not that great.”*

How happy would you be with the idea of having him help you battle your disease? You wouldn’t be, right? But then again, what if he said:

*“Don’t worry, you’re in the best possible hands and I promise you we’ll beat this thing. I’m an excellent surgeon and I know exactly what to do to crush this cancer.”*

I’m guessing that’d be exactly what you want to hear right? Well that’s how girls feel about confident men. They don’t want you to tell them you’re confident, but they do want you to show them that you are so they can feel safe with you. Think about it, if you’re scared of them, how on earth can you be trusted to protect them from the world?

Now you might think that you’re just not confident and never have been but that’s not true. It’s not true at all, because:

**When you were a baby, you were supremely confident**

All babies are born with the confidence of James Bond mixed with Conor McGregor and a splash of Muhammad Ali thrown in for good measure. Have you ever seen one that was insecure about screaming its head off to let you know it was hungry, or nervous about staring strangers dead in the eyes for 3 straight minutes? Yeah me neither. How many times have you seen really small kids yell at their parents and say “Mommy! Mommy! Watch me dive into the pool!” or “Listen to me sing! I’m really good at singing!” Babies (and really small children) are extremely comfortable with being the centres of attention in a way that most adults just aren’t.

All of us were born with an innate level of self-worth. We just assumed that we were valuable and worthy of love, respect, and other people’s time. But as we grew up that innate belief was systematically stripped from us, usually by parents, grandparents, older siblings, teachers at school or maybe other kids.

While it was once hugely endearing for us to do silly things like try to say “Daddy” but pronounce it “Baddy” or to run around the house naked with our underwear on the top of our heads, as we got older, the love of the people we looked up to became hugely conditional. If we weren’t getting good enough grades at school, acting in an appropriately restrained way in public, or just being humble enough about our self-worth, then that love was taken away.  The people we looked up to wouldn’t hug us, play with us, be nice to us, or tell us that we were good kids. They’d just judge, isolate and punish us in hugely negative ways that crushed us.

We then started to hear things like:

*“What’s wrong with you?”*

*“Don’t get too big for your boots!”*

*“Who do you think you are?”*

*“Why can’t you be more like your cousin Amanda?”*

We heard all the above and others way more often than we heard any sort of praise and like I said before, that systematically crushed our self-confidence. FYI, it’s believed that in order for a kid to grow up with healthy levels of self-esteem they need to hear 8 compliments from their adult caregivers for every 1 negative comment or insult, but how many of us really got that?

Anyway, fast forward to when you’re an adult and trying to find the balls to talk to that hot blonde in the tight yoga pants at the bar or the college canteen and you just can’t do it. Something’s pulling you back; your mind and body are racked with fear, and you just cannae actually find the will to get it done. But why would you? You’ve been conditioned to believe that you’re not that great of a person, so with that in mind, why on earth would someone so beautiful and awesome want to give you the time of day?

**The nurture your childhood-self exercise**

Like I said, I’m going to show you an exercise that you can use to rebuild that shattered self-confidence and radiate more of the natural self-esteem you were born with. You might think it sounds like ‘woowoo, new age, hippy dippy bullshit’ but just try it for a moment and see how it fits. Just because you think something’s silly doesn’t mean it actually is, and even if it is, well you won’t lose anything by trying it, right? So with that in mind, here’s the exercise, you ready?

**Here come the pain**

Close your eyes and in your mind’s eye, go back to the house you grew up in and find the childhood version of you. Take them by the hand and bring them to wherever you live today. Show them all the cool stuff you have that they couldn’t have dreamed of when you were them (games console with all the games you want, new technology, ability to stay up late, can eat whatever food you want, etc) and see how they almost have an orgasm at how great your life is compared to theirs. Let them know that all of this and more is waiting for them in their future.

Then you’re gonna let them know that you’re the awesome, loving and protective big brother they’ve never had, and that you’re always gonna be there for them. And after that, I want you to sit them down and tell them all the stuff that you wish people said to you back when they were you.

*“You’re an amazing little kid!”*

*“I’m always gonna be here for you, and I’m never gonna let anyone hurt you, ever.”*

*“You’re so clever.”*

*“I feel really lucky to know and have you in my life.”*

*“How on earth did I ever manage to meet a kid as fantastic as you? What did I do to deserve it?”*

*“It doesn’t matter what anyone else thinks of you because I know you’re awesome and I’m never gonna leave you.”*

Say that stuff to your childhood-self and notice how much it means to both of you to hear it. Do this for as long as you need to and as often as you need to, but every day for at least 10 minutes in my opinion and with real passion and emotion. Don’t half heart it, say it like you mean it. That hurt little kid is still inside you to this today and is the cause of a lot of your pain and insecurity. By taking them under your wing and being the loving big brother that they (you) never had, you’ll help them (you) to get over the trauma of the past and radiate that innate confidence that they (you) were born with.

This will then mean that when you’re in situations that usually would have you curl up in fear (like talking to a hot girl, asking for her number, going in for the first kiss, putting your hand on her breast etc) you’ll innately know that you’re a great person who’s completely deserving of her and her time. That’ll then make you act in an appropriately confident and unstifled way and **grrrrreeeeeaaaattttlllllyyyyy** increase the odds of her reacting to you the way you hope she will.

**But why does this work?**

It works because the human brain simply can’t tell the difference between what’s real and fake. When you imagine something, your brain responds as if it was real and that’s why we get excited by action films or scared by horror films. What’s going on is that on some level our brains actually think we’re being chased down corridors by explosions or being chained down in dirty basements by Australian psychopaths. When you talk to your childhood self and tell it the stuff that nobody ever told you then as far as your brain’s concerned, somebody did tell you that stuff, you. You did.

This will help that kid (you) to heal the trauma of the past and reclaim the potent and vibrant level of self-confidence that they (you) were born with.

Ciao for now, humans.

**Lacking confidence? DM me to join my WhatsApp &amp; Telegram groups for guys who on the path to smash their limiting beliefs and become amazing with women. I’d also like to hear from girls too so don’t be shy if you’re a female, hit me up and let’s talk**",seduction
Why do you think some girls don't reply even if they have had a great time with you?,"I had a date with a girl 2 days ago. It was great , we were laughing, chatting, had a beer, we spent 4 or 5 hours together and I know (you just feel it) that she had a great time with me too. We didn't agree on anything, I just gave her a kiss to her cheek and went on our merry way. I wrote her next day on messenger that I had a great time last night. She read it, no reply. Today I asked if she'd like to meet up again sometime? She read my message, no reply. I really don't want to look ""needy"" or so, but really don't understand this ghosting.... 

Any ideas? ",seduction
How to decide that I'm going to take action NOW?,"I'm letting time pass by without dealing with my 'approach anxiety'. first a month passes by, then a year, then two years - and I've not improved at all socially. I need to make the decision \\ commit to going out by myself to daygame, but I just can't do that, and procrastinate. I'm 18 years old and would like to become a different person in terms of confidence and conversational abilities - and I don't want to end up being 21-23 regretting that I didn't improve my characteristics, and by the situation right now I know it's possible because I wanted to start approaching when I was 16. 

&amp;#x200B;

Could use some help right now, thanks a lot! ",seduction
"Brooding on decisions, how to set priorities in transitional life-period","First I'd like to thank you everyone in this subreddit who contributed to this community and for helping guys like me build up their life in a more conscious way, in order to be happier. It also helped me to see that intimate relationships are possible for everyone, who are willing to work hard for it. I have been reading the side-bar contents for at least 2 years now, and they were undoubtedly helpful in surviving a very depressing period of my life. This is my first post and I feel I need some help. I have been brooding on a question for a few days now, and I'd like to ask some advice on the topic, as my friends couldn't give satisfying answers IRL. 

I think that a brief summary is needed of my past two years in order to know where I stand now. As I have said, I recovered from a dark stage of my life two years ago, and have been building up my life since then. I absolved my BA degree in 2015, but didn't really know what to do with my life, and failed to earn my degree at the end of my last year. I moved back to my parents and didn't have a job for 1,5 year. I was playing with videogames, woke up at noon and stayed up late, gained weight, stopped running/bodybuilding and even neglected my teeth. I was very lonely, as my acquaintances and then potential (even wife-material) girlfriends went on to become highly succesful. I am not exaggarating. One girl who was important for me back at campus started working at an EU institution in Brussels. She was the one who reached out for me on facebook after a year, out of the blue, asking how I'm doing, but at that moment, there was not much going on with me. I haven't talked to her since then, as I felt inferior (but I intend to message her at the end of this year). I haven't had any type of relationship with a girl since the summer of 2015. I had the goal of graudating and going to MA, but deep inside I wasn't happy with this goal. 

During the last month at my dormitory, when I have already failed my dissertation, I had a friend/roommate who was doing his MSc and advised me to find out what I want out of life. This was the first time I started seriously adressing issues in my life, but july came, and I still wasn't sure what I really desired. I moved back to my hometown and after that stressful 1,5 year, one of my friends in my village got me a job at an office. That was definitely a turning point as she also urged me to think about my life, just like my roommate did. I started reading about professions online in all of my spare time. During the process I found out many things about myself. I have found out about Seddit around this time, which helped me become more resolute and self-reliant about my goals in life. I decided to take a chance, and started a course in finance and accounting last september. The curriculum was already hard for me after studying humanities, and the course took place in a semi-high school setting too. It was an eye-opening experience to see how I changed from a university student to an ""old slacker"" (that was how some younger students and some acquaintances described me). Even though I was a nerdy student in the past, I have never felt that I was really that succesful. I realized that studying here, it was something out of my comfort zone, that I have chosen. I finished my first year with good grades. It was a very positive experience in the end, learning a lot about othering and how to handle it.

I was the oldest in the course class last year, and the only succesful university ""graduate"". I got to know a girl on this course from day one and I felt that she had a crush on me. She was genuinely interested in me and showed many signs of interests, even though I felt unattractive after neglecting my personality/looks for a longer period, didn't even try picking up girls. We talked a lot, and she started talking about my old facebook pictures, that she looked up on her own and was always smiling as hell, when she saw me. I acted as a very cool and stoic ex-uni guy, who was brave enough to follow his desires. I liked her from the get-go too, and there was another dude with whom we formed a friend group. The dude was a little bit like me, but he dropped out completely from his BSc engineer course and still had a stronger frame, as he was better at math, and he moved on from his past mistakes. I was happy for a while but the other classmates were more colder, as I stood out a little as a bit nerdy old guy, always yapping about my past at the university, when they didn't even cared about their maturity exam, and they were bad students in this course. I started to feel a little bit jaded and outsider, while the engineer guy started working out more, going to the club, and became popular with the girls as he got totally shredded (it was very inspiring at the same time). I still acted uninterested towards the girl, in order to stay cool, while the engineer guy got confidence and started hitting on her. The girl didn't reciprocate him, but he persisted for a few months, until he got bored and got together with another girl from our class. I felt that she became lonely, but to my surprise she started looking for jobs. She got a nice little job offer, and went on to the part time (evening) course group, leaving our class. I know that I have made a mistake with not asking her out for a date, and waiting too long with showing interest. Eventually, I made friends with all the other classmates as many unmentioned ones dropped out, only 5 of us finishing the first year.

This year I had to join the evening course too, as I have reached the age limit of 25 according to our country's educational law. It was a must, as I am on a state funded education, so I couldn't stay on full time course. Ironically, it was very awesome, as I got to meet her again. I decided to be more social, caring towards this girl, as I have felt, that my cool dude attitude left her disappointed and lonely. So I became friends with everyone from the class from the start. All of them are girls, but I only do light flirting as they ALL have boyfriends, even husbands and have been concentrating my attention mainyl on this girl. I have also talked with this girl on every classday, not neglecting when she writes on facebook, sat beside her when she was alone, worked together, accompanied her during walking home after class. I used every opportunity to show my interest (oddly feeling like the guy last year). She was a little suspicious after a half-year of not seeing each other, but I think we are on good terms now again. She responds totally positively. To my greatest surprise, her attraction towards me is back too. I also feel more attractive than last year because I work hard on my stuff and it starts getting fruitful. My very best friend, whom I have been with contact since freshman year, has also became succesful with a steady job and regular dating (he was in the same boat as me for a while), and it seems that I will become an accountant in 2020 (its a three year course). There is definitely a silver lining for my future. But I still have problems, and I want to ask for advice on how to set priorities in my current stage of life (which will be a whole year), as I am stressful in this new situation. 

I know, that this situation sounds 100% oneitis. It is. But here's the reason why I'm in this situation right now, and why it is not wholly about this one girl. It's also about my life. This year, there will be a huge accounting exam at the end of this year. I know for a fact, that it is hard, and I still need to practice a lot on a daily basis, to get a good grade. I need the good grades in order to not drop out during the next year, as it will be several times harder getting the final accountant exam (my most helpful teacher told me). I want to be an accountant, but I also need to finish my BA thesis at uni. I still have two years until the absolvation gets obsolete (our country's law), but the main thing is, that I have procrastinated graduating for far too long. If I don't graduate by the end of next semester, I will have to pay back my state funded scholarship for the 3 uni years (it is a pretty hefty amount). I haven't worked for two years (since the administartion job), but I still managed to save money from that time, and have been living from it (with the help of my parents and siblings, of course). I'm de facto broke and don't want to borrow that much money for a failed course from my family. This feels as if I have shot myself in the leg when I go out meeting new people, and I don't think that it will change until I reach the end of this year.

So, I have very little spare time, as I have to study hard, and also have to manage my past savings strictly, in order to stay independent. I don't have time to work out more, so I am still chubby, but I can get my teeth fixed in the near future (mainly whitening). I meet with my friends rarely (once per two months), as I have to study a lot. I don't have a driving licence either, so meeting with new people is ten times harder than it was at campus. I live in rural eastern-europe, so meeting new girls on tinder is out of the question with such resources. I will be able to do that after june, when I will have finished with the exams and be able to get a job and licence (I don't want to risk my uni degree by getting a job now OR wasting precious time with getting a licence). The question is: should I escalate further with this girl, knowing that I will not meet with her that much and doesn't even have the means to date her normally (as I have done in the past, going out for dinner for example is not that viable now), knowing that she is 4 years younger, goes out regurarly and even parties. OR stay friends with her, as I value her friendship VERY much, and don't want to screw up. I also got to know her a little bit more, and my instincts tell me, that she is still not ready for a mature and long term relationship (past experince). But she also flirts with me like no girl did in the past 3 years. This week, on wednesday, she gave me a 100% sign of sexual interest (I will tell it in the comments if necessary). I don't know whether she is up for a friends-with-benefits type of relationship (I have never had such), but she is beautiful (easily a 7/10 in my opinion). I already feel lonely and stressed out at the start of this semester from studying fervently.

At this point of my life, my main goal and long term dream is to have a serious and lasting relationship. Maybe I could even work towards starting a family. The older wives in my group already have kids, and it is very inspiring (there is even a 22 old girl, who has a family, and she is very balanced). To tell you the truth, I only hoped to make up for my past coldness by being a considerate friend with her, but it blossomed into this renewed sexual attraction from her part in this short time. At this point, I fear that she will be the only potential partner for me until the end of the school-year.

In a nutshell, I am brooding over staying true to my long term goals, by refraining from further escalation in these distressed times or taking a dive into a very unknown situation in order to deal with my short term oneitis. And potentionally losing a good friend (who happens to be a pretty girl) making my already stressful course more miserable, even risking alienating her. This question is more general in scope, I think, as it deals with a liminal phase in a man's life in his 20's, and confused about setting priorities. I want to maintain a healthy friendship with her, but I fear that if I escalate more, it will turn into a mainly sexual one, which is very new to me, and don't know how to deal with it. I'd rather have a serious relationship, but I don't think it will work. 

I'd love to hear some advice from people who had a similar stage in their lives.

TLDR: Long time lurker, first post, successfully turned my life around, Seddit helped in it too, but still have life-style questions in my current situation 

",seduction
Need advice on how to ask girl on a date.,So I met this girl a while ago at an event from an organization that this girl and I belong to. We have seen each other a couple of times since then during different events and I always try to make small talk and even flirt a little bit. We recently went to another event and took some pictures together. She took some with her phone and send them to me so I now have her number. I would greatly apprecciate if someone from her can guide me on how to text her to ask her on a date without sounding weird.,seduction
Getting Back with her Ex,"I find it so weird that a girl can talk so harshly about her ex, making it seem that she hates him, but later gets back with him.

Look, I don't have a lot of dating experience but it seems like cognitive dissonance to me.

",seduction
"Brazilian, felt like with a friend would be cooler","id like to go back approach but my friends are on spiritual emotional crisis, and i feel the weird feeling about going cold approach, can you guys say something that motivate me finding interessed guys or goin alone? do you go cold approach  on street alone? cool",seduction
Terrible situation; need to turn tables around ASAP,"So I just got out of a 2.5 years long term relationship and I met this wonderful girl at work. I've dated her for 3 months and we had sex a few times and I completely fucked up because I wanted that comfort level of a relationship and I was acting like a male girlfriend aka the nice guy.

She got really scared and was extremely sad that she had to friendzoned me. Days go by and conversations, phone calls, texts have been 100-0 really fast.

Throughout that time I've kept myself busy and only focused on getting my mysterious self back.

So I sought out and read religiously on coach Corey Wayne's ebook and I turned the tables around by taking her out on this coming Sunday without her knowing where I'm taking her. 

What do you guys think I should do at this point? I really really really like this girl and I would love to have a good time like the first few times that I've met her way back in August. ",seduction
"""When a DNA Test Reveals Your Daughter Is Not Your Biological Child""",,seduction
The most important aspect of getting girls,,seduction
Regarding the push/pull technique,"Ive noticed my friends try to do this one too, but fail often cause the girls assume theyre too rude or childish...

I think the trick with push/pull is to first get her on your level, thus you breaking the ""awkward"" barrier and letting her know;
""yes there is a mutual form of attraction and i didnt need u to confirm it."" 
This allows her to feel elevated AND special: appreciated.

Now imo the trick here is, she should give you an excuse for you to make her exit.
Lemme try elaborate;
When someone is in the presence of someone very confident or strong presence, ppl feel the need to confirm their ""awesomeness"" specially during clubbing, they will want to stroke your ego.

So if she said;
""wow ur dressed so much better than everyone in the club"" just say thanks or jokingly say ""is that really a compliment comparing to ""them""? ""

Now to ""push"" her away you can use that exact compliment later against her


Why doesnt it hurt or fail(atleast for me)?  Cause she had already put u there on top, she was the one that said in the first place. 

And this is,what ive seen from others, the mistake they make.
They just randomly try to push the girl away just to do it and see themselves running circles or against a brick wall and the girl will notice youre playing games and losing hard, just cause u got caught in ur own web of ""manip""


Another easy one is the handshake method, its so stupid but has proven to work each time.

Girl wants to know ur handshake or saw u doin it or whatever cause ur both drunk
U tell her nah, its way too hard or u got sweaty hands so rather not
Now she def wants to learn it cause u challenged her
U teach her some stupid hard handshake, so when she tries she fails miserably then u just walk away and tell her;
""see now u wasted time i couldve spent(insert anything"" 
She will def come back later



The trick with these stupid things is....; in the short amounts of time yall spend together and really interact and physically you touch, you do the most to impressive her personality and presence wise.
If you can already make her laugh to death with a 1min handshake joke, you will def be remembered. Not if u try to manifest yourself as some wannabe macho doin it just to hurt her

Its u setting her up against a challenge she herself signed up for, tbh unknowingly they lead the dance...they just look for someone to lead them.",seduction
Secret daily habits that attract women,,seduction
Making Interactions Sexual,"Hey everyone! I'm (19, University Student) a long time lurker on this sub. For a bit of background on me, I'm an extremely shy individual who doesn't party much and is very bad with escalating with girls. I study engineering and most of my friends are similar to me in that they don't party/hookup much and cannot offer much in advice or experience.

Over the past year, I've taken a ton of advice from the this sub and some friends I've made IRL to become much more attractive: I've put on 25 pounds of muscle (now 6' 195 lbs), cleaned up the way I dress and joined a bunch of interesting activities (I do bodybuilding, dance and lots of engineering projects). I've seen massive changes in my attitude, confidence and how girls look at me through this process (lots of girls will maintain eye contact and people tell me/I notice girls checking me out reasonably often).  

I'm pretty good at maintaining interest/talking to girls, but not very good at actually making anything sexual. I don't have any previous sexual experience and I have aspergers, which can make it difficult at times to read exactly what girls want from me (or what I could do that would be acceptable). As an example, a week ago I studied/talked with a girl from class for 2 hours and towards the end she lingered longer than seemed normal; making me think she wanted something more, but I was not sure what to do. There are also quite a lot of girls that I'm acquainted to (will say Hi to enthusiastically and sometimes walk together) and I'm not sure how exactly to approach relations with them either. Possibly compounding this problem is that I'm (to both girls and friends) a very nice/caring individual (not in a r/niceguy type way) and have a very good memory, so it may strike the girls as I'm just trying to be friends with them (or that I am obsessed with them) when I would ideally like something more and it is simply the way my mind works.

TL;DR
What are some good ways to turn study buddies to friends with benefits? What are some good ways to become sexual with girls I'm only acquainted to at the moment but would probably(?) be interested in me? How normal is this stuff in Uni? If I attempt to go for something in a CS group I'm in would it become awkward?

Bonus: How do you attract/hook up with girls in Uni parties where you know almost everyone else present and is there usually negative reputation for doing so? I've been in situations where girls have apparently been interested in me, but I have no idea what to do in that situation.",seduction
How To Become A Friend Making Machine,,seduction
"I know this question has been asked a lot, but what should me first text be.","Ok so I met this girl last week and we had a good talk, and I decided if I meet her again I’ll hit on her next week and that’s exactly what happened. The only twists are that I literally told her that, and said that I’m literally hitting on you, she told me she has a bf but she’s in the break up phase with him and they aren’t really talking anymore and I was like so what and she started laughing, then she said there was also a guy who hit on her last week (btw I witnessed that) and I said I can beat him anytime and she laughed again. Then we spoke for like 20 mins just random stuff, I was really natural with her and really straightforward and honest. Before she left I was like I need to talk to you somehow and she gave me her number and IG. Thing is I was a bit tipsy when I talked to her and even though it worked so well, I don’t really know how I did it without any game or PUA stuff. Now Idk what to text her but it’s good cause the stuff im saying happened like 3 hours ago from the time of my post so I still have loads of time to decide what to text but I still want your advice guys?",seduction
Wierd encounter with a group of girls,"First time positing on this page. 

Summary: girl shows interest and is really forward but doesnt text back. Was this a joke and i cant read social cues or was she just wired. 

So I am out with my buddies in nearby college bar a few blocks from our house off campus. I have been drinking for a good stright 2 hours and two of best pals just arrived to the bar on half a Xanax but it looks like they landed shitfaced before 13 hours. They were just messed up but were all having good time.
 
So I am just there drinking and this girl comes by me and goes like ""hayyy cuttie"" as she passes me. I dont really pay her much attention or react at all since she just passed me really quick. She comes back around and hangs in the back of the bar before passing me again. She says the same thing ""he is a cutie""or something along those lines. This time her friends comments as well as how cute i am. I understand what you guys are thinking, whats the problem here ? 

Anyway i dont say anything and they decide to sit at the empty table right behind me and my friends. One of the girls catches my eye really quickly and she doesnt hestiate to call me over. Not the girl who called me cute the first time but her friend who commented the second time. So i decided to come and sit with them since they seemed cool and  i was a little  curious. 

The girl that invited me over starts asking me questions. And we chat for like 5 minutes. Her friend doesnt seem too happy now. I asked one of her friends whats wrong and she says "" she wants you all to her self"" at this point i am like WTF. I consider myself average and maybe above average when it comes to looks. I am well built and played sport in highschool. Nothing to fawn over let alone fight over (although I like the ego boost). So now i start to get a little wary but i am having fun talking them so i just ignore what she said. 

As i am talking with the girl that invited me over the other girl tells her to stop talking with me, because she has a boyfriend. I stoped holding her hand as the entire time so far she was holding my hand and leaning forward and flirting with me. The first girl says ""you will just have to settle for me"". 

Anyway my friends leave and I wanted to leave as well. I offer my number to the friend not the one who invited me over. I did not ask for her number because i was not sure if she was 100% serious or was just doing something for her "" sign night"" ( birthday challenge). She said she did not have her phone on her to take my number. So her friend jumps in and offers to take my number for her friend. I give her my number and she tells me she will give it to her friend.

I am confused. People dont usually act like this. It was bizzar. I never had girls fight over me and I am pretty sure this was a joke. As she did not offer me her number even though she said she was interested, or i took it the wrong way and it was just a casual compliment. She still hasnt texted me so I assume she was not interested. But than you know why did she go through all that? 

",seduction
Solo night game strategies.,"Going out solo is really tuff in comparison to going out with a good wing. I've had pretty decent success but I have to run some serious game, it takes a lot of effort and luck sometimes plays a significant role. There's a couple of ways I will go about solo gaming and I'm going to break them down for you guys.  

&amp;#x200B;

The first strategy that I might go for is locking into a random set. The set can be all guys or half and half or whatever. I'd lock into a set of all girls if I could but that's usually pretty difficult to do solo dolo. I simply introduce myself and ask if I can hangout with them for a bit. Most people are pretty friendly so it's easy. From there I will use that home base to go open 2 sets. Typically I go with an opinion opener and a false time constraint. Best friends test is pretty clutch in a 2 set. I know it's old but the shit really works well.

&amp;#x200B;

When I feel like I'm locked into the 2 set I start escalating kino really quickly with both girls. Hugs and high fives, spinning them around, shoulder nudges, a little dancing, whatever. The key is to overwhelm them both with a lot of stimulus.  This takes a lot of energy and natural charisma and unfortunately you run the risk of being the dancing monkey for a while. Then I'll go into boyfriend girlfriend roleplay. I just tell one of them that she's going to be my girlfriend for the next 20 minutes and I tell them both to come meet my friends.

&amp;#x200B;

Set merge the 2 set into home base and then I can do whatever I want with my target and even go open more 2 sets if I want. The second strategy I might use is straight up dance floor game. No one knows you are by yourself on a dance floor so it doesn't matter. Just dance in your own zone and then look up and approach whatever girl is looking at you. It's very easy to start. Escalate to the kiss close if you can and then after a song or two you can tell her to come with you to take a break and talk. Always go up to her friends and introduce yourself and tell them you two are just going to go where ever for a minute and talk and that they are welcome to join you. This is a boss move and it minimizes cock blockery from her friends later. 

&amp;#x200B;

Then you're off to the races. The last strategy I will use for solo night game is what I call lost on an adventure. If there is a lot of foot traffic between bars outside then you can either walk around outside by yourself until a random girl says something to you. Or you can walk up to girls and open them however you want, then simply tell them that your friends left you here because one of them had to go to the hospital for whatever reason. I say stuff like I'm on an adventure, are you guys spontaneous and out going? If they say no then I say "" well that's no good, maybe our paths will cross later during my adventure. Until next time ladies"" I do this over and over until I meet some cool girls that want to have fun.

&amp;#x200B;

When I find those girls I say stuff that makes it seem like we are all stuck on an adventure together. The hard part is that you must constantly be coming up with new and exciting things to do. Playing games, dancing with strangers, doing dares, going to other bars, you have to be the source of constant fun and the one driving the adventure. This only works really well if you are naturally spontaneous and outgoing. You won't be able to fake it for the most part.

&amp;#x200B;

I don't talk to random guys that are alone and make them my wingman because they usually only fuck my shit up lol.    Well I hope this helps some of you guys that are forced to go out solo. Be safe 

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
5 Underrated ‘Secret Weapons’ Every Pick-Up Artist Needs," Yes, the clever lines or techniques mentioned in this sub-reddit are useful and worth learning to give you that extra edge in the field…

However, if you can develop yourself and gain these five ‘secret weapons’, that will provide a solid base for you to SLAY with women.  

I’d recommend working on these before anything...

# 1. Self-love

I think this is the MAJOR KEY and solves most of the basic problems in game

* Self-love stops you giving off those subtle body language cues that you’re expecting to get rejected. Way less instant-blowouts. 
* Self-love helps with the number one rule of: you ‘whatever you feel, she feels’  
* Self-love helps with giving off ‘needy vibes’. Much easier to be non-needy when you already love your life without this woman. Self-love stops you ‘running out of things to say’ because you think everything you say is awesome. When you feel like this, it’s much easier to naturally develop great body language and vocal projection. 
* Self-love helps you ‘stay in set’ when she’s giving no signs or throwing shit tests as you

How to find self-love? I’ll write a more detailed post on this soon, but a great list to start includes: meditation, setting goals and achieving them, surrounding yourself with great friends, spending time on hobbies and passions, keeping fit and eating healthy. 

# 2. Brass balls

Approach anxiety exists in all of us, albeit less in the experienced guys who have numbed it.

Still, a great pick-up artists makes bold moves without hesitation. 

He doesn’t know what’s going to happen. It could well blow up in his face or cause confrontation. 

Brass balls are often needed to win in this game.  

# 3. No ego 

If you’re doing pick-up properly, you’ll need to toss your ego in the trash. 

* It’s your ego that stops you opening when you’re not ‘in state’ 
* It’s your ego that stops you opening in front of a group of strangers. 
* It’s your ego that stops you building social momentum through mass approaching. 
* It’s your ego that stops you re-approaching.
* It’s your ego that stops you trying to pull when the set is going OK. 
* It’s your ego that makes you avoid all awkward situations. 

In fact, approach anxiety is probably 100% ego-based.   

# 4. Good logistics

It doesn’t matter how into you she is. If she has to jump in a taxi to your parents house 30 minutes away, she’s going to think twice. That’s going to fuck with the ‘sex just happened’ frame she needs to stop her feeling like a complete slut. 

Bad logistics will ruin your chances for a lot of one-night stands.

Great logistics will help you seal the deal even with girls who were ‘kind of’ into you. 

# 5. Field experience

One for all the keyboard warriors out there ;). The more you go out, the more you humble your ego, strengthen your brass balls, and learn about what works and what doesn’t in this game we call pick-up.  

***I've co-launched a Telegram group for men who want to become amazing with women. Hundreds of guys discussing their goals and getting advice on their sticking points. A true brotherhood :) Drop me a PM with your Telegram handle if you want to join***",seduction
A question about jokes and truth,"Do I understand correctly that any nonsense, said without a back thought and not entailing awkward grimaces, is not nonsense?  
For  example, to say “I love you” on the second date, really feeling  feelings for a girl or to say “I love you” for the sake of joke to look  at her reaction. After all, is it really different things?  
Why then do not disguise the real words under the guise of unsuccessful jokes?",seduction
I'm seeing two girls at the same time,"Hey, so I'm currently dating two girls at the same time. I haven't discussed exclusivity with neither of them, but I still feel guilty somehow. I've met them both 4 times each during the last 5 weeks. 

&amp;#x200B;

I'm more interested in one of them, but I still don't want to completely ditch the other one, since I barely know either of them that well. I simply am not sure where to draw the line, i.e. at what point I have to decide on one and stop seeing the other. I guess the line gets drawn at the point of an exclusivity deal, right? 

&amp;#x200B;

Am I an asshole? Should I feel guilty? One of the girls asked me the other day if I was a player, and I played it off well, but am I one? I told her that I am indeed seeing another girl casually, but that I have nothing serious going on with her. Meanwhile, the other girl (that I am kind of less interested in) seems to fall deeper and deeper down in her infatuation with me for every day. I am having a ton of fun with them both and they are both great girls, and it's a really really tough decision, am I an asshole for wanting to wait it out a little longer? I really hate making people hurt, so I want to avoid that as much as possible.

Best regards",seduction
"21 year virgin college senior, how to change things?","I’ve never had a girlfriend nor have I dated anyone. Every girl I approached was either unreceptive, only wanted to be acquaintances or was already in a relationship. 

How do I turn my life around? I meet women very often and don’t have approach anxiety. Yet, I can’t get them interested in a romantic or sexual manner. 

I’ve got my life on track, in terms of academics, career and social life.

What do I do? It’s the fourth year of college and I still haven’t had any luck. ",seduction
Conquering Fears,,seduction
First time going out with a wingwoman,"If I'm honest, for most of my friends, their game sucks. 

Whenever we go out anywhere I usually approach girls solo. Never used a wingman apart from when my mate once tried. He just talked to this American girl about walking dead... In a nightclub... On the dancefloor...

She promptly pulled her friend (my target) away. I don't blame her! Since then... I've been doing it solo. 

So tomorrow night, I'm going out with the company of a very good female friend of mine. She is a solid 8. She has agreed to be my wingwoman. She has next to no experience of this though, as do I. 

So, any advice on how to use my friend to maximise my game and also, any tips I can give her would be appreciated too. ",seduction
Remember that your emotions will try to fuck you up,"I read this in ""The Game,"" and it's 100% true. I recently found myself wanting to ask 2 different girls out for drinks. Immediately my mind was racing, ""Maybe you should just be by yourself for a while,"" ""You got the new Spider-Man game, playing that is much more fun than talking to girls,"" ""You've got plenty of time to talk to girls, just relax for a bit"" and on and on. And I almost gave in to these thoughts, because Spider-Man really is that fun, 10/10 for sure, pick it up at your local Best Buy today. In all seriousness though, these thoughts are common, and you probably get them too. All it is, is your brain trying to keep you in your comfort zone and away from so-called stress and anxiety. Even the feeling of anxiety itself, when you are about to make an approach, is a last ditch effort by your brain to ""save"" you from the ""enemy."" This is some prehistoric bull shit, and if you're able to realize that your emotions are trying to fuck you up, then you'll be able to fight through those emotions and approach girls all day.




For example, today I got those thoughts. ""You don't want to ask the coffee girl for drinks tonight, you want to go home and 100% Spider-Man and drink beer all night, you deserve it after working 8 to 5."" Fuck that, and fuck believing any thought like that. Do you have any thoughts like that, too? If so, when you get one, take a step back, think critically, and realize those thoughts aren't rational. Your emotions are trying to trip you up so you don't have to feel any anxiety. In reality, the feeling of anxiety is the same exact feeling as excitement, your brain just processes it differently. So today, as soon as I started getting those thoughts, I immediately acted against them and went and asked the coffee girl out for drinks. Whether or not the girl says yes doesn't matter, what matters is you showed your emotions who the true master is.




So next time you get any thoughts like that, immediately challenge them. Ask yourself, ""is this thought rational?"" 10/10 times the answer is no. With every decision you make in the present, you're actively making your future. So today, right now, go make your future. It's up to US to make the future we want. Fuck looking at postcards. Go pave the road.


",seduction
What and when do we talk about moving from tinder to date.,"Hello really new to this whole pick up game. I thought maybe I give tinder/bumble a shot and I’m running into the wall of conversation. Keep in mind this was my crack at it and I’m looking for constructive criticism. 

Main things are:

1) what to talk about in text
2) what to talk about leading up to the first date
3) what to talk about on the first date 
4) what to talk about after and leading up to any following dates


I’ve have seen some posts on this subject, but I’m left with some questions. Basically it usually goes as followed

1) set up a date, don’t get to know her through text, which I’m finding difficult because all of them don’t want to go on a date if they haven’t talked to me for a bit. So I end up falling into this mistake of “getting to know her through text” 

my question here is how to avoid it and what do I text about if not anything her or myself?

2) on the first date, so here I find that there are two camps. First camp, this is where you get to know her. Second is you wait till the third date to get to know her. 

So I find that conversation tends to be interviewish if I go with the first camp. “Where do you work” and “what hobbies do you do in your free time” might as well put ask her “what skills can you bring to our team”  

If I go with the second camp, I’m running into a lot of awkward silences with very little to talk about. 

My first date went more like the first camp, it was very very dry both of us kinda asking questions which I would think to be good, but still dry. I found that I did most of the talking and trying to be engaging. 

My question here is, what have you experienced if you are in camp one or two? What worked for you and what didn’t? Any tips on fixing any issues you ran into?

3) So after the first date I find it kinda weird I just don’t know what to say here. I made the mistake of being to boring and interview like in the first date so leading up to the second date there wasn’t a whole lot of texting. We did go on the second date then it turned out just like the first one. 

Although I did try to let her lead some of the conversation by staying quite and letting her come up with a new tangent, which resulted in A LOT of awkward silence which I was okay with but I can tell she didn’t like it much. 

I’m just looking for some advice and honest criticism of my experience. 

Thank you for the time you took to read this! 


",seduction
Any benefits to “playing it cool”?,"I have noticed a phenomena whereby I am having more success by “playing it cool” versus approaching girls. I cannot tell what to make of it and if it may be just specific to the scenes I am.  A friend of mine said I “observe” too much and that could be it.

I would appreciate any insights as I don’t think it’s a sustainable MO.

* Saw a group of 4 girls at a day party. Tried to talk to one of their group, but conversations never went anywhere. Saw them again at a venue after that and it’s game on, dancing with one, being called naughty, etc.

* Similar situation. Group of girls I couldn’t talk to at first party came on quite strong at another venue. Mainly driven by fact I was talking to her friend and not giving her attention. It was not intentional as my friend was talking to the more attractive one.

* Was at a different party and not really focused on talking to girls. An attractive girl grabbed me to start dancing, grabbed food after, etc. Next time I saw her randomly at the same venue a month later she basically ignored me.

* Twice girls were at a venue with another group of guys, so I did not put any effort into the situation. Both offered to exchange phone numbers anyway.

None of these interactions led to much more beyond the initial night, so I would also appreciate insight if they were headfakes or I screwed something up logistically.

",seduction
How not to be ashamed of being proud??,"This morning I was walking on the street trying to approach. To this point on my life I never achieved it, and I' been trying for months.

&amp;#x200B;

I was walking trying to fix my physical posture, and just trying to feel enough to ""deserve"" approaching.

While doing it, I noticed that I'm scared of rising my head. Rising my head makes me feel proud, and I'm gut-ashamed of being proud.

&amp;#x200B;

When children, I was taught at a catholic school that being proud was something bad, as arrogant, or conceited and uncaring of other people.

&amp;#x200B;

I also know from PUA stuff that self boasting tends to be interpreted as insecure.

&amp;#x200B;

Also, girls seemed to be more interested on me when I raised my head.

&amp;#x200B;

So, I definitely need to find a way to be proud of myself without being boasting, and feeling uncomfortable and ashamed. And I cannot conceive a mindset that allows me to do that.

&amp;#x200B;

Do you have any valuable advice?",seduction
Interest and approach at gym !?,"Need advice/strategies on ways to initiate conversations at gym. I am a regular and people recognize me. Always keep to myself but have a few friends that I talk to when they’re there. I make sure I laugh and smile when with them.

There’s this amazingly beautiful girl that I constantly make eye contact with but need a solid opening line. 

Or multiple suggestions. !!

",seduction
Cold approaching a girl,"Hey guys there is this girl that I always see at the library and I’ve been meaning to approach her and so I finally did yesterday.

I saw her walking alone as I was on my way home.So I decided now is probably the best chance at approaching her .I noticed she was wearing earphones,
 I said hi and she just kept quiet than I smiled and made a remark  asking “why she doesn’t like talking much “ her response was that sorry i dont talk to strangers,stranger=danger “
I then proceeded to laugh and she put back her earphones 

At this stage I knew she wasn’t interested so I walked away and let her be.

We attend quite a few classes together so what I’m wondering is that the next time I see her should I play it cool and try and talk to her again or get the message and leave her alone",seduction
How can I have more casual sex?,"I am a 24 year old male virgin who currently lives with my dad in Las Vegas. I do have a job and I am saving up for my own place. I have had very limited experiences with women but I am interested in practicing. I listen to various podcasts on the subject on dating. But I am interested in this subs advice. 

Growing up I was told I was not allowed to date till I was 16. The first person who showed interest in me happened when I was in Middle School around 14. I did not like her that much at the time because I confused flirting with bullying.  The other time was back in High School but I was too shy at the time. Lately I have been interested in dating and having casual sex here and there. I have tried online dating but I only get a few conversations but no actual dating. I consider myself to be average looking but when I talked to the women who liked me and asked why she was into me. She told me she liked me because of my personality. I would like to know how do I improve on myself and find other partners who are into casual sex?",seduction
"Making plans, girl wants to invite friends.","I asked a girl if she wanted to hang out and she agreed for this Friday. I said ""sounds good"" and she replied with ""maybe we can get a group together and go to a bar :)"". Is there a non-aggressive way of implying that I was tryna hang out with her alone? She's a coworker so I'm not trying to be super aggressive.",seduction
How to flirt/seduce woman we are meeting for possible third?,"My boyfriend (M35) and I (F29) have a meeting set up (drinks at a bar) with a tinder match to see if we click and possibly move on from there to a hotel room. I am great at flirting with men, but have no idea how to flirt with women. I think women are sexy and am happy to finally try out this side of me. I just have no idea how to start. What kind of conversation should I try? Touching? I am looking for tips please and thanks!",seduction
Social media accounts to follow for text ideas?,I'm trying to improve my text game by sending out more texts to girls I'm talking to that are funny/non-needy and don't necessarily need a response. I'm looking for guys to follow on instagram or social media to get ideas for stuff to send throughout the day. Or really just any resource to help me come up with some ideas.,seduction
More knowledge isn't the answer,"I know a lot of beginners get caught up in the learning element of seduction, I know I did.  At some point you realize that more knowledge isn't the answer.  Becoming is the answer.  Become the type of guy who women are attracted to.    

You can ask a fat person on the street how to lose weight and they'll give you the right answer.  They have the knowledge.  They don't have the results though.  The results come from consistent correct choices and actions over a long period of time.  

I guess this post is geared towards those who think they're not getting results because they haven't learned enough yet.  I'd advise them to take a more rounded approach.  ",seduction
How to interact effectively with a group?,"20M here, just recently discovered this and started to actively improve myself. There's this group of girls (from 22 to 25) who work as receptionists at my gym. They for some reason get all giggly whenever I go to talk to them or pass nearby. They say hi to me, ask me questions such as my age, where I'm from, and which one of them I  like more (this one I have no idea how to respond, but manage to redirect the conversation somewhere else gracefully somehow).

They give me lots of IOIs, from smiling and twirling their hair; one of them gave me a nickname (a playful version of my name), and she sometimes will brush her hand on my  ear when she passes me and I happen to have my back to her. 

Question is: how to interact with them as a group and (if needed), interact with the one I liked the most?",seduction
3 tips to incorporate and help your first date end at your place!,"[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KdK3tNGV3mA&amp;t=83s](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KdK3tNGV3mA&amp;t=83s)

&amp;#x200B;

Hello everyone, i made this video on 3 tips that will help your date end at your place. I hope these help you!

1. Setting/place. A lot of guys overcomplicate this and end up hurting their chances. Ideally you want to go for drinks near your place. keep it simple. If you have really good game it doesn't matter as much what you do. But going for drinks is low investment, helps with the right vibe and gives the girl plausible deniability. (oh we had a couple drinks and i guess stuff just happened afterwards)
2. You want to incorporate sexual tension during the date. Theres a reason why she decided to come out on a date with you, and its not to talk about the weather. Make the interaction man to woman. misreading, bantering, teasing at first, escalating through out and going a for kiss later on.
3. Leading. Suggest to go over your place afterwards, any small reason to should suffice. dont make it a big deal. pretend you two have been dating for a while and going to your place is only normal. people suggest to seed the pull during the date and you can, but if you have picked a good place and the interaction has gone well(flirting, teasing, make out), the underlying vibe of the date should be that the date will end at your place.

If you guys have any questions, comments or topics you'd like me to talk about let me know!",seduction
"""I'm not sure where I'm staying tonight"" = You know where she's staying tonight.","TLDR; If a girl says ""**I'm not sure where I'm staying tonight**"" you can capitalise on that situation to give her that [**shelter**](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=RbmS3tQJ7Os).

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

Women love **feeling secure**, and they **love those who give them that feeling**. That's why I finish up my lovemaking with a bedtime story and tuck my sweetlings in before rolling over and browsing r/seduction. Just kidding, I don't mix work and pleasure. When a woman is on the move, with friends, between houses and **has no great place to stay** she is looking for someone to ***solve those problems***. If a woman casually drops that she needs a place to stay, wait until Indicators of Interest are high and then **offer your place.**

Either **you get to have sex** *OR* you did a [**good deed**](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Xenia_(Greek))

&amp;#x200B;

A quick case study/""FR""

&amp;#x200B;

I met Vasquez (19F white) in the mini-mart near my hotel. She had a big head of dreads **(not my thing)** and a (**cute)** mouse-like look to her. She was one of those anxious college girls who takes off around the world on Aunty's money to 'find herself'. Couldn't wait to tell me about the reptilians running the government. Normally I'd stay far away, but at 19 she was still fresh and I enjoyed shooting her down with lines like ""You're worse than uneducated. Uneducated would be an improvement. You've been *mis*educated.""

On the third night I run into her she tells me that **she's sleeping on a hammock on a friend's stoop/porch/veranda**. Well, that won't do.

I invite her back to my place, and ***unsure of what kind of sexual expectations she had***, slowly escalated to massage and then asked

**""Would you like to take off your top?"".** NOTE: this gives the girl plenty of time to **put the brakes on if she just really does need a place to sleep.** Got that? Ya horny animals...

After making her cum (""Where did you learn [Tantric massage](https://www.bookdepository.com/New-Tao-Sexual-Massage-Stephen-Russell/9781856751094)!!?""), I decide not to have full intercourse. What, you think OpenStraight just gives it up like that? Be [careful](http://www.winchesterhospital.org/health-library/article?id=103113) out there fellas.

&amp;#x200B;

**A cursory reflection on other experiences I've had seems to suggest to me that it also works when...**

1. The girl lives in a shitty apartment with too many other people/animals and wants a night away
2. The girl is on exchange and wants to see more of the city
3. The girl is having family problems and feels better not staying at home
4. The girl has PTSD and doesn't do well sleeping alone (might make a post on this one, it was weird)

&amp;#x200B;

**Conclusion**: Being able to provide a place to sleep is one of the most powerful ways to provide **comfort** to a woman.

&amp;#x200B;

**BONUS**: If you ever need to throw down money on a hotel so that you can take your girl somewhere NEVER HESITATE. I have, for some sick reason, decided that $80 was *too much to spend* to go home with girls who were 100% DTF. Don't make the same mistake. Worst case scenario, you buy the room, treat yourself to a great night of moderate luxury, and wake up rested with a girl you thought was cute enough to take home. Best case scenario - you know what's up.",seduction
Procrastinating by Learning More about Game,"I have been down the road learning about seduction for the past 2 years. I have read notorious books like Mystery Method, Models, Mode One, Bang, watched RSD material, Simple Pickup. Watched tens of videos and read many more articles. Listened to Ross Jeffries' material, basically I saw it all. 

Although there were some bright moments were I approached, escalated, and gotten results. I am no where near where I want to be. I am not virgin but I have not had a girlfriend in my life. I still get approach anxiety specially in low energy environments. The thing is the more I see that I am facing difficulties the more I indulge in learning and the progress is very minimal. Maybe I can say that the progress is more down to chance than material learned, a mere motivated moment leads me to a number, or a drunken state gives me the confidence to approach and kino escalate. Living in a relatively conservative city is not helping either. 

Thing is in many times I feel that if I approach I will get results seeing the IOIs (indicators of interest) when holding eye contact but I still have that fear of approach. Whats your opinion guys, should I choose one method stick with it and keep applying till I get results. Should I learn more, but I feel this is procrastinating feeding itself more and more, a problem I feel many of us have. Learning although gives valuable information can confuse you further given the variety of techniques and make you also more self conscious during interactions.

I know I have rambled on for too long, I am just trying to share my experience with you guys so we can discuss solutions that would benefit all of us. What is your opinion about all that?     

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
Anyone find some parts of your city easier to approach girls than others?,"I live in a town about 2 hours away from the downtown area of my city. When starting cold approaching, I decided to only do it in the downtown just cause there's way more people so it's more comforting knowing that if I screw up, I won't ever see the girl anyways versus if I did it in my town it's possible I might see her again somewhere here. Past couple months I been cold approaching in downtown and it's been pretty good. Like all the girls I approached and given a compliment have always smiled and said thank you and if they weren't interested let me know easy. I really got more confidence cause now I was thinking ""man there was never anything to be afraid of!"".

I then attempted to cold approach in my town, and both times have just been super rude and awkward. I was walking to the gym and on my way there was a girl just sitting on a bench on her phone. I just went up and said ""Hey this is kind of random but I just felt like saying you look really pretty"" every girl I said that to no matter what as replied with a thank you. This girl literally just says ""ok..."" and goes back to her phone. I then said my name and asked for hers asked and she's like ""you don't need to know...go away.."" while still staring at her phone.  I just walked away kind of laughing at how awkward it was lmao

Anyone have an experience like this? Weird that 2 hours away I  can have full conversations with random woman on the street but can't even get a girl to smile when I'm approaching here lool",seduction
20 Psychological Life Hacks That Can Help You Make the Most of Social Interactions,,seduction
[The 3 Attraction-Generating “Roles” I Used To Go From Getting Rejected By Women All The Time To Meeting And Dating Beautiful Women On Demand],"2012 is when I graduated high school and I decided that I would no longer be a loser when it comes to attracting and dating beautiful women.

So, I started going out and approaching women at malls, clubs, bookstores, and pretty much anywhere I could find lots of attractive women.

After a few months of reading books, watching videos, and hours of approaching women in a variety of scenarios, I began to see patterns in my interactions with women.

I began to realize that attraction between a man and woman is truly something that can be created through skill.

Most people think it’s all about how you look, how much money you have, and how famous you are, but there’s a lot more to the game of attraction.

I believe every man should improve his value every single day, which means you should improve how you look, make more money, and increase your status.

However, you can attract beautiful women in your life even if you’re broke, not very good-looking, and you’re not well-known publicly.

So, here are 3 attraction generating “roles” you can use right now to start attracting more beautiful women in your life:

====================
1.) The Socially Free Man
====================
Most men have one character that they play in life, and that’s all they bring to the table.

For example, you have the serious guy, then you have the funny guy, then you have the tough guy, and so on and so forth.

However, the socially free man can express a variety of personalities and is able to play the role necessary to attract the women he pursues.

The socially free man can be serious, fun, tough, playful, seductive, and many other roles when necessary.

You see, when you approach a woman that you don't know, you’re stepping into the unknown.

You don’t know the woman’s life story…

You don’t know what the woman is going through currently…

You don’t know the woman’s mood…

You don’t know the woman’s philosophy on life…

The point is, there is a possibility that this woman who you approach has a completely different outlook on life than you do.

For example, let’s say you approach a woman who is a high-energy social butterfly that loves to socialize with other high-energy social butterflies, but let’s say you are a low-energy introvert who would rather be at home reading.

If you’re restricted to only playing the role of the low-energy introvert, the high-energy woman might judge you right off the bat as “not her type” and she’ll probably reject you.

On the other hand, we have the socially free man who is able to play the role that is necessary to get the woman he wants. He is not restricted to one personality, or one dynamic of expression.

The socially free man is able to express himself as if he was playing a musical piece.

He is not playing one note the entire time, or playing the same loop of instruments over and over again.

He is playing an entire musical piece.

He can do this because he is free.

Free from outcome dependence.

Free from the fear of others judging him.

He is able to adapt to the situation at hand because he is not holding on to an identity that doesn’t serve him.

So, when the socially free man approaches a woman, he listens to what she says and watches her body language.

His goal is to truly understand the woman who is standing in front of him, while demonstrating his value to her.

He is asking himself, “What does this woman value in a man?”

He is calibrating his behavior to communicate to the woman that he has the value that she is looking for.

And if the socially free man communicates his value freely, but still doesn’t get the woman, he is okay with himself at the end of the day.

Why?

Because he knows that he didn’t hold back. He let go of his ego and expressed himself freely.

He did his best to understand the woman and demonstrate his value to her.

If she doesn’t see his value, then it’s her loss.

=======================
2.) The Confident Leader
=======================
After approaching thousands of women, you start to see the behaviors that women respond to positively.

Without a doubt, confidence and leadership are two qualities that women respond to very well.

So, when you approach a woman, you should always “confidently” take the lead.

When you’re timid and unsure with your actions, women will test you and they will assume the role of confident leader which forces you into the role of “submissive follower”.

A wise man once said, “I may be wrong, but I’m never in doubt”.
When you’re interacting with a woman, you need to know your desired end result, and unapologetically lead the interaction towards it.

If you see an attractive woman walking in the grocery store and you want to approach her, you must first ask yourself, “When I approach this woman, what is the end result I’m looking to create?”

Sometimes you will approach a woman with a specific end result in mind, but after interacting with her that end result may not be as desirable anymore. In that case you can change it.

However, it’s still a lot more powerful to approach a woman knowing exactly why you’re approaching her, as opposed to just approaching her without any intent.

=======================
3.) The Man With A Type
=======================
When you know the exact type of woman you’re looking for, your ability to attract women instantly becomes stronger. 

Why?

Because when you know exactly what you want, you suddenly become the chooser and not the guy hoping to get chosen.

You become the King looking for his Queen as opposed to the peasant who will date any woman as long as she is in fact a woman.

However, I believe you can’t really know what your type is until you put yourself out there and date a variety of women.

You need to experience the good and the bad.

Go on great dates and go on horrible dates.

You will quickly find out what qualities you do and don’t like in a woman.

Then once you start to see the specific qualities you like in a woman, write them down.

The list doesn’t need to be huge, but you should have a decent list of qualities that you look for in a woman.

This doesn’t mean that if a woman doesn’t have all the qualities on your list that you should reject her completely, but you should use those qualities to qualify the women you speak to.

When you know what you want from a woman, it makes it easier to tease and flirt.

You can say things like, “yeah you’re cute and all, but I’m looking for a woman who is affectionate and treats her man like a king”.

Or you could say something like, “Yeah that’s cool that you can cook, but you’re a little too serious for me…. I like a woman with a sense of humor”.

If you don’t know what kind of qualities you’re looking for in a woman, you can’t genuinely make comments like the ones above and therefore your ability to qualify women will be weak or non-existent.

So, take the time out to really figure out the type of women you’re looking for, and your ability to attract women will surely increase.",seduction
"If you respected her, you'd approach her","**TLDR**; She **deserves to know you like her**.

&amp;#x200B;

I have approached in many ways. Whilst I always favour a **straight approach** (Imagine a **straight line** between you and the girl and [**walk it**](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Lq0fUa0vW_E)), I have done it *every* which-way. I've **skateboarded** through university campuses to catch a girl I've seen walking by. I've **commando-crawled** up grass hills through freshman parties. I've even chased girls down the street **barefoot** because I didn't have time to put my shoes on. And I've got laid each of those times. You think I'd write field reports **where I don't** **get it in?**

When I approach, I still get scared. Not always - sometimes I feel nothing. But every now and again I'll feel the **cold rush of terror** creep in when I'm  about to approach. I find it amusing now, but (to be completely honest) it does fuck with my game A LOT since it's so **strong physiologically** even if I can push through it. I ask myself: ""**O.S...why are you getting scared**"" and I tell myself the same thing every time.

**Because you don't respect her enough.**

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

If you respected her, you'd be **honest** with her. You would **grant her the knowledge** that you admire her. You would **provide** her with options. You'd **validate** her beauty and maybe then her personality. Hell, you might even **give her a story** to brag about to her friends and family - the stranger who liked her. Even better, I've actually got aspirations to create and cultivate an amazing family. 

&amp;#x200B;

Now, my Mum didn't raise a misogynist. So I'll be damned if I'm going to go around **disrespecting women because I'm too shy to say hello.**

So get out there and #respectwomen.

BONUS: What is the [etymology](https://www.etymonline.com/word/respect) of the word respect? [""To look back at""](https://timedotcom.files.wordpress.com/2017/08/gettyimages-493656728.jpg)

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
How do you be confident when you don’t have any positive refinforcement?,"A little backstory. I’m 25, and the first 22 years of my life I was religious and never bothered with girls. I also was never told i’m good looking or attractive. Only one girl in my entire 22 years through school and college told me she liked me, and I brushed it off because of religion. Anyways, when I hit 23 I stopped believing in god and destiny. I kissed a girl for the first time, but the next day she broke it off. I think she just felt bad so she let me. I lost my virginity at 23 to an escort. I honestly don’t know if i’m ugly or not. Never been told I was good looking so I just assume i’m unnatractive. Before anyone says work on yourself, I gained 25 lb of muscle over a year, i’m fit, have a degree, and am working on going to a professional school, possibly pharmacy. There is more that could be done like putting myself in more social situations and i’m working on it, it’s a learnin curve. I have had 2 instances were a girl liked me but because of my inexperience I got jealous and impatient. Fake it till you make it doesn’t work, it only works in the initial attraction, after that I’m lost and I don’t know how to make them want me. When it comes to sex i’m inexeperienced as hell, only having sex 2 times in my life. I have no reason to believe any girl wants me. It’s all mental, and I know it is, it’s just a hump I can’t get over. Any advice?",seduction
7 major daygame mistakes you should avoid,,seduction
Beginner sex problem,"I just had sex for a second time and I struggled as much as on the first time with something I would never expect. I have trouble fcking the girl. 

They compliment my dick that is big and it can cover their face basically if I lay it over it. So I think size shouldnt be problem. 
***
But I struggle with all positions, its like I cant properly get in, and thrust. Like I cant manage to get it in, if I get it in it is kinda uncomfortable. Like I cant really put much power in and increase speed as I can barely manage to hold that position. Even if I thrust I see its not how it should be on her reactions. Both girls were pretty small about 30cm smaller then me in height, it might be having some impact as well. But in porn I saw whathever fckin high guy fckin small girl no problem.
***
I dont know even how to describe it I will do my best:
I guess I managed to do it properly in one position with the second girl. It was missionary if I remember correctly with like 3 pilows behind her lower back and she was hanging out of bed with her head. But when I started thrusting, it was visible she is finally getting pleasure out of it. I couldnt last long there though I was already so exhausted from all that we did and I had to hold her so she doesnt fall of the bed as well :D. 
***
To be honest I was expecting I will physicaly feel it much more when I correctly thrust her. That position which went well I saw her rly enjoy herself, but for me the thrust were like in any other position. 
***
I dont know why the fck I have this problem. In porn I see ppl doing whatever kind of shit and finding right position seems to be last of their problems. The women love it anyway he fcks her. Maybe the girls just didnt show it to me that much when they enjoy it. But I rather think I was not rly fcking properly.
***
So on the 2nd sex:

we started with missionary, I can get it in at some point but as I said it feels so unnatural to me and I have to really focus on not slipping out and the uncomfort makes me loose hardness as well and on top of that it just doesnt feel right the whole fcking. I tried putting pillows below her. didnt rly help. Like she is always in some angle that doesnt wanna work out. Same in doggy I tried to put her upper, lower, wider, closer stance. Nothing rly helped. Like her legs are in the way or I cant hold that position comfortably. Maybe my muscles are too short and I cant spread my legs that much or something . I asked her to go on top of me. I tried to fuck her like cowgirl. Again like we are not synchronized at all. She seems to be moving as well, but it didnt match with me. Should she stay still ? And overall even if I managed to thrust for a while in some positions it just wasnt as it should be I didnt seen her enjoying it as that one time, when she even said like finally its good....and my cock slips out so often. I feel really horrible.
***
Like I dont know how to fuck ? what the fuck? it looks so simple... I just move my hips, maybe I should go harder or something, but I feel like slipping as soon as I try to move more to hit her harder there is just that much space to move as my dick length so it doesnt slip. That is not rlly that much. Its really fckin exhausting as well..Did any of u guys struggled on your first times with something similar? What am I doing wrong? How can I improve. 

We were both so fucking horny and it just didnt fckin work. We even tried without condom, it was the same.

Please help
***
TLDR:
positions feel unnatural, uncomfortable, cant get more power and speed in, cock often slips out, not hitting proper angle, she doesnt rly feel it properly. even though size is proper.


",seduction
What to do when a girl grabs my hand while dancing?,"I was at the club last Saturday and while I was moving through some people on the dance floor a girl grabs my hand and kind of lifts it up. I think she was shy because she legit just held my hand, didn't really make eye contact and continued to dance. She was a pretty girl and I could see she was with her friends. When she kinda let go I got close and grabbed her by the waist and was laughing at how she started this interaction and asked her friend ""how much has this one had to drink?"". I left her there with her friends pretty quickly.

I guess I need some advice on dancing. Now, with this girl, if her friends weren't there I probably would have tried to get her to grind on me or something. However, since her friends were right there I didn't feel comfortable being so sexual and I doubt she would be. Maybe I should have tried to lead her away a bit.

This has happened a couple times now where I have no idea what to do with a girl when she opens me in this way. I can only react appropriately when I get opened verbally or when the dancing is immediately sexual. I have no idea how I would incorporate a girl into my dancing in a way that's not grinding since dancing at a club is obviously not choreographed and also involves a lot of jumping up and down and throwing your arms everywhere. I tried to twirl girls but 90% of the time it's awkward because youre not in sync and I also don't know what to do after the twirl.

Incorporate = dancing 'together' as oppose to simply dancing close to/facing each other. 

What would you have done if that girl grabbed your hand? Any good dancers here lol",seduction
A Brief Conversation With A Ukrainian Princess...,,seduction
Physical Escalation (With Example exercises to practise),,seduction
Assuming attraction,"Recently I have been surfing the net for sciences behind attraction and came across something very interesting. There are 2 types of mindsets 1) *innocent until proven guilty* possessed by men who are likely insecure and need certainty that a woman likes them in order to move forward and 2) *guilty until proven innocent* the mindset of men who assume a girl is attracted to them and act accordingly (higher chances of success). That has resonated with me deeply and after giving it a try, it did work. But I want to hear some opinions or tips on how to shift to that mindset and make it permenant and how to verbalize and express yourself when you're assuming a cute girl is attracted to you

",seduction
Beginners help,"Hey guys I need help with pick up. Just getting started too, I’ve seen Rsd Max and other stuff like Jason Capital. Any tips for a college freshmen and cold approaching and seduction. What’s the best way to do it?",seduction
People with ADHD (Attention Deficit Disorder) Tend To Miss Social Cues - Is this you?,,seduction
Comversations Getting Stale with Approaches/On Dates,"I feel like I have the exact same conversation on every first date, and every time I approach a woman now. I'm especially because most of these women are from campus, I feel like one of the first things I think to ask is about their majors, and then we talk about why we picked them. I rattle off the same introductory list of facts about myself when asked. I ask them about their interests. I'm getting very bored of it.

The last date I had felt boring to me, because it felt like a million dates I've had before. And each cold approach feels stale, too.

My favourite conversations tend to be about things that interest me, like topics in philosophy (especially philosophy of mind and philosophy of science), physics and astronomy, politics, sociology, biology, and linguistics, but not everybody has interests that are so academic. It's hard for me to find another ""mode"" of conversation, especially when I'm talking to people who aren't university girls, or are the kind of people not that interested in education itself and just look at it as a stepping stone to a career.

How do you have more varied conversations, so you don't feel like you're having the same discussion over and over again? I want to make it a goal to get into a conversation without asking somebody about their studies once or talking about my studies once, but that stuff just seems so basic to the ""what I do"" aspect of my life right now that I don't know what other ""getting-to-know-you"" topics I'd bring up in those beginning parts of the conversation.",seduction
Negging Is For 10s,"And 9s and 8s too. But that's just rhetoric.

Now let's talk about negging.

Negging is a great way to playfully tease a girl, showing that you are both confident and possess a sense of humor. 

Negging is also a surefire way of taking down an incredibly hot girl's ego, inciting in her a desire to qualify herself to you.

Negs, when done correctly, as to not be pure insults, are an invaluable resource for a man to have.

That being said, *be careful*. 

Most girls that skirt the line of average in physical appearance are not *half* as confident as you assume. They are insecure and far less self assured than you are. Girls are good at hiding this but it is the truth.

You *cannot* use the same amount of negging on a 6 as you would on a 9. You likely think all girls are emboldened by delusions of grandeur and have egos up to high heaven, but you're wrong. You must learn to be calibrated and present the right amount of validation to actually make the girl feel appreciated, valued, wanted. 

You *must not* over-neg a girl or you'll wound her and she'll hate you. Trust me. From experience. I know. You don't want to ruin a good thing and make yourself look like a vicious asshole.

If she's curvy, don't make a joke about what she's eating. Even if it wasn't offensive, she is already painfully aware of not being slender looking like a Victoria's Secret model and will hate you for reminding her of her perceived inadequacy. 

If she's short, don't call her a midget. Even if you didn't mean to be rude, she'll remember that she's always wanted to be 5'8"" like a runway model and will hate you for reminding her of her perceived inadequacy.

Those anedotes are actually true stories. When I said I speak from experience, I meant it.

Be careful out there my guys. 

You can be confident, funny, sarcastic, brash even, but you don't need to be a little asshole.
Girls are attracted to confident men, not walking ballsacks.

",seduction
How do I find a conversation to approach with?," 

Hello Seddit, so to jump right into it there's this one girl in my class in college. I really want to talk with her after class as we usually walk the same way and she walks alone but I just don't know what say. All class info such as hw and tests are all in a calendar in the syllabus so I can't just go with an easy ""Whats the HW?"" Q. But, who knows maybe i'm over thinking this. Your help is really appreciated. Thanks :).",seduction
Would you guys be interested in a 2018 30-day challenge thread?,"I just read all the posts on the old 2015 30-day challenge mega-thread. It was very inspiring and motivational and I really want to have something similar. I noticed we haven't had anything like this in the forums for this year.

&amp;#x200B;

The thread I am referencing is here:

[https://www.reddit.com/r/seduction/comments/2s78g8/2015s\_official\_30\_day\_challenge\_megathread/](https://www.reddit.com/r/seduction/comments/2s78g8/2015s_official_30_day_challenge_megathread/)

&amp;#x200B;

Anyone down?

&amp;#x200B;

If you are, comment below and maybe we can get something started with a list of participants and have day reports when we officially kickstart this thing so we can all work on this together and read some fun stories too.

\-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

If you're in ..

&amp;#x200B;

2018  30-day challenge

**What is the challenge?** Do 30+ days of straight pick-up and write a report on each day with a takeaway  and how you can improve

**Why do the challenge?** ""The only difference between a master and a beginner is that a master has failed more than a beginner has tried"". This challenge is not only meant to make you better at talking to girls, but to get you out of your comfort zone, it's for people who want to take control of their **OWN** lives, for those who is willing to say no to society's rules and boundaries, to do something that you have never done before and prove it to yourself you can **DO IT.** It's all about baby steps and slowly desensitizing yourself and gaining inner confidence. You will need this in EVERY part of your life, in your work, in interviews, with your girlfriend, wife,  in academia, with your family. Ultimately, you want to take charge of your life and have the confidence to do something **YOU** want to do!

**Rules**

Start today right now, no excuses! Do it everyday! The rules are simple, you can do however many approaches you can manage in a day for 30 days straight but always challenge yourself. Push yourself for more the next day. No matter how tired, sad, or whatever excuses you come up with, own it and keep on plowing through. Most importantly, have fun and enjoy it, and look back retrospectively in 30 days to be amazed at the things that you never thought you could do.

\-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

**Participants (so far)**

* [MangoPeaches1234](https://www.reddit.com/user/MangoPeaches1234/comments/9ngif3/reports/)
* BunnyGandhi
* AmiablePenguin
* Imjustheartless
* uberwaffles
* ihavesomefreetime
* gg1angela
* DatingCoach111
* MrDownhillRacer

As suggested below, lets write your reports on your profile and post the link as a reply to your comment so I can add it to the post and everyone can read it. ",seduction
How do I tell if she’s interested in me?,Like I’m honestly terrible at this. Every girl I see I think about asking for their number or name but I create the idea in my head they wouldn’t be at all interested in me. ,seduction
How true is it that women will push for a date if she likes you?,"I've always been frustrated when it comes to texting women. It seems like everything I've ever heard from everybody I've ever talked to / read from contradicts in one way or another. For instance, I often hear this meme that *""if a woman is really interested, then she'll offer to reschedule a date when she says she's busy (whether that be for a legitimate reason like work or plans with someone else, or just saying she can't)"".* On the other hand, I've heard people say that some women won't do this even if they're interested because they think it's just not expected of them as women, or they want to see if the guy offers again, or that other women will intentionally say they're busy / flake on a guy as a test to see how he reacts.

Another thing I've heard is that *""if a woman is interested in you, she will initiate text conversations / send snapchats daily or weekly as a sort of hint to make a move.""* On the other hand, I've heard that some women never initiate with a guy, for similar reasons: they think that it's not their place, they ""want the guy to chase"", they want the validation of knowing the guy is willing to take initiative, etc.

What is your take on this? For the men, do you typically find that women who are interested will frequently counter-offer, initiate conversation, or even suggest that you go out and do stuff, or do they usually remain the ones on the receiving end throughout the entire process? For the women, what's your mindset going into this? Do you typically try to throw out as many ""hints"" as possible to a guy in these ways, or is this advice really just hit-or-miss?

I'm asking simply because as a young man, texting feels a lot like a shitty game that I don't know the rules to. Girls I think are interested flake on me, girls who I never thought were interested turn out to be interested but I never picked up on it, girls who I've already done stuff with who I think are interested aren't initiating, I just don't know how the hell to navigate this sort of thing. I've already learned the basic ""rules of texting"" so to speak (no paragraphs, few hours between messages, all of that nonsense that we all do to pretend we're more cool than we actually are) but how do I interpret the signs?",seduction
How do I get into a girl's social circle?,"There is this one girl I met during one of our semesters together. She was nice, pretty and seemed to be really authentic. I talked to her during the class and was able to get her Snapchat. We have snapped each other before but I haven't really gotten anywhere. I wanted to talk to and become closer to her in person. I thought that the best way to do it would be to become part of her friends group. We go to the same school. This is my final year and most groups have already been established. I have a different social circle than her. I wanted to know if there's an easy way to become part of the circle?",seduction
"What is the most effective way to handle the post-coital ""what are we"" line?",,seduction
What should you do in this situation?,"Short post, to the point, was just walking down the street on my way to study, when I noticed an attractive girl walking down the other part of the sidewalk. She had headphones in and was walking fast, so I wasn't thinking about approaching her, but she quickly eyes me up and down and then breaks eye contact. I didn't believe it at first, but after the checkout I didn't approach since I would've had to run after her and go ahead of her which isn't my style.

So for the future, what would you do different when faced with a situation like this?",seduction
More soft pet names (teasing nicknames)?,"What are some of your go-to soft pet names you use (usually over text)?

More teasing nicknames like: kiddo, dork, weirdo, troublemaker, tiny (if she's short), etc...",seduction
Spicing up the text,"I need you guys’ help. I matched a girl on Tinder and we started texting recently. Our conversations have been mainly about our interest and shit we do in school. We message like 2-3 times a day.  I need some pointers and wisdom on how to be playful and flirtatious through text. I also want to talk to her on the phone very soon because I can be the most charming me through the phone. We’ve only been chatting for like 4-5 days too. Thanks in advanced for your help.


Cheers",seduction
Awkward pauses,"When you're talking to a female, or anyone that you just met for that matter. How do you eliminate those awkward pauses when making conversation.",seduction
How do I approach a girl on my commute?,"I’ve noticed this girl takes the same 8:12 am as me everyday. She’s cute and I’d like to approach her, but I have no idea how to do so without looking like a creep.",seduction
If ur a bi girl in this subreddit- pls read this!! Do u relate?,"I wish I could start a subreddit for girls like me but idk what i'd call it. I never talk in here although I check it a lot and love it because I feel like this is a guys space (maybe overthinking but it was my initial feeling and I stuck to it bc I havent put more thought into it). 

Girls that DO think similarly to me rarely match me in our physical appearances. They tend to be lesbians who act like ""fuckboys"" and dress like those kinda lesbians do lol. I, on the other hand, don't look like that. I guess an example might help visualize; a lot of days I'll wear ripped jeans, heels, but a cool boy t-shirt. When I'm going OUT, i sometimes wear just that but most of the time I'll put on a girl tank top because I have big tits so like why not lol. Guys and girls are pretty equally interested in me, I don't feel more into either or more fitted to date either. With guys it's more of a homie/bonnie-clyde vibe usually because we relate on so much and like the same activities but they usually end up liking me more than i like them and everyone comments that i'm ""the boy"" in the relationship even when it's a boy i'm dating. With girls, i put more thought into my game but I definitely have an advantage over boys because even though i dont think like the girls i'm attracted to.. (super typical hot girls, the kind that wear lingerie every day and are intimidating to others lol).. i've always been a master of persuasion (probably because i;ve been acting since i was young). 

**So because I look so much like a girls girl, i've experienced this weird phenomenon where, my whole life, girls have opened up to me in ways they cant/dont to guys and without knowing gave me the playbook. I've never met girls exactly like me but I feel like this subreddit may have some other girls feeling the same exact way in it!!** Also like to note that it's always like this in the beginning with girls, by this I mean them feeling like i'm just like them, and when it goes away (if i open up to them and we become close friends) our deep talks about differences in how guys/girls think don't stop because it's mutually beneficial- i'm the closest thing they can get to genuine guy advice without having to talk to a boy and they continue to add plays to the playbook without knowing it because i get to see the side of girls that only girls see. Yeah, I really dont like relationship/feeling talks but I put up with the convos because I love my friends lol. 

&amp;#x200B;

\*\* i hate long posts and i'm sorry this is long but it's been on my mind for a while now!!",seduction
"3 Logic Based Rules for ""Being Good in Bed""","Couple of days ago a friend told me he'd be going to a girl's place for a hookup, said he was extremely nervous and asked me how to be ""good in bed"". The great majority of girls say I'm ""good in bed"".

Up until then I had never asked myself that question, but I thought it was very interesting so I gave it some thought, thought I'd share the main 3 rules I follow 100% of the time, pretty foolproof way in my opinion.

As a preface, this is obviously a general rule and doesn't apply to all the cases, there's exceptions to everything.

**MAIN RULE: Understand that sex for women is very different for sex for men**

Understanding this is the basis of everything. I'm sure you all have heard millions and millions of times about shit experiences with guys in bed, the great majority of the time this is because the guy having sex just sees sex the way he sees it, and carries it out that way. He may have had a great time, had an awesome orgasm and saw no problem with it, and the girl ended up feeling completely unsatisfied.

We all know girls are emotional and guys are logical, 100% this extends to sex.
For us it's a basic thing, our train of thought generally is something like: I think you're attractive, sex feels good physically, let's get it done.

For women it's a whole other situation, regardless of whether we're talking about a drunken one night stand with a girl you don't know the name of, a first date hookup, first time with a girl you're dating, or sex with your wife of 30 years, it's always going to be a completely different thing.

To put it in oversimplified terms, we enjoy a blowjob if a girl has good blowjob technique.

We'll bust in 2 min.

For women it's more about the emotions she feels during the act than the physical pleasure. She'll enjoy it if she feels connected to you, if it feels passionate, if it feels ""right"". 

Keep this in mind at all times, and try to adapt whatever you do in bed to fit into what you'd like if you were a woman.


**RULE 2: Take it slow, make sure she's comfortable**

For us guys a lot of the time it's just about enjoying the physical sensations, getting to an awesome cumshot, done. Girls see it completely different, and you can start enjoying sex way more if you take a page from their book.

To put it simply, take a reaaaaally long time with every single step of the foreplay, even with just the initial kissing. Every single thing you do, drag it out to make it as long and slow as possible. Your goal is not to ""get to the penetration"", why are you fucking rushing? Foreplay is amazing.

Switch your mindset. Your new goal is to build up the moment, make the tension/arousal/excitement as HIGH AS POSSIBLE before you put your dick in.

If you've spent 20 min enjoying every part of her body, touching every inch, kissing her lips, cheeks, neck, breasts, legs, giving each other oral, fingering, literally whatever rocks your boat, When you FINALLY put  it in you'll feel heaven. So will she.

Additionally to this, make sure you hold a chill vibe and make sure she's comfortable with every step, you honestly have no idea how common rape is. I can guarantee you 100% EVERY SINGLE GIRL you ask will report at least 1 bad sexual experience with a guy. They might have felt pressured to do something and they're not ready, or done something sexual without feeling comfortable with the moment/person.

Can range from a guy grabbing her ass in a nightclub to her being drugged and fucked unconscious, girls live in constant fear of sexual experiences without consent.

Your main goal here is to not be that guy. Be as far away from that guy as possible.

If you're having sex with a girl for the first time and her mind is thinking ""I have absolutely no fear of this guy doing something to me I don't want"", you're already guaranteed a huge bonus.

Feel free to take little breaks in the process to have some conversation/make a joke/take little pauses to hug every once in a while.

Ask her ""are you comfortable/should we keep going/does that feel good/let me know if you want to stop""

Imagining saying this in the middle of a hot steamy session sounds like a super weird mood killer, but I can guarantee you it'll work the complete opposite way.


**RULE 3: Study her reactions/learn what she loves/focus on pleasing HER**

Again for us guys this doesn't really matter, who doesn't love a deepthroat?

Girls respond wayyyyyyyyy differently to stuff.

You have to take it slow. Observe her reaction to every movement, especially during foreplay. See what she's enjoying, learn what you do that provokes the best reaction. Literally study her sexuality, both from verbal communication and body language. Once you nail this you can adapt the whole sexual act around stuff she fucking loves.

In a brief example, some girls love when I give them a neck kiss by lightly trailing the tip of my tongue through the side of their neck, some other girls love an aggressive bite and suck right in the middle of the neck. Try them both, you'll clearly see which one she loves, do that one. Simple right?

Additionally, test the waters.

This is rather specific to me, but I love dom/sub sex. It turns me on like nothing else and I have plenty of experience doing it. Most girls have at least a little bit of submissive in them, most girls love when I do some dominant stuff and they enjoy that side of me. 

That doesn't mean I'm gonna give a girl a slap across the face and put her in a choke as soon as I put my dick in her for the first time.

I usually start light, maybe grab a good handful of her hair, pull it relatively strongly so she feels the pressure, and look directly into her eyes with a dead serious/angry expression. This is a clear sign of dominance, it will give a clear response. If I see she goes crazy about it then I have a bit of a ""green light"" to progress a bit more, and this way you can gauge what the girl's kinks are as you go without doing something out of place.

All of this general mindset will make her feel like sex with you is ""special"". You care about her, you care about pleasing her more than you care about throwing cum out of your dick, you see sex with her as a meaningful act, instead of being some sort of robot that goes through steps in order to reach a cumshot. The beautiful thing is if you come into it with this attitude she'll feel motivated to do the same for you, now you have 2 people that are trying their best to make each other feel great pleasure, this is ""sexual chemistry"", the ideal goal.


**As a final sidenote:** Try to make the vibe chill and relaxed.

Sex can be stressful, you and her can feel pressure, get caught in your own heads and this can easily carry on through the whole act.

Countless times at the beginning of my sex life I had situations similar to this: You invite a girl over to watch Netflix, you're cuddling in bed for 30 min, you start feeling this huge void in your stomach building up, because you know it's about to come, you finally kiss her. HOLY SHIT, IT'S ON, WE'RE **HAVING SEX NOW** you start moving through the phases while you're both in complete silence, not even fully enjoying anything because you're running at a million miles per hour in your brain about what's happening. Pressure and stress keeps building higher and higher as you go on. Here's a mindblowing unbelievable secret: she's feeling exactly the same.

On the alternative, you can chill the fuck out, relax, make some silly jokes as you go, fucking talk to her about what's happening in your mind, take a little break to just sit there and smile at each other, kiss her nose, do a ridiculous dance move, talk to her about how crazy it is that this is happening, share feelings, whatever works to break this fucking ice tension thing. Make it feel like a cool fun easy thing, it's just chill and enjoyable, it feels ""right"", it's meant to happen. It's totally enjoyable.

We think of a guy who is GOOD IN BED and we imagine a tall jacked dude with a huge dick that eats pussy like a god, knows a million positions and can last for 3 hours. Guess what? Real life isn't porn.

Use your common sense and think around these lines, it's given me great results and hopefully it will for you too.",seduction
Getting from Tinder to social game,"**TL;DR for context and then questions in the end:**

* Am a lonewolf but quite social, just prefer to be alone.
* Good looking, short and athletic. Sound smart (not so sure if I am), talk a lot about philosophy and things like that.
* Started making an effort towards building better relationships with groups of friends I care about.
* Started going out to new places (very alternative / hippie) that are usually about cultural events (movies,poetry,etc..) putting myself out there. If I go alone I usually stay for the movie and then get out.
* I can't complain too much about my dating life, I use tinder I go out mainly with tinder girls or eventually if I go out to a good rock club and meet someone. Went out last night with girl I saw at college, she smiled at me, saw she was interested in an event  and just pmed her for us to go.

Now I want to start breaking free from the dependence on them coming to me in some way, I want to start being more active.

* Going after girls I know from college and are in some social circle // acquaintances of mine
* Start building a social circle in these new places
* Don't depend on tinders and random encounters

**My thing is, I really never did this, and I'm not sure how to start. I think I can be both too upfront** (just go for intensely when meeting someone and scare them away, like ask them out when I meet them first time) **or beat around the bush too much** (because I don't know the appropriate way to ask a girl out when I have tons of people in common)**.** 

**What do you guys recommend to get started in this real world? What are your tips, advice and sources to read/watch?** 

  
Although this is /r/seduction this goes both for making new friends, I want more connection than cheap sex and I believe this is the way.",seduction
How to add girls to my social circle?,"High schooler. I am friendly and make several female friends in my classes that I feel comfortable talking to and texting. However, I can't seem to keep girl friends that aren't in my class or hang out with any girls outside of class. I hang out with a group of guys who are somewhat like me, likeable but they choose to hang out with other guys when not in classes. My problem is that all the girls I would like to have in a social circle hang out in groups with other girls who I have never talked to or interacted with before. Any advice?

P.s. I'm not interested in any of the girls romantically, I want to interact with them more to possibly get referred or introduced in the future",seduction
Notes/Summary PDF EXCHANGE for any Dating Product like PUA video programs or books. (e.g. Social Circle Game by RSD Luke),"Let's face it there is a ton of books and programs out there for Pick UP. Most have similar content, they are expansive and time consuming. So once you know about the material a bit it is better to just read short summaries instead of watching 50 hours of videos.

I have to offer my own notes from:

\- The Natural by rsd max

\- NRYNE from alex social

\- the blueprint by tyler

\- several dating books.

I am looking for notes from:

\- RSD Luke for Social Circle game 1 or 2

\- Social Encrypted

\- girlfriend game

\- any other program or book about Dating/PU/relationships or Self Help

&amp;#x200B;

Preferably they are written on the computer but if handwritten and scanned in in a readable way that is fine too!

Send me a message or comment below. I will create a shared cloud storage if enough people join in.

Let's crush it.",seduction
Going to see an ex I still have feelings for at a party,"Basically it's been 3 weeks, I've reached out to her twice and she has told me she has moved on everytime (I got in a fight infront of her, something she has ptsd about). 

My friends on the other hand tell me she still asks how I'm doing and that she just wants to make sure I'm okay.

I still want to attract her back, but I'm not sure how to do it. I could take another girl, or I could there with a bunch of my guy friends.

Please guide a brother in the right direction in order to win her back. I know there's always a way.",seduction
Going out to bars/ concerts solo,"My friends aren’t into daygame, and they aren’t always available to hang out, so I find myself going out to meet people solo. It used to be easy to approach knowing if I failed I still had a group to interact with. Now that I go out alone to events, if I’m not able to join a group or make friends, I feel like a failure. Also going around interacting with every group makes me feel odd. 

Do you guys have any tips for what to do/ how to act when you go out to events alone?",seduction
Did my first approaches today,"So I went shopping alone today and thought I'd make a day of it, so I was in a fragrance shop looking at the different colognes and decided to do the cologne opener cause I thought why the hell not. So anyway, I tried it out first on a girl working in an apple shop and she and her male colleague responded in a good tone. Since that I went into different shops and tried it out on some other customer assistants after making some conversation and they all responded willingly. Only a small step but I'm still proud of this",seduction
Ever since graduating high school I notice a lack of girls in my day to day,"Around senior year was when I started understanding this stuff and actually made some good progress with girls. (18yrs) I've still been improving in other areas of my life and I feel capable of attracting women but I noticed I don't meet many in my average day. College is an obvious gold mine but it's not really an option for at least another year and in the meantime I do it from home. I spend most of my free time either hanging out with friends or doing my hobbies. I live in a pretty small city with not much to do in terms of events and activities i'm interested in.

 The only times i'm ever exposed to girls are either at work, (which I don't want to open up that can of worms),and the gym which I feel girls probably don't want to be bothered when working out. I also feel that doing so would distract me from being productive in the gym. I tried tinder a little bit ago but didn't get any matches so I don't bother with that anymore. So how do you guys go about meeting girls if your options are scarce? ",seduction
14 Ideas For 'Showing Intent' When You've Just Met A Woman,"The secret to 'showing intent' is to start small and slowly become more daring. 

* If she allows it, move on to something more daring. 
* If she rejects it, laugh it off, keep talking and try something different later. 

Below are bunch of escalation moves, which start tame and slowly become more bold. 

* **Open direct** \- ""I thought you look really nice/great/interesting/fashionable so I wanted to say hi"". (If you must, open indirect as a warmup, but you better throw in the direct opener with 'by the way' in pretty soon afterwards.)
* **Fiddle with her jewellery while showing interest in it** \- Any sort of touching is good. Here's an innocent one to start with.
* **Playful taps on the arm or leg when she says something cool or funny**  
* **Leading her somewhere by the hand**
* **Over-the-top jokes about getting married or a super-romantic date**
* **Grabbing her hands and dancing salsa (or the classic PUA spin hand-shake)**
* **Readjusting or picking something out of her hair**
* **Asking if she's sporty and playfully feeling her arms or abs** 
* **Pulling her in close and throwing her arms over your shoulders**
* **Hugs**
* **Nibbling on her ear or neck** 
* **Rubbing her hands on your chest or ass**
* **Grinding on the dancefloor**
* **Kissing etc...**

Obviously, there's loads more (add your own in the comments)

# Here's the important part of the post

If you're a newbie, this will all make complete sense, but you **still won't do it** because: 

* you'll be so pleased that the hottie is enjoying the polite chit-chat that you won't want to ruin that;
* you have few references of escalating going well that your default is too assume that it'll ruin the set;
* your brain floods with bullshit excuses why it's inappropriate to escalate.

It might take dozens, maybe hundreds of sets that fizzle out until nowhere, until you realise that the polite chit-chat frame **DOESN'T WORK.**

That's what happened to me. Not escalating was my biggest sticking point for years, until a wingman spent a memorable night whispering 'PHYSICAL' in my ear every time he saw me in set. It felt so unnatural but the results from that night were phenomenal. (Kissed and number closed two girls with bad logistics, and fucked them both later that week.)  

# Please give escalation a go 

Set yourself a night of specific challenges based on it: dance salsa with 5 girls, get turned down for 5 kisses etc.

A night like this will change your game if you're a newbie who struggles with this.  

**GOING TOO FAST WON'T KILL THE SET** (unless she has a bf). You can laugh if off and carry on talking. Going too slow will kill the set, waste your time and make you feel like a pussy.  

# Showing intent on dates

This guide was based on nightgame, but can apply to daygame and **DEFINITELY ON DATES.**

Yes, escalating is scary for the three reasons mentioned in the bullets above. You really really have to give this a shot on dates though. Seriously, even if you try and fail, it's better not trying

If you don't escalate on a first date, you'll be extremely lucky to get a second.

***I've co-launched a Telegram group for men who want to become incredible with women. Hundreds of dudes discussing their goals and getting advice on their sticking points. If you'd like to join, drop me a PM with your Telegram handle.*** ",seduction
"She didn't respond a text after saying ""please, now we'll have to meet""","I was talking to this girl for a while but we stopped since shes from another city like 15 days ago. We started talking again 4 days ago through voice messages and she was almost trying to convince me that having a distant relationship isn't a bad idea (we've never met). I said ""that's not for me...etc"" but she lives close... We would be able see each other if it comes to it (actually I think it's way better than living close by)

So she changed to agree with me ""Yes I don't like distant relationship, we need personal conection... but now we have something already, I don't know what, but we have something and we'll have to meet... I'm crazt enough to go next holyday to meet you"" 
I said ""sounds great, but next holyday is next week"" and then we didn't made any concrete plans but kind of...

So I sent her a voice message 2 days later (just not to stay silent for a whole week) just saying ""have a good trip"" (she was returning to her city from somewhere)

It's been now 3 days and it's not the she didn't listened to it, she didn't even visualize it. I'm like what the hell... even if she is really good at gaming no one resists that much curiosity haha... 
My best guess would be she just missed unintentionally (and I'm never the optmist one) but anyways next weekend is in 2 days and I'm really down to meeting her... But I don't even know how to re-engage.

PS: I know I know ""next her"" ok... I could easily next her and fuck any other girl this weekend but I'm just not in that phase right now... after a while you get tired of fucking everyone in your city. And after a while numbers game also gets lame... I'm more inclined to try and make it work no matter how hard it looks when that's what I want.",seduction
"After many years of trying to man up, I’m doing my first true bar experience, some advice needed","Before I start, here’s some facts which can give more context.

1. I am autistic
2. I wear earplugs to places to block audio, due to a phobia. I can still hear others with them on.
3. I’ve been to this bar before on a Friday evening and left before 6pm
4. I live in Australia
5. I’ve tried picking up multiple times with little success
6. I am overweight

Sooooo anyway, I am planning on heading to a bar alone. As said above, I’ve been there before on an afternoon, but now I want to go much later, at a Thursday night from around 8ish.

I have the sole goal of talking to women. I wanna put myself out there and perhaps a casual date. The biggest issue I mentioned above is due to a personal anxiety issue I can only go where and when there is no live or loud music/dj. This particular bar has background-level music but only on weeknights. I’m gonna head there on an eventless day and wondering if it’s harder to meet women on days that are not particularly “events”?

Another question, do you think with all the facts I posted, am I fit to seduce? I recently got myself a neat haircut and I have plenty of nice clothes but wondering if this night is gonna flop? How do you feel about me getting there alone?",seduction
Jesus Guys... It's not that hard to tell,"Lately I have noticed an uptick in the ""I'm not sure if she likes me and don't know what to do"" posts.
So a little lifeprotip for you all.

Any of the following means she probably likes you. The more of these you see in combination the more she she likes you.

 Its the girl equivalent of a flashing neon sign above her head that that says ""fuck me now"" 

If she says she'd like to see you again.

She tells you where she's gunna be and that you should come hang.

She repeatedly keeps touching you on your arm. Shoulder, hand or legs.

She tells you she doesn't have a bf.

She tells you she likes you or that you are cute, funny, sexy or handsome, Have lovely eyes. 

She makes an effort to be near you even if it means ditching her friends for a bit. 

She gives you her number

She sticks her tongue down your throat.

I get that a lot of people are insecure and socially awkward but Honestly. It's not that hard to tell.

Finally. 

Treat every moment you are with a woman as a chance to flirt, regardless if you are attracted to her or not. It's great fun, good practice. And occasionally leads to very memorable events.",seduction
Where to do daygame?,"The obvious answer is ""where ever you are going anyway"" is the best place to daygame, and yeah I do go to places/events/meetup groups I enjoy but let's say I have a whole day off and I want to go somewhere specifically to daygame.  Where are the best places?

Gas stations - Seems like girls are in a rush to get in/get out.  Worth trying anyway I suppose but seems like asking to get shot down.

Grocery stores - Seems ideal, you can see how fast she's moving, mention something in her cart.

Shopping mall - Seems ok, except they're usually with their friends or parents, could be 16-17 years old, but if you notice a girl who's walking slow/seems like she has nowhere to be, that's a great target.

Library - Low population, and the ""drawback"" that I see is if a girl is sitting down and you sit down too, to game her, then it's harder to gauge interest/disinterest because in regular life they walk away when they're disinterested.

Clothing store - seems a little invasive because....I'm sure they'd think it's weird that you're walking around the women's section anyway.",seduction
Regret has paralyzed me,"When I was 18 years old I decided to go to a music school. This was the worst decision of my life. The school was 99% dudes, there was no college life at all (no clubs or greek life) and even worse I stayed with my parents to save money. Well now that I'm graduated and realize what a waste that degree was. I'm working some grocery store job while living with my parents and regretting every day that I followed my passion. What makes it worse is my parents could have afforded my entire tuition if I went to a normal University. I could have focused on becoming more social, independent and gone on dates. I keep hearing college is the prime time for dates and sex and now I can't get over the fact I missed out on it.

The woman I started dating at 22 was going to a normal University.

She told me about the guys she hooked up with and they really weren't even that attractive (one was a straight up by the books chubby computer nerd) She said her entire friend group hooked up with this dude and that honestly made me bitter and angry. What makes it worse is all her friends keep telling her how attractive I am. I feel like I missed out on so much.

I was a socially isolated virgin who worked out and cared about his appearance while this nerdy weird looking dude was getting laid left and right just due to his circumstances and convenience.

Well this regret has festered into my game. I do plan to go back to school for a different degree but I will definitely be older than my classmates. I feel like the fact I didn't have a college experience has turned me bitter and prevents me from being the confident attractive man that I strive to be. I feel like I can't even do seduction because this event has caused me to just be bitter and negative.

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
What to tell girls when they ask what video games I play?,"19M college video game nerd who plays on PC,  girls constantly ask what games I play on my laptop and I have yet to figure out a good answer, either I give them a list of all the games I play and they don’t know what any of them are and kinda just awkwardly move to the next subject, or I brush off the question and it sounds like I’m being distant and closed off.",seduction
How do I ask a girl out if she is always with her friends?,"I know a girl that I've asked for information once and we chatted for a while, but I was in a hurry and she was waiting for a friend and I've lost the opportunity to ask her number so we could talk later.

Then I've seen her again but now she's always with her friends and everytime I approach her, all I can say is hi and can't talk because she is always with one or two friends.

I am still new to asking girls to go out so I might be missing something.",seduction
Dealing with social stigma regarding approaching,"Throwaway. I'm not from the US. I'm from Austria. Here, the dating scene is completely different from that of the US. Most people here find partners through common social circles or friends. When I say most, it's actually fairly close to 100%. It's just the default way of doing things. People usually network through their own circles, meet friends of friends etc. I'm not saying that casual sex doesn't exist, it does... but again through that whole 'networking' thing. Approaching in bars etc. isn't really a thing here. So, why am I asking this?


I have no trouble striking up conversations with girls at clubs or bars. In fact I'm rather good at it. I have no anxiety or social issues. But hooking up successfully with girls you met the same night is nigh impossible. I basically have to get their number, and wait a few weeks until sex. I would like to accelerate this process. The only girls I've managed to do it with are travelers from abroad, and trust me, it's a night and day difference. Among the native girls, there is a huuuge social stigma regarding hooking up with strangers. Basically, if girls just 'get together' with a guy they just met, they are immediately labeled as easy, sl*tty, wh*res, etc. For guys, it's the opposite. They are seen as players, alpha, topdogs and so on. You get it. But, you may ask, why care about this at all, why care about what other people think? You see, here it's very rare to find a girl out alone. Usually (esp. if she's college aged like me), she's out with 3-4 other friends. Meaning if a girl hooks up with someone, her friends will notice (obviously) and word spreads quickly. This often tarnishes the reputation of the girl, meaning they are hesitant to do something like this. Likewise with traditional dating there is a huge courting period where girls basically tease the guy, to try to prolong sex or whatever in order to ""test the waters"". And again, this usually happens with mutual friends. Most relationships start like this, meet up -&gt; go out drinking etc a few times -&gt; makeout -&gt; go on a few dates -&gt; sex -&gt; relationship.. Also, dating multiple people isn't very common here, and usually is seen as something very rude. A guy texting multiple girls at once (if any of them find out) is a dealbreaker to most. 


Any advice, maybe even from European guys, how to get around this social stigma? I'm not saying it's impossible, but it's definitely very difficult and I would like to improve my whole approach to the situation. 


Edit: I messed up my title, I meant 'regarding approaching with sex in mind'",seduction
Approaching while at work?,"Just looking for some opinions on approaching customers while on the job. I see questions all the time about asking women out from the workplace, but mine in particular is about customers.

I work part-time at a dining hall doing clerical work but I'm often out and about in the dining rooms seeing women all day.
I'm not seeking to approach every single girl, but rather the ones that catch my attention and reciprocate ioi's.

There is this one girl in particular I see fairly regularly that I'd like to approach, but I have little idea how to go about it fearing it would seem unnatural.

TLDR: I work at dining hall and would like to know how and if I should approach while on the job.",seduction
7 First Date Ideas Other Than “Let’s Get A Drink”,"One of the things that adds pressure and potential awkwardness to first dates is the tendency to focus completely on each other.

For example, “let’s get a drink.” When two people who barely know each other sit down for a drink, there’s only one thing to focus on (besides drinking): *talking to each other.*

Of course you must talk to each other in order to get to know each other. However, if there was some other activity involved, it would relieve the constant pressure to figure out what to say next.

1. **Let’s Get A Drink &amp; Play Board Games!**

Bars with board games are becoming trendy these days. Now playing a few games of checkers, Connect 4, and Hungry Hippos may sound childish, but it can also be a great way to learn about each other’s childhood, competitive spirit and carefree attitude.  Give her a chance to let loose and become a kid again, even if just for a little while. And really, isn’t there something mildly sexy about a hot girl in a low-cut shirt trying to gobble as many balls into the hippo’s mouth as possible?

Similar to this one is going to a bar with video and/or arcade games.

2. **Making Stuff.**

Going to a painting, pottery or cooking class is a great way to do something together while having some activity to focus on. This vastly reduces the pressure to “talk and get to know each other.” The beauty is that you will get to know each other anyway through the teasing, flirting and laughing that happens throughout the class.

**3. Read Random Things.**

Wander through the bookstore and randomly pull books off the shelf. The game is that you flip open the book and read the first sentence you see. Then the other person has to give a reaction.

If you want to spice things up, the person reading has to tack-on the words “in bed” to the end of any sentence that was read. This activity won’t make for a complete date, but it’s a great add-on activity if you happen to wander past a bookstore (for example: a date window shopping on the boardwalk).

**4. Pretend to be Pompous at the Art Gallery.**

Now if you’re actually an art snob, you can skip this one. But if you’re like the rest of us, you wouldn’t know a Jackson Pollock from PlopEgg Painting. (If you’re not familiar with the latter, you can Google that. Just not at work).

So find an art studio that offers complimentary wine and take your girl. Hold your noses high in the air and tell each other “what you see in this piece.” Then have a laugh.

**5. Animal Lovers Unite.**

If you’re an animal lover and she’s an animal lover, this one can really melt the heart. Take her to the shelter. Volunteer to walk the dogs, feed the cats, do whatever needs to be done. Trust me that when a woman loves animals and sees that you do as well, her attraction skyrockets. Just make sure to tell her to dress appropriately for the occasion.

An alternative to this one for people who have dogs is instead of you two going on a date, you agree to ""take the dogs on a date.” See how the little rascals get on with each other. Take them to the dog park or the beach. If the pair of hounds click like old buddies, chances are that you and her will get along just fine.

**6. Be A Tour Guide.**

You’re from the West Side. She’s from the East Side. Take her on a walking tour of your favorite parts of town. Maybe she’s spent little (if any) time there before. Act like a real tour guide. Give her a little history. Impress her with your knowledge (just between us dudes: it’s cool to Google a few facts before hand, just so you know what you’re talking about). Make sure to pop into a couple of your favorite pubs for a drink or two along the way.

**7. Go To The Farmer’s Market (or a fair).**

Anything where you can wander around, see some sights, taste some food and generally play around is always great. You’re bound to find some unique attire for sale in places like this. Try on some goofy hats together. Take some pictures. Have a laugh.

Grab a seat under a shady tree and enjoy some of the homemade treats the market has to offer. If you are prepared with blanket, you can turn the event into an impromptu picnic.

Women love uniqueness and creativity. And when the pressure to simply talk has been removed because there’s an activity involved, she can relax and be herself. And so can you. When that happens, the talking just happens naturally.

You can use the ideas above for a full date (except the bookstore one probably) or as one part of a longer date.

And remember to check out more great articles to up your game [here](http://dailymanup.com/how-to-attract-women-turn-girls-on/).",seduction
"Help! ""I'm busy this week""...","Okay, I met a girl out on Saturday during one of her socials and I had many other options that night so we were only chatting in the beginning. I thought she was cute but didn't peruse at the time. 

Fast forward today (Tuesday) I added her on Facebook since I don't have much to lose as I won't see her day to day (she's in the same uni but we have no classes or anything in common) 

I texted a her god forbid through Facebook to ask her out and it went like this... 

Me: Ideally I'd ask in person but I'm not actually in (insert sport) remember so don't know when I'll see u.
Me: Anyhow, thought u were fun and wondering if you'd be down to hang out sometime?

Her: Yeah sure
Her: I’m pretty busy this week but after that I’m around.

What does this mean? She sort of counter offered I guess so do I text her to arrange for next week, acknowledge it and say what days youre free? Or just leave it and try again on Friday or something?

I do like her and want to persue this but won't if theres no point. I thought about this but probably shouldn't say this should I? Something along the lines of... ""it's completely fine if you're not looking for that right now u can just let me know? Otherwise shall we say Monday for now?""

I'm over thinking a little cuz im just not sure what this means like is she interested or not I'm fine with either and happy to move on just don't know what to do right now. ",seduction
Some of my fears with approaching,"Other then approach anxiety I have some other fears when I think about approaching (for reference, I'm a college sophomore whos a virgin, never had a relationship before, pretty introvert, never approached)  
1) Thinking too much- I overthink everything in general, but when I see a girl I'm attractive to I always think about how the conversation would flow, what I would say, what she would say etc. For example i see this one girl in one of my classes in the library sometimes, and I always think i should approach and say ""hey arent you in this class, my name is...whats your name?"" but then I wouldn't be able to think about what to say next to carry the convo.  
Also along the lines of thinking too much I kind of freak myself out thinking if I do approach she going to tell all her friends that some guy approach her and just thinking about that makes me feel weird

2) Thinking too much about the sex- In my head(this goes with overthinking) I skip to how it would be having sex with a girl I end up attracted to, which probably adds to the approach anxiety. Also being in college where the sexual tension is high(to me anyway) adds to this.

3) Being judged by others- Now i know I shouldn't care what others think about me and for the most part I don't (wont show it anyway) but that fear of possibly messing up and being judge could get to me, especially since if I mess up my first approach my confidence could take a hit since it taken this long to even attempt to do it.   


Any tips/suggestions could be helpful",seduction
Be congruent when texting women you’re interested in.,"This is all from my experience. I’m 23 and have had sex with 11 girls, and this is what works for me in regards to texting a woman. If you play your cards correctly, she will actually get excited when you text her rather than thinking “Oh Jesus Christ.”

You text. She texts back. Then you reply. Then she replies. And so forth.

Easy. Don’t send multiple texts in a row. Don’t seem overly eager to text her.

Gauge her interest in you by giving close-ended responses sometimes. If she’s into you, she will keep the conversation going. Then do your part and contribute to the conversation. If she doesn’t reply, well, you’ve got to be prepared for that. But you learn something; she’s either really busy or not that into you. Now you wait for her to text you first and find something better to do. You will not send another text. If she never texts you back? OH NO! Get over it and find something productive to do.

If you’re asking all the questions, seeking all this attention and expecting an answer to every question like it’s an interview, she will sense you’re too eager to talk to her which will turn her off.

Play it cool, and god damn, find something to do. I’m usually busy and can only reply to girls 30mins-2hrs after they text me and they love that I actually have something better to do than blow their phones up; and those things that I have better to do may be other women. They love it",seduction
"Men from abusive homes, keep screwing up your relationships? Here is how I fixed it.",,seduction
Any tips on getting same day lays from tourists despite bad logisitics?,"I live near a big city that attracts alot of tourist girls. I just started daygaming recently. All the numbers I got were flakes, so I've begun to focus on getting instadates instead. I have managed to get a few instadates, but nothing happened from any of them. I've noticed it's way easier to get instadates with these tourists than with the locals. With a couple of them, maybe something could've happened if they didn't have to leave the very next day or if their friends weren't coming to meet them an hour after I initially approaches them. 

Also, logistics aren't perfect as I live with my family an hour away from that city. The 2 different girls that I had the best chance of banging were staying at hotels around 30 min from where we met. With both of them, after the initial approach, I took them for a walk, got drinks with them at a coffee shop, sat on a bench, then went for another walk until they had to go see their friends. I did verbally and physically escalate with them - they were neutral to my touching their watch, earrings, necklace, fingernails, hair, etc. But I didn't go for the kiss. There were some bars/lounges around 10-15 min walk from where I met them, and I now realize I probably should've tried leading them there

Has anyone gotten any same day lays? Any tips for what I could do better despite the bad logistics?



",seduction
Best way to end a first date?,"So I just finished a first date with a girl I cold approached. We had some drinks, gelato and then I walked her back home.

I ended the date by asking her out again for Friday night, she said she'll let me know because of work. I then gave her a kiss on the cheek and said goodnight, let me know about friday.

I'm very new to the dating scene and my game needs improvment.

Any advice on the best ways of ending a first date?
",seduction
[FR] 'No girl' rejection and close call with a maybe call,"Was out with a few guys i’ve never met, One of whom is a big time slayer. 

Tall, muscular, bearded tattoo artist who everyone in my town seemed to know. He was banging his high school teacher when he was 15 and has a huge list of gorgeous girlfriend – Every one of his stories involved hot girls approaching him on night out. I was trying to almost study his mannerisms and ‘learn’ from him as even though he’s good looking, he’s not ‘model material’ like my other slayer friend who has 9’s throwing themselves at him every time he leaves the house, so I felt like maybe there was more to actually ‘learn’ from him compared to my friend.

First approach was on a really hot ‘no girl’


Gorgeous. 18 or so. She was with a friend sitting down and both of them were facing away from everyone else in the bar and were often engrossed in convo. I know from experience that this is a 100% ‘go away’ set, but I found the balls too approach her (It was obvious every other guy in there wanted too by the way they were all looking at her and clearly talking about her, but didn’t have the guts. I wouldn’t have usually either, but for some reason was feeling ballsy)


I opened her (her friend was now at the bar) and I made a comment about her checking her stocks as an opener (has worked before) as she was texting, but she just blinked at me and forced a fake smile and nodded her head and looked away from me. 

I went into some sort of cold read which lead too a short story with a few easy threads in there for her to comment on but she just nodded her head. 

I’M certain that if she wasn’t sitting down at this point, she’d have just walked away as they often do. 

I asked her name and made some statements and asked some more questions and she was doing exactly what all ‘no girls’ do and trying really hard to not engage me. Made some assumptions about her but she carried on basically ignoring me lol.

I Was dying too eject at this point as social pressure was building up but I carried on speaking. Tried to run some little routine about the rings on her fingers but she didn’t go for it at all and i felt like I was digging an even deeper hole here lol. 

Then She was like ”Anyway, my friend will be back soon. I’ve got a boyfriend and i’ll be honest – you’re not my type. It ain’t gonna happen”. 

I tried to remain playful and teased her about rejecting me for being too ugly (like Max RSD sometime does) but she’s still not engaging. 

Then she just starts texting and looking away from me and it this point I decide to throw in the towel and accept that I really wasn’t her type and there was no way of getting this particular girl. On to the next!

I think that no amount of 'GAME'  in the world could have gotten me this girl.

It's clear that you can only 'game' girls who are initially attracted to you physically as well as being single and available.

Not feeling too down about that rejection, I opened another hot girl with a comment on her dress and told her she looked like Beetlejuice with the black and white stripes.

She laughed. I asked her name and then made a cold read about her doing yoga or something. Just a bullshit ‘canned cold read’, really, but I got lucky and she started talking about her yoga and stuff. I grabbed her friend and told her she looked like Tara Reid and then we all have a convo about our celeb ‘lookalikes’ and stuff (I got Patrick Swayze, which I’ll take as i’m and ugly mofo! lol). Introduced the tattoo artists to the girls and ‘bigged him up’ (I notice lots of people always put their friends down to make themselves look alpha and stuff, but I liked doing the opposite). I DVH’d for him and told them about how he travels the world tattooing people and is semi-famous and stuff.

Then moved them all too a different bar but I was maybe slightly drunk at this point and I found myself jumping from girl to girl too much and didn’t do a good job of making it clear which one I was going for as I was in a good mood and was flirting pretty heavily with all of them and also forget who was who/what their names were!

Branched off with the one I wanted who my other friends thought was the hottest one in the group. 

Just some comfort talk and asked her if she could cook and done a little role play thing about us being on a date which I used to do some very heavy kino under the ‘umbrella’ of a role play.

Her friends were getting food and now we were outside waiting for them and she was cuddling me, and there was a moment where I really think I should have kissed her, but I was a bit concerned that I hadn't made her chase enough yet and didn't want to be the one 'chasing' her too obviously and so decided not to. 

I’m pretty sure this may have backfired. Might have made her think i was a pussy or something.
Went to see her friends and she grabbed my arm as we walked.

They invited me and tattoo dude to their place for a drink. Me and girl in back of cab and I was rubbing her legs and being touchy feely. Again, should have kissed her here? But also thought maybe she wouldn't want to be kissed in front of all her friends and it might make her feel slutty?

Back to their place and similar. We all sat in the lounge together drinking. Just light touching and rubbing her when she said she was cold, but at this point she had gone very quiet and the energy seemed to drop so much. She just seemed tired. I needed to be way more proactive

I wish I had have done something like just asked her to show me around her house where i could have made a move on her in private, but I often forget this sort of basic shit in the moment and at one point whilst I was chatting with her friend, she disappeared to bed! 
 
If I could play it over again, i'd deffo had went for the kiss which I feel would have changed the direction of the interaction there after in a positive way.

Half being a pussy, and half 'over-gaming' on my part, I think

First girl was just impossible and unless I had a handsome man face transplant, she was never gonna go for it lol",seduction
What is the best video series to learn seduction?,Mark Manson? Mystery? Tyler? Any other?,seduction
Stop making exsues for yourself,"Too many of us getting into the habit of reading seduction books, and constantly researching without taking action. Today is your last day of not taking action. One thing plaguing your growth/success is your excuses. ""I need new clothes"" ""I don't have enough money"" ""I not in good enough shape."" Believe me when I tell you almost none of that matters. The newest Nike shoes aren't going to help you get girls, flashing money attracts the wrong women (i.e. golddiggers), huge muscles and a six pack also aren't as important as you think. 

Many girls will still give you a chance if they see your potential. Women are naturally nurturing meaning that what you help you success and be taken care of you. As long as you're working towards improving yourself she will still be invested in you. 

Guys miss out on too many opportunities with great women thinking they need this and that. When in reality they only want the confidence that comes with new clothes, a lot of money, and big muscles.  There's many way to build your confidence such as affirming yourself, taking care of yourself and getting out of your comfort zone. 

&amp;#x200B;

**The faster you call yourself out on your excuses the easier it is to move forward and get to where you want to be with women and in life**

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
How To Do Push/Pull – Using Suggestion,"Using push/pull is critical to your seduction game. There are many forms of push/pull – including physical, verbal and combinations. In this post I’m going to lay out a simple framework for doing push/pull using the power of suggestion.

**The Power Of Suggestion**

Think about someone “telling you” to do something. The first thing you would think (before you even consider what they’re telling you to do) is: “is this person a reliable source for this information?”

Right?

You’re not going to do something you’re “told to do,” if you don’t trust that the person telling you is reliable.

Suggestions are different. Think about someone “suggesting something.” The first thing you would do is consider the idea itself (whatever the suggestion was). You wouldn’t focus on if the person giving the suggestion is reliable, because he’s not telling you to do/think anything specific. He’s just offering a possibility.

The key here is that by “suggesting” rather than “telling” you can get people to focus on the idea straightaway and bypass the part where they need to consider the source of the information first.

When it comes to women, the concept works exactly the same way. If you “tell her” to do something or think/feel a certain way, she will resist. That's because she must first decide if you’re reliable enough to be telling her those things.

However, if you suggest it, then she will just focus on the idea itself.

An important final point about suggestion is that when done correctly, it can be so subtle as to barely be noticed (or perhaps not noticed at all). Nonetheless, the seed of suggestion is still planted. When it starts to grow, she will often consider it to be her idea (which is what you want – better to be “her idea” vs you “telling her” what to do/think).

**Push/Pull Framework – Using Suggestion**

The framework is like this:

1. Tell her something interesting/exciting about something you do, something you’re about, something you did recently, etc. An interesting story.
2. At the end of the story, suggest that she would really love doing it. It would be a blast. Use descriptive words to really bring about the “feelings” of enjoying it.
3. After the suggestion is complete, playfully disqualify her and basically say “nah..you probably wouldn’t enjoy it.”
4. Change the subject. Don’t wait for her to refute the idea that she may *not* enjoy it. Just move on.

**Example:**

1. You’re telling her a story about rock-climbing. Maybe you do it regularly. Maybe you did it for the first time. Maybe you’re thinking about doing it and you’re merely relaying a story that you heard/read about it. Whatever.
2. At the end of the story you casually drop the line “It’s really so exhilarating. You’d probably really love it."" \[Now use words to really bring out feelings ---&gt;\] “The wind flowing through your hair, the solitude, the freedom, the adrenaline, the sense of accomplishment.” Whatever ‘feeling-type’ words are applicable to the situation. Women think in feelings, so to really reinforce that she’d *love it*, you have to say a few things that evoke feelings.
3. After you say all that. Pause for a second or two. Then give her a sly smile (smirk) and disqualify her. This is done playfully. “Nah…you probably would hate it.”
4. Change the subject. “So anyway….” And then just start talking about something else.

**Breakdown**

What you’ve done here is describe an interesting/exciting situation, made her feel some positive emotions related to it, pulled her in by implying that she’d love it (by saying something like “you’d ***probably*** love it”) and then pushed her away by saying she really wouldn’t love it.

The suggestion that she’d love it (rather than directly stating that she’d love it) has the power that we discussed before. You’re not telling her, so she doesn’t have to consider whether you’re a reliable source to be stating whether she’d love something or not.

The push at the end has this power: When you tell people they can’t have something, or wouldn’t like something, they immediately want it. It’s like a knee-jerk reaction.

The combination of those two things can really ratchet up her desire for whatever topic you’re discussing(in this example, rock-climbing). If you’re a rock climber, then you’re the guy who can fulfill her newly found desires.

Substitute any activity that you’re about in place of rock-climbing. Kick things off with an interesting story and then apply the framework above. She’ll be super-excited to go do that activity with you (and may even think it was her idea).

Golden.

Make sure to check out more great articles [here](http://dailymanup.com/how-to-attract-women-turn-girls-on/). ",seduction
Use Tinder &amp; Instagram To Get The HOTTEST Girls,,seduction
So women are attracted to things that they cannot get.,I have heard a method were people act disinterested when talking ti a girl but how do i do this with out looking like a total dick,seduction
Picking Up Girls All Around The World - Infield Compilation Rampage,,seduction
Why are comments like this allowed?,"I explained that I'm an autistic man with low prospects, not young anymore, has little to offer women (at least not if you measure by status and money) and get this reply:

&gt; If a guy is autistic and has no prospects, he is to stay home and jackoff. No one cares about them, sorry.

What?  Something like that, allowed here?

For those of you who have some empathy, is it just me or is this place taking on an undercurrent of ""harsh realism"" focused on status and money, which another sub is better known for?",seduction
"Anyone in Damascus, Syria?",,seduction
Weird situation: I'm a novice with women but people think I'm a player.,"24M

I've always had a good understanding of emotions and human connection, but only  for the last 6 months have I worked at my charisma and extraversion.

It's actually gone pretty well. To the point that people think I must be really good with women. And tbh I can flirt/tease them fine. It's the showing sexual intent and escalation skillset that I'm lacking.

It's weird though, because I can attract girls with my personality, but I don't know what to do after that. Mainly because I truly am very inexperienced with women, its just that I have very good social skills. 

My escalation skills, sexual vibe is so incongruent with the genuine confidence with which I speak to them. 

So I talk and flirt, but my physical advances are uncalibrated, hesitant and creepy. ",seduction
First dates during the winter,"I'm fairly new to dating, throughout my undergrad I mostly just hooked up with people from parties or invited people I liked to come over to my place and watch movie.

Now that I've graduated (and also for the time being am living with my parents...) I've been trying to do more ""conventional"" first dates. What I've been doing so far is getting ice-cream or bubble tea and going for a walk in the park, usually this works pretty well as it lets the date be as long or short as I want it to be. 

I'm in Canada and theres a foot of snow on the ground, I was wondering if someone could recommend any casual first dates for winter. I'll try to keep my eyes out for a nice coffee place/bar but does anyone have any other good ideas?",seduction
How do you avoid being a creep?,"I haven't seen this topic posted here and the term ""creep"" is quite nebulous and I'm assuming you've heard ""Creep"" by Radiohead, so we might be able to throw together a rough idea of what a creep is and the possible psychology behind it.  I'm pretty sure there is psychology behind it.  Anyway, how do you avoid being a ""Creep"" (all types).  (going by the song)...is it neediness? putting her on a pedestal? low self-worth? obsessive rumination and anxiety? I behave like a Creep sometimes and I can see it.  I scare people sometimes too as a result. I'm such a weirdo.",seduction
She’s telling me about her recent past?,"Been talking to this girl for about a week. She came over one night and some cuddling but nothing more. She’s been telling me she wants a relationship, and I’ve been sort of saying the same but I’m not sure if she’s the one for it. 

She said we can try and work things out for us but she said she wants to wait for sex...but had told me about these other two guys that’s she’s been with in the past month? Told me all the details and that if I’m another guy she sleeps with then it wouldn’t look good. I told her she can do what she wants and it’s her body. 

Why tell me all of this? She seems very bitter toward these guys and will go on and on about them being bad. I’m not saying I’m any better but I can’t wait as long as she’s talking about waiting for sex. What can I do? ",seduction
How does anyone have confidence this day in age?,"I’m a 26 year old guy and I don’t think there’s ever been a social situation in my entire life I’ve been confident in. I was a really awkward kid growing up and I’m still a little awkward but what’re you gonna do? I really struggle with relationships of all kinds, not just dating. Everyone always says that girls are attracted to confidence which I completely accept and understand. I just genuinely have no idea how anyone can be confident in this culture right now. Everything is so negative online and then social media  is made up of people posting snap shots of how great their life is when in reality that’s just what they want you to see. 

I would just like some advice because I am sick to death of feeling sad and alone all the time. ",seduction
"How to not care about women and attract them: ""it's not that you need to stop caring about women, it's that you need to have a higher purpose""",,seduction
"You’ve got her number, now here’s when to call","Let’s say you’ve just met a girl and gotten her number or IG, when exactly is the best time to contact her? Well I’m glad you asked. 

**The best time to call or message a girl after getting her details is exactly whenever the hell you want to.**

You don’t need to sit down and wait an arbitrary number of days for her to think you’re ‘not needy’ or any of the other reasons people might say why you should. Just do it whenever the hell you want. Anyway, I’m gonna spend this post explaining why so hang onto your hats and strap yourselves in for a bumpy ride.

*You ready? Here come the pain.*

**She most likely wants to hear from you.**

People who say you should wait a specific number of days before contacting a girl are wrongfully assuming a couple of things. 

**The first thing that they’re wrongly assuming is that the girl in question isn’t really that into you and wouldn’t be excited to see that you’ve DMd her.**  

Now I don’t know what you think, but I’m telling you that’s a pretty defeatist way of looking at the world. There’s no reason whatsoever to assume that this girl wouldn’t be tickled pink to hear from you and thinking anything else is just selling yourself short. Also; the simple fact is that people tend to see you the way you see yourself. If you walk around thinking that you’re someone who no one should really give much of a crap about, it’ll program you to act in a way that causes them to have the very opinion of you that you’re scared of them having! 

Waiting to message a girl because you think she’ll think you’re needy for doing so comes from a fear-based belief that you’re not that compelling of a person to be around, and that’s like taking an axe to the neck of your potential future with her. Now don’t get me wrong; you won’t necessarily mess things up by waiting to text, not at all. However; if you have this belief in your head, you’ll screw things up further down the line as you demonstrate through your words and actions that you’re not good enough for her and she slowly loses interest as a result. You don’t need to deliberately act aloof for her to want to be around you, you have to get over your own internal shit and realise that you’re a great human being. It’s this mindset that she’ll find compelling, not how long you wait in-between messages.

**The second thing they’re wrongly assuming is that even if she is really into you, she’ll get put off by you messaging her too early and as a result suddenly decide that you’re a loser.** 

And does that make any sense whatsoever? If you gave a girl your number and she texted you 4 hours later, would you be upset? Would you think she was needy? I highly doubt it. You’d either be freaking thrilled or moderately pleased. The only way you’d be upset was if you just didn’t want to give her your number to start with, but there’s no reason assume that any girl’s gonna think that way about you. At the end of the day, if she’s not into you, she won’t like you any more just because you waited 2 weeks to message her. She’ll still think you’re a twat. And just so we’re clear; I’m not saying that you should message a girl instantly, not at all. I’m just saying that if you want to do so then knock yourself out because there’s no reason to think she’ll be anything less than happy for you to do so. Anyway; this brings me to the real reason why people wait before messaging girls, which is that:

**Guys wait before messaging girls to give the impression that they’re cool people**

It took me a few years to realise that, but it’s really true and when you really internalize it, you’ll see where your true focus should be. When you sit down and wait 3, 4, or 5 days to message a girl, why are you doing it? You’re doing it because you want to give her the impression that you’re out living an active life. You want her to think you’re out with friends, dating other girls, going rock climbing, hosting parties or doing other cool stuff, right? You basically want her to think you’re a cool and high value guy and you know what? The truth is that waiting to call her could help to give her that impression. **But here’s the thing.**

**The best way to give girls the impression that you’re a cool guy with a cool life is to become a cool guy with a cool life**

Rather than sit down and play silly little games, just work to become the person you’re pretending to be when you wait to call or message. Spend time working on yourself and become more confident, find a great circle of friends, develop hobbies and interests and get a great career that you care about. The more of an interesting and active life you’ve got, then the busier you’ll be, and the less time you’ll have to be invested in any one girl. And this means that you’ll naturally be more likely to not message them right away.


**You won’t be doing it because you’re trying to give off a false image. You’ll just be busy doing shit.**

*DM me for tips on what you can do to create a great life and to join my WhatsApp and Telegram groups for guys who want to be amazing with women. They’re safe havens where guys learn, share stories and become the best versions of themselves in supportive and inspirational environments*





",seduction
How to get ask girl on date through text,So I’m not really talking to this girl I haven’t really talked to her we met through text. We both find each other attractive however I asked her a few times if she wanted to hangout and she ends up flaking. Last time she just said to let her know. I haven’t hit her up I awhile but what’s the best way to ask her out without me constantly texting her or acting like I’m too interested. ,seduction
How do I get back to my previous state?,"Got out of a relationship about in May and since then I've been trying to readjust to the whole flirting game once again. It used to be really good in Freshman year; I had a lot of confidence, didn't give a shit about what I'd say, admired myself and could say just about anything to any girl. Rejection didn't phase me. Then after my relationship I got into this phase where I lost my mojo. I started caring more about social interactions and what people thought of me. I began letting my emotional side take a hold over my logical side, even preventing me sometimes from going up to girls and talking to them. How do I get back into my I-don't-give-a-shit state? What must I do to relive the badassery that I once held in the palm of my hand?   


P.S. I've been going to parties, hooking up occasionally etc, but it's still not working out for me. Can't seem to approach an attractive girl randomly just like how I used to. Met this one girl and we were really hitting it off. Then we hooked up the second time we met and she sorta friendzoned me at that point? Then we hooked up a second time recently but she's still acting very detached?   


I'm in college, I've read the Tao of Badass a couple years ago and some reddit posts on Models.   


&amp;#x200B;",seduction
Seduction -- Women Want To Seduce Men Too,"There’s something important that we’ve forgotten on this sub: Women Want to Seduce Men Too.

Yet most of the discussion on this board focuses on *you* seducing *her*, as if she has nothing to do with it. 

That’s an incomplete picture. 

It’s not just about men seducing women. It’s about the two of you seducing each other. 

The buildup to sex (also known as Seduction) can be just as erotic as the sex itself. This is true for both women and men. When done correctly, both sides will be thrilled to play along and buildup the sexual tension until its ready to explode.

So when a woman is looking to meet a man, what she’s really looking for is a man she can seduce. Now you might be saying: “Wait a minute, a woman can seduce any guy. Like, if a woman is attractive and just comes onto a man, he’ll go with her. What is there to seduce?”

On the surface you are right. Many guys would just go with a woman if she came on strong. And obviously, women know this. Therefore, what a woman is really looking for is a guy who is *challenging* to seduce. That’s where the excitement lies for her. Going after some wallflower who’d probably pop an erection if she just touched him on the shoulder isn’t exciting. Seduction should be an exciting experience. 

If a guy is challenging to seduce, it means he could be any combination of these things: 

\- Mysterious. 

\- A little too confident.

\- Doesn’t always answer her directly.

\- Plays around.

\- Flirts.

\- Changes the subject.

\- Disagrees with her and sticks to his opinions.

\- Seems to say whatever comes to mind.

\- Doesn’t put her on a pedestal.

All of these things should sound like the kinds of traits we discuss constantly about what men should be like when seducing women. And these are all true. But here’s the key:

The truth underlying these traits isn’t so you can manipulate, trick, or seduce her in some one-sided fashion. They are true because it offers her a challenging opportunity to seduce you, as part of the two of you seducing each other. 

If you’re still unclear how two people are seducing each other, think about a flirtations text conversation. Each communication is just another step in building sexual tension. 

\- You say something with sexual implication

\- She says she’s been a bad girl

\- You tell her what’s going to happen to her later

\- She sends you a nude

Each text gets the other person more and more excited, thus the tension builds. And as you can see, that requires two people. If two people aren’t involved, then there’s no seduction.

So when you improve yourself and become the highest version of yourself, it’s not only so you can successfully seduce her, it’s so she can have a challenge when trying to seduce you. ",seduction
INFOGRAPHIC: The 5 Reasons Guys End Up in THE FRIENDZONE,,seduction
How do I make sure I don’t appear lonely?,"So I’ve read a lot of places that women sense desperation and as someone whose lonely I’m worried I may come off like that. I guess it’s the idea that validation is wrong even though I believe we’re biologically programmed for that stuff and we’re not really meant to be completely alone.

Anyways, what are ways I can avoid this or know if I’m doing it right especially on a date since I’ve only been on one date. Btw I go to the gym, I groom and take care of myself as best I can, I’ve improved my social anxiety, I act narcissistic sometimes because I am so sometimes people think I’m uninterested in them a lot because for example I’m horrible at texting. I usually never text unless it’s for a good cause. Anyways, I do all the stuff required to “be happy being alone” but I’m still lonely and want a girlfriend. I’ve done hook ups and sex is totally great, i watch things like Todd valentine or charismaoncommand for help. I occasionally hire escorts but all in all I’m still lonely and I’m afraid of appearing that way in front of women.

I only admit this stuff to close friends, I have told some women that I want a girlfriend but it was more in context and they were friends. But I never really go deep into it. I felt he need to include it because I’ve posted similar stuff about dating on other subs and sometimes people assume as if I’m going around to women saying I’m lonely so fuck me lol. ",seduction
Self Intro/Beach FR,"This is my first post to this subreddit. I've been lurking for a few weeks now and finally mustered up the courage to cold approach during the day so I figured I would document it for both myself and others.

A little bit on me: I'm what I consider to be a genuinely attractive straight male. I've been told once from a random person that I could be a model. I was told by a girl on Tinder that I'm good looking enough to get anyone I wanted. Very flattering, yes, but I doubted her because I felt like I didn't really know how to talk to women. My former roommate/one of my best friends described me as ""The smoothest guy I know until he opens his mouth"". That shit was funny but it stung a little. I still laugh about it today though.

I've had multiple girlfriends. I have been on first dates with probably around 30 women, almost all exclusively through apps. Almost all of them led nowhere. I've been on dates with 3 women that I would say are around the caliber of woman I want to date. I got essentially nowhere with any of them.

I recently bought 'Models' and am currently on the first chapter.

TLDR so far: I'm a good looking guy with little to no game.

FR

I was at the beach by myself yesterday and decided I was going to approach. The first girl I approached was laying by herself playing on her phone. I walked up and asked if she could take a picture of me. I did some stupid poses, no laugh from her though. When she was done she told me to check them so I did and then that's when I started talking to her. I asked her where she was from and she reciprocated by asking me the same. I could tell she was somewhat interested. I was pretty nervous and kept cutting her off (first mistake). We started talking about what she was studying and I made the worst joke (in an attempt to make an assumption) I think I've ever made and that's when I could tell she lost interest by saying 'hopefully your pictures turned out well' and headed back to her towel.

What I think I did wrong:
Cut her off
Asked her how old she was (Sounded creepy)
I should have talked more about where she was from and made an assumption about it.

The second girl I approached was very attractive. She was walking down the beach by herself in a bikini. When I approached her I said ""Hello, you look really nice and I just wanted to say hi."" She didn't stop, said hello, and kept walking.

What I think I did wrong: 
I commented on her appearance while she was wearing a bikini. I'm thinking it would have been better to ask a random question about where some kind of shop was and then ask about if she was from around here and then go from there. Not sure though.

I won't do a TLDR for the FRs. If you're here and looking for a TLDR, there's one for my self intro, just scroll up a little.",seduction
[FR] I didn't know girls could be this fucking hot.,"Hey guys. this can be considered pretty much a shitpost, I'm just going to share some new experiences that I feel the need to get out.

So I've recently moved to uni (I'm 20) and the thing to do is to go out clubbing and drinking. I've never really tried it (I'm also a virgin if that even matters), so figured I'd give it a go, and I like it almost bit too much. To feel so loose is absolutely amazing, and I feel like I'm in the fucking zone after a few drinks. The music flows through me.

I've been going out a few nights, with each night getting progressively better but still ending in a somewhat disappointing manner. Yesterday I went with some friends to a more adultish club, and ended up losing them. I was just wondering around looking for them, and then I spot these insanely hot girls, two of them, dancing more seductively than I've ever seen in my life. They were such teases, waving their ass all over the place, flicking it in the air, and groping themselves; randomly grabbing their tits with such sexy ferociousness. I've never seen anything like it and I was pretty much in awe. As I was walking by I make eye contact and hold it, then dance towards one of them and then pull back, almost as if to show I'm not too eager. I then talk to one of their friends, and explain that I've lost my friends and ask if it's okay to hang out with them.

This is my biggest dilemma in the club. I would love to go alone and meet new people, but I also don't want to be viewed as a weirdo or creep who has no friends.

They say ""sure!"" and I continue dancing with them, progressively getting closer and closer to the point that we're practically grinding on each other, and at this point, I can't help but slap her ass, and she fucking loves it. This goes on for a while, and I'm having such a good time with them. I head to get another drink, and ask them if they would like one. I've always said that I would never buy a drink for a girl, as if to bribe them to talk to me or whatever, but I thought this was kind of different, I already liked them so much. I down my drink, dance with them for a bit longer then for some reason I decide I should probably go find my friends again. I'm not sure exactly why I left so quickly, but I head to the upper floor and don't find them. 

After wondering around for a bit, I find my new friends on the upper floor, who now seem ecstatic to see me and we dance together again. it's so amazing to dance with girls like that, you just feel so fucking connected. the club then starts to close, and it's almost 4:00 at this point. I give one of them my phone and she puts her snapchat in. She added herself on my phone, but she hasn't confirmed it yet, and I'm kinda disappointed about that to be honest. I keep thinking about them, and wanting to meet up with them again. I sent a text but it's not delivering until she adds me. How the fuck anyone can be so fucking hot I don't know. And it wasn't just one girl. it was two. my mind was blown and my jaw was on the floor. I want more of this.",seduction
How to get dates from online dating apps?,"I have a good amount of matches, and I can usually start the conversation and get a reply, but after that they either don't reply or I end up getting their number. After I get their number, I say hey, and try to add on to the conversation we had, but sometimes replies become scattered and its hard to actually get a physical date with the girl. How do I get better at this?",seduction
Help with the shit tests on a date,"Hello guys! I have a few questions to you.

&amp;#x200B;

**1) Tell me something.** I hear this phrase all the time when I sit with a girl on a date. I guess it’s an indicator that girl got bored with me, right? What should I answer in this situation? Should I immediately start to tell her some stories that I know? But in this case won’t it look like I’m some kind of clown that entertains her on her first demand? For some reason it sounds to me as a shit test too, not only as an indicator of boringness.

&amp;#x200B;

**2) Do you often meet people like that?** What do I tell her if she asks do I often approach women on the street, malls or public transportation? Is it a shit test?

&amp;#x200B;

**3) Where are we going?** *(on the first date)* Should I answer directly: “to the coffee shop” or should I go with intrigue?

&amp;#x200B;

**4) We don’t know each other that well** *(when you try to kiss her, touch her or invite her to your place after the club)* Maybe there is some kind of routine or metaphor for this one? Some story that I could tell that will make her feel or at least think that it’s not necessary to know someone for ages, that you can get all the important information about the other person in few minutes of meeting. I need this, especially for the clubs. SOS!",seduction
Should PUAs believe in fate?,"So I met this beautiful girl the other day, wasn't planning to game her or anything but it sorta happened and she started the talk so yeah. I felt a cool connection and all. We then exchanged names and heres what happened, 2 seconds after she told me her name I totally forgot it, its ridiculous, I then went to dance with my friends, the club was super crowded, I then remembered that I forgot to get her number, later though, she called my name and waved at me to come and talk to her again, but my friend distracted me, and then when I went where she was she disappeared, again it was super fucking crowded. A couple of my friends spoke to her, so I was hoping id ask one of them for her name so maybe I can find her name online, and guess what? the same thing happened I totally forgot what he said. I dont wanna ask my other friend cause he seemed sorta into her and I dont wanna be a douche to him. I told my friend that and she said there some superficial shit stopping me from getting with that girl. Ik where shes from and whats shes studying but my Uni is huge, and the club we met is super crowded usually. Does anyone know how I can find her, or should I just give up or wait for some coincidence for me to meet her again",seduction
Can female friends help you get girls at clubs?,"Besides the social proof you have for having female friends, are there other things that female friends can do? Assume that I have a friend that is down to do whatever I request e.g. forcing her way into other girls dance circles and opening groups of girls. How do I best utilise this?",seduction
"Girl walked up to me and handed me her number, without me asking","I was shopping for clothes and this girl I chatted to but left to go find what I was looking for, came up to me with her number written down for me. We talk on the phone and text and went out last night. She asks me to come by at work to see her, and we smooched. I went to pick her up and instead of going bowling and then to a party like I planned, she wanted to sit and talk and then go to the party. No big deal. Her and I have exchanged dirty pictures and talked dirty and what not, and so at the party some of the people went out to smoke, leaving us alone. This is where I think it went wrong? I'm not sure. She stood up and says she's uncomfortable with her bra so she takes it off, then sits on my lap. We kiss, I'm feeling her leg and stuff, then she stops and goes to check her phone. She's gotta leave. I take her home and kiss her goodbye. Next day (today) she won't talk to me. The only thing she said to me was that I was being extremely pushy and touchy and I'm moving too fast. What do I do? I'm confused, I know girls are nuts but what do I do?",seduction
Beating myself up over rejection,"Logically, I know that trying and getting rejected is better than not trying at all. Other people have even said “you were brave to go and talk to her, etc.” yet, when I get turned down, it hurts, and a part of me feels stupid for trying. I beat myself up over it. Like, I know I’m not gonna go and just insult the girl for turning me down, but I just feel shitty. 

Does anyone else feel this way? If you dealt with it and got over it, how did you do it?",seduction
Getting a makeout... How to go for a kiss,,seduction
Woman not ready for a relationship,"Hey guys,

I went out with a woman, I had never used the word date but in my perspective I have made my intentions very clear. Now, everything went okay, as soon as I got home I was messaged by her and thanked for the good night. However when I mentioned a second meeting time with the word date. She was all up for it except it being a date then later explained herself as that she just got out of a relationship that was nearly 3 years long.

I am just unsure on how to approach such a situation, would anyone like to provide some insight?

Thanks!",seduction
"What if you are getting close to someone you like, but you are embarrassed about your past","So I had like one semi-girlfirend my entire life.  I mean we were dating and having sex and everything, but we never got really close and it only lasted maybe a year.  

&amp;#x200B;

Anyway, I'm 32 now and have worked hard building up my group of friends and trying to have more fun and going out with people.  I had a really stressful life because of issues with one of my parents and I've only recently fully broken away from it.  It was really to the point where I didn't ever have a chance to focus on having fun and meeting new people or getting a girlfriend, but now I'm finally at a stage where I can focus on it.  

&amp;#x200B;

Now there's a couple women I've been talking to and one of them I went out with with a group of people and we had a great time and enjoyed each other and she was really touchy and telling me to look at her ass etc.  

  
The thing is she is like 10 years older than me and used to be married!  I can only imagine all the sex she's had over most of her life and I feel so embarrassed that I probably won't have a clue about anything.  I really like her though... She makes me feel real good being around her and seems to like me a lot.  I haven't had sex in 3 years either!  

&amp;#x200B;

Can anyone give me any advice?  It would be greatly appreciated!  Thank you!",seduction
[Text Screenshot] Hot girl at library got angry at me for not remembering her? [Dumb FR],"I do this bit at the library when I'm studying. If I catch a girl looking at me I'll play a bit back with the glances. When I'm leaving I'll write down my number, name, and a compliment on a piece of paper and set it beside her after getting her attention. 

Most look confused then give an awkward smile, a few smile right away, one girl just straight up looked horny when I did it lol. But very low return rate all in all.

So a couple days ago I catch this gorgeous gorgeous girl looking at me. I do my bit as I'm leaving, and as I expect, no text.

Few days after that I'm at the library and a girl walks up to me and its her.

Wanted to say she didn't want to seem rude but she didn't recognize me without my hat on and that she had a bf. She tells me that I could have come up and said hi. Said that ""like four girls laughed at you after you did that and left"". I just chuckle.


She starts asking me questions on what I am doing etc. and I say well we can still be friends and grab her number and she puts her first name and number in my phone and I text her my name. She walks off, I get back to work, delete her when I get home (I do this as a mental game to keep myself from getting desperate; just to remind myself I don't need to text every number I get [plus she had a bf]).

[Then just a little bit ago this happens](https://imgur.com/a/98MXENQ)

I see her behind me a couple of rows. I walk up and say hi, asks what she doing. She tersely replies ""studying"" I say good luck. 

I get thinking about if she actually is angry and decide to to see how she would react to me asking if she wanted to walk to the library starbucks with me. 

I walk up and ask and she goes under her breathe ""[sigh] oh my god"" back up to volume ""No, ... I'm about to leave"". She's coming off as annoyed. 

I walk away saying nothing.

lol. Thoughts?

",seduction
socal social meetup group,"Hi there guys. I've been a part of the pua community for a couple years now. Something that as always seemed amusing to me is how hypocritical this subreddit is. We'll spend hours talking to other guys online, giving them advice on how to act in social situations, but never in person. Seems counter intuitive to me to not socialize with like-minded people who share the same struggles and same goals. That's why I'm  trying to start this meetup group. It'll be in LA most likely not sure on any days yet, still flexible with the scheduling. But if you're interested pm me and ill give you more details",seduction
"I Have Too Much Feminine 'Energy', How Do I Become More Masculine?","I was raised by a single feminist mother, and as such I was conditioned to be super respectful (almost reverent) towards women. As I've grown older, I've realised that this often just firmly places you in the category of beta-male in male female interaction. 

The irony is that I am an alpha (for want of a better term). People look to me in a crisis, I'm confident, I'm a natural leader and If there's a fight I'm the guy to deal with it. But at the same time I'm very caring and too sensitive, I tend to put everyone else's needs above my own. An example is someone could attack me and I'll likely just try to fold them up and restrain them but if someone hits a friend of mine, I will literally go full gorilla on them and anyone else they happen to be with. 

The reality is though, that my feminine energy has made things much more difficult for me than they should be in terms of getting laid. I've realised that due to my upbringing, I attract masculine women (in terms of energy), I also realize that I've been seeking this too. 

A good analogy is when my ex and I we're joking around about spirit animals, she said mine would be a 'lioness'. This makes a lot of sense to me. 

How do I go from 'lioness' to lion? Do I just need to give less shits?

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
"Online dating: Girl complains that I use the same ""copy and paste"" messages but makes no effort to initiate or invest...","Girl finds out I was using the same scripted messages from a friend or something. I essentially told her if I was getting a reply from every message sent out then she would have a point, I would put more effort into my messages and be more creative - But when you consider that 90% of women don't respond at all (and are just seeking validation) then I'm not gonna send a carefully calculated message to each girl, I don't have time for that shit, I'm gonna copy and paste.


Idk I guess this is just a rant - It allows bugged me how girls will complain about a guy's certain approach to interact with women while making zero effort to invest in the interaction or approach - They don't understand what a luxury it is to have to do literally nothing to attract the opposite sex, we don't have that luxury, we have to be proactive as fuck. 

Thoughts? And how can I not be bitter about this? ",seduction
Having trouble loosening up in interactions,"I understand that building connection with new people generally happens when both parties start to lower their guard and loosen up. There are lots of ways to do it, one very common and easy way is through alcohol. However, I’m terribly allergic to alcohol, so I usually have to resort to banter. 

Problem is, I’m a little bit clueless as to how to calibrate on the bantering, since it’s essentially a playful insult. Generally, what things are okay to joke about? How far is too far? 

Thoughts? This could be in terms of male to male interactions or men and women on dates.

 I particularly have trouble differentiating between when a guy is actually belittling and insulting me vs bantering to joke around. I usually give them the benefit of the doubt and laugh it off, but the back of my mind just nags me thinking he went too far and I shouldn’t let someone talk to me like that. Yet if I call him out on it, and he claims he’s joking, I come off too serious and a party pooper. 

Subtle sub communications in society is difficult..",seduction
Cold Approach Pickup is Way Harder than I Thought it Would Be - Openers,"After my first game day session, I realize that my sticking point right away is opening. I'm having trouble coming in confident and bold. So I ended up resorting to asking for directions and trying to turn that into a set. It went horrible. I got the ""Sorry, I don't give my number out to strangers."" Man lol. I laughed it off after but still. I usually am more comfortable in familiar settings, but this day I drove to the city to practice and I felt out of sorts. 

&amp;#x200B;

So my first sticking point is opening. How have you guys solved this problem?",seduction
How do I talk to her,"There is this girl I like at work. I talk to her sometimes not all the time as I don’t want to be desperate or creepy. But I don’t really have anything to say to her, I end up just talking about loads of random stuff. We don’t have anything in common so I can’t go on about a new bands album or something. 

She also has a boyfriend so although I like her I see me talking to her as practice for other women I like. If she didn’t have a boyfriend I would of asked her out by now. I try to flirt with her but she doesn’t bite but then how can I tell if I am flirting correctly. 

So really I suppose the question is, am I talking to her in the right way and what else can I do to maybe make her fall for me. Examples would be great, thanks seduction people! ",seduction
What happened to ideagasms.net?,The site went down recently. Anyone got any info on what went down? ,seduction
"Whatever Your Game, People Will Judge You -- So Ignore The Noise, Focus On Yourself &amp; Getting The Girls You Want",,seduction
How do I pick up a girl walking down the street?,"I’m a good looking guy and online dating has been a bit annoying with the bar scene not really being my thing. 

Wondering is there a non creepy way to stop a girl and get her number?  Talking about early evenings on Friday and sat nights ",seduction
"When she asks for your number, and not the other way around","If after approaching and building rapport for 5 minutes, I suggest we hang out and she agrees, and says give me your number, should I give it to her? Should I instead take hers? I'm afraid maybe she won't text, but not sure why she wants mine.",seduction
Beta/Alpha male dichotomy: what's your opinion?,"These two concepts are not hard to come across nowadays. Just a simple search on Youtube shows you a thousand different videos promising to help you become an alpha. After a while, though, and some observation/experience, I have the sense that using these terms might give us the impression that the world is simpler than it is, especially because context is never mentioned.

What's your opinion on these two words? Are they accurate? Are they even useful? Any opinions are welcome.",seduction
How to Get Whatever You Want the Cleopatra Way,,seduction
How to attract more attractive girls?,"Ok, so basically I consider myself a reasonable attractive guy. I go to university, fairly good looking, muscles, have enough friends, plenty of hobbies and so on. There are also enough girls attracted to me. But the problem seems to be, neither of them I find really interesting. I can go on some dates with them, have sex with them but I still end up with the feeling that there is missing something.

I hate to use those terms, but the traits they've been lacking, I see them in the more ""higher value"" women. But I find it hard to get them like fully attracted to me, or even meet them.

It's not that my standards are so high that i've got the illusion I only can fall in love with a 11/10 girl. It's just that I'm very attracted to a certain type of women.

In short, I can date enough girls of a certain category, but I want to go a level up. I've had enough of driving Porsches and want to try more Ferrari's ;). What are your thoughts on this and what/how to improve?",seduction
I actually lost my virginity through tinder. It’s easier than I thought,"I couldn’t think of a better place to post this but me, a fairly outgoing and fairly attractive (granted I’m also a gym rat) **23 year old** ex-virgin just lost his virginity on a tinder date. And it was easier than I thought my entire life. I literally lost my virginity in a bar bathroom. 

I was just myself. Easy as that. When texting this girl, I wasn’t trying to be slick. I just used general seduction rules while being extremely honest (although not about the virgin part). I landed a date two weeks later. During the date, I was no other than myself. I talked and acted in the same dorky manner I would with my guy friends. 

Slowly we escalated via general flirtation, and next thing I know she’s holding my hands and we’re fucking in the bathroom. Of course I came early, not just because I’m a virgin but because I was nervous about doing it in a public place. I told her it was the latter, and she was perfectly understanding and comforting and agreed on a second more planned one. 

Tl;dr I literally lost my virginity by quitting all the games and literally being myself, and in a bar bathroom of all places. And I would just like to specify that it was my first ever tinder date ",seduction
A Big Epiphany After 7 Dates in 7 Days (LMR),"Hey guys, 

&amp;#x200B;

Firstly, not saying this to brag. I did set up 7 dates in 7 days, mostly because I was desperate to get laid after being in a relationship for over a year. (I am newly single)

&amp;#x200B;

After being in a relationship for so long I had to re-remember certain things about women which I will now share with you.

&amp;#x200B;

So for starters, I got every girl back to my room in my bed on our dates. I want to start with that because the epiphany has to do with girl's state of thinking and LMR.

&amp;#x200B;

If you're a beta-cuck White knight then I suggest you stop reading now (Albeit I don't think any would reside here)

&amp;#x200B;

The first 6 girls I tried escalating and having sex with, they all put up resistance and said things like, ""We shouldn't do this"" or ""I am not having sex with you""

&amp;#x200B;

Now, 6 out of the 7 girls I was indifferent to and ""respected"" their opinion and didn't continue to try stuff with. I let them leave and they stop texting me.

&amp;#x200B;

On the 7th girl, I was sexually frustrated (Wasn't masturbating either) and I wanted to see what would happen if I pushed passed the soft ""no""

&amp;#x200B;

So for the seventh girl, I was sitting in bed with her making out, just like all of the rest when all of a sudden the whole,""I don't do this"" thing came up. I straight up told her, ""If you don't leave right now then I won't be able to stop myself from taking you.""

&amp;#x200B;

I said this to basically give her an out to leave and let her know I was about to rip her clothes off. She just sat there and looked at me so I did just that. The whole time she was saying, ""we shouldn't do this, no, this is wrong.""

&amp;#x200B;

I shit you not, as soon as I stuck myself inside of her, she lost it....In a good way.

&amp;#x200B;

Moaning, grabbing me etc, etc

&amp;#x200B;

Out of all of the girls, she is now non-stop texting me...  

&amp;#x200B;

So there are a couple of things I now remember before being single. 

&amp;#x200B;

1. Women want you to push past resistance. This is controversial I know, You can play it safe all you want and I don't blame you for it, but it is in a female's nature to push passed her ""soft no"". I mean, if a girl comes into your bedroom, it is pretty obvious what is being insinuated. I now remember all of the times this happened in college and so on. A great book that actually highlights this is ""Sperm Wars"" by Robin Baker

2. Women backwards rationalize their emotions to you. I don't feel I need to explain this.

&amp;#x200B;

TL;DR Women want a guy to push past their little resistance. I know this is controversial, but it has been my experience thus far. I wish it wasn't true and I don't blame you if you don't want to risk it just to get laid a bit more.  ",seduction
[FR] Went out to a club/bar solo for the first time,"So yesteday I did this. 

After two flakes from two girls via text , and none of my best friends aviable to went out , I said fuck it and went alone.

I had already read some posts about this situation here in the sub, yet I was doing it again before leaving home, trying to get some extra motiviation.

So , while I get down from the bus and start walking some streets, there is some wind and light raindrops. *""I choose the worst day to do this""* I say to myself. *""The club will probably be half empty""*, and I didn´t want to be noticed.

Anyway, I arrive to the club, and indeed, it seems very empty, I go to the bar and order a drink,  This was the ""hardest"" part, as I stood there for about 45 minutes/1 hour. Good thing is there was a tv and a football game, so at least I can be watching the tv.

I move to an empty table and seat, then more people arrive and I need to leave the spot (seats were reserved) . 

I order a second drink and then I spot a girl I used to like back from High school, must be from 8-10 years ago. 

I say to myself *""This is the chance""*, not necesarily to try something with her, but to talk to a group and see if I can tag along.

I see that she is talking with some dudes in the table/spot in front of hers, and then goes back to her original spot. So I thought that it would be a good idea to go to those dudes first, just to increase the number of people aproached..

I go with them, and I don´t like them much, they seem not friendly (at least not as I wanted) and asked them if the girl was X, that I think I knew her, they all say no. (One of them was lying, found out later). So yeah, overall they seemed very defensive. I tried to talk to them , but they gave short answers.

Then a dude from the girl´s table comes , and I ask him the same, turns out he is her cousin, and he is indeed the friendly type, she calls her, she comes, and I talk to them. She didn´t recognized me (I have some sort of Jesus-esque look now) but she did after.

They seem cool, and I talk to them for a bit, and sorta catch up with her.

So I legit think I have a chance with her, as she explicit says ""I want to fuck tonight"" (both her and her cousin were already semi-drunk) but then she says something about ""realizing she is in love with her best friend"", a dude who was in her table. 

I realize she is into him for real, and I don´t have many chances to grab her attention, they go back to their spot, and for a moment I feel alone again, in the middle of the two tables, talking to no one. 

So I decide to walk around the club, then go to the bathroom, then go back to the bar, grab another beer, and I talk to a dude from her (the HS girl) table. She asked him If he remembered me (turns out he was also in the same HS). He didn´t know me, and viceversa. But I talked to him, he was the shy but friendly type of guy. 

As we are talking I realize we are almost unconsciously walking towards another group that had better energy, and dancing.

I say this to him, as his group was not doing much. And I decide to walk to them a dance in their circle. The other dude stayed standing back, and I had to drag him to the circle.

It was a group of some straight guys, girls, some gays, and one lesbian. We stayed dancing there for the rest of the night.

I told to the lesbian that she looks exactly like another lesbian friend I had in another city, I show her a pic of her, say to her that she was/is a lesbian, and then ask her, ""Are you gay too?"" She says yes. 

We dance a bit together, then I sit down and ask for a smoke. As I am a bit tired from dancing. Then I go back to it.

Nothing really special happens, I am just glad I ended up with a nice group. 

Later, a dude from the HS girl/dude table comes and joins us, to me, he looks drunk (this comes out at play later, sorta)

4 girls arrive , and join the group, they were friends with one of the gay guys. And this drunk pal who I just mentioned wants to aproach them. Thing is, they were very closed , like in a circle of four. This dude seems drunk and sort of ""stupid"", the other guy is even more shy than me, and yes, I accept that I chickened out, but I think I didn´t have the best partners to approach a closed group of 4 girls (who weren´t even attractive to me). 
This seems like an excuse, I know, I just wanted to point that out.

I kinda shrug it off, and told to the ""drunk"" guy to approach one of them who sort of got out of the ""circle"" and was in her phone. 

I then go back dancing with the lesbian and some other of her friends.

I see that the drunk dude is sort of talking to one of them, but I have this feeling that the girl is not really interested and that this dude is saying some drunk stuff. Who knows...
After that I see that he is not longer talking to her.

I believe on her friends was cockblocking him, as he told me later.

Then, there is an instance when 2 of the 4 girls were talking to their gay friend, and the other 2 are sitting, and the drunk dude and my shy pal are just sort of dancing in front of them, but not approaching.
This is when I felt guilty and thought *""Maybe I should´ve been there and try something else""*

Anyways, I am getting more tired of dancing, so I rest a moment, while watching the McGregor fight, and talk to two dudes about the fight.
Then I exchange numbers with the lesbian girl, and some minutes later, we have to leave. I go with the shy pal and the drunk dude.

Shy pal is a great sport and gives us a ride (I was going to take a cab back) I also ask for his number and give him some money for the gas.

Also, drunk dude didn´t knew I went on my own and said, ""wow, you have some balls"" lol.

So thats it. I went out alone for the first time, I it wasn´t half bad, I could have tried to approach just for the sake of it, but overall I was happy I could manage to talk to people.

**TLDR** - I went out alone to a club for the first time, ended up dancing with a cool group of people, got a lesbian girl´s number, and got a ride from a cool pal. I was lucky. Better than expected, looking forward to do it more times.

And some questions 

*  In the case of the HS girl, was there any way to grab her attention and made her forget her friend he wanted to make out with?
* As for the group of four girls, who don´t seem very open , how do you deal with this. And how do you carry a not so promising set of wingmen?
* What other advice can you give for the next time I go alone, and improve the experience?
",seduction
My pick up game is a mess,"I feel that my social skills, especially in regards to attractive women are like the character ""Danger"" in Million Dollar Baby. He is this wanna be boxer, that is really naive about his ability to fight. He shows up to the gym every day hyped to get better, but never seems to improve and is often cheering about he is going to be the greatest.

I have a damn good body in my opinion, at least well above average, lean and muscular. I have an amazing career, I could probably survive in any city in the U.S. with the type of money it brings in. It has taken me a long time to realize that no matter how good my body is, and no matter how much money I have, if I don't have ""game"" I could end up completely lonely.

I wish I had realized this sooner, I have been working on improving my social skills as much as possible, but I still have psychological barriers with attractive women... I have to believe I can get passed them if I can just challenge the discomfort.

Does anyone have inspiration stories that focus more so on improving psychological barriers or social skills? I seem to common across the guy that wasn't getting laid early on in life, but takes a turn and is getting as much as he wants, but to me that guy was already sociable, but just didn't know how to use it.  How about someone who felt a little awkward, but has been able to make personality changes? Especially someone who grew up in an antisocial family...

I mean, how much can a personality really change? I've never been able to pull a woman on the first date. I rarely get a second. I think women are more attracted to me before I start talking. If I don't get success I just get burnt out. Being intelligent and in great shape only make me realize how boring my personality seems to be when I look at my social life.

It blows my mind that I can do things like jump off high cliffs in to water, swing dance with girls, give presentations (even though they sometimes were terrible), yet an attractive girl is like a safe with 10 inch thick steel walls and 5 different types of high quality locks holding the door shut.

I just needed to rant, I could use some inspiration...",seduction
Negative self-talk,"I'm in an unusual situation.  I have this really nasty habit of thinking the worst is going to happen.  Sometimes I'll come up with excuses, talk myself out of approaching, other times I can't even get in touch with whether I'm attracted to someone.  These thoughts are messing everything up and they're keeping me from connecting with women.  I know what I'm like when I'm at my best, when I've got all my energy and I'm strutting my stuff, opening up, being confident, and just in general being my best self.  Lately, it's really hard for me to get in that zone.  It's like I'm really scared.  I'm working on inner game and trying to get over these things...I still do them. I run away, I shy away, I lose frame, I become needy or insecure, or I hover around in a self-conscious state if it's a place I hang out with friends.  I don't know what to do. All I can do is keep approaching (I've been slacking though...again, excuse, oh, I'll do it some other time, etc.), and trying to maintain conversations without running away.",seduction
I have a girlfriend but was hit on last night and froze. How do I handle it the best way?,"I was caught off guard because the girl was pretty cute and pretty blatant with it (touching me a lot) and I honestly was just not really sure what to do. I noticed a lot of girls just checking me out as well. 

I don’t plan to cheat on my girlfriend but in situations like this, I still enjoy flirting. How do I mix these two things together without leading anyone on/going too deep into it?",seduction
How do I get over sex anxiety?,"I'm a fairly good looking person, pretty social when I want to be but most definitely an introvert at heart.

I'm happy with most aspects of my life, but not dating.  I avoid dating women because of my lack of sexual experience. The few times I had sex, I couldnt cum and I'm ashamed and embarrassed because of it.  I put too much pressure on myself.  Even after 30 minutes!

Also, I'm a former fatty and still look 'skinnyfat'. I had abdominoplasty to remove excess skin around my stomach, but my waist still looks awful/like a muffin top.  My thighs are pretty fatty too.  

Also, my dick size is on the lower end of average, but definitely still in the average range, but I still feel slightly embarrassed by it.

Honestly I want to date women, get to know them, and have wonderful sex but I don't know how to overcome these problems and feel comfortable in my own skin.

Suggestions/advice appreciated.",seduction
"Do girls like guys that are trouble makers one of those ""bad boys"" or more calmer guys who don't seek problems and are more laid back.",In my opinion fighting and making trouble is more of a beta thing. What's your thought on this?,seduction
"""Night Game"" for People Who Don't Like Clubbing?","Most of my interactions fishing for potential dates is in the form of ""day game"" and cold approaching. I'll just chat up a woman I encounter as I go about my day if she interests me.

Because I'm not into the clubbing scene, I'm not really sure what opportunities I have for ""night game."" I'm not into pop music/Billboard Chart music/mainstream radio hip-hop, so most clubs aren't up my alley. Plus, I live in a cowboy town, so a lot of clubs are country-Western themed— definitely not my scene.

The only dance night thing I ever go to is one held about monthly by this punk/metal pub that plays gothic rock, post-punk, darkwave, new wave, '80s shit in general. This is more my speed, but it only happens about once a month.

Other than that, my nights out are mostly going to local independent shows, but I've found it pretty difficult to get numbers here. For whatever reason, though everybody at these events is friendly and great to strike up conversations with, I get a cooler reception when I try to go for the number.

So, outside of clubbing, which I don't want to do (the crowd isn't my crowd, seems to being out a lot of Gucci-wearing douchey folks and really basic girls in my city), what other opportunities are there for ""night game?""",seduction
Hanging up my hat early,"I just want to get the general feeling and sentiment from the guys in here: if you became exceedingly good at seduction and basically had the world at your fingertips, and you met The One, and you knew this was The Time to make it a one-woman show (never stop seducing, of course, just focus it on her and apply the additional time you reclaim to your own development), how would you think about all the missed future seductions you are “sacrificing” (because the point is growth, not dominance, but there is a bit of the latter built into it isn’t there?), because being around The One helps you grow in terms of loving your own self and she’s hot as fuck (sleeper-hit) too?",seduction
How To Keep A Girl Forever (Three Steps),,seduction
"24 years old, still single and afraid to stay in this situation","Good evening

Today I come to you to give me your advice, especially from the veterans or the experienced ones.

I am someone who is 24 years old, single, shy, virgin, a little ugly (5/10),skinny,suffering hairloss, I get up sometimes too fast, never fucked a girl, even a hug (a desesperated case),

since my childhood, my relationship with girls is not good, always I feel rejection from them, I had like a complex towards girls, I started to hate them once they reject me, and by following at the age of 18 until I was 23 years old, I saw them as a threat, a waste of time, it is true that I liked to establish a contact, but the fear and  this cumulation of rejection left me always distant and fixed in my comfort zone, I preferred this time stay single and try to have fun by other leisure such as video games, learn English, read books of finance, see TV, television series , self-study in relation to my studies; but a few months ago, I began to feel this heavy burden, to wait for a girl who will accept me, who will do the FIRST STEP and come talk to me or interest me, I think on the long term, when I will be 40 or 50, this burden will be even harder, and it will be harder to make contact with a woman at that age, how will she believe that I'm 40 years old and I have never had a relationship ..

So I would like to save the situation before it's too late, I know I lost time but what's important is how to socialize with girls because I have boys friends but they are the same, everyone follows his studies, busy, we meet to go to the beach just during the holidays. But with girls it's nothingness.

I was talking with a girl in my class last year, just in school stuff, but when she left to study elsewhere, I did not get in touch with her, and she, too, a week ago, I took the courage and I contacted her, but she answered me with a short answer, or even she did not answer me on my last message, it's good I understood.",seduction
Both Sides Of Keen &amp; Hal's Love Story - Inspirational Video On Relationships,,seduction
Differences in conversational styles between Men and Women,My @Quora post: Differences in conversational styles between Men and Women https://wayofmen.quora.com/Differences-in-conversational-styles-between-Men-and-Women?share=2a96ec63&amp;srid=39VLT,seduction
Daygame around Gaithersburg Maryland Area,Looking for wings/coaching to daygame with around the gaithersburg area. DM me or comment!,seduction
A positive word replacement for Nerd\Geek ?,Does anyone know which positive word I can replace with Nerd\Geek ? I'm constructing a bio and need a positive replacement word which will sound like I'm a geek\nerd but in more positive light.,seduction
What is the best way to create an Instagram profile from scratch?,"I very rarely use social media and I've never had an Instagram account. The thought of trying to build one up from scratch seems like a challenge because I graduated college several years ago and so I don't have a lot of friends on Instagram.

I've read this sub and other sources that say Insta is a very valuable tool for seduction. I understand what type of content to post but how do you build up followers if you don't know many people with accounts?

Also, I'm not very photogenetic. I'm in very good shape and know how to dress decently but I don't have an aesthetically pleasing smile, so I usually have a serious expression when photographed. Is there a guide to Insta for people who don't like to smile?",seduction
"Please, help me with my issue at clubs.","I go to club sometimes, pretty much only with friends but I'd be open going alone. They're loud AF, no real point talking. Here's my problem.

&amp;#x200B;

I'm decently attractive, I'm an above average dancer, and this leads me to attract some girls. At least, I imagine they're interested, I'll get some looks and some girls will satellite around me, though often they're not really directly facing me. However, from here, I have no idea what to do. I'll try to initiate some light physical contact and I don't even get a real response, but I just internally cringe and can't keep it up. Anyways, any advice would help.",seduction
Flaky?,"I was talking to this girl I met via Instagram.  She was studying here from the US, but had the intentions of getting a work visa after her two years was up.  We was talking everyday and she was saying how she was super excited to meet up (Today) and that it's refreshing to meet a genuine guy.  She said she was telling all her friends about it and her flat mate.

Three days ago she changed her tone. She said she's not the one night stand kind of girl and wants to know what I am looking for.  I said that I wasn't looking for that and wanted someone genuine and just see how it goes, which she agreed and said she was very excited to see me. She out of the blue stopped sending me messages, and then short replied me.  I asked her if everything was alright.  She ignored me till the next morning.

&amp;#x200B;

Then came the dreaded ""I am not interested style message, don't want to lead you on"" and she deleted me on all social media.

How on earth did that come about?  Did her flatmate (who was very very pretty) kill it? or did she just get cold feet?  Or was it the fact she doesn't want anything with anyone?   Women are hugely confusing.",seduction
Help! Asian guy tips with other race girls,"Asian male, 20 years old in Australia, I have been living here for almost all my life but was mainly in the Asian community all my life though , my race preference are Aussie/ Mediterranean girls, just wanted to ask what are some tips and advice you guys can give me with these girls from that background, my previous gf have always been Asian so I’m pretty inexperienced with girls of other race. 

FYI: in no way is this one of those I’m Asian so I can’t get white girls post, it’s just that when I hang out with male friends from that ethnicity, I get a very different vibe compared to the asians.",seduction
She started losing interest when i played hard to get,It's been A month now at this new school and i really like that girl and we have so much in common that I tried to act hard to get to make her like me like ignore her and she did the same so what should I do?,seduction
How To Talk To A Girl When She's Busy,,seduction
How To Not Be Creepy During Daygame: 4 Steps To Help You Come Across As A Cool Guy,"Ever spotted a hottie in some unorthodox daytime situation and had second thoughts about speaking to her?

On one hand, you'd love to meet her. On the other, your mind is running wild with fantasies of her being completely creeped out. Perhaps your mind runs wild with premonitions of passers-by shaming you, the police getting involved and news of your creepiness somehow travelling back to your employer. 

Then, before you know it, she's walked out of your life forever. These outlandish fantasies cost you what could have been your dream woman. All because you cared how other people would perceive it...

The truth is: it's very possible to come across as creepy when approaching women during the day.

However, there are plenty of steps you can take to ensure you don't come across that way too. 

Take the following steps during your daytime approaches to reduce your creep factor as much as possible.

# Be loud and proud

The easiest is way to come across as creepy is by trying to hide your true intentions. 

If you try to whisper so no-one hears, lie about why you want to speak to her or show any sort of shame in your behaviour, you're doing yourself no favours

However, if you're completely honest, comfortable and proud with what you're doing, it's pretty damn hard to come across as a creep. 

Watch some YouTube videos of the way Russell Brand shamelessly flirts with women on TV. He becomes extremely sexual extremely quickly, but because he's so damn sure that it's  fun and awesome, others fall into this frame.  

""That's just the way he is,"" they think. 

You want to be loud and proud like Russell when you approach during the day. 

Open direct, own your actions and give zero fucks about who overhears you. Almost no-one will give a damn, and even less people will intervene. 

What's more, your comfort with the situation will help her feel comfortable. The same rules apply with physicality in a bar or nightclub. 

* When some fratboy thoughtlessly throws his arm around a woman's waist, it comes across as confident
* When a 'gentleman' tries to tentatively put his arm on her lower back, it's creepy. Go figure.  

# Do it quickly

Following her down the street for ages is super-creepy. Staring at her from across the cafe for hours is just as bad. 

So many dudes waste decent opportunities by waiting for the right moment.

Not only does this increase your creep factor (she can feel you staring, dude), but it usually results in the situation becoming more difficult. Maybe her friends appear. Maybe her bus arrives. Maybe she gets a phone call etc etc. 

Being bold in your actions is the best way to not be creep. So, go speak to her as soon as possible. 

# Statements of empathy

In my [step-by-step guide to fantastic daygame](https://www.reddit.com/r/seduction/comments/9i1259/what_to_say_after_hey_a_stepbystep_daygame_guide/), I suggest throwing in a statement of empathy before you say anything else. 

Not only does this give her time to adapt to the situation, but it also shows you have basic social awareness. 

Do this always.

What's more, if she's showing signs she's uncomfortable, don't ignore them. Mention them and throw in another statement of empathy.

This shows you're not a sociopath, can read social cues and care about her emotions. A great way to earn 'not creepy' points 

# Smile and have fun

The often-cited 'number one rule of pick-up' is 'whatever you feel, she feels'   

It's also known as the 'law of state transference' 

It means:

* If you're enjoying what you're doing, she'll be more likely to enjoy. 
* If you're worried about being creepy, she'll worry about that too. 

There's something about not smiling in what's meant to be a fun situation that's insanely creepy. So, smile, have fun and you'll be far more likely to get the girl.

***I've launched a Telegram group for men that want to become amazing with women. Hundreds discussing their goals and getting advice on their sticking points. If you'd like to join drop me a PM with your Telegram handle.***",seduction
"Guys who actually improved themselves, how did it affect your social life outside of dating? (no high school and college kids allowed in this thread)","Not going to allow high school and college kids since those years are supposed to be easy and a given for social life.

For the guys here who are mid-20s or older and not in a school setting, how did improving yourself affect your social life outside of dating and meeting women?

By this I mean meeting new people and making new friends, reading comprehension is a must so if you don't have it then don't reply to this thread.",seduction
Advice on getting this woman please?,"Hello Seddit. Hope you guys are having a nice day. I met this really nice woman recently and I'd like advice on getting her. She is 25 and I am 22. As a bagger boy I was bringing in carts from outside. She stopped me and asked why do I look so serious and upset. I told her because I was out there for a while in the hot sun. We talked for a little then she went in her car. A few seconds later she comes out and asks if I'd like to be friends. I agreed and she took my number.

&amp;#x200B;

That has been about a week ago. Since then we text a little because she prefers calling instead of texting. She called me late tonight to talk and ask if I'd like to see Venom with her at the movie theater. Of course I agreed but I don't have any idea what to do. I'm wondering should I hold her hand, put my arm over her in the theater, ask her for a goodbye kiss. I keep remembering that she asked to be friends. I don't mind being more.",seduction
How to go out if you have no wings.,,seduction
"I lost all my game, What to do?",I used to kiss girls almost every week. Now i haven’t kissed a girl in months. I’m going out every weeken. Nothing seems to work. I tried everything. I’m thinking about what i was doing back then. I kinda lost and sad right now. ,seduction
"She finds me attractive, laughs at my jokes, and invites me places. Why do I keep doubting myself?","For real though, within the first two nights of meeting this chick she followed me, added me on Snapchat, etc all within the next morning or two; seems like a pretty good sign.

She invites me places and pretty much every joke I crack she laughs at me - she’s never mean/rude to me even if I’m teasing/messing with her the exact same way other guys are. 

On top of that all she’ll do really obvious things like hold on to me from behind when she’s scared even though there’s other guys around.

So why, when I take this all into account do I end up lacking the confidence to actually do something about this? Why does something as simple as leaving me on read on Snapchat get me so insecure when other times she’ll send me four consecutive snaps?

Maybe I should go to a Doctor and see if I’m on the spectrum lmao. ",seduction
How do I learn from getting rejected for no obvious reason?,"Sometimes I do everything right but still get shot down. Just recently I asked a girl I've been flirting with and things have been getting really sexual, and I asked her for nudes. But got shot down with a hard ""no"". I was just like ""oh well"" and then left it at there and never texted her again",seduction
What sources do you use for more information?,"What PU/self improvement YouTube channels do you watch?
What books did/do you read?
And maybe which internet blogs do you follow?

Personally I watch Based Zeus, Improvement Pill and I like watching some others, too.",seduction
"Recently got fit, new to receiving attention, dont know how to deal with it","So over the past couple of month or so I put in a lot of work to get in shape, lost 25lbs and look pretty alright now. Before this, rarely got any attention in public but now theres an obvious difference in the way girls look at me. They try to make eye contact much more frequently and I just look back and do nothing. Not used to this attention, and have no exp flirting. 

I also noticed that sometimes if a girl is in my vicinity for a while and I don't acknowledge her presence, I notice louder noises such as inhaling louder etc and then walking off rapidly, this happens more than once. Or they first smile and then walk away with an upset face.

What do I do? Obvious answer is go say hi but remember that I don't even know how to do that...and i wouldnt even know where to take the conversation from there. I can't even tell the type of interest I'm receiving, aka what are they trying to achieve.

Im in 2nd yr college if that makes a difference",seduction
So tired of Tinder,"Damn guys I’ve been going on tinder dates and they just aren’t great.  Just last night this chick left a concert we met up for after the opening act because her friend was “super sick” from drinking.  Which was fine but since then she hasn’t said anything or texted me even though I brought her to it.

Really need to learn how to talk to girls in person because I’m tired of the crapshoot that tinder seems to be.  And bumble and all the other stuff.  I just freeze up whenever I see a cute girl.  Female friends of mine say I’m really hot all the time but I just can’t talk to girls I don’t know why.",seduction
Why is my girlfriend so obsessed with me being bad?,"**Note:** You don't need to read *Italic*, it's just historical context.

 *I was this new in school (17) and for some reason every single girl was falling for me. At first it was weird (tough I did build some ripped abs over the summer), all of a sudden being the center of the school. So I slowly started to exchange jeans for ripped ones, Adidas for Jordan... you know, evolving from the nice guy, to the bad boy, because that's good publicity.*

 *Most hot girls either had boyfriends (so it was one night sex only) or they were too arrogant. I wanted commitment.*

 *So the girl I'm writing about. I accidentally met her a month when I went to the library to masturbate (because according to my friend, he does it all the time since its always empty, lying jerk). She was really hot. The sexy curved legs, her ass when she bent to reach books on the ground... she was one of the hottest I met. Anyway, we talk, we flirt, we end up kissing behind the shelves. Next date is at her place after school.*

 *I said yes because I was trowing those intense sweet yeses while kissing her neck, but actually it was a really bad idea because I had basketball with friends after school (which we play in our school clothes). I came to her place as wet as one can be.*

 *Her apartment was so clean, I kinda felt bad I walked in with my shoes (trashed Nike AF1 white, totally loose, great for style, bad for everyday everything else). We kissed a bit, talked and that aroused me so much that I had to sit down to hide the boner raging from my tight jeans. I sat on the couch and put one foot on the edge of the coffee table, just to spice up things. She sat next to me and told me to feel as if I was home, and that in here I don't have restrictions. So I kicked my feet on the coffee table and took off my steamy shirt to show her my abs. She started playing with my wet torso and asked me if I want a foot massage. I wanted to say no, I really did, but a foot massage after 2 hours of basketball? Who could resist that! BTW that was a yes. What followed was the start of the weirdest experience ever.*

 She started massaging my socked feet, it was like pressing on wet sponges. She wasn't only massaging my feet, she was smelling my socks, rubbing my feet over her face... Those things reeked. **Why would anyone want to have anything to do with them?** I was soooooo confused. And she didn't stop there. She licked my armpits, asked me to piss over the keys of her piano as she plays it, to get my shoes dirty and then abuse her furniture casually while doing other things. She asked me to swear, curse her, ask her to lick my shoes, rip and mud her books, smash glasses, smash her piano... At first I  wasn't sure what to do, but I slowly got the hang of it. It was the most fun I had in years. I didn't have a problem doing those things (as long as she likes it), and I must say it was great. It continues up to date. I don't have anything against the things she asked, I've always loved destroying things. I just wonder, **why would she like to watch me do such stuff? If she doesn't, why did she asked me to do it? Was I a bad person for saying yes? If yes, what was I supposed to do? AND WHY THE HELL DOES SHE LIKE MY FEET?**",seduction
Curious what people here think about STD (like HERPES) disclosure?,"any men out there have herpes or something similar and yet are still meeting and banging a lot of women?  Are you telling them before you bang them?  It's the right thing to do but it pretty much kills your chances right?  Just curious how people handle this one?  PM ME if you'd rather not comment publicly, thanks",seduction
Recovering from not making a move?,"So I had a girl round last week and I was a f\*ing idiot.

&amp;#x200B;

We matched on tinder, I arranged a date for 5 days later, we texted a bit in the middle (fun and flirty, sometimes subtly sexual). She had to bail (for a 100% genuine reason, she opened up about it when we met), rearranged for a few days later.

She had been crying all afternoon for the same reason she'd bailed a few days before, but wanted to meet to cheer her up. I decided not to be too pushy cos she was sad. We watched some tv and really got on, good banter from both of us and i was rubbing her inner thigh the whole time with her legs over mine, she mentioned something about fucking me, and I still never kissed her, dropped her off at like 1am.

&amp;#x200B;

As I dropped her off at 1am I realised how fucking dumb I was, she 10000% wanted to fuck me. Idk why I had it in my head not to do anything - I wasn't nervous or anything, just dumb. I still cant really comprehend what I was doing.

&amp;#x200B;

She texted me asking if I even liked her because she got ""mixed signals"" - I'm direct and cocky, but my natural personality gives a lot of push/pull (i dont intentionally implement it) and obviously I didnt kiss/fuck her.

&amp;#x200B;

I asked about meeting up again (we were both seeing friends til \~10pm separately), she said shed ring me after seeing her friends and come round. havent heard from her since (3 days).

&amp;#x200B;

Do you think I have a shot if I ask her to go out in a couple of days, and how should I approach it? Was just gonna do my own thing for a couple days, then ask her to do something fun.

&amp;#x200B;

Not the end of the world if I don't see her again, but she was smoking hot and seemed cool. Wondered if you lot think its recoverable?",seduction
FR: How 1% can fuck up the 99% - failed date with my personal 10,"Hi all, I'd like to share one of the most painful lessons I learnt after a Sunday date so, hopefully, somebody wouldn't make the same mistakes as me and lose a girl. 

APPROACH: we locked eyes for a sec while I was walking out of the tube station and she was walking to the station at 10pm, got her number in a min, turned out she is living 1 min away from me and we went on a date a couple of days later

DATE: met her in a bar at 8.30pm. It turns out she is leaving 2 min away from me so perfect logistics. The vibe was great, she seemed to like me, my game and humour to the point when she was the one escalating on me - she was the first one that hold my hand, rested her head on my shoulder, locked my arms while walking, wanted to come to my improv show and wanted me to cook something for her in the future.

I tried to kiss her during the middle of the date but got the typical ""I don't kiss on the first date as if the guy wants me, he'll see me again"". I shrugged it off and just continued talking with her. After 1h and 30 min she yawned and said she had to go home as she was waking up early. So we started walking back to the same tube station, got on a train and got off at the same stop. I didn't offer to chill in my place as she said she has to get up early and I just enjoyed the presence so I walked her to her place while being sure I'll see her again one way or another. We then kissed lightly on the lips but for whatever fucking weird reason (to this moment I still don't understand my weird behaviour, was caught up so much in the moment) I became too lovely-dovely and tried to escalate for a make out in the street. I was too pushy, she hit me on my chest but didn't push me away and we split parts in a weird ending. That was the moment when 1 min (so literally less than 1% of time we spent together) of my weird behaviour fucked up 2h we spent together and turned a super hot girl that was so into me into an unresponsive girl. She didn't reply to my first message, replied only to my reconnecting meme message but didn't reply to the third one. At that moment I knew the game is over and I fucked up soooo much. 

LESSONS:
* Try to invite a girl over every time if the logistics are perfect to cook something for her etc when you know she likes you and escalates on you so that you don't miss window of opportunity
* Set up a date early on (i.e. 6pm) if you know the girl might be working the next day so this excuse from her doesn't come up and you can spend more time with her and escalate further
* Don't go for the kiss if you're not in place where sex can happen as I noticed a trend that girls are more flaky after the makout - also go for the kiss at the right time at the right place
* Girls don't forgive bad game / you messing up - remember that even 1 mistake can cost you loosing a great girl (or my personal 10 in my case which is a real shame and I can only think of what would've happened if...)",seduction
SoCal social meetup," 

Hi seddit I'm trying to get something going. I've been into the community for a while now and I feel its definitely time for there to be some kind of social for people to meet and have discussions. There's only so much growth you can manage catering to keyboard warriors with no standards to get better. I think seddit needs to meet irl to legitimize any of the ideals pushed on the thread. The goal of the group is to have a place where like minded people can meet to discuss their views, issues, get help/advice, find wings, practice theories, all that good stuff. Even trying to get some experts to come down to show some infields. 

Since I'm located in socal I was thinking of having the meet up be at least weekly, somewhere in LA.

Message me if you're interested and I'll send you more details!",seduction
"Looking for wings in Austin, Texas","I'm looking for a wingman. All I'm looking for is somebody who is willing to approach,improve themselves and help me do the same.",seduction
Guide tO Mind Blowing SEX :),,seduction
"Those who tried transformation mastery, let’s discuss it.","Do you feel it really works? In my experience, it seems like total bullshit. The benefits I received are the same ones I would have with Mindfulness meditation, nothing of that “trauma release” stuff, high vibrational energy and etc. What is your opinion and personal experience?",seduction
Looking for Daygame Wing in Houston,"I've been looking everywhere the past couple of weeks for a Daygame Wing in Houston with little luck

I'm a 19 year old University of Houston student looking for some people that are down to go daygame with me on campuses, Rice Villag, Galleria, etc. Please inbox me and/or exchange numbers and we can get to it asap. Thanks!",seduction
las Vegas 7-9th,"I'll be in my city of Las Vegas from the 7 to the 9th nights. 

If any of you guys want free entry into the clubs (got connections, not hard to get) and to have a crazy time. hit me up to wing. 

Ill be doing day game and night game all day and night. My goal is to fuck 2-3 girls each day. 

im not a fan of direct game, think its stupid, but since i have such little time im playing the numbers game, insted of gaming the 9s and 10s at the vip areas and tables/dj booth. 

sunday: day: miracle mile shops, night: hakkasan at mgm

monday: day: Wet republic day club, night: marquee at cosmo

tuesday: day: street game/miracle mile, night: omnia at ceasers palace

best clubs of the night. Im on vacation, im getting lit! 

Don't care about your skill level, as long as your're not a pussy and down for whatever happens. 

Drugs,threesomes,strip clubs, maybe hookers if all else fails, etc

This is just an invite, ill be staying at MGM, I've actually never gamed with wings before usually. 

Usually just throw left over women on random guys in the club and make friends/wings with them through that. 

call it wing on the go. 

but i'm down to see how it works out, should be fun. ",seduction
How to get used to Gaming alone,"Hi, i wanted some of your recommendations on Gaming alone. I arrived in Warsaw, Poland a few days ago and do not have any friends here **yet** to game with. For the time being, what would you suggest and where to approach? Thanks!",seduction
"How to make anyone laugh, and why women are attracted to men who make them laugh.","Women love men who can make them laugh.

The ability to make anyone laugh stems from being honest about your thoughts or intentions.

Laughing is not a form of submission, but a form of being open. 

Honesty, such as being critical of someone or being transparent about your intentions, is the key to opening someone up, and is used by comedians everywhere.

Example: “I walked into a McDonald’s one time and saw an obese woman in an electric wheel chair and thought ‘God damn, can you please pick up your dragging fat flaps?’ .”

Example 2: *Guy walks up to a woman* “Hi, I saw you walking down the mall and thought wow, I’d sure like to impregnate her.”

If you thought that was funny, it’s because the person who was thinking or saying those thoughts was being honest.

Honesty grabs attention. Attention builds power. And women are attracted to power.

Honesty also creates connection and transparency, because even though sometimes honesty hurts, it’s better than lying to someone.

Assholes are very good at being honest, but they weren’t born that way. 

Masculine energy develops by going through hardship and pain, such as being mistreated or betrayed by others.

Once the ego realizes that focusing *too much* on others is not beneficial, the ego turns inward and becomes more self centered.

Self centeredness creates a breeding ground for honesty, because it focus on what *you* think, and decreases or eliminates anxiety on what others think of you.

Too much pain or too much betrayal creates evil beings such as dictators, narcissistic figures, and domestic abusers. 

To create a nice balance, love and respect others, but love and respect yourself.",seduction
How do I take this interaction with these girls at my new bar job?,"Long***I started a new job as a waiter in a new pub and all night these 4 girls (only 2 of them are in this , a blonde girl and a brunette girl) were there for a few hours in the night at the end before closing time the blonde girl walked up stairs with some other girl to the toilet she kept looking back at me down the stairs and laughing a bit with hand to mouth . but couldn’t make it out fully. later I walked around the corner towards by where they were sitting one of them (that same blonde girl) was looking at me and like politely smiled a little (not a full smile just like a tighten lips hard to explain) and she didn’t look away and then I looked away, then I heard her lean in to say whisper to her friend the brunette girl 'that lads just been staring at me'. another while later I was cleaning a table (they were the last customers left in there it was late before closing) and the brunette girl asked over at me ‘excuse me’ twice then I looked and then she asked ‘how do yer get a job in here?’ I answered and walked towards her because she asked me if I knew a girl that worked in there (where I work) I said yes and she was saying they don’t know her that well and then said ‘yea she’s not weird’ as she was talking with the blonde girl too but the blonde girl was like ‘awww no don’t say that’ then the brunette then said ‘well not weird just a bit...yer know.’ and then looked at me after she sipped her drink with a straw then grew a smile and said 'she likes you' and they all burst out laughing I just walked away (she meant the girl at work who said was weird likes me but she doesn’ she was just joking) then I then went back to finish cleaning the table and then the same brunette girl asked ‘excuse me’ I looked and she looked a bit tipsy and nervous as she asked pointing at me 'can I ask you a serious question?' I looked then she said 'have you got a girlfriend?' Relaxingly, ignored her and their was a pause then the blonde girl then said 'aww leave him alone...he’s dead cute' while looking over at me smiling (idk if she said it like puppy dog cute is that bad?) and then said “he probably has” (probably has a gf) the brunette then looked at me a bot and asked me it again saying ‘have er have you got a gf’ nicely and I blanked her and then the blonde girl said laughed a bit and said ‘ aww leave him alone now hes fumin” . On their way out by the door when I was cleaning other tables the brown girl looked a bit drunk and the blonde girl who seemed normal said ‘byyeee’ smiling politely idk they looked like pleasant well spoken girls not loud drunk girls",seduction
17m advice with text game with homecoming date,"Ik she probably likes me since she said she'd go to homecoming with me when I asked, but where do I go from here?

I thought about asking her if she wanted to play 20 questions, but idk if that's too much for text or asking her what music she's listening to lately, just want to get to know her more and have a connection over text so we're not clueless who each other is on homecoming night

Thanks",seduction
Hong Kong Cold Approach/Daygame - Looking for a Wingman in HK (香港),"Anyone here in Hong Kong and interested in doing some Daygame Cold Approach?

I've done some street approach here and it seems like the women are very friendly and nice. I can pretty much whatsapp/wechat close every one. I'm actually learning Chinese now so its so easy to open them by saying a few words of Chinese :)

PM me if you're looking for a wing.",seduction
Looking for an 18+ club in Philadelphia or nyc that has a good crowd of single girls,"Looking for a good place to just dance with single girls in either phillly or nyc, preferably philly since I live very close to it, but nyc is pretty fun. 

Like the kind of dancing where your either behind a girl or your facing each and feeling other and just moving together, that’s what I’m looking for. 

Problem is though I’ve only been able to go to two clubs because I’m 20 and they’re the only 18+ clubs I know of in philly. One is pretty alright but not a lot of chances to dance with single girls, most come with significant others if theirs and at the other club, while having way more single girls, they play mostly rap/rnb and I just want to try something else. 
",seduction
How to I bring her guard down on Tinder?,"I'm talking to this girl that I'm really trying to escalate things with, but it's been a little difficult. She has her guard up, but isn't dismissing me just yet. I can save this interaction from falling out still.

I opened with a question relating to her bio, and that got her to open up a little with a double text back. I then texted back with some small story I had that related to what we were talking about, but also a somewhat flirty response. She only responds with one word. I try getting her to open up about her passions with another question relating to her bio, so I assumed that she was into x that lead to her passions or whatever. I'm hit with a ""Nope"".

At this point, she just feels cold towards me. I then texted her ""Okay, I guess we're not gonna click. Have a good night"". She texts back goodnight, followed by a question like ten minutes later so I'm just surprised she hasn't unmatched.

How am I supposed to bring her guard down enough to talk openly with me? At this point, I'm willing to just do a hail mary play for kicks and see if she'd bite on it. Is this convo a lost cause?",seduction
I find it so difficult to break conversation into groups of people going out at night.,"I consider myself social and attractive. Yet I feel it’s so difficult to chat with people going out because everyone’s in their own group talking with their friends. I think I’m successful integrating with maybe 1/5 groups of people that go out? 

I go out with my friends too, so thankfully I at least always have people to talk to.

Thoughts?",seduction
How to handle girl with a lot guy friends who are interested in her?,"I've been seeing this girl for about 3 months. She calls me baby and I call her baby, so I guess it's serious even though I haven't asked her to be my girlfriend. She has a lot of male suitors, and will go out to dinner with them. She says she explicitly tells them that she just wants to be friends. Two days ago, this guy took her to a very expensive restaurant, and the next day sent flowers to her office. What can I do in this situation? She reassured me that she told him that she just wants to be friends, but then why would he keep doing this? Maybe she's lying to me that she told him she wants to be friends? Anyways, how do I get my mind off this, or what do I say to the girl?",seduction
How to talk to shy girls. Pickup videos.,,seduction
Budapest wings,Anyone around in Budapest for day game (or night) game?,seduction
How To Stop Worrying About What Other People Think --- Realize They're Not Thinking Anything About You,,seduction
Can adopting the abundance mentality (= lots more where she came from) actually be dangerous when it comes to settling down?,"My feeling is that the abundance mentality, and not growing too attached to how things go with any one women (whether she likes you, whether you get a second date) are two sides of the same coin. When it comes with staying with one girl, such attitudes seem dangerous- you *want* to feel a strong attachment, you want to think of her as more than just another hot girl, but a fantastic and unique individual in her own right. 

It seems plausible to me, that people that have been very successful in adopting the scarcity mentality may face issues forming strong and long term emotional connections with any girls. 

Thoughts?",seduction
What do you say to a girl at the club?,"Loud music, people dancing and drinking...
How the hell do you make a connection and escalate? 

I'm in college, please help me out ",seduction
What to do from here?,"Had an intimate thing with a girl a while back. Because of reasons we stopped talking until I randomly hit her up one day. She was quick to reply but one day I took a lot longer to reply and when I did, I was left on read. Should I send another text asking to possibly meet up? Or should I call it in and move onto the next. ",seduction
Made out in club. How should I plan the date?,"Was just having lots of fun in a club and eventually danced and made out with this awesome girl. When she told me her friends were leaving I asked for her number and she gave it.

Fast forward to now and we did little chat but she thanked me for the experience and we shared some details like where we live, study etc. 

Next step should me  setting up a date, right? I thought about cinema, spending the afternoon in a bar or watch a movie at her home. 
The thing is I haven't decided yet and seems like all my ""ideas"" are just so basic. And to add up the place where I actually live is quite far and unavailable for a date.
Do you guys mind giving me some suggestions on what to do and how should I proceed?

P.s we are both 18 and she lives in a city which I go to, every day, to get transport to my college.",seduction
I think I made a mistake - what should I do now?,"I have this crush on a cute girl in my class, and yesterday I was at a party with her, and I had decided that I would try to kiss her or make a move - mostly beacuse it would also help me stop wondering about whether she likes me or not.

But I didn't do it. I talked with her for more than an hour I think, and then I played a drinking game with her and some friends.

But I felt pretty bad about myself afterwards, because next week there is a pretty big assignment in class, which will probably make it hard to get together.

I didn't even get her number, but today I wrote to her on Facebook that it was a fun time yesterday... but I don't know what to do now. I could ask her out tomorrow on Facebook, but I'm not sure if that's a good idea.

Does anyone have any advice?",seduction
How to get into fashion ?,"I'm looking for advice in terms of fashion. I want to do it because my wardrobe and clothes are wack and not very stylish. I don't know anything about fashion and have tried to get into it in the past but most of the time I just can't find any outlet for it where I can see or review current fashion trends. I found one, kind of, called Alpha M. on YT. 




Now, I'm looking to improve my personal as well as my work wardrobe. My current wardrobe consists of random t-shirts, 3D corolfull hoodies, few shots and two jackets with two pair of shoes (one for work and the other one for gym and outdoors). I'm looking for something that would complement my looks and my nerdiness. I don't know where to start as I'm not a fashion guy. I heard that Pinterest is a good place to start with ? But is it ? 




Any advice will be appreciated. ",seduction
How To Not Suck At Dating - Understand that you aren't measured by anything except for how you make her FEEL - everything else is details,,seduction
What advice do you have for a guy whose 'sexual prowess'is weak?,,seduction
how would you react when the AMOG calls you a bitch,"first of all, i'm 5'7"" and 123 lbs so most AMOGs could probably kick the shit out of me. problem is, that inner fear due to physical inferiority just leads to anger (a la star wars) and then you actually become a bitch...

&amp;#x200B;

buttt yeah so i was going to cold approach this hot as fuck girl across the street who had strayed a bit from her squad, i'm waiting for cars and shit to cross...the AMOG dude sees me and goes ""cross the street bitch"" and he and the rest of the group are closing back in on her so chances are fading anyway....so now in addition to the approach anxiety, stress hormones and shit are going off in my brain and i'm trying to make a split second decision whether to go and get in an altercation with this guy or drop it and walk away

&amp;#x200B;

i dropped it and walked away, and then just blacked myself out

&amp;#x200B;

honestly this goes deeper than game, you kind of have to be superman in every other way besides. what are your thoughts?

&amp;#x200B;

I think when you react to everything or get butthurt or get your feathers ruffled like this, it is coming from the same place as feeling shitty when a girl rejects you....which is the ego being hurt. Just some food for thought 

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
"Lets discuss the concept of ""Frame"" for a bit - Any thoughts you'd like to share?","So by now I'm assuming most, if not all of you at least grasp the idea of what your frame is, so I won't go into detail about the basic jist.

However I am curious on everyone's thoughts on it. Are there any common challenges in making it stronger that you've noticed. What are some obvious signs of someone with a weak frame (verbal and non verbal communication), and vice versa? Besides the obvious of getting more exposure to social settings, are there any tips any of you have on building it when you're not out? Any youtube links examples of strong and weak frames, frame battles, etc. are more than welcome!",seduction
The Art Of Body Language - How to get an EXPANSIVE body language,,seduction
Montreal - Looking for a wingman / pua,"Hi

I'm looking for a wingman here in Montreal. I'm a beginner in this but really willing to learn and improve.

&amp;#x200B;

PS: I'm 23yo and new to the city :)",seduction
The 'Looks Don't Matter' Manifesto,"Below, I explain how I learned that 'looks don't matter' when attracting women.

I reckon to truly believe this, you'll have to experience what I'm about to describe for yourself.

I'll explain how you can experience what I did. Once you do, you'll be convinced that looks don't matter. This will change your life forever.

If you can't be bothered to read on, go search for 'RSD TYLER INFIELD' on YouTube.  He's a fat, balding ginger who owns a company called Real Social Dynamics and slays it with girls.

For those of you who remain unconvinced, let me share what I've learned...

(This is my experience, which I believe can be replicated by anyone. I'd love if others would share their own stories of how they came to this same realisation. That would make this thread a proper manifesto that could change lives. I'd also love if people who think looks DO matter explained why in the comments, so others can argue with you ;) )

# Why you think looks matter...

In order to be convinced that looks don't matter, it's important to understand why you may think they do. This could be because:

* Men primarily experience attraction visually.
* Women talk about 'hot guys' a lot. (Of course, they do appreciate good looks. However, they primarily experience attraction emotionally)
* The media tells men that looks matter. Advertisers are trying to sell clothes, fragrances, grooming products, gym memberships etc. Good-looking men are used to sell these.
* If you dress well and take care of your appearance, this makes you look high-status. It also shows you respect yourself. These are attractive qualities in and of themselves.
* Good-looking men do get girls because high-status. They also get girls because society constantly tells them they're awesome, making it easier for them to behave like a confident, charismatic guy.
* For all the reasons above, when you're immediately blown off by women, it makes sense to believe it's because you're bald, short, old, young, black, white, whatever. After all, these women haven't even given you a chance to show your personality, right?

I promise you it's rarely because of your physical imperfections...Far more likely, it's the little nuances in your body language which show her:

* you're uncomfortable with the situation;
* you think you don't deserve her;
* you're far too desperate for it to work;
* you're expecting to be rejected.

This tells her everything she needs to know about you. Feeling like this also shuts down your brain, preventing you from being able to relax, show charisma or even think of anything to say.

# The female mind: emotions vs logic

Logically, girls may say they want a handsome boyfriend. While they're sat at home in an unstimulating environment, they'll swipe left on anyone who's not their type, pine after Hollywood celebrities and write 'no short guys' on their Tinder profile.

Thankfully, women follow emotions over logic.

If you can learn how to stimulate her emotions and get her feeling really good, she'll forget all this logic. Instead, she'll follow the good emotions. This is how the female mind works...

Back this up by learning how to pull smoothly without making her feel like a slut, and you can sleep with plenty of hotties, no matter what you look like.

# How do I know this???

Because I've experienced both worlds.

I had a break-up which destroyed my confidence. I went a whole year not getting laid afterwards. I was going out and approaching loads of women. I thought I was being funny and charismatic, but I had this dark cloud of neediness over my head that was impossible to hide. It repulsed every girl I met.

At the time, I couldn't see it. I assumed it was because of my looks. Looking back now, it was so clear. My inner demons were showing in my outer vibe.

Then, I discovered 'The Game' and the community surrounding it, plus I moved to London in in that same period.

I barely knew anything about the techniques and theories surrounding success with women, but I was so excited to go out and try what I had learned.

That excitement was infectious.

Suddenly, women were excited to speak to me and I slept with two hotties in two separate weekends.

**If looks matter, how could I go from a year not getting laid to this??** *(commenters tell me??)*

# Ups and downs

The more I went out, the more I learned about the importance of building social momentum.

When I was in awesome mood, (or 'in state' as the community calls it) girls would love talking to me and were often open to spending the night together. When I was feeling insecure/nervous/needy, they'd blow me off almost immediately.  Go out enough and you'll see these patterns for yourself.

I'll always remember my solo holiday in Sweden. A weekend spent hitting on women in Stockholm's high-end clubs. I was so excited to be there. Nines and tens everywhere. I would speak to everyone and everyone loved it. My enthusiasm was more infectious than ever. Once you experience a night like this, you'll know for sure that looks don't matter.

(And yes, I pulled a couple of hotties that weekend)

# How can I experience a night like this??

My results probably flipped so quickly, because I was always somewhat confident in my younger years.

If you're coming from a place of lower confidence, perhaps it will take you a little longer. Who cares? The time is going to pass either way.

The best advice I can give to newbies is to build social momentum.

Get in the habit of:

* 'opening' as soon as you see a person (man or woman);
* minimising time between interactions;
* saying things that make you laugh and put you in a good mood;
* saying things you find funny (put yourself in the mood you want them to be in);
* staying in set even when things get awkward.

When I do these steps properly, I end up 'in state' every time.

Before long, you'll start to notice the patterns between how people react when you are in state, versus when you're not.

Before long, you'll experience one of those mind-blowing nights like I experienced in Sweden. You'll be socialising without a care in the world. Everyone will think you're awesome. YOU'LL think you're awesome. This is why I say [the game is FUN AS HELL](https://www.reddit.com/r/seduction/comments/9guu2c/game_is_fun_as_hell_please_explain_why_some/).

From there, you can escalate using my [step-by-step guide to nightgame](https://www.reddit.com/r/seduction/comments/9j23le/what_to_say_after_hey_a_stepbystep_nightgame/) and you'll finally realise that **LOOKS DON'T MATTER**.

# If you're still convinced that looks are crucial....

...then go all-in on your looks.

Lift weights. Buy good-fitting designer clothes. Eat healthy. This is good for you! It may well give you an easier first few seconds when you introduce yourself to women. Hopefully, it will give you the same confidence I got from going out and improving my social skills. How you get this confidence doesn't matter. Just know that it's confidence (not your appearance) that's crucial to your success.

It worries me when people use their poor looks as an excuse to not flirt with women. These are the people who are scared of rejection. They're scared to try and fail. They're scared to admit it's THEIR FAULT their sex life sucks. These are the people I'm hoping to influence with this post.

Yes, the process above isn't easy. You'll take a lot of bashes to the ego while you learn. Staying at home and masturbating to porn is a lot more comfortable (in the short term).

Still, at the end of the day, you have two choices.

* Attempt to [improve your skill](https://www.reddit.com/r/seduction/comments/9gkb34/game_is_100_skill_follow_these_four_steps_and_you/) with women by learning to be more fun, non-needy and charismatic.
* Believe that your looks give you no chance of being good with women, avoid speaking to them and be lonely forever.

To me, it's clear which one leads to a happier life.

***I recently co-launched a Telegram group full of men who want to become amazing with women. Hundeds of dudes discussing their struggles, getting feedback on their approaches and sharing their success stories. Many are realising that their looks needn't hold them back. If you'd like to join, drop me a PM with your Telegram handle.***",seduction
"if you are going out in college, there are going to be guys around you who also suck with girls so don't feel bad",just a bit of motivation. EVERYONE has something they are insecure about ,seduction
Tips for Reducing Flake Rates?,"I typically haven't worried about trying to get women to flake less often, because I figured there's nothing I can do about that. Instead, I've just treated it like a numbers game, and figured that if I talk to enough women, 90% could flake and the remaining 10% would still be enough to be getting somewhere.

But lately, I've been feeling like despite chatting up quite a large amount of women and getting a large amount of numbers, I'm still not getting a lot of in-person meetings out of them. So, I figure trying to work on a strategy to reduce flaking is unavoidable at this point.

Any tips for that? I have no idea what I'm doing wrong. I totally understand when a girl I didn't get into that interesting a conversation with when I got her number flakes, but the flaking seems *totally independent* of how interested they seem when I'm talking to them. A girl who seems totally enthusiastic and giddy when I'm talking to them ends up being just as likely to ghost or flake as a girl who seems uninterested or awkward, and sometimes, girls who seem uninterested end up being the ones who actually *do* end up going on dates with me.

I don't know if the cause could have something to do with how I text. I never text to chat, just to set up dates. I find text-chatting kinda tiresome, because the only way to say anything actually meaningful would require blocks of text much larger than are comfortable to type and read over SMS. I'd rather save actual conversation for being in-person.

I don't know what else it could be. Any pointers?",seduction
I haven’t cold approached in several years. Should I go to a place like the mall with the sole intention of approaching to get more comfortable?,"Been out of the game for a while, want to pick it back up again. However, I definitely am dealing with anxiety and rust from being away for such a long time. Would dedicating time solely to approaching be a wise strategy? Where would be some good places to do this? I’m afraid if I take a more reserved approach it will take me too long to get over any anxiety or inexperience issues. For what it’s worth I don’t have bad social skills. ",seduction
100 sets - PUA Robbie,"I just read a post about how most guys don’t get through 100 sets. I am gonna try this for myself. A little about me. I learned about PUA about 6 years ago in high school. Went through some crap adopted a victim mentality and was lost for a long time. I’ve used the pick up methods before and had limited success, number closes, that’s about it. I would consider myself at the beginner level, attempting to break into the intermediate zone. I have approached over 200 girls probably, not much recently but I am taking on this challenge to change that and better my ability to build attraction, bounce, insta date, kino escalate. If you are an LA local feel free to PM me, I am just heading out now and will use the comments section and possibly additional posts to document the process with updates through the day and a reflection tonight. Planning on doing at least 30 sets, and finish the 100 by next Saturday. ",seduction
How to seduce girls as a trans man?,"Getting tired of all this bs! I don't pass as a man even after months of bulking, 17 months of T, possibly never getting bottom surgery and getting top surgery in months but I hate it. Having such a high sexual drive because of T and no girl even considers me as an option because either I look too feminine or I don't have a penis. And I hate this being a straight trans man is the most difficult thing in the world. ",seduction
Make Women Captivated By You (This Weekend),"Gentlemen,

Do you want women captivated by you? Do you want them chasing you? Texting you? Pleasing you the way you want to be pleased?

If yes, then listen up.

To make a woman captivated means to get her thinking about you, a lot. When a person thinks about something a lot, they become captivated by it. 

To understand this, let’s reverse the situation. What are you thinking about a lot? What are you in this sub talking about and asking questions about?  Girls.  And more specifically, probably some particular girl(s) that you’ve seen, fucked or somehow interacted with lately.

Well, whether you like it or not, if you’re thinking about her, posting about her, asking questions about her, coming up with ways to meet, talk to, date, escalate and fuck her, you’re captivated. 

Here’s the important part to understand. You’re captivated by a girl who presents “value,” and who you’re ""uncertain"" whether you can get. Those are the two ingredients that you need for captivation. 

Captivation = Value + Uncertainty

That’s the captivation formula you need to memorize. 

Just to be clear, you need **both** components to create captivation. For example, you may be uncertain if you can bag the overweight UPS lady, but since she presents no value to you, you don’t think about her and thus are not captivated. 

Second example, your needy ex-girlfriend who’s dying for a make-up shag may present some value to you on lonely nights, but because you’re certain she’d rush right over if you called, there’s nothing in particular to think about, thus you’re not captivated. 

Now let’s flip it back around and see how to create value and uncertainty so she becomes captivated by you. 

**Value**

In other posts I’ve talked about ways to increase your value, which include: Improve yourself. Become the highest version of yourself. Have your own life. Have interesting things to do. Be an interesting guy. Improve your social and conversation skills. Improve your wardrobe. Hit the gym. Be fun, spontaneous, exciting, mysterious. Etc. 

That’s all important stuff. And you should be working on all of it. If you want guidance, check out [Make Women Chase You](http://dailymanup.com/attract-women-talk-girls-make-conversation/).

However, here’s the issue for this upcoming weekend: improving some of this stuff takes time. It’s time well invested. But it still takes time. We need something that works now, immediately, that you can take with you this Friday &amp; Saturday night so cleavage-busting hotties will disco-grind on your manhood. And maybe they’ll go home with you too. 

So in this post we’re going to put aside all the usual stuff and talk about 1 Hack which can up your perceived value immediately.  

Here it is: You need to “act like you’ve seen it all before.” 

Imagine your little sister came to you all freaked out with some bullshit from school. Would your heart start pounding? Would you get all nervous and excited?  No. You’d look at her with a friendly, but mildly disinterested look as she ranted and raved. If she asked you a bunch of questions, would you feel obligated to answer all of them promptly and directly? Or would you just answer the ones you though were important? Probably the latter. Or maybe you’d not answer them at all and just tell her what you think is important. 

Why? Because you’ve heard it all before. And *when* you’ve heard it all before, nothing about her or the story is particularly impressive or interesting to you. 

Think about the hot chick(s) which you’ve had on your mind recently. Now imagine that someone you consider to have really high status met her/them in a bar. Think about some celebrity or model or Donald Trump. Do you think that high status guy would be particularly impressed or interested in this chick which you’ve been so captivated by for the last few days?

Probably not. 

Why? Because he’s seen it all before. He’s had dozens upon dozens of girls (or more) throwing themselves all over him, and this is just another girl.  She’s cute.  Sweet.  Silly.  But nothing particularly new or exciting. So he will act similarly to how you would act when talking to your little sister. When he does that, she will immediately conclude that he’s of higher social value than her. 

And how specifically is this high status dude acting: he’s not impressed by everything she says. He doesn’t agree with everything she says. He pokes fun at her. He teases her. He treats her like his little sister. And when he does that, she starts qualifying herself to him, seeking his approval, trying to please him and generally starts thinking about him a lot. That’s the start of captivation. 

Now you might be saying “Yeah that makes sense, but I’m not a celebrity. I’m not Donald Trump. I’m not a model. How can I act like that?” 

Try this thought experiment: Imagine that this upcoming Saturday and Sunday you have two girls lined up. A different girl each night. And not just for dates. These chicks want you. You know they’re going to be all over you. You know you’re getting what you want. (really take a moment to imagine that). 

Now it’s Friday night. You and the boys are at the club. How would you be acting? Would you be hemming and hawing, looking at girls from a far, nursing your beer and wondering what to do? 

Fuck no. You’d be strutting around like the big swinging dick that you are. After all, you have two hot chicks lined up for steamy sex over the next two nights, and you know it.  

If you really took the necessary 3 seconds to imagine that, did you feel the excitement? The dopamine rush? Did you feel how confident you’d be on Friday night?

Now, like most things in life, you need to use the Fake It Before You Make It approach. You need to figure out how to act like that, as if it were real. The confidence. The non-neediness. [The smirk](http://dailymanup.com/attract-women-girls-alpha-male-body-language-eye-contact-smirk-pua/). 

If you can go out and act like that this Friday night, you will demonstrate the kind of value that women can get obsessed over. 

**Important**

I want to be very clear here since half the readers on this sub interpret a man doing anything other than kissing her ass, as him being mean, rude, a dickhead, a chode, an asshole, or a dozen other things. 

Acting high value does not mean being rude, an asshole, mean, or unkind in any way. When you’re demonstrating high value, she should be smiling, giggling, laughing, and thoroughly enjoying herself. Her eyes should be wide with fascination. Her body language should be facing you, turning toward you, leaning in to you. She should be touching you here and there. On the forearm. On the hand. On the shoulder. 

So it’s not being mean, it’s being completely friendly, exciting and fun, with the underlying tone, body language and expressions that simply say: you’ve seen it all before. 

**Uncertainty**

Uncertainty (as to whether she can get you or not) comes across naturally when you act like you’ve seen it all before. However, here are some additional things to do. 

Remember the little sister example? How you didn’t feel the need to answer her immediately and directly? Maybe you didn’t answer at all and just changed the subject to what you thought was important.

Women want you to take control of a conversation in that way. They are fascinated by it. They will not say that’s what they want (women rarely say what they mean when it comes to attraction), but just look at who is getting the girls. 

Is it the guys who try to please and qualify to her and answer all her questions and do everything “right?”

Fuck no. It’s the guys who seem like they’re living in their own little worlds. Who seem to say whatever comes to mind and act like “they’ve seen it all before.” 

So here’s what you do. Be playful, sometimes indirect, sometimes elusive, sometimes vague with your conversation. Mix it up. Have fun. 

Eject from your mind any idea that you need to answer her immediately and directly. Because if you do, she’s leading the conversation. 

Instead, play with her. Tease her. Poke fun at her. When she asks a question, give her a half answer. A nonsense answer. A vague answer. Change the subject to what you want, without answering. That’s you leading the conversation. 

**Important**

Again for all the guys who can’t understand the word “sometimes.” When you use ANY TECHNIQUE in pick up, you use it SOMETIMES. You don’t use it all the time. You don’t just constantly “not answer and change the subject.” If you do, then you’re just being a dickhead, which is the opposite of what we want.

You mix these things in with normal conversation. It’s a normal, fun, playful conversation that you are leading by not always responding exactly how she expects. 

Now go captivate some chicks this weekend. ",seduction
"From the ""approach on eye contact and smile"" method, how many people actually acknowledge you?","I live on a college campus, I probably pass 250 different girls a day, and very rarely does a girl look at me. I try to initiate eye contact with nearly all of them. I might get like 5 looks from 5s and below the whole day.

Really depressing.",seduction
Feel like every girl is giving me IOIs,"Because of the fact I feel like every girl is giving me IOIs I can't tell if they are real or not so I don't get an overwhelming reason to approach.

&amp;#x200B;

Background:

While I was waiting to be served at the bar there was a constant stream of girls coming up besides me. It was prime time for how late I got there and there was 5 or more sets of 1 or 2 girls. It all seemed a bit odd compared to other sides of the bar. I didn't get served for ages and one of the female bartenders even gave me a weird look like ""why the fuck aren't you talking to them"" lol. Lots of the sets didn't even stay to order a drink so that was a bit suspicious.

The girl that was by my side for the longest amount of time kept looking my way so I returned the look a few times. We made eye contact a couple times but I rationalised hardcore because there was a dude on her left, however she seemingly payed him very little attention to him. She also talked to a girl on my right which made me think that's why she was looking that way. 

&amp;#x200B;

What I want to know is: has anyone ever felt the same way without validating that they're some kind of sexy beast?

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
Day game approach - Full Infield,,seduction
How to meet girls at school or college,"The fact that you’re reading this email means you probably find yourself surrounded by hot girls at your school, college or workplace and don’t know how to approach them; and if that’s true, you’ve come to the right place because I got you, son.

I got you.

I spend a lot of time coaching guys to approach women on the street and let their intentions be known right away. I advise them take establish a man-to-woman vibe from the get go so that the girls in question know what’s up and feel attracted to them at the same time. 

But that’s only a good strategy for situations where you know you’ll never see her ever again. If your black ass approaches a girl who then thinks you’re a creepy loser (which is a real possibility no matter how skilled you are), then once you’ve both gone your separate ways there’s no harm or foul. 

Your black ass can carry on with your mother lovin life and her black ass can do the same. However: 

**If you approach girls at school or work the way you would strangers on the street it can backfire massively**

It’s one thing to have some strange woman decide you’re a loser, walk off and never think about you ever again. But, it’s another thing entirely to have Jenny Patzitski from Social Studies 101 think the same thing, start DMing her girlfriends on campus about your black ass. 

**#nowyouhaveabadrepatschool** 

But having said that, you can safely approach girls at college, uni, or work. It’s totally possible, you just have to have a different approach. What you want to do is:

**Approach her with the intention of making a friend rather than trying to make sweet, sweet love to her body**

Sounds crazy, right? 

Blasphemous even?

*What man in his right mind approaches a got girl with the intention of friendship rather than sweet, sweet, delicious nookie?*

**A smart man, that’s who**

And here’s why.

A smart man understands that most girls meet their boyfriends and fuck buddies through their existing friends, and he also knows that this happens because they take said friends’ recommendations very seriously.

[As I said in my last article](https://www.reddit.com/r/seduction/comments/9l03zh/this_is_the_best_time_to_approach_a_girl) women rank their personal safety as being of paramount importance and don’t like to take chances with it. This means that a man they don’t know is an inherent safety risk, but one who comes recommended by a friend who they do know isn’t. And as a result of this:

**They’re waaaaay more likely to give the time of day to a guy their friend has vouched for than some bozo on the street**

Now if you don’t believe me then ask yourself this question. Assuming you’ve been in situations where you’ve met random girls on the street as well as girls through friends, didn’t you find it easier with the second group? Weren’t they way more likely to respond to messages and then show up to dates than the first group? The answer’s yes and it’s because of their beloved friends’ stamp of approval which meant they knew they had good reason to like and trust you and your black ass.

If you’re in a hugely social spot like a school where everyone knows everyone else, then approaching single girls in a sexual way is risky because it runs the risk of turning you into the guy they warn their friends about.

But!

If you create a social circle of pretty girls (who in turn know other pretty girls) then you’ll get access to their friends vis recommendations and won’t have to do nearly as much work to get with those friends as you would with strangers. So here’s what you’re going to do:

**Approach girls but just be a cool guy with no sexual agenda**

Have fun and get to know them.

Chat to them whenever you see them out and about and let a friendship build.

Don’t ask ask for their number or social media straight away, because you’re my gaming them, just being a cool guy. There’s no rush. Get to know them over a period of time and grab their details when it feels more natural and organic.

Find out what they’re into and let them know about you.

Have jokes with them and send them funny memes.

Tell them something deep and true about yourself to build comfort and an emotional connection.

Give a shit about who they are as people and create genuine friendships with them.

If you do all of the above, do you know what will happen? What will happen is that you’ll be out and about one day and see your friend Sarah Brown with her hot brunette friend Jessica Samson. When you go over and say hey to Sarah Brown, she’ll then introduce you to Jessica Samson who’ll immediately be receptive to you because your already friends with her good friend Sarah Brown

You get me?

Then you can ask Sarah to put in a good word for you with Jessica and she definitely will. In fact she’ll probably send you her number shortly afterwards and tell you that Jessica’s waiting for you to get in touch.

You’ll also get messages from Sarah inviting you to parties that Jessica, Miki, Shaneese, Preeya, Carla and other friends are going to. And guess what? They’ll all be open and receptive to getting to know you you because you come preselected by Sarah, a woman they respect.

What you’re basically doing here is social circle game and if I haven’t made this clear enough then let me spell it out for you:

The goal is to have a number of females in your circle. Women who are seeds of possibility. Seeds that grow into trees of friendship from which your black ass can bear the fruits of meeting their girlfriends.

Save the sexual cold approach for strangers on the street, but use a softer approach for school, college, or work.

**I’ve co-launched a Telegram group for men who want to become amazing with women. There’s hundreds of guys supporting each other to achieve their goals and work through their sticking points. Send a message to +447875603623 if you want to join**







",seduction
"Started approaching in March...been a great journey of self-improvement, however I feel like living with my parents at 24 lowers my value immensely","Maybe it's a subconscious thing I dunno...when I was away at university (with my own place) there were times I literally matched with chicks on apps and invited them over then and there. Being back here (Toronto) its very hard when you don't have a place of your own to bring women back to. You kinda have to just hope they are have their own residence. What's worse is that being such a wealthy city and living with your parents at 24 (despite having a full-time 9-5) it almost makes you look like a loser. Kinda hard to save when the average price of an apartment here is like $2000 a month. Any thoughts on this?
",seduction
Second date of the week debrief. I need suggestions.,"So I went on my second date of the week with this cute brunette (Tinder).  I’ve been doing good with dates lately.  This one was a little more awkward than usual.

1.) the girl kept apologizing?  For me that’s a sign of nervousness.
2.) first spot we sat at about 90° from each, awkward angle.  She kept fidgeting with the chair.  Again maybe nervousness?
3.) there were a little bit of awkward silence here and there were she was trying to ask me questions and she couldn’t come up with things to ask.
4.) she kept looking around, I asked her if she was seeing someone and was paranoid of catching her
5.) she opened a little bit more at the end, sat looking at me with her legs in between mine. Kino got more heavy at this point, so started going up and down her legs, she did the same thing getting close to my crotch.  We left second venue, I k-closed very heavy kissing.  I misread her feeling my leg and thought she was down for some action.  She wasn’t, we talked we kissed some more but I feel date ended awkward.

What are you guys take on all this?  Was it bad?  If it was bad how do I recover? When should si text again?",seduction
How do I stop myself from not smiling?,"I can keep eye contact and I'm always smiling, but it's that neutral smile. I know that I want to smile but there is some sort of mental block that keeps me from doing it. Any tips for this? ",seduction
Asked a girl out and feel freaking awesome like never before.,"Hi all,






So I'm a very needy and introverted guy who is also a 25 year old virgin. As I face a lot of customers face to face I have a lot of interactions with variety of both males and females. So today I'm with this woman and she was coming too friendly to me, complementing on some stuff so I thought something was up and immediately decided to roll with it and give it a shot because why the fuck not. So I started doing the same to her then at the end when we were walking down the hall I asked her if she wanted to go for a drink sometime to which she said yes. Then we arrived at her office where I did what I had to do and handed her my phone so she can input her number into it which she did. With a corner of my eye I have noticed that she kind of blushed. When I asked her out I thought she was 20 years old on in her late 20's.






I was so excited I couldn't wait for the end of work which by that time was 2 hours and 9 minutes. I also have decided to abandon my gym session because why not, grab and use the opportunity when it comes especially that it's was my first time successfully asking woman out in face to face opposed to online which is always easier. Mind you through out of my 25 years I have only asked a girl face to face which ended unsuccessfully.






So important time comes, we go for a drink and boii how wrong I was, she was 29 years old but looked very young as most Asians do. She also told me that I look older because for her most people in office suits and clothes look this way. To sum up our night both of us had a lovely time, awkward starring at each other with a lovely smiles; complementing each other; me being a subtly touchy and interesting topics that we have covered. It appeared that she was a female version of me like 1:1 because interests, hobbies etc were all the same and sexual chemistry was definitely there.





Then we walk out of the pub and head back, at this moment I thought ""Better ask if she wants to go out on another date"" which I was quite nervous to do but I did anyway then she said I'm all sweet and all that but she doesn't see us together because she is looking for someone older than me but she wants to be friends together to which I said ok because I'm fine with it. I also said that I look for someone older than me and if we were together it wouldn't matter to me because I'm into older women and for me it's just a number.





When we walked down the street we started to talk more openly about being attracted to each other, sex etc. She also admitted that when I asked her for a drink she didn't realized it was going to be a date, she came to realization it's going to be a date long time after she put her number in my phone and I was gone. It shows that women can be even more oblivious than us men. It's pretty funny if you ask me as well because I missed signals from various women multiple times before and I realized it only like week or month later what happened but then it was already too late. (Facepalm).





It was the best date I have ever had and because she said that she wants to meet for a drink, I got excited and more confident when dealing with women in general from today. Still tho, I won't ask someone out if I don't see that they are interested in me. This looks like at least to me that it's more effective method than online dating because when I did it, it was peace of cake. Even tho I got friendzoned I feel like a fucking bad ass and I'm over the moon because she said yes.





P.S I decided to share this with you guys because I think it's worth sharing as well as wanted to see if you had any similar experience.





TL;DR: I have successfully asked a girl out then got friendzoned and I feel like a fucking bad ass and I'm over the moon because she said yes.",seduction
So I was ghosted for the first time today,"Make way for incoming vent. 

&amp;#x200B;

Texted her to hang and she never replied. Worst part is I see her in class every week, and she still had the 'nads to ghost me. Now I'm already 20 and not very experienced with love/romance, and initially this fucking hurt cuz I thought she was sending me signals (you don't fucking smile at someone to come sit beside you if you aren't at least interested in being their friend). But you know what? I don't care why she ghosted me. It's her loss. I could ask her in class next week why she didn't respond, but you know what? I'm not gonna do that. I don't think I'll ever speak with her again. Her ghosting me says nothing about me. I've never gone to bars before, but I'm gonna start now. I'm gonna go out to bars and meet plenty of girls and try to get lucky like a college kid *should* be doing, I'm not gonna succumb to this oneitis bullcrap. There are too many women out there. And hopefully I can learn from this so that the next time I get ghosted I don't need to type up a rant on Reddit. And hopefully each time after that it hurts less and less so that eventually I won't even care. 

&amp;#x200B;

Rant over. 

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
Did i fail this shitty shit test (could i have fucked her??),"last night, approx. 10 PM

&amp;#x200B;

I'm walking down the opposite side of the street from a group of maybe 4 guys 3 girls, idk i was pretty fucking tossed so i don't remember, but i'm dressed up a little bit...not really fancy, but those white v-necks and jeans and nice shoes. body language on point, cock ass motherfucker stride, etc.

What's funny about what happened next is that immediately before it happened, i was thinking to myself ""gee those sluts look hot"" but figured they were hooked on their guys anyway...and then suddenly, ONE OF THEM runs up to me and goes ""HEY HEY YOU YOU'RE A STRANGER BUT I NEED TO TAKE A PICTURE WITH YOU AND HUG YOU""

she whips out her smartphone, i put my arm around her, cheez it up, thank u / goodnight then she runs and rejoins her herd and they go fuck and have fun or whatever

my first thought: ""fuck yea im a fucking boss she wants my cock""

my second thought: ""FUCK i'm a fucking idiot, she was obviously into me so WHY DIDNT I FUCKING SPIT SOME GAME""

my third thought: ""you didn't spit some game because you don't like yourself enough and doubt yourself, you were intimidated by the AMOGs, and you had already assumed you were going to fail""

&amp;#x200B;

having a girl do something like that....and not going anywhere with it....is basically saying ""i am a retard"" to the world. yay im a retard!

&amp;#x200B;

I'm curious to hear what you think, i think the pieces are finally starting to come together for me tbh. If girls are cold approaching me, basically, this is the second time in less than a month, then there is no fucking reason i should not cold approach them

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
Doesn't everyone have 'game',"Whenever I red someone say 'just learn game' they make it sound like juggling, but then when I ask them to clarify what sort of things that mean, it's always things that I always think any 'normal' person wouldn't need to 'learn'

I might ask them t break down an approach and They're like ''I approach with good body language. I open and say something to get a conversation started. Ask them some questions about themselves, make some statements. Then once we are talking and she seems interested, i'll start showing my intent and escalating. And then, i'll take her back too my place''

I'm like ''Errrr.....and you had to learn that? Show that paragraph to any normal functioning guy and he'll think that this is just common sense. A bit like learning how to swallow your dinner!'' lol

This feels more truer than ever since the days of learning (memorising) lines and routines and stuff have gone and now it's all about 'being your best self',  'what ayou say doesn't matter' etc.

So, i'm curious. Those of you who find yourself writing things like ''just learn game, bro!'', can you elaborate? What kinds of things do you say in interactions and do that you didn't before?  What things have you 'learnt' that your 'normie' friends don't know? What is your tangible 'edge' in terms of these things that separates you from people who haven't 'learnt game'?",seduction
Talking too much leads to friendzone?,"5 dates during the month, I was quite talkative. Trying to don't let any uncomfortable pauses. I was teasing, IODing her but it didn't create any attraction. Ended up by friendzoning. ""We understand together so good.. bla.. bla.. let's be friends."".


So my guess is that, as I talked too much, I didn't allow her to invest and created an impression that I am needy. On the other hand, Mystery's thing ""being talkative"" or all these RSD guys talk so much. So I am confused a little.",seduction
Day game wing Perth Australia,I’m looking for a local wing to do day game with I’m 18 so my mates don’t have the balls or motivation to cold approach. Message me if your looking for a wing ,seduction
Do you guys approach on girls at the gym?,"Felt conflicted to approach on a girl on the gym yesterday. I ended up not doing it even after making brief eye contact with and her flashing a smile. I try my best not to check girls out in the gym, because I don't want them to feel uncomfortable or be seen as a horny creep. 

&amp;#x200B;

Do you guys not care about where you approach women? Are their places that are off limits to you for approaching women? Do you not care about being labeled a creep in the gym and stare at girls all day? Is my insecurity showing? ",seduction
I just got hit on during a first date while my date went to the bathroom. How to respond?,"On a first date, going well, she goes to the bathroom so I’m chilling at the bar and this girl next to me starts asking if I’m there with someone, complimenting my looks, asks if I’m single. I was taken aback by it and didn’t really respond great. Do you just not give af and give her your number?",seduction
The night with the strippers,"I went to meet a friend at a strip club. We drank some liquor while watching some strippers perform. At some point, I went to take a leak and came back. I saw my friend with two strippers and he decided to get a dance with the less hotter one. 

His game was to focus on the girl he didn't want and clearly say things like I don't like you to the hot one. 

The hot stripper asked me if I wanted a dance with her. I looked at her and said  yeah whatever with a disinterested look on my face. I followed her in and prepaid 5 dances. While she was dancing on me I asked her stuff about her background and so on. Tried speaking Spanish and all. She complimented me at some point. She was slapping her ass so i spanked her ass a couple of times. First time she said you call that a spank so I gave her harder spanks every time. At the end, I gave her money with a tip and left. 

Me and my friend discussed near the private booths and when they came out he asked how they'd go home. He offered a ride but he lived at the opposite of their place and then the hot one asked where I lived. Since it was closer she told her friend we're going with him (me).

After they changed we went to my car. I asked the girls if they wanted to party. ( Knowing that my apartment is not furnished didn't moved in yet.) The hot asked me if they could go eat but when we got there McDonalds was closed. My friend wanted the other girl in his car but the hot didn't her friend to leave and said that he should join us. He proposed to 2 ideas: Eat at banquise (a restaurant) and go to an after-hours nightclub. I shutdown both ideas. First i hate banquise food it's too heavy and was too eager to bring them home. 

Looking back the after hours seemed like a good idea but the strippers were dressed in a stay home way with flipflops. No way they would have got in anyways.

 As I was driving to my place with girls they were drinking my vodka. I was focused on driving but was trying to keep a conversation with the hot girl sitting next to me. As we approach her exit on the highway she said that they needed to drop their bags before going to my place. So they asked me to drop them at a corner near their place and said that she'd be back.

Then my noob ass got lectured by my friend. Explaining me how i fucked up and that those girls were not coming back. I waited 15 minutes and we left.

Note: I never tried to pickup strippers so for me I don't know what's sincere and what isn't. The girl got her ride back. The next day we saw them downtown at the closing hours of a night club. I was about to get out of the car because I wanted to know how they'd reacted and also if they came back or not. But my friend was like don't. Assess the situation first. Then there was a group of guys taking to the girls. He told me to Remember thag those girls are strippers and that guy she's talking to could be her man/pimp and he has his crew with him. He told me I had an opportunity the day before and I blew it. It left me salty because I don't handle failure properly but he didn't mind. Even tho it go our way, he said he had fun and that we hanged with strippers. Most dude pays for that.

I guess I will never know who ghost who for real.",seduction
I feel really bad about not paying!,"So it wasn't really a date or anything, but more of a get together at an event.  Long story short, I didn't know about what really to expect and one of the girls bought a bottle of wine and we shared it and I feel really bad about not giving her any money or anything for it.  

&amp;#x200B;

We had a good time and she is really nice, but I feel awful about it now that we are home and I'm thinking about it.  It was our first time hanging out and I don't want her to think I'm a freeloader or something

&amp;#x200B;

I don't even have her number.  I'm thinking of getting it off one of my friends and telling her thanks for everything and telling her I want to give her some money or is that too needy?  What should I do? It's driving me crazy even though it was like $15-20",seduction
Any way to recover from a long text?,"I sent a long text, nothing weird and I know usually not the best idea. Essentially ranting about some old men at my gym that went on about some ignorant stuff and how I was really upset because I couldn't say anything while on my shift. It's only been like 45 mins, if I don't get a response tonight I'll shoot a text about our meet up tomorrow night, around noon.


Little perturbed about myself right now because we were joking around quite a bit before hand and she was responding really quickly to my texts.


In hindsight I fucked up quite a bit. Not only did I send the text but then sent the ""I'm sorry for the rant"" text. sucks but I'll get over it if she doesn't respond. Learning experience at worst, recoverable at best.


My question is could I say for instance throwback to an earlier text/convo and move things from there? Or try and re-orientate the convo to address my last text?",seduction
Lowering your baseline anxiety the easy way. How conquering that low level feeling of dread will improve every part of your life. Models series mini [FR],"*This is part of a series I'm doing on how the principles of* [Models](https://www.goodreads.com/book/show/12633800-models) *apply in situations I've found myself in since reading it in 2015.*

TLDR; **Sleep** enough, **eat** **well**, **exercise**, and **don't avoid** your problems. This will lower you anxiety.

I wanted to make a quick shoutout to all my boys out there who have a bit of anxiety. It's a consequence of the [ego](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=eMTE1yUKf_E) and was probably necessary to keep us alive as proto-humans. A lot of the 'technical difficulties' I see guys posting about here are a consequence of their high anxiety states. If you extinguish your anxiety, you don't need many 'skills' to attract women. You'll just have it.

Here's a quick list of things I do to minimise my anxiety.

1. **Sleep** enough. Get those 8 hours. The easiest way is to say to yourself: ""**No screens** after 10:30"". I just put on some Joe Rogan audio. That puts me asleep by 11 and awake at 7. Sleeping [boosts testosterone](https://examine.com/nutrition/how-important-is-sleep/). Take **melatonin** and **valerian** to boost sleep quality
2. **Eat well**. Get your proteins. Minimise crap carbs. Don't let your weight get out of control - that'll eat away at *you*! Go keto if you want. Some people will get anxiety if they don't drink enough water. Is that you?
3. Try these **supplements**: [rhodiola](https://examine.com/supplements/rhodiola-rosea/), [theanine](https://examine.com/supplements/theanine/), [st john's wort](https://examine.com/supplements/hypericum-perforatum/), [Vit D.](https://examine.com/supplements/vitamin-d/) You WILL feel the difference.
4. **Exercise**: **jogging** as best for mental health but **bulking** up will give you social confidence too. I also believe that by working *every part of the body* you are actually performing a kind of [vipassana](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=WNmxxbqJMxI) meditation.
5. [**Breath properly**](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ldNnKVGxabA). Every breath is an opportunity to stretch (release those endorphins) and release tension. Nirvana: [blowing out](https://www.etymonline.com/word/nirvana). Look at you, learning how to breathe.
6. [**Don't avoid things**](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=M8GSf5cYCvE) that scare you. The more you expose yourself to things that scare you, the faster your fear response will be extinguished.

Most people will be **able to do the first five**. It's number 6 that separates the Don Juans from the pack. Because it **works** but it **doesn't work forever** unless you **keep working at it.** Look at what happens to [RSD Tyler after a month](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=S1Ed1RZcIKo) of **no exposure**. This is a man who *had* **completely extinguished** his approach anxiety, but allowed it to come back by **slacking off.**

Just like the first five, number six is a *lifestyle.*

Conclusion: So next time you feel **anxiety about approaching**, recognise if there is a **strong element of background anxiety** which is fueling it. Are you **doing all you can to address that first?**

Sources:

[https://www.goodreads.com/book/show/46674.Feeling\_Good](https://www.goodreads.com/book/show/46674.Feeling_Good)

[https://www.reddit.com/r/Nootropics/wiki/beginners](https://www.reddit.com/r/Nootropics/wiki/beginners)

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

BONUS FR:

In 2015 I was at a local bar after reading [Models](https://www.goodreads.com/book/show/12633800-models) a week before. I saw a girl I liked the look of and was determined to approach. I **did not give myself time** to get nervous. I gave her the classic opener.

Me: ""Hey I thought you were cute. Want to get a drink?""

She scowled at me and her friend grabbed her arm and steered her away. I felt...nothing. Because that's exactly what Mark said would happen. Because I **didn't give myself time** to get invested in the outcome. Because I'd been **working out** all week, **sleeping** enough, **eating right** and I had **low baseline anxiety**.

Literally two minutes later I found a new girl on the dance floor and hit her with the same line

Me: ""Hey I thought you were cute. Want to get a drink?""

Her: ""Sure. Ok.""

We ended up chatting about her trip to Egypt for a while. After 45 minutes chatting I said.

""Well I **don't want to bore** you. I'll catch you later on"".

Went back to dancing and **having fun with my friends** and an hour later found her again. **Pushed her hips** back up against a speaker and said

Me: ""Want to go back to my place?""

Her: ""Sure!""

I danced to Elvis in my room and was so nervous about having my first one night stand I [couldn't keep it up](https://imgur.com/a/kBPZOr5). But we ended up having sex a little later. I'm eternally grateful that my **low baseline anxiety that night** meant that I didn't quit after the first rejection because that might have ended my Don Juan journey at its inception! And the same thing might happen to you.",seduction
Social proof vs good fundamentals," Which one do you guys think is more important?

To be more specific, regardless of the situation you find yourself in, aka having a shot at a girl or trying to get a second chance with a girl, which one do you think serves you best: her seeing you with other women vs having good fundamentals?",seduction
seddit's r/100sets is a total failure,"From just a quick look it seems like 80% aren't making it past set 20. And from the 3 guys I looked at that got past set 50, none were number closing at all (and they all quit before set 100).

These are guys posting, which means there numbers are probably going to be better than the general population.

I'm not sure what's going on. Maybe we need to stop telling young men to approach during the day, if the success rates are so low. Like I bet it's around 5%.

Instead of doing 1000 approaches, go start a band. Go to a meetup. There are way better ways.",seduction
Zero clue what I’m doing wrong,"Hey
I’ve been on tinder for about 2.5 months now and I’ve had around 350 matches so far and 70% of them I have talked to (the other 30% are either not attractive at all or in different countries). 

I would say I’m average at keeping decent conversation based on my interactions in real life with friends, people I vaguely know, randoms etc but I have never met one of the hundreds of girls I have matched with. Literally every single one ends with them losing interest and ghosting me. I’m definitely not spamming at all, just keeping the convo going. I’ve had a couple that I get kind of close to meeting but it ends with them ghosting me or we stop talking some other way like being rejected when asking them out for instance. I’m sure I’m approaching this wrong since from my understanding other guys have way better results at least in meeting them let alone anything else. 

I’m 18 so it could be that people my age take tinder less seriously or are less willing to meet but you would still think that after this time I would get some results lol. 

Any suggestions or advice? Thanks  ",seduction
"Is it foolish to save your first ""love"" for someone that means something to you?","Here's a backstory of me. I am 21, turning 22 by December. I already have an AS in Software Development, going back to school to transfer to San Diego State and get my BS in Computer Science. I have two jobs, one a part-time food server and another as a Programming Intern. Sounds like my life is going good right? Wrong....My friends like to say that I am happy with my life when in reality I am depressed and loney as shit. I've never ever had a girlfriend in my life, and I'm at the time in my life where having a close companion would greatly help with my severe depression and loneliness. I guess the reason why I never had a girlfriend is cause I deeply believe in true love. My friends always like to tease me on why I never just get a girlfriend by now...They always try to hook me up with these stuck-up girls that just want a quick fuck or a fuck-buddy for a few months and then just forget about me....and for the girls that I DO have feelings for, they either reject me or have some feelings for me but never want a relationship cause they still have feelings for their Ex. I dont want a quick fuck or a friend with benefits. I wanted an actual relationship with a girl that could grow into something more.

I keep on telling my friends that I want my first love to actually mean something. That should we break up eventually, I could still look back fondly that at least the love was true and perhaps tell my kids that there is such as true love, even for the briefest of moments. My friends always pester me to just lose my virginity and that there is no such thing as your first love. The latest girl I'm meeting....she was everything I ever wanted from a girl and I would have done anything for her if she just given me a chance. Alas, she too just recently had her first love and she simply cannot leave those feelings behind for me, no matter how much I told her I would be anything she wanted me to be. Now, though we are good friends, she just became another reminder of my awful love life.

I'll be honest. At this point in my life, I'm starting to cave in. I feel like a loveless loser because I'm the only person in my group of friends to yet even KISS A GIRL! Its hard to walk around campus and see couples holding hands or kissing each other in the cheek. It just reminds me of my lonely situation and I'll be honest in saying that I've contemplated taking up my friends offer and just mess with one of his home-girls. Honestly, if I do go through with it, I would probably not feel any better about my situation.... Do you guys think Im foolish to believe in first love? I'm starting to think so myself....

Here's a [picture](https://vignette.wikia.nocookie.net/warhammerfb/images/d/d0/1252512511.PNG/revision/latest?cb=20181001021806) of me if you guys need a perspective. I'm the guy on the left with the strip shirt.

&amp;#x200B;

TL;DR: I never had a girlfriend because I wanted my first love to mean more than just a quick fuck. Had many opportunities but none ever worked out. Friends offer to help me lose my virginity but I so far rejected it. Lonely as crap right now and thinking of taking up the offer. Am I foolish for believing in true love?

&amp;#x200B;

EDIT: Thanks guys. This actually means alot to me. I'll be honest in saying that I pretty much already knew the answer to my question even before I wrote this but I guess I just needed another group of people to tell me the things that needed to be said. Fortunately, your insights gave me the incentive to go with the friends tommorow to hangout with some new people at this party/hangout they are hosting. Hopefully with a new open-mind I can find a nice girl to talk to. Now I just wished there was an easier way to detach my feelings from the previous girl......if only it were so easy to move on from another one of my failure...",seduction
The 100 Approach Challenge,"So. 

You suffer from crippling anxiety.

You're on this sub asking questions about elusive advanced techniques, and yet you haven't even worked up the strength to do step one.


I know crippling. 

How about puking all over your classroom floor because you were too nervous to get up and walk out in front of everyone?

How about replying with an unintelligible noise when asked for your date of birth?

How about sitting like a statue, avoiding eye comtact, and saying nothing even while your crush essentially threw herself at you?

Has your brain ever just seized up on you out of pure terror? 

So you're socially awkward.

Well.


That's okay. There's a way around that. There's a way out of your crippling anxiety and your fumbling of words. This way is nothing more than practice.

With practice comes experience.

With experience comes skill.

With skill comes confidence.

And confidence alongside time produces *mastery.*

So recently, I charged myself with a goal.


I would approach one hundred girls, and by the one hundred first, my fear would no longer exist. I would not try to get dates, numbers, anything. I would have no intent to get something out of it.

This is NOT the ""100 Sets"" thing where guys go out and try to get 100 different dates. This is entirely different as it's goal is to remove the fear of approaching and literally *nothing* more.

Completely disconnected from the outcome, I would approach.


The first one took every goddamn ounce of willpower I possessed in the recesses of my soul. I have done *few* things in my life that have proven more difficult than that.

The first two were awkward, fumbling messes, but I noticed that the girls were not repulsed, but actually rather *happy* that I had decided to chat with them.

The third approach was a double approach. They were talking about bands I liked, so it was easy.

By the fourth approach I realized that, instead of a premeditated act of sheer willpower, I had done it nonchalantly, simply because I *wanted* to, nothing more.


After a while, you'll begin to subconsciously learn things about conversation. You'll learn that she's likely more nervous than you. You'll learn that girls like to chat. You'll learn that silences in the conversation are okay and don't always need to be filled. You'll learn that people talk too so you actually don't have to be ready with an infinite repertoire of convo topics. You'll stop caring about the outcome. You'll learn to enjoy the moments and not become attached to them. You'll free yourself from the trap of your own head.


But you *have* to. There is no shortcut. There is no magic pill, no holy mantra. The first few will be some of the hardest fucking things you've ever done in your entire life, but it *will* get easier.


You have to get off your ass, shut off the motivational videos and the RSD infeilds. You *have* to get up and do something. If you don't you'll always be a failure, now and forevermore.


Be the five percent that actually does something, and when you're living your best life drowning in pussy, no need to thank me.",seduction
Was she just a 'no girl' or was it 'bad game'?,"When you keep getting rejected, do you tend to think: 

'Them girls just weren't into me. Nothing I could have said or done would have changed it. They were, as Mark Manson says 'no girls' . On to the next!''.

Or do you think that it was some mistake with your 'game', because, with 'perfect game', you should be getting basically every girl you approach (as mystery alluded too in his '5 for 5' rule)

I tend to think that they are just 'no girls' although i'm always looking to learn. 

I find most of the time if I approach some hot girl in a bar, whether I open indirect or direct, the result is often a fast rejection along the lines of 'sorry, you're not my type. Have a good night'', or sometimes they will literally just turn their head or/and walk away.

As I say, even very indirect opens can get this reaction, ,especially from young girls in bars, because they just assume (know! lol) that you are hitting on them. That's like the only reason guys approach random girls in bars (here at least)

So I might make a comment on her item of clothing or about her expression, or about something going on in the environment or whatever, and she'll still maybe tell me i'm not her type. I might make a joke about her being 'persumptuous' and she'll STILL fail to 'hook' at all and might just walk away or turn her head away from me for example. Then i'm not sure what to do lol

I try all kinds of 'methods' to 'turn' these girls, but never anything even resembling 'success'.

I can, however, pull girls who are 'into me' the second I say 'hi', or who give me IOI's before opening them (this also kind of confirms that, in the case of rejections, i'm not doing anything 'weird' or whatever. I don't have a bad 'vibe', because, if I did, even the 'yes girls' would turn be down before sex, and they don't!)

So yeah, give me your thoughts - and if you are in the camp that believes that game is everything and your looks don't matter etc, i'd be open to  hearing what lines I should be using to ''turn' girls who just walk away from me after I open, or who tell me i'm not their type etc. (Usually it might be ''sorry, you're too short'' or last night for example, the girls FRIEND said to her ''Stacey, there's gonna be much better looking people than him out tonight! Let's move on!!!'' after I opened her and she talked back briefly.) I use the 'agree and amplify' when short is brought up, and try to be playful or use all kinds of 'game theory' but without 'physical attraction' on her part, i'm struggling bad! 

Last year got 6 lays from maybe 500 approaches, and this year 1 lay from maybe 700 approaches.

edit: Also just remembered quite a funny one from last night (funny because she was both rude and sweet in a way). I was like ''Hey, how's your night going?'' and she said ''Sorry, your not my type. I'm trying to get the attention of the hot barguy because I want his number. Thanks for trying, though. And honestly , have a really good night!'' all with kind body language and a genuine smile with a sweet, authentic voice lol. Like she was unaware that this was kind of painful to shoot me down like that lol

",seduction
Approach motivation help,"How can you find the motivation to approach more? For context, I haven't approached in a few weeks with school being back and all. Unlike when I saw a pretty/attractive girl outside that made eye contact/I wanted to approach, I did, now I rarely do in passing unless she makes eye contact. Most of my approaches the last month have been when the girl was sitting/lounging. I wonder if I've lost that desire since I've been using tinder more since then (with some success) compared to the summer when I had less success on the app. Thus pushing me to approach more. With the winter months coming, is it normal to have the desire to approach go down?

Anyone else have this issue?",seduction
I am doing 10 approaches a day challenge,"Hi next week I am starting my university(it's not exactly a university)
And I was thinking about approaching 10 women a day for practice
Do you have any tips on approaching and just making better conversion?

Do you want me to write a report for every day?

Btw I live in Greece if anyone is from there ",seduction
One Date - Chase Amante Review,"So I signed up for the One Date system a while ago, here is my review for anyone thinking of getting it.

&amp;#x200B;

'''Overall''' - Overpriced and promises too much, but the material is solid, it's just that you need more instruction than just being given an outline of the method. It also assumes that you have already conquered AA.

&amp;#x200B;

'''Promises too much''' - There is an intro sales pitch video which you have to watch before you are allowed to enter your email to get the link to buy the package (unless you can find a direct link). Your best off to put this tab on mute and go do something else while it plays (it's about an hour long) cause Chase will promise you that all you need to do is buy this system and all your problems will be gone in seconds. This is BS. When you actually get to the system, the first video is about Fundamentals (how you look, dress, carry yourself, etc), this is a huge part of being able to attract women and Chase doesn't mention it on the sales pitch video.

&amp;#x200B;

'''Overpriced for what it is''' - Before you buy, there is a list of what the material 'should' cost which Chase puts at over $2000 which is idiotic. Most of the material is repacked from his older book 'Make Women Chase' or whatever it was called and a bunch of the 'extra' material is stuff that's already online for free on his blog. After all that, the actual material costs $67 (it is currently 'on sale', if it ever goes up to it's 'regular' price it would be $87), for material that could've been put into a book for a lot less than that. You get 8 video lessons of Chase talking to his student Hector explaining each section. The material is good but these types of things usually cost a lot less, Chase increased the production a tiny bit in order to charge a huge amount of money. The sound and video quality is mediocre at best, Chase has a droning voice, the interview style is awkward, there's no change in the setting and in the first video, there's a girl there who does nothing at all, occasionally they ask her a question and she just gives one word answers. Then there is an ebook called the 'primer' which gives basically the same content in ebook form. For me the videos are a bit better but it still shows the form the material could've taken.

&amp;#x200B;

'''Attempts to scam you with unwanted material''' - A few days after buying the One Date course, you realise you were also signed up, unvoluntarily to an idiotically priced subscription service which will cost $1000 by the end. I didn't read in detail what it offered but it seemed like more specific situations like how to get college girls, etc. You have to email the company to get out of this BS and one person left a message on the forum saying he didn't get a response. This is dishonest business, so make sure you're aware of this scamming attempt before you buy.

&amp;#x200B;

'''Solid Material''' - Despite all that, the material is actually solid. I've used it and it's increased my success rate with women, though I haven't actually got a lay out of it, I was close on one occasion and my dates seem to go better and girls say yes to invites more. I also feel like I understand what's happening now with girls, why they do certain things, when I should attempt a kiss, how they're feeling at a given moment. I haven't fully incorporated everything so I'm hoping that I will have more success in future. I also have a proper structure, I used to use Mystery Method and it was just so vague or it didn't turn out the way they said when I was actually on dates , I was often left floundering not knowing what to do next, but this method gives a proper structure for what to do when.

&amp;#x200B;

'''Assumes you've conquered AA''' - The material starts (after Fundamentals) with what to do when you're talking to a girl, so if you're not able to talk to a girl, then you're shit out of luck. This material is not for you, at least not yet, no matter how much Chase promises in his sales pitch video that you'll be able to do these things 'quickly and naturally'.

&amp;#x200B;

'''Not enough guidance''' - This is not something that was promised before buying the material, but to really grasp everything, I think it would be very helpful to have some further guidance after purchase. There is a forum where you can post questions, FRs, etc, but there is no one there and the staff stopped replying long ago. As it is, you just have to keep practising and using the material when you're out and hope you figure it out in field.

&amp;#x200B;

Overall it's hard to say if it was worth it, I think it's not suitable for a lot of people (those with AA or those who aren't able to implement written material in practice), but if all you need is a clear structure for how to interact with women, then I'd say it's worth the price, if you can't find that elsewhere.",seduction
How can you tell the difference between these two things?,"How do you know whether you're seeking validation OR you're merely trying to express yourself and connect with someone?  In my previous relationships I used talk a lot about the things I found interesting, even half-baked ideas about stuff.  Was that me seeking approval or was I just showing off?  On the surface the two things seem pretty similar.
",seduction
How do one handle panic attacks when having 'Man to women' interactions? Also I've never been on a date before.,"Background- I used to be pretty anxious around women before, (I'm 26M, with no physical experience with women. Never been on a date.) 

Have been working on myself since last year &amp; I'm seeing progress as well. 

Presently - I can easily talk to random people(mostly guys) and I feel quite confident and appealing (seeing their reaction) while taking to them. I feel they get impressed. 

When I'm not doing anything(as I'm a student), I usually spend time at home with family(i.e. less interaction with outsiders), and when I'm out(which is once in fortnight) I'm all over everyone, talking to everybody, making connections. Not sure if I'm a extrovert or introvert but I truly like meeting new people.

Problem - Say while talking to a girl, when I'm having 'man to women' interaction, I freak out and start feeling nausea. I don't feel like eating in front of them(which makes me about going out on dates).  Don't even feel like having a meal in advance if I ever plan to meet someone. Due to this all I'm doing is maintaining my relationships with all those potential girls just virtually(texts and calls). I'd give 'em all the excuses not to meet so that I'm not in that position to feel that unpleasantness. 

I feel as if I'm trying to save the 'image' of being awesome and confident and charismatic that I think I've made over them by being behind the curtains. I do wanna go meet them, get involved and experience all those great or shitty things in life but this feeling of having nausea is stopping me to meet them.

P.S. - I've been matched with a lot of women over online dating sites over a time but because of this I've never gone out on a date. I do talk to a few of them over calls, but never met them personally. 

If anyone knows what I should be doing, how I should be handing this then please direct me. ",seduction
Fucked up night game.,"Hi, I feel like i really need help. Just went home from a student fest party, I am student too (22 yo) and i wasn't able to game anything. There was a lot of girls at my age, i approached like 3 sets but after opener they were like ""i/we need to find my frinds"" or whatever and left or ignore me, not in angry way. I know it's low number but then my head was overwhelmed by whining what I  did wrong and I couldn't do more approaches. My friend also came with 2 hot frends girls so i thought my value is higher than avarage but without change. I study game time to time like 3 mounts, sometimes i approach on streats, just small talk and its okay. But today i was desparet! I felt more and more depresion of how bad i am that cant get some girls, even more when i knew i should because i know the game. I saw there all theese girls and couldn't do anything, even thought i came to that party in good mood prepared for the game. I tried position changes, getting some drinks, bying funny, leading group from place to place and so on but without effent on my value i think. At the end there were some easy target (probably drunk)but still atractive girls and i didnt know if i want them or not and before i decided what i want they were all taken, making out with random guys and enjoying it. About me: Iam 22 yo male student, little bit self conscious about my heigth because Iam only 168 cm / 5.51 feet high, but Iam ok with that. Can you tell me something to this pls i am now really really despared.

PS: sry for english Iam from Czech Republic and it's also 4 am.",seduction
Tremors,"I get slight tremors from within, like slight head shivers when talking to girls. Its probably nervousness or getting overwhelmed. Anything that i can do to change that ?",seduction
3 Triggers That Will Attract Hot Women,,seduction
"22M, living with parents, help me","Saving all of my money to go traveling for a few years after I graduate college, so I am living with my parents so I don't have to pay rent. 

This raises difficulties when it comes to dating. I feel like it turns some girls off, but this is the least of my problems.

I feel restricted and embarrassed. Like I've never been super social so it would be unusual for me to come home really late and to stay the night over with someone would be unheard of. I feel like as soon as I lose my virginity my parents will know, or if I go on a date with a girl they will tease me and when I get home ask all sorts of questions.

This seems to be holding me back from taking action, I've heard it called ""fear of success"". Like if I ask out a girl and she says yes, I'm more bothered by how my parents would react to me seeing her a lot or whatever.

Note, my parents have been extremely restrictive growing up, they wouldn't even let me go riding my bike with friends when I was 13. I have a lot of resentment towards them I feel like most of my problems stem from them. (Which is why I want to get the fuck away as soon as I graduate). But I still have like 8 months of living with them left. How do I date, have sex, and see girls while feeling shame and uncomfortable about it at home?

Also the logistical problem - there is no fucking way I can ever have a girl over to hangout or have a one night stand or anything. I cannot be myself or act normal when my parents are around. The house is also small, we won't have much privacy.

Any thoughts?",seduction
Same Day Lay of the Year - Full Infield Street to Bedroom (90min),,seduction
The average guy and the player have different problems,,seduction
This is the best time to approach a girl,"That title get your attention? Good because it’s not just clickbait, there’s real substance behind it. Guys always wonder when’s the best time to approach a girl and the truth is that ANY time is a great time to approach her. You see the girl, you like the look of her, you walk over, and you say hi. It’s really that simple.

But having said that; there’s one moment when you absolutely have to say hello and I’m gonna tell you exactly what it is. You ready, mofo? Here goes.

**When a girl smiles at you, you absolutely have to approach her**

I swear to God this is a fact and I know you might think it’s bullshit so I’ll explain why. It’s because:

**Women are usually cautious and mistrusting of men they don’t know. They tend not to smile at strange guys because of this so if one smiles at you then it’s a massive sign that she’d be happy to talk**

It’s true. The fact is that most women who don’t know you are kind of intimidated by you. And if you don’t believe me, ask yourself this question. How often do strange women flash smiles at you? How often do you look into the eyes of some random girl and see her beaming a smile in your direction? 

Rarely happens, right? And when it does, it’s usually by *hired guns* who are working and therefore being paid to be nice to you?

Am I right I’m guessing that having women smile in your direction happened a lot when you were a little boy and then dried up in your teens?  Well if you’re like the majority of us who can relate to that then there’s a reason for it and it’s because:

**When a woman looks at a grown man, a number of scary things run through her head**

*‘Maybe he’s a rapist?’*

*‘Maybe he’s a stalker?’* 

*‘Maybe he’s weird?’*

 *‘Maybe he’s really, really fucking boring and not worth talking to?’* 


These are the sorts of thoughts they have when they make eye contact with men they don’t know.

**Another thing you need to consider is that women rank their safety and security as being of paramount importance.** 

They’re just not as likely as guys to take risks where that’s concerned and this is why they tend to avoid things like walking home alone at night.

Guys do that without a second thought but for girls, it’s a real concern.

The point I’m getting at is that even though you’re only scared of approaching girls because of how they might reject you, they’re actually scared of what you might physically do to them.

It’s a proven fact that people are more motivated by moving away from the things they fear than they are by moving towards the things they want. Coincidentally this is why you hesitate to approach girls even though you know that any one of them could be your next fuck buddy, girlfriend or wife. The fear of the rejection often outweighs the anticipation of what would happen if she likes you. Well they’re just as scared as you, if not more so, but for different reasons.

The point I’m making behind all of this is that if a woman actually looks at you and smiles then it’s a ridiculously good sign. It doesn’t necessarily mean that she’s attracted to you, because it’s totally possible that she just thinks you look like a nice guy; but it definitely is one of the two. 

It goes a little something like this:

**If she smiles at you, she either thinks you’re attractive or a nice guy**

**If she smiles at you, she definitely thinks you seem trustworthy**

**If she smiles at you, she definitely doesn’t think you seem weird or creepy**

Now like I said before, this doesn’t mean she’s necessarily attracted to you, but there’s a damn good chance that she is. 
At the very least she thinks you look like a nice guy and I promise you, in either of those situations she’ll be more than happy to talk to you.

Also; assuming that she just thinks you look like a nice guy, there’s still every chance that she could become attracted to you during your conversation. That’s a very real possibility, but in any event, like I just said, she’ll definitely be happy to talk to you. And you know what? If she’s not attracted to you then you can make her a friend and turn her into a wingwoman who’ll help you meet new girls.

Now don’t take this to mean that if a woman either doesn’t see you or doesn’t smile at you then you shouldn’t walk over because you definitely should. Even if she’s seen you and thinks you’re smoking hot she still might be too nervous to crack a smile in your direction so you can’t use that as a barometer for whether or not you’re going to approach her.

It’s just a simple fact that girls who smile at you are waaaay less likely to reject you than those who haven’t!

Ciao, bitches.


**I’ve co-launched a Telegram group for men who want to become amazing with women. There’s hundreds of guys supporting each other to achieve their goals and work through their sticking points. Send a message to +447875603623 if you want to join**",seduction
Broke up with GF of 5 years. Need a nudge in the right direction,"Hey Seddit, I was hoping I could get some advice. Me (26m) and my GF of five years broke up this last weekend and I'm hoping to get back into game. Thankfully I stayed in good physical shape and have decent people skills, so it won't be a tough transition trying to get my love life going again. I was wondering if there is any good products that teach how to cold approach? I know the advice on this sub is frequently ""experience beats theory"" and I'd agree, but I think it'd be helpful for me to have a resource to give me a framework. RSD Pimp looked cool, but if anyone has something else they'd recommend I'd love to hear it",seduction
Improve your social skills before cold approaching,"I'm sure this will get downvoted to hell, but it needs to be said.

I would say, maybe 30% of the girls I've slept with were from cold approaching. 

Then, maybe 50% from social game and the remaining 20% online dating. 

Cold approaching is the hardest part of the game. But, for some reason guys want to start with cold approaches. Here's what I did.

I developed my social skills first. Meeting new people, conversation skills, getting contact information, rinse and repeat. 

You have very little chance of success with cold approaches if you have sub par social skills. 

Also, the good thing about social game is it builds as you continue. You meet people with mutual friends, get invited to activities where you can get introduced to a girl by a mutual friend. Now, you're not starting from square one because you were ""recommended"" by a friend.

After some success with social game, I moved to cold approaching. The good thing about having good social skills is, cold approaching doesn't feel like approaching. Just feels like socializing. 

If you have just decent social skills, then by all means approach that cute girl passing by you. 

If you've been a hermit for the past year or your whole life, develop your social skills first. It'll make you more successful and comfortable at cold approaching. Comfort equals confidence. 

Edit: [Check out my post for more tips](https://thehimalayaplaya.com/tons-cold-approaches-hurt-game/)",seduction
It's scaring me (28m) that literally nothing works,"Never had a date and only asked out girls who were interested in me often because a mutual friend tells me they were interested and I promptly prove them wrong. Or if they show interest, I know interest when I see it. Or maybe not who the hell knows anymore.

  


I make this thread because a mutual friend told me that this girl was into me and I didn't believe him until she made a move at a group meeting when she sat next to me. So I prove him wrong the week after. Asked her out, she's gotta family event so she can't go and said enjoy your Thanksgiving weekend.

  


I do other things with my time, but this is probably the one thing I'll never understand well, I can keep distracting myself with other hobbies but this will remain the because so far it has.. I'm getting older and it's just been stagnant, I can pick up a new language, a new profession because I study study study. But this I ask girls out that show interest... And then nothing? I used to be angry, depressed, now I'm just numb. Even as she felt me up under the table I was thinking, yeah I've been here before. I don't feel entitled, angry, just that it will never be for me because for me, it never has.

I just told my friend yeah you really think she likes me? That's nothing watch what happens in 3....2.... When I ask her out and get a not yes answer and i sheepishly say awww no worries rinse and repeat. If it took me this long to pick up snowboarding I would have sold my gear. I am numb, but I'm also terrified that while I'm fun to play with, to look at, and to flirt with. No woman think it's worth going on a coffee date with me, the fuck kind of sick paradox is this? I'm getting older and this same exact pattern has been happening since I was 19.

  


I don't know who else has this problem or what they've done. She was a 6/10. Very socially awkward. So to get rejected by her caliber... I don't know I'm at a loss. Id rather be ugly and have an excuse. I don't.",seduction
8 Unique Attitude Shifts To Help DESTROY Your Approach Anxiety,"Everyone knows that approach anxiety is completely illogical.

Yet, we all feel it at least a little bit when that hottie walks past.

The difference is that some of us **FEEL THE FEAR AND DO IT ANYWAY.** You'll numb the fear, the more you approach.

Here are eight attitude shifts that pretty much completely stopped me pussying out when I spot a beautiful woman.

# 1. I'd be a great boyfriend

As part of our confidence-coaching company, we encourage students to write down a list of 50 things they love about themelves. This is essentially 50 reasons why she'd love to you to approach her. Are you doing to deny her that??

Even if she doesn't want a boyfriend, she'll appreciate the compliment if it's coming from a good place.

# 2. You have £10,000 in your pocket

If you approached a woman and offered her a £10,000 cheque, would you feel bad if she rejected it? Or would you feel sorry for her?

Well, a loving boyfriend over many years if probably worth more than £10,000 to most women...

Many of these women that instantly blow you out would also reject the £10,000 cheque by the way. There are plenty of people who have a bad attitude and aren't ready to accept awesomeness into their life. That's not your problem.

# 3. What's the best that can happen??

So many guys are obsessed with the worst possible that can happen when they approach a woman (which realistically isn't even that bad anyway).

Switch it around and picture the best thing that can happen. This woman could become your next girlfriend that shares years of happiness with you... Or it could be just another woman...

It costs nothing to find out.

# 4. It's a man's job to make it happen

As a man, it's YOUR JOB to approach hot women.

Women don't want to approach dudes. Many are frustrated that the right guys aren't approaching them.

She's done her job of looking fantastic. Go do yours! It's almost rude not to...

# 5. She's not rejecting you, she's rejecting your approach

In a cold-approach situation, this woman doesn't know YOU. She only knows what you presented to her in the few minutes you've known her.

[See game as a skill](https://www.reddit.com/r/seduction/comments/9gkb34/game_is_100_skill_follow_these_four_steps_and_you/) that you can improve at. See it as a game!

The same way most people aren't afraid of hitting a golf ball wrong, you shouldn't be afraid of approaching a woman.

The reason you are is because you're tying your identity to the success. You're putting your identity in the hands of a COMPLETE stranger. Stop that now!

# 6. I'm not special (in a stranger's eyes)

There's no nice way to say this. No-one really gives a fuck about you!

Yell out loud in a crowded street to see for yourself. People will look for a couple of seconds then go back to thinking about their own lives.

NO-ONE CARES when you approach a hot woman (or at least no-one will say anything).

The same way you probably don't remember what the last homeless person that asked for change looks like, most hot girls don't think about the approach you made for more than a few minutes (if it was bad).

There really is nothing to lose by trying.

# 7. The symptoms of anxiety and excitement are the same!

Increased heart-rate, muscles tensing, projecting it going badly.

You only do this in moments that matter...

So reframe your nervous as excitement, and make that moment count!

# 8. It feels better than not doing it

In my own experience of running daygame for almost five years, I have never regretted doing an approach.

Having the balls to go for it feels so much better than pussying out.

All of our confidence coaching clients say the same. See for yourself!!!

***I recently launched a Telegram for guys who want to become amazing with women. Here, we report on our exploits in the field and get feedback from like-minded people. Drop me a PM with your Telegram handle if you want to join.***",seduction
17 Modes of Bragging — How to Communicate Status Without Alienating,,seduction
Consecutively flirting with different women in a row. Good idea or bad idea?,"Some people have told me that the best way a guy can get over the fear of rejection and improve his chances of getting dates with women, is to keep flirting with different women consecutively in a row....until they meet someone that likes them back. They've said that they should treat rejection like its no biggie, and just keep moving on to the next girl.

Example: If you're at a dance club, then go up and talk to some woman. If she rejects you, then simply move on and talk to some other woman over there. And keep doing this until you find one that flirts back with you and likes you. 

From a third person perspective...doesn't this seem a little humiliating? What if someone at that club was watching you the entire night hopping from one woman to the other with no success and having a good old laugh in the background with his/her friends?

I recently saw some famous social media post of some girl who was posing with a short guy at a club and in that post all of that girl's friends were making fun of how that guy was individually trying to pick up all of them but failing. I don't want to post the link here, but if you go on Google images and type - manlet btfo cringe anarchy, you'll see the post that I'm talking about.

So is this a good way to pick up women? Can someone tell me if it really is humiliating or I'm just looking at it the wrong way? And is there a limit to how many women you should try to flirt with in one night? Like what's the rejection limit? If you get rejected 4 times, is that when you quit for the night or do you keep going on?",seduction
I have my first date on Saturday,"I have my first ever date on saturday. I'm super nervous but also excited. The plan is to get drunk together and go see a movie. 

What advice can you give me? How should I greet her? What should I first talk about? I think I'm most scared about the initial 20 minutes than anything else, getting the ball rolling if you get me. ",seduction
How to overcome crippling depression and start succeeding with women (my story),,seduction
Making the Best out of a Grim Situation,"Alright folks, I'm going to need your advice and help, or words of kindness for this to stop me from going more or less insane. 

Be me, 18 years old, fall in ""love"" with a girl. Go to the same high school class and in this class, there is a guy who also wants her badly and courts her constantly, usually behind my back. At the end of the day, she's mine and we have a happy 5 year relationship. 3.5 of these years are happy are the last 1.5 years descend into arguments and bitterness. Now I'm 23 and we've been broken up since february this year. She dumps me over the phone and pours salt in the wounds by hanging around the places I go and constantly contacting my friends to hang out. I decide to travel to get her out of my head. There is always a small glimmer in me that wants to try again and reconnect with her, but I do know the split was probably for the best. I just need some distance to get over it.

I travel for 3 months and when I return to my country to restart my college courses, I get a phone call from her. She is dating the guy from 5 years ago in high school she tells me they are happy. She also tells me that he goes to the same school as me as well. She lives on the other side of the country now, but stays with him for a week at a time. Now, I cannot avoid seeing them everyday. In the dining hall, in classes. I feel as if my life has been hijacked by her or that fate is playing a very cruel joke on me. 

They both try to reconnect with me by trying to give me hugs and say hello, but I brush them off with silence and ignore them whenever they approach. She seems to be a bit guilty. Never looks me fully in the eyes and speaks in a high pitched tone.

I need help to know: How do I handle this situation? Do I talk to them? Befriend them? Do I keep giving them the cold shoulder?  Is she doing this on purpose to hurt me?  What might be going through her head?

DISCLAIMER: I don't want to get back with her. Might want to have her give me an apology, but otherwise I am over her. Just feel angry that it has to be this guy and at my school nonetheless. 

Show me what you've got",seduction
How should I proceed?,"There’s a girl in my human rights class who I think is really cute. Not only that, but we talk about so many controversial issues in the class, and she is such a well spoken, down to Earth person. I’d love to get her number but I don’t wanna come off as creepy because we haven’t really talked before. How should I proceed? 



UPDATE: So before I decided to make a move, I looked her up on Instagram and found out she’s engaged. Sooooooooo, kinda dodged a bullet. Thanks for the advise anyway.
",seduction
Perspective - Why Rejection Is Irrelevant,,seduction
How many approaches make it to something more than just chatting on the street?,"I know it depends, but I want to know, roughly, how many of the approaches should go from street talk to date or something more. Like 1 in 10, 1 in 100 less? More?",seduction
if a girl asks sexual questions is that an IOI?,"I was playing truth or dare with a group of girls, and this particular girl was asking me questions like. ""if i was a virgin"", ""whats my favorite position"" ""how many girlfriends i have had"" then she proceeds to call me a playboy. Is this an IOI?",seduction
"4 dates in one week, how do you juggle multiple women!","Hi guys, I’ve been having fun lately thanks to the advise on this forum.  I’ll be having 4 dates with multiple women this week.  I live in relatively small town, metro area of about 1 million, and about things are about to heat up.  This is the rundown of the dates:

1.) happened yesterday.  Meet girl in a silent disco event, was doing kino that day, numbered closed.  Meet her spontaneously last Friday, kino, k-close, brought her home didn’t want to do anything.  Changed strategy went for dinner last night, did everything in bed except f-closing, she was very good.  I’m happy about it.  I think she’ll be the best in best.

2.) tinder girl.  Seems to be taking long time to answer, I fooled her by telling her she should try espresso martinis, she said it sounds delicious, I invited her out to try them, invitation she couldn’t resist.  I’ll try to charm her.

3.) ONS that wants to move into date territory.  Mentioned dinner and drinks.  She’s the one that started my current streak.  Not bad at sex, cute and sweet girl.

4.) tinder girl #2.  Canadian Ukrainian, bombshell.  Very talented musician.  People from her country like my ethnicity.  Going for drinks.  She seems very excited.


I haven’t mentioned exclusivity with any of these girls but I’m still worried about drama.  At some point I’ll have to select or they’ll self select.  How do you guys go about this?  Also how can I sustain this lifestyle?  Is getting expensive dating so much, lol!",seduction
I want to hook up with this girl but i live with my parents.,"I'm 27 and moved back into my dads house a couple months ago to save money for school. Its been hard to hang out with people. Anyways i met this girl at this party. Shes gorgeous and likes to party  but theirs a bit of an age gap (20). She got my number from the host and has been texting me wanting to hang out. I was thinking of taking her to a park and smoking a bowl, have a few drinks, and then ______? Where do i take her if we hit it off? My dad is generally cool with me bringing people over but I want to go somewhere else. The car is an option; maybe a bathroom or at the park? I could rent a hotel room? does this sound like a fun ""adventure"" or does anyone have a better suggestion? ",seduction
Emotional CRASH after abundance is lost??,"I am a year or so into the game and I've had some success in the past. I've been finding that when I lose abundance, I go on an emotional crash and old feelings of loneliness creep back in. This happens now ONLY when I am talking to a few girls and I end up losing all of them. For example I have been talking to these 3 different girls that I have had dates with and recently one way or another they stopped talking to me. I've noticed today that I have been feeling an emotional crash similar to when a girl I was dating would leave me. My whole day today was totally FUCKED because of it. I couldn't be productive at all and I can't shake the feeling of loneliness. Is there anything I could do about this?",seduction
Any advice for me? Socially awkward guy,"Started university. I talk to everyone and everything but in my whole life I have never really connected with the opposite sex. While my flatmates at unis are able to participate in convos like “what age was the oldest girl that you had sex with”.

Never kissed a girl,never done anything really. Now when I talk to girls I try to bring up mutual interests, and I try to make jokes but I just feel like I hit a brick wall tbh. I even just feel boring sometimes. Also in the club girls never want to talk to me.

My social life is bad. I’m starting to think that everyone in school who called me socially awkward was actually right lol. I never believed it but now I’m not sure. Like damn uni was my chance to reinvent myself and now i think I blew it 

I also really don’t want to end up being dependent on alcohol for socialising.

Like everything in my life is good except for the social/relationship aspect.",seduction
Should You Persist When A Girl Says No? These Body-language Signs Tell You The Truth:,"&amp;#x200B;

Many of my past daygame students often ask ""should you persist when a girl says 'no' the first time?""

&amp;#x200B;

Luckily this is easy to answer. 

Girls will often throw out a \*soft rejection\* during your daygame approach to see whether you persist when a girl says 'no'. Effectively she is looking to test whether you truly believe in yourself and what you're doing as you flirt with her.

&amp;#x200B;

They're not stupid. They've been hit on plenty of times by drunk guys in nightclubs. This is their natural defence mechanism to weed out the guys who really have no inner-confidence in themselves.

&amp;#x200B;

**So... Should you persist when a girl says no?**

&amp;#x200B;

The most important aspect you can develop is calibration during your daygame. When it's time to take a girl's number, you should know whether to persist when a girl say no... Or if she's truly not interested.

&amp;#x200B;

When first determining should you persist when a girl says no, you must decide whether the girl's ""no"" is a \*real no\* or a \*try one more time no\*

&amp;#x200B;

**Some signs she's actually interested in you and just testing are:**

&amp;#x200B;

**- She's** stopped for you and your conversation. She hasn't actually shown signs of wanting to leave or get out of this abnormal situation of flirting with a random guy in the street during the day

**- She** hasn't actually mentioned any objection like boyfriends, leaving town soon etc until the very end when you've asked for her number

**- The** girl has given you strong positive body-language signs throughout the daygame approach

&amp;#x200B;

So, should you persist when a girl says no?

&amp;#x200B;

If you pick-up on any/all of these above signs during your daygame conversation, there's a strong likelihood that the girl is just testing you and you should persist even though she has originally said 'no'

&amp;#x200B;

**Now, what are her seriously REAL 'NO' signs:**

&amp;#x200B;

**- She** doesn't actually stop for your approach. Maybe she keeps walking slightly and tells you to 'walk with her'...

**- Shy** or extra polite girls aren't confident enough to simply walk away and reject you... So they give off sub-communications with their body language that lets you know that she isn't interested. Facing away from you, leaning away, taking little steps to your side, etc.

**- Weak** eye contact

**- General** fidgeting... Looking at her phone, adjusting her headphones, playing with her rings/fingers...

&amp;#x200B;

Should you persist when a girl says 'no' in these example situations?

&amp;#x200B;

Probably not... They're pretty clear signs that a girl's ""no"" is a real ""no"".

&amp;#x200B;

This 6th sense of knowing and understanding whether you should persist when a girl says 'no' or not, will come with experience and calibration the more you practice daygame and cold-approaching girls.

&amp;#x200B;

**I run a telegram messaging group where a bunch of very experienced PUAs and seducers hang out, chat, and help answer many different seduction questions from guys.**

&amp;#x200B;

Want in? 

&amp;#x200B;

Message me privately here on reddit",seduction
Shit test : Are you cool or trying to be cool?,"I 've met that girl for the first date and after 2 hours of chatting and hanging out , we ended up at a bar and then she told me that she likes my black shirt because its for cool people.
Then she asked me ""Are you cool"" or ""trying to appear cool""

I knew its a shit test so I said ""you can ask anyone will tell ya"" and then I laughed.

Was that a good answer or could be better?",seduction
Talking on socials,"Usually nowadays, before a person asks someone on a date, they usually slightly get to know them on social media. When one is at this stage and the dm conversations tend to go stale, what techniques do you guys use to get the conversation flowing again.",seduction
Is approach anxiety 'normal' or is it basically 'social anxiety'?,"I'm curious as to whether a 'normal' person has approach anxiety to the point that they are often unable too approach.

I keep reading different opinions. Some people say ''Most 'confident' men who are assertive in the boardroom etc would never have the balls to go and approach some hot girl at starbucks!'' which makes me think it's maybe 'normal'

Although I've also read people say ''A confident person isn't afraid to go and talk to some young girl. Approach anxiety is basically social anxiety''

I'm wondering if those of us who struggle bad maybe need medication?

Although I don't think my GP would hand me drugs if I told him my reason, lol

",seduction
When Should You Call A Woman After Getting Her Phone Number?,"Some people say wait 3 days, and some say wait 1 day.

Here’s what I do.

I setup a date before I get a woman’s phone number.

I tell her that I intend on taking her out sometime, and I set a day and time to link up before we part ways.

In those cases, I don’t call her until the day comes when we are supposed to meet.

However, I do text her a day before just to make sure we are still on.

I’ll check up on her via text and see how her day is going, and then I’ll confirm whether we are still good to meet up the following day.

Then when the day of our meetup comes, I will typically call her an hour or two before and let her know I’m excited to see her, and I’ll be on my way to our meetup destination in a few.

Now, let’s say you get a woman’s phone number, but you didn’t setup a date before parting ways. In that case you will need to hit her up via text or phone call and setup a date.

Women tend to be more comfortable with texting but calling can be a stronger move since most guys are afraid to call.

Personally, I use text to setup the date. Then I call her on the day of the date to let her know I’m looking forward to seeing her and that I’ll be on my way to the meetup destination shortly.

I don’t believe in waiting a few days to text or call a woman.

I will typically text a woman the same day I met her or the next day.

If you wait longer than a day to text her, she might lose interest, or she might forget about you. If you’re out there doing your thing, you might even forget to text her because you have other women you’re talking to.

You also need to keep in mind that attractive women have tons of men hitting them up on a daily basis, so it’s easy for her to forget you, or for a much better option to come around.
 
So, it would be wise to “strike the iron when it’s hot”. Hit her up when she still has you in her mind and is still intrigued by your interaction with her.

Another thing you need to know is some women will give out their numbers mainly because they like the validation that comes from having lots of men texting and calling them all the time.

So, it’s easy for you to be grouped into the category of “average guy”. 

If you want to avoid being in the “average guy” category, make your intentions clear, don’t blow her phone up and don’t act needy.

Some guys like to game women through text and on the phone, but from my experience that is not necessary.

You will stand out more, if you just use the phone to setup a specific time and date to meetup.

Most guys will text a girl and say, “when we gonna meetup?” or “when you tryna chill?”

Don’t be like every other guy.

Take the lead and find out when she is free, and then set a specific time and date to meetup.",seduction
5 Attractive Stories To Tell Her On The First Date (use these wisely),"This post might get a bit of hate...

I can already see the comments...

*'Just Be Natural, Bro'*

*'Don't Be Dishonest'*

*'You're a virgin. Go kill yourself'* 

I agree 100% with all of these statements. In an ideal world, no-one would need this post. 

Yet, I've been participating in this sub-reddit for a weeks now and there seems to be a lot of people who worry about running out of things to say on dates.

By having these stories to fall back on when your mind goes blank, you can relax. This will free up your mind to concentrate on having an awesome time (as well implementing the structure in my popular step-by-step [guide to sex on the first date](https://www.reddit.com/r/seduction/comments/9k62zo/5_devilish_first_date_tips_for_men_to_seal_the/)) 

A bit like karate. You can learn these stories just in case you need them. 

Having said that, I use these all the time and they all work awesome. The reason why each story works so well is highlighted in **bold.** 

Let's get started!

# 1. Callback humour

She may have fucking LOVED you in the club, on the street, or wherever you met, but that doesn't mean she'll be instantly wet for you on the date 

Girls' emotions are like a rollercoaster, so you're better off assuming you have to game her from scratch. 

With that said, callback humour is a great tool to **remind her how she felt when she first met you**. 

Any in-joke from the past will help build a personal connnection. It will also serve to bring  back the emotional state she was in when you agreed to swap contact details. 

# 2. A movie review

In my step-by-step guide to dates, I talk about the importance of **seeding the pull.** 

Usually, I do this by ranting and raving about some INSANE Netflix movie that my housemates were watching as I left the house. 

It's normally the second or third thing I say to her...

Use all your hype skills to describe how awesome this movie appeared to be. Tell her it's all you can think about. Get her sucked in to the awesomeness of the movie, then casually bring up watching it together once the date is working well. 

This well with an outrageous film that not many people have seen. 

I use 'The Lobster'. 

# 3. Screening

You should have a list of 5 personality traits that your dream woman will possess. If you don't, write it now. This post will still be here... 

..

..

GREAT! Now you have your list, you can use the first date to screen whether she has these qualities.

This sets the buyer-seller frame really well. She'll thank you for it. Girls like when you **leave room for them to chase**... 

Don't straight-up ask her like some asshole job interviewer. Have some fun with it. Make assumptions about her personality, then let her confirm or deny them. Feign extreme disappointment if she denies...

Even better, tell a positive story about some female friend who shows these qualities. 

This brings me to my next point... 

# 4. Some positive story about sex

Sexual talk is useful for setting a romantic, rather than a friendly frame. The key is to do it in a non-seedy way.

The easiest way to do this is tell a story about a third-person. 

I like to tell a story about my female housemate being on a Tinder rampage after a break-up, and praising her for it. 

*""Good for her! That'll show him! Female empowerment!""*

Hey, perhaps that same housemate was watching 'The Lobster' with a Tinder date as I left the house.. Now I'm linking one of these bullets into another...

Another cool idea (admittedly stolen from a previous post on this sub-reddit which I couldn't find) is to make cheeky comments about other people in the environment. If you see two other people on a date, ask her if you think it's going well. Ask if you think the woman looks like she'd good in bed etc. 

The point you're subtly communicating is that you're comfortable talking about sex, and you **won't judge her for sleeping with you on the first date**. 

OBVIOUSLY, if she's not loving the sex talk, slow it down, just like you would with any type of physical escalation. 

# 5. Your passions

There seems to be a misconception that talking about yourself too much on a date is terrible. Normally, it's great. 

Having an activity that you're really passionate about is so attractive to a woman. 

**Display all the passion you have in your body** when describing your hobbies to her. Make the most of your story-telling skills and suck her into the tale of why you love it so much. She'll love *you* for it. 

For inspiration, do a Google search for Joey Tribbiani's story about backpacking through Western Europe ;)

# Here's what matters most...

I work as a confidence coach and one of our main teachings is: the words you say only counts for 7% of communication. If you can show relaxed body language, good eye contact, dominant voice tonality and the ability to HAVE FUN, that'll do a lot more for your success than these stories. 

In fact, it could be argued that the stories would be useless without these fundamentals of communication.

Still, as explained before, feel free to use them as the icing on the awesome cake that is your personality... 

(Also, 'The Lobster' is an awesome film. You should actually watch it after you're done fucking ;) ) 

***I co-launched a Telegram group for men who want to become amazing with women. Hundreds of lads discussing their goals and sticking points. Drop me a PM with your username if you'd like to join.***",seduction
"""Abundance mentality"" when you're extremely picky","Hey guys.

&amp;#x200B;

So I'm not really into the whole seduction community thing, I've always been pretty successful when it comes to getting laid. But the thing that made me start reading into it is my tendency to get one girl stuck in my head.

&amp;#x200B;

The reason is, like I said I can meet girls and get laid pretty easily, but I rule them out as potential dating material so quickly. 95% of relationships I see around me have me wondering why theyre even together - I'm not someone that's ever gonna settle for someone I just get on with the way everyone else seems to, they have to be special.

&amp;#x200B;

So the once or twice a year I meet a girl who I don't immediately rule out, they get seriously stuck in my head. I stop caring about seeing other girls, I find myself getting a bit pushy with them etc. after just a couple of dates.

&amp;#x200B;

My issue is that even though there's loads of girls out there who will happily date me, I still don't have that abundance mentality you guys always talk about because it's so rare that I find a girl that im genuinely interested in, then when they do come along I have to make a serious conscious effort not to come across as clingy and needy.

&amp;#x200B;

Anyone else relate to this/got any tips?",seduction
I’ve been out of the game for several years. Should I start with moderately attractive chicks I’m not super interested in?,"I had little interest in women for several years until I recently developed a crush on a woman. Things didn’t work out, but it made me interested in getting back in the game. Should I start with the lower hanging fruit I’m not as into just to make the transition easier. If so, what are good things to do? I don’t like spending money on women in the first place, much less on women I’m basically just using as practice. ",seduction
Virgini-tea,I’m talking to this guy a few years older than me and he’s super experienced where I have done exactly nothing. I’m scared he won’t be interested once he finds out how inexperienced I am. Guys: is it a turn off when a girl is a virgin. (I’m early 20s and it’s just never happened) ,seduction
Help for Advice?! Trying to get the girl!,"So hello first and second sorry for my english, its not the best.

So about 1 month im texing and sexting with this girl (lets call her Amy), she is 25 (im 26) and lives about 40 min flight away.

She has an open relationship with his boyfriend and on the other side she gets laid by some guys, because her boyfriend cant deal with her sex drive (she wants more). So im trying to be one of those guys. 

She sends me pics of every part of her body and knowing that im trying to get her laid. She told that she wants to me meet me first, because im not ""spicy"" enough for her. And maybe on the second date, will happen something. But on the other hand, the last three guys get her laid on very first time.

So my question is how do i get more ""spicy"" for her and get the things right for the first time?",seduction
College Freshman in Amsterdam having difficulties approaching. Advice please?,"I'm 19 years old, about to turn 20 next month. I moved here to pursue a better education, but in turn means that I'm in a new city with not as many connections/friends as before.

  


I believe what I want to focus most about my game is the approach (more important) and also bringing girls home (not as important but sealing the deal is a make or break situation). Personally having a fun conversation with a girl isn't so difficult but the bitch butterflies have overwhelmed me recently from initiating an interaction. A lot of the time I refrain from approaching because I don't know what to say.

  


Perhaps what led to his fear is that I have approached women around here (mostly in clubs however) and have been repeatedly told that ""Aww you're such a kid"" or ""You're too young for me."" Most likely because the tourists that come around here are older than me.

Would someone give some advice please? Any help will be appreciated. Thanks",seduction
"Best friend (F30) had feelings for me, made out with me and then decided against me and for her BF of 10 years","This went over weeks. We went on a vacation together, it somehow clicked. After the vacation we became very intimate - I told her I developed feelings for her, she somehow confirmed and started making out with me. She has a BF of about 10 years who is / was also a friend of mine.

We live in different cities.

She needed to get distance, wrote and spoke ""less intimate"" - but still on a daily base. We met a couple of times, and for the last time today. I asked her what her status is and the gist is - she seems to have more feelings for her BF - she said her decision was definite. 

I wrote her I think her decision was wrong, but I accept it and will move on. From then on barely any contact.

This was a freaking rollercoaster ride of emotions. I could now dig a hole and jump into it. I have no idea what to do, work and other things stopped interesting me. I know I need distraction now, but easier said then done. I think of her daily, sometimes just missing her, other times including hate.

I'm in between hating her but still having feelings for her.

I know women can make decisions and change them, but I am wrong clinging to some irrational hope. We went cold, no contact - she recently wrote some pretty impersonal and cold messages, so I told her that's not the way to end a 10 year friendship - and would rather have a call, which we will. I'll tell her my feelings are still there.

Guys, I probably know I will get ""move on"", ""there are other women"" ""she's not worh it and I know you are right - but I wonder if anyone went through the same and how it went. And what you guys think about turning something like this around again.

I just can't wrap my head around how a woman will develop such feelings, send very obvious signals and ask me to go to my hotel room to make out - and then decide against all it ",seduction
Would you like to be my friend?,"Would you like to be my friend.  It's a cheesy line that none of us uses, past the age of 5 I suppose.  My question is, how do you move into a dating relationship? In my previous relationships, we met, we hung out, we touched or got physical, and then we were magically dating.  There was no explicit talk about dating, we just had feelings, and acted.  And whatever game I had was in my subconscious.

I haven't met many girls lately, and I'm kind of going against my instincts now.  I've opted to try dating events, and honestly the whole think seems pretty boring.  You sit down and you chat and there's this thing looming over your heads ""Is he/she right for me?"".  I don't really want to do it that way.  I wish I could create a situation where I meet a girl and it happens spontaneously, and we end up running off somewhere.

The problem is, I'm not sure how to plan the whole thing (I don't know how I did it before), the moves to make and the things to say, without falling into lines like ""Would you like to be my friend?"".  Inner game has without a doubt helped, but there's got to be some outer game, to help escalate and lead to something spontaneous and free.  Any suggestions?",seduction
Techniques to initiate physical contact,"I don't know how to initiate physical contact.

The 2 girls I've had a physical contact with (hugging, kiss etc..) it was particular I guess ?

The first one literally told me ""Why you don't touch me ? I would like you to do it"". So the message was clear.
The second one was at a night club, I joined her dancing, we shared our name and danced together. Then I hold her from the back and did whatever I want.

But latelly i started dating girls in place like bars (I never went to these untilnrecently) and sruff and I have no clue how to make a transition between the talk and something more (i'm not talking about sex necesserly).

I think the last one I saw expected me to do more but I'm shy with very few experience. My guess is that she seemed interested in me but I did nothing.

If you guy could give me some concrete exemple like :
Her : "" i'm really cold lol XD ""
Me : *hug her *
Just a bit more realistic.
Please do not just say , ""It's just about feeling mate, take a few sip and do whatever""

It is useless.
Thanks in advance.",seduction
My flirt game needs some serious work.,"Hello, everyone! I'm a lurker on this subreddit. Now to start off, let me say that I have confidence to approach girls. I don't flat out avoid them like I used to. However, I've found that most of my attempts to have conversation with them are worrisome. Here's why; most of the time my attempts at flirting are kinda insulting. Let me show you what I mean. This is a conversation I had with a girl that's new to my school (I'm a junior and she's a senior):

Me :""I haven't seen you here before;  are you new?""
Her:""Yeah""
Me:""Where from?""
Her: (city name)
Me: Oh... (other conversation)

So far so good. This was the conversation where i found out she was a senior, and said she looked like a junior. She said she took it as a compliment. Then tomorrow rolls around.
This conversation was shorter because in the previous situation circumstances put us together, but this time I attempted to talk to her on our way out of class:

Me:""Are you sure you're a senior? (insert whatever else was said here)""
Her: ""I think I would know what grade I'm in.""

*record scratch*

Maybe I'm overreacting, but at the same time I know what it feels like to have someone talk to you that you're just always annoyed with. I just don't want to make her feel uncomfortable/frustrated.  
This past 30 days I've scaled the wall of self consciousness and fear of being made a fool of. Now I have to learn how to use this confidence as a tool with women. Especially flirting. Whenever I try to flirt, I think in my head *hey, it would be a pretty good idea if I said something snarky and possibly offensive. That'll work!*  I'd really appreciate some input.
Thanks. 

Tl:dr: my method of flirtation is snarky and, in my opinion, can be offensive at times... how do I flirt in an interesting yet sarcastic way that's not offensive?

Edit: reddit mobile makes my post so aesthetically revolting",seduction
College Dating,"Hi reddit! I started my freshman year of college a bit over a month ago, and while I've made tons of new friends, am doing well in classes, started working out, and am feeling the most confident I ever have in my life, I'm still lost when it comes to dating and talking to girls romantically. I've never really been in a romantic relationship before, and it's something I really want to try out this year! I've made a bunch of female friends, but I still don't know what to do.

My school is somewhat smaller than most universities (10k\~ undergrad population), and my friends advise against it, but I really haven't tried any cold approaching, mostly out of fear that I'll build a reputation for myself. Instead, I kinda just sit around libraries and cafeterias looking for opportunities to talk to girls. I've joined clubs and my classes have a decent amount of girls in them, but maybe because they're somewhat nerdier, I'm not really attracted to many girls in them, bar a few.

I guess what my question is... is what should I be doing? I have kinda realized that one of my biggest weaknesses is groups. Sometimes I see girls around from a class who I'm attracted to, but they're usually with their friends so I don't bother them. I kind of have a crush on this one girl in one of my classes, and I sit relatively close to her, but usually she's talking to her friend in class so I don't really do anything. We've talked before at orientation, and we know each others' names, so whenever we pass by each other in a hall or something it's just the usual ""hi and bye. "" If I ever see her, she's usually with friends, so I don't bother approaching! Kinda lost with that one.

An example from today was that I sat down in the library, just in some random spot since it was somewhat crowded. I thought the girl sitting next to me was kind of cute, but I had no idea what to say to her! Eventually, I had thought of asking her where something was in the library, but she got up and left before I could try it out. Or like maybe, I'll be by myself in the cafeteria, and see a cute girl sitting alone at a table eating. I feel like I'd be bothering her if I asked her if I could eat with her, and usually don't end up asking! Same thing in the library; an empty seat next to a cute girl could be open, but even if I ask her if the seat is taken and sit down, what would I say to her? What do I do in these situations? Advice would be appreciated!",seduction
Texting tip: Break up your text messages,"**Rather than writing large blocks of text such as:**

*Hey! it was great seeing you, I had a lot of fun today. That game we played was interesting. I'll have to show you more the next time we hang out. What are you doing this week?*

**You could split it up into:**

*Great seeing you today*

*I'll have to show you more of that game next time*

*What are you up to this week?*

Here each text message reads more like how a person talks rather than an essay. **The messages you send each has a different emotional trigger and so they are separated.** This splits up the ideas and gives the reader a better experience. You can also be more concise when you split up the messages. They will also feel less pressured to not having to type an essay in reply. For all these reasons, I find girls are more likely to respond to the second example. 

Now, this tip won't drastically change your life but it's a good addition to add to your arsenal. 

My [YouTube Channel](https://www.youtube.com/c/TheSingleGuy)",seduction
What else can I do?,"I don't have a problem going up to talk to a girl that I'm attractive to, being myself around them, asking girls out, etc... This has never been a problem with me but that doesn't mean I have a single shred of success with girls. I have autism and for the last 7 years of my life I've trying to understand people and socializing which I have greatly understand better but even after knowing so much I don't feel like I've made a  step further in anything. I'm not an ugly guy, I can tell that woman are attracted or at least interested in me initially. Just today I was at a social event and I was talking to this girl that decided to sit next to me, she was very receptive, showed a lot of positive facial expression/ body language but it was after I started talking a bit more that I noticed that she was becoming less interested. This seems to be the theme with anyone not just in dating. When people first meet me they think I'm the coolest guy ever and once I start opening my mouth more everything just go down. 

I don't know what else to do. I'm not one to give up but it feels like I'm trying to push a wall. I've put so much effort into trying to understand all this and myself but it feels futile because no ounce of progress is being shown. ",seduction
Would it be a bad idea to do cold-approaches in high school,"There are a couple of girls I've seen around. However, we don't have any mutual friends and I have no clue how I would make some. I'm think to just say 'screw it' and approach them myself. Is this more of a college thing? Or did you do it in high school as well? Experienced guys or ladies preferred.",seduction
Top Ten Pickup Artists In The World (Part 3),,seduction
"How do I meet guys, as a girl?","I know this thread is for males to female mostly but im so fucking desperate that im asking reddit lmao

I'm not ugly, like im a decently attractive person. I live in Los Angeles, with how many people here?

Its hard for me to approach anyone in person, and the kind of person that talks to me I usually want nothing to do with.  
Any ideas?  


EDIT:  
I'm 19 and definitely not looking for the kind of outgoing guy that would approach me lmao. Also not planning on going to college any time soon rip  


Thinking about going to LAN centers and internet cafes rn but that just guarantees  me to get made fun of lmao  


I'm only on Reddit when I remember to be LMAO dont beat me for slow replies  
&lt;/div&gt;&lt;!-- SC\_ON --&gt;  
",seduction
I don't like flirting too much.,"I'm not into telling jokes and using negs.  When I was in my teens I used to neg, but it was usually pretty messed up, and not too calculated.  It was mostly just poking fun, natural negging.  I don't like canned lines or jokes.  I've read some inner game stuff, and I get it, and I suppose outer game might naturally flow from inner game.  When I interact with women I don't like seeing the interaction as necessarily having an end goal.

I'm starting to wonder whether or not that's good enough.  My social skills are okay, but I still struggle with approach anxiety, even if I'm just going to hang out with people I know, it almost kills me.  My hands will shake and my voice will too.  It's probably the biggest problem I have.

The next problem is, what exactly should I do about outer game? Should I start memorizing openers (sometimes, to get it going I used some lame opener...as we all have to, after that I usual try to let it flow). Should I look at scripts? I can't seem to get in the right state of mind a lot.  It's happened a few times in the past few months with a few girls, but things fizzled.  I can't blame myself entirely, maybe I wasn't pushing hard enough. 

I just can't seem to genuinely get turned on sometimes to the point where I'm ""peacocking"" at my best.  The thing is, I don't even like doing that entirely, especially if it's empty. I hate empty humor, and being too mundane.  I'm not sure if that will work well for my game. Maybe being serious is really a bad thing.  I've read it before ""be fun""...but I don't want to be fun all of the time.",seduction
How to Get Girls to CHASE YOU (Effortless Game),,seduction
18M Need advice (preferably links to good posts) regarding improving my game (next to no experience),"Like the title says, I need any advice/links to other advice regarding game improvement (at university).

(Yes I've read the sidebar)

Thanks :)",seduction
Settling for guys if you can't get women?,"I'm not trolling.  Just today I had a man in the Asperger's forum tell me ""women hate me, I tried and gave it my best, but I couldn't do it.  I basically went for men, at a certain point.""  Having asked him further, it was implied he was not ""already bi"" he just gave up on women because none desired him.  (Oy Vey, that is painful to read)

To me there is all sorts of things wrong with this thinking.

I still will not judge the guy poorly, and I ask none of you do either, keep this thread polite please.

I'm quite sure that option is one I would never resort to, but as a low-functioning man with Asperger's I'm at a serious impasse.  I'm well into my 30s and it's like my time has run out, nor do I have any value (no status, no social circle, no money) to offer.

There isn't anything I can offer in a competitive market.  What can be done?",seduction
Bee Dum Boop Bop,"To any newbies being jaded works. To those who are a little more advanced I am sure you'll relate.

The less you care the more they want you that is true. My most recent ex still wants a fwb type situation living together and sharing a bed... also to split rent (now I aint saying she's a gold digger. However she is hot too so idk). This pretty much only came about because some tinder thot I saw once hit up my ex online to mock her and call dibs on me (psycho/10).

Seeing a couple different girls a week is not a problem. But I cant help but notice it wherever I go the flick of her hair, the sideways smirk while she tries to work out if her friends approve, biting her lip, the nervous energy, when she adjusts her bra or leans over a little more. Seeing her profile pic and all i see are tactical angles and strategically exposed skin. 

Hitting the clubs  is a breeze btw guys if your gf goes clubbing it isnt that she will cheat on you, more you better hope she doesnt meet a guy who knows what he is doing. Girls i talk to with boyfriends I just play it cool and act like i dont care (because i dont). Then it begins with justification to me but for her own benefit ""I havent been happy with him for a long time, he is a dick..."" then he simply exits the convo and ceases to be relavent. If I dont seal the deal that night she will come to her senses, but in your absence you cease to exist to her. Charming.

Nothing feels better than having a ""slut"" come onto you, she is just a girl that plays her own version of the game. It may be easier for a girl to get laid but that doesnt mean she has more sex she is just more selective. When you start talking to her if you know what you're doing she will see you for what you are. She may be a heartbreaker and a tease but I promise she will be an awesome lay and probably hot as shit too. It is refreshing to talk to a girl and find yourself on the otherside of the game. Having a solid 9/10 stare at you like a cat with a mouse is a visceral fucking thrill. Just dont fuck it up.

It's all just tainted love isn't it.",seduction
The Long Awaited Truth About Success 6 From RSD Tyler,,seduction
Some Quick (And Easy To Remember) Essentials For Daygame Cold-Approaching,"  

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

**Hey guys,**

&amp;#x200B;

Daygame Australia here.

&amp;#x200B;

I'm pretty damn new to this whole Reddit thing... 

&amp;#x200B;

And I want to hit the ground running with some quality posts and information. Here's the first of hopefully many future articles!

&amp;#x200B;

\[Before I start, I'd love for you guys to leave a comment with any feedback you have about what I can do to make these posts even better into the future. Thanks in advance\]

&amp;#x200B;

**Today I'd like to quickly share a few easy tips that you NEED to implement when cold-approaching new girls during the day.**

&amp;#x200B;

(That is, if you want to attract them and have the girls invest enough to actually reply to your texts)

&amp;#x200B;

**So here goes:**

&amp;#x200B;

Every approach needs your freestyling ability to make some kind of assumption about the girl. 

&amp;#x200B;

This is your basic opportunity to let her start talking... Or at least letting her offer some kind of conversational topic about herself that you can latch onto and build rapport/comfort with

&amp;#x200B;

My example, which is my ""go to"" when there's nothing else coming to my mind in the moment is:

&amp;#x200B;

*""I don't speak any \[Guess nationality\]""*

&amp;#x200B;

So in this daygame infield, you'll quickly hear me saying:

&amp;#x200B;

*""I don't speak any French""*

&amp;#x200B;

\[At around **0:22** in the video\]

&amp;#x200B;

This gave the girl the opportunity to correct me. Without saying where she was from, I was able to build her investment levels by making her give me a ""hint"" (Or an ""evidence"" as she so sexually put it) about her country.

&amp;#x200B;

Doing this pops her out of the normal \*surface bubble\* of normal chit-chat conversation... Suddenly she actually has to put some thought into the conversation.

&amp;#x200B;

This is the type of investment that starts creating a bond between you and a girl. **\[Heard at 0:52\]**

&amp;#x200B;

**Once we know where a girl is from, we want to start introducing favourable frames about her.**

&amp;#x200B;

Generally, if you are cold-approaching with the intent of finding fast sex... You will be looking for easy-going, hippie, heavy partying type girls.

&amp;#x200B;

**At 1:40** you will hear how I start trying to push these frames onto the girl to see how she reacts.

&amp;#x200B;

This is another important step in qualification. By doing this I'm starting to gauge what \*type\* of girl she is. And from there onwards, what type of ""game"" I should be displaying.

&amp;#x200B;

**Old school seduction advice is ""Push-Pull""**

&amp;#x200B;

Essentially it means ""with every compliment, make sure you are also teasing the girl""

&amp;#x200B;

Make believe she is your sister for a second (Or step-sister, as Pornhub would have you believe...)

&amp;#x200B;

How would you play with and tease her then?

&amp;#x200B;

Well after I've finished saying she looks like a:

&amp;#x200B;

*""Normal girl""*

&amp;#x200B;

I then say:

&amp;#x200B;

*""Except for these sunglasses""*

&amp;#x200B;

Which lets her invest further by telling me a mini-story about how she got them. All good signs that she is at least initially attracted and interested in me

&amp;#x200B;

**Time for a quick BONUS Point Tip:**

&amp;#x200B;

If you really want to hammer home the man-woman frame of your seductive interaction, you can start telling the girl about your red-pill philosophies in life.

&amp;#x200B;

Definitely not a tip for the inexperienced daygame seducers among us...

&amp;#x200B;

But when you're confident enough to stand your ground and defend your thoughts and positions on certain topics, making a girl submit to strong ""male-female"" frames is a great position to build for yourself in a girl's eyes.

&amp;#x200B;

\[I show you **an example of this at 4:05** in the daygame infield video linked below\]

&amp;#x200B;

**Back to the basics of successful daygame approaching:**

&amp;#x200B;

One super-basic mistake I see a LOT of my past students making, is trying to impress a girl with ALL the information you know about her country.

&amp;#x200B;

I see so many guys boring her with their history-textbook analysis of her nationality as soon as they recognise her accent.

&amp;#x200B;

Counter-intuitively, I like to leave this kind of information for the middle to end of a daygame approach. You'll see that it's taken me **6 minutes** to start sharing some of my past stories and experiences in relation to Italy, with this Italian girl.

&amp;#x200B;

Not only that, don't talk too much...

&amp;#x200B;

You should be making playful teases and accusations about her country, then letting her ""defend"" her country. That puts the onus on her to continue investing in the conversation heavily.

&amp;#x200B;

**Today's final tip is about taking a girl's number...**

&amp;#x200B;

We don't want to come off needy, as though this whole 'conversation' was a ploy all along to get her number.

&amp;#x200B;

Ideally, you will make taking her number a totally \*natural\* thing.

&amp;#x200B;

Which it should be...

&amp;#x200B;

When two new people like each other and want to meet up again in the future, it's only natural to swap contact details.

&amp;#x200B;

What I like to do is reserve another minute or two of conversation for AFTER I've taken her phone number. This totally ""grounds"" the approach and makes it feel completely natural for the girl.

&amp;#x200B;

You can find the daygame infield I'm referencing through-out this short article here:

&amp;#x200B;

(r/https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7Oy9-NMHkk0)",seduction
Watch Me Get Rejected By Girls - Daygame Infield Compilation,,seduction
Getting started. Books. Advice.,"So I recently tried online dating, met with one girl but after a couple of dates and a kiss now she stopped texting me.
After educating myself a little I know now that she was shittesting me on last time we met and I failed all of them and what's worse I was soo attatched to her I didn't even noticed them! and demonstrated my insecurities.

I was reading once in a while about the game, know a couple of techniques but after I succesfully gain a girl's interest on the first date it's like I become that weak man I have always been before.

I'm sick of this. I want to get good at it and change my mindset for good, to always be ready to talk to a girl, don't care about what others think and just have fun while I will search for LTR material.

So. Can You guys reccomend some books about seduction, becoming a high value person, or rather how to convince myself, not for a day but for the rest of my life that I can have what I want? How to not fall into someone after 2 weeks of dating and screw up because of that?

I have beed motivated by the last failure and I ditched online dating today. Going into the field trying my first cold approaches today. Any advice/books/useful thoughts will be greatly appreciated.

Take care everyone!",seduction
Corey Wayne and Todd Valentine are the keys to doing this right,"I am a student of both Corey and Todd. Corey for relationships, and dates, Todd for pickup. I used simple pickup, I used RSD, and now Todd and I highly recommend Todd. I  have read David Deta (however you spell his last name) and many other books.

I am not going to sell you too hard on these guys but I will say this. I have read Coreys book 3% man 30 times. I have watched many of his youtube videos. I have gone on a bootcamp with Todd, and have his product The System. They helped me tremendously. I am a human trafficking survivor. My parents from my birth till when I escaped at 11 used to sell me for sex. Once they where found out, they killed themselves. I had a terrible time for many years of my life relating to people. Dating was super hard because more than anything I wanted to be loved. I wanted people to care about me and when you grow up without love, without proper nurturing, learning it properly as an adult is very challenging. 

&amp;#x200B;

What both teach is hard to adopt, or at least it was for me. I see people bashing corey and I see it from a lack of effort on their part. In order to really benefit from both Corey and Todd you must fully adopt what they teach. In order to do that you must overwhelm yourself with immersion. I read coreys book 30 times. I listen to it at least once every 2 months. I watch a few of coreys videos every night before bed. I go out and practice Todd at least a few times a week. You must fully change your nature. I don't mean your personality  I mean your habits, your self talk and that especially for people like me with such a hole to overcome, it takes a tremendous amount of effort. 

&amp;#x200B;

Take care uses these resources and get results.",seduction
[Self-reflect] Recognize and disengage when she's not interested,"This comes as a response from that post about ""shit tests."" I acknowledge there's all types of girls and some may test you. However, I do hope everyone realizes that there is the **possibility that it is a polite rejection** and does not necessarily and automatically means that ""she's a bit interested in me."" 

&amp;#x200B;

So as a way to self-reflect and to prevent this place from becoming an echo chamber and yourself from being a ""creeper"" who can't take a hint, I'd like to ask:

1. When have you realized or can tell she's truly not interested in you? And that she wants you to leave her alone.
2. How have you disengaged when you realize she's not interested?
3. When she has told you, ""I'm not interested,"" what is your go to response?

I think it's important to recognize when someone is testing you or when someone is truly not interested. Understand that there is the possibility that you may not be able to change her mind and the possibility that she doesn't want to be your friend. So this post is to reflect how you've reacted and how you should have reacted.",seduction
How to play it long distance,"Met this girl in a club on the weekend, thanks to the advice on this subreddit probably, I managed to keep her interested and chasing after me most of the night. Ended up kissing and grinding a lot on the dancefloor despite me not really doing that anymore since girls seem to disappear after they get their validation from a bit of kissing.

Anyway I managed to set up a date for the next night, nothing big just drinks because she had to leave early the next day to go back to college - and here’s the catch its 160 miles or a 3 hour drive away

So basically I know a relationship isn’t really on the cards but I feel like I got on really well with this girl and want to keep her interested so was wondering if theres any advice. The sidebar has text game tips but nothing about if you wont be able to see or set up a meet for months at a time.

Also she’s hinted at me coming up to visit her at college a few times, is it going to look really desperate if I accept and do the 3 hour drive just to see her or should I wait until she’s back in town at xmas?",seduction
The Ultimate Guide To Passing Shit Tests (this should be easy),"Shit tests are awesome!

I'm so happy when a girl throws a shit test at me, because it means she's a bit interested in me. 

It also gives me a chance to show secure, grounded, quick-witted and self-confident I am.

Below is a quick explanation of why girls give shit tests - and an ultimate guide to becoming incredible as passing them.

# Why do girls give shit tests?

Shit tests show a woman whether this confidence you're portraying is the real deal. 

You won't see berating a homeless man who tries to speak to her. Nor will she even give the time of day to a super-creepy chode in the club (unless they've been really mean or she's a psychopath) 

If she's taken the time to be mean to you, it usually means she  interested in learning more about you. 

Better get good at passing these tests then...

# How to overcome shit tests 

There are four main ways to pass shit tests. 

These are:

1. Agree and exaggerate

2. Disagree outrageously 

3. Misinterpret sexually

4. Complete ignore.

For pick-up veterans, I'll throw in a slightly more complicated fifth...

5. Anything that it's in your frame, not hers. 

&amp;#x200B;

**Let's demonstrate how these work using some shit tests I got on the beach today.** 

&amp;#x200B;

*""Oh my god, you're really pale.""*

1. So pale. Like a ghost. Sometimes I think I'm see-through. Can you even see me? 

2. What you on about? I got mistaken for an African-American earlier.

3. Checking out my body already? We've known each other five minutes.   

4. NEVER MIND...so anyway... (This is my go-to for most shit tests in nightgame haha)

5. Yeah, I'd really like to be South American. Wouldn't that be cool?

&amp;#x200B;

*""Oh my god, you look really old.""*

1. Yeah, I'm old enough to be your dad. Call me Daddy...  

2. What you on about? I just turned 18

3. Yeah, I'm just about legal if you wondering...

4. NEVER MIND...so anyway

5. Yeah, my dog is even older than me. He's 12, which is 144 in dog years. 

# How to become incredible at passing shit tests

I've been to pick-up seminars where the instructor paired us up and made us do shit test drills for 30 minutes straight. 

There's no reason why you can't do this with your wingman as you're heading into the field...

The chances are that your going to get the same shit tests again and again, depending on what you look like. 

You should be able to reply to these with any of the 5 methods SUPER-FAST.   

EVERYONE will also experience these classic shit tests at the club. 

* *""We're lesbians.""*
* *""Its girls night.""*
* *""I have a boyfriend.""*
* *""You're only looking for sex.""*
*  *""We're not having sex tonight.""*
* *""Only if you buy me a drink.""* 
* *""I don't give my number out to strangers.""*

If you don't have ready-made answers to all of these before you hit the field, **WHAT ARE YOU DOING BRO???** This is like baseball players turning up without those big brown gloves. 

You fail - or even stumble over these - and you're done. So it's worth practicing...  

Treat game like a sport and passing shit tests as your defence. It'll serve you well.  

***I co-launched a Telegram group for men who want to become amazing with women. Hundreds of lads discussing their goals and sticking points. Drop me a PM with your Telegram handle if you'd like to join.***",seduction
"I'm always confident/sexual at first, then feel as if I become needy... tips?","So I'm not great at game, but I've definitely improved since I lost my virginity a few years ago. 

There is still one thing I'm having trouble with that seems to never go away. 

I will be confident/assertive with a woman at first, very sexual on tinder, etc... but then after we hang out/bang a few more times, I feel like I become needy. I start thinking about how much we have in common. I start thinking things like ""oh this a perfect date idea, she'll love this"" or ""I hope I actually see her again"" etc. Then I start feeling anxious around said girl, and feel like I just can't be myself, like my confidence completely diminishes. I agree with everything they say, and it's like I'm a child trying to behave obediently for my teacher or something.

I kept a girl around for a good 4 months by strictly meeting up only for sex, nothing else. But when I try doing more than that, taking them on dates, etc, it goes seemingly nowhere. 

I feel as if I may be over investing too quickly. It's like I either keep it extremely minimal with contact solely for sex, or I end up over investing, trying to do ""coupley"" things and pushing them away. I think the fact that I don't hang out with many people and socialize other than at work is probably playing a part as well. After we have sex, I'm always worried they just will ghost me after. So I'll sleepover, take them out for breakfast, we'll spend the entire next day together.. all this with a girl I've only been on 2 dates or so with.

What are some tips on maintaining a sexual relationship without being too pushy/available/eager?",seduction
What to do when you didn’t made a move on a girl and she lost her interest in you?,Most of the time i’m going to the same club in my small town. Some girls gave me very obvious signs that they liked me. Staring at me all the time and even approached me after staring. I was so akward back then and fucked it up big time. So this happened multiple times that i didn’t made a move on them. Now the same girls don’t even look at me anymore. If i think about i now i have so much regret. There were like 8/9’s. Is there any way to get them interested in me again? ,seduction
rebooting my game at a festival Showgrounds (field report),"Hey Seddit. It's probably been months since I've tired any cold approaches or closes. I've strung up lots of conversations here and there with random girls since my few successes earlier in the year. 

Today I was at a Showgrounds festival type event and saw one of the most gorgeous girls I've ever seen. She had some amazing studio ghibili tattoos and killer purple/pink hair so I opened by complimenting her tattoos and led the discussion from there (I also have tattoos). She was with her mum who was a carer for a disabled guy so I was being mindful of that (also politely recognising them to try feel like I'm not isolating her too much). The conversation flowed easily and I made her laugh. Her and her mum were about to move so after she said it was great meeting me I simply said it would be cool to hand and if I could have her number and she was happy to give it to me. I also commonly forget a girls name when I've asked it during a conversation - so I have a little trick I like to use by playfully asking them what they want to be saved in my phone and what emoji they want (really I just don't wanna admit I forgot haha) and it works really well. 

I sent her a quick text later on as I was leaving saying it was great chatting and thanks for the tattoo artist reccomendations and hope she enjoyed the rest of the show. No reply yet - so I later attempted to give her a call as I was about to head home ( was gonna see if she'd be down to grab some food or something near by) but she didn't answer. Hoping she didn't give me a fake number, not that I really mind. I was just happy to act on my instinct for once in a long time and hold a conversation. Always remembering that we win just by approaching! Still riding a little high

Hope you're all having an awesome day :) ",seduction
The ‘ol coffee shop scenario,"I’ve been casually looking at this subreddit but it seems like I might need a deeper dive because yesterday I was in a perfectly stereotypical coffee shop scenario.

Facing each other at different tables, a really pretty girl was doing her own work and I was doing mine. We never exactly made eye contact, but if a small child was running by or some commission would be happening I’d often look up and towards the action, and she would sort of follow that. Probably not to follow me, but that was the closest we made to any sort of contact.

So time to make fun of me for failing here! When sitting across, how can I make my move? I feel getting up and walking over may take too long and be intimidating. I don’t want to stare to make eye contact. How would you proceed next time around?",seduction
What to do if winging and the girl clearly goes for you?,What's the etiquette in this case?,seduction
How to get her interested once you go up to her - day game,"So I know the usual where you pretend to ask for directions. Tell her you just thought she was really pretty and didn’t actually need directions. Then talk a little and then say you gotta go but try to get her number. 

I don’t know what to talk about that would get her interested. Do I compliment on her looks or her shoes or some accessory? Maybe I just ask her how her day was? I just don’t know what to talk about in that 30 seconds to a minute to make her want to continue seeing me and drop me her number. ",seduction
How to ask a girl for her number,"Most of the guys I coach want to know what’s the best way to ask a girl for her number. Are you one of them? If so then this guide’s for you, dude. Enjoy! But first things first let me tell you:
 
**The huge mistake most guys make when asking for a girl’s number**
 
The mistake that most guys make is awkwardly waiting until the end of the conversation to ask rather than doing it spontaneously. They spend the entire chat with that fateful question burning away in the back of their brains before timidly blurting it out just before they part ways with the girl. Now this is bad for a few reasons:
 
**1 - It makes the girl think your entire reason for talking to her was to get her number**
 
Girls don’t like it when they think you have a hidden agenda behind anything you do with them. They don’t like the tiniest whiff of that notion to be honest. Any time a girl gets the impression that there’s something going on behind the scenes with you that they don’t know about, they’ll usually assume the worse and extricate themselves from the situation.
 
**2 - It turns it into this big, scary, and uncomfortable thing**

If there’s one thing most women can’t stand, it’s awkward situations, and most will do anything they can to avoid them.  By waiting until the end of the conversation to awkwardly bring up swapping details you’re letting her know that this is something you’re uncomfortable with. That in turn will make her feel uncomfortable too and her gut reaction will be to bail or reject you. One thing to remember when you’re dealing with girls is that they’re only ever going to be as at ease with you as you are with yourself and the situation at hand. If you’re nervous about asking for her number then don’t expect her to be comfortable with giving it to you. Finally, girls are attracted to confidence so anything you do that implies insecurity isn’t going to set her heart on fire.
 
Asking her halfway through the conversation is basically what you’d do if you weren’t so scared or nervous. You’d just be having fun with her and then say ‘Hey, let’s hang out sometime.’ She’d say yeah, then you’d swap numbers, and go right back to the fun. Any time you’ve swapped numbers with a guy it was most likely a situation just like that. Something cool, easy, and free from pressure. Anyway, here’s a step by step guide to asking for her number in a way that will make her give it to you.
 
**Step 1 – Tell her you’d like to hang out at a high point in the convo**

When the conversation is at a high point, like you’ve just said something funny or made a really insightful comment that’s she’s reacted well to, that’s when you’re gonna drop it. Like I said earlier, say ‘Hey, we should hang out some time.’ Don’t ask if she’d like to hang out, assume that she will. Trust me, that confidence will be very attractive. Maybe she’ll throw up some sort of resistance by saying that she doesn’t give her number out to people she doesn’t really know, but if she does, that’s only a shit test and should be treated as such.
 
Crack a joke about how she’ll be completely safe because you’re now a reformed man who’s put his stalking days well behind him and she’ll likely laugh and say ‘OK then!’ Just remember that none of this is a big deal. It’s all fun and games and you’re not taking any of it too seriously. You’re not invested in the outcome at all, you’re just having fun in the moment and spreading good vibes.
 
Anyway, when she does agree to swap numbers that will move us onto:
 
**Step 2 – Give her your phone for her to put her number in**
 
Now as I said just above, when you do this, it’s imperative that you have an air about you that seems like this isn’t a big deal at all. Remember that if you’re uncomfortable then she’ll be uncomfortable too. Give her your phone, tell her to put her number in and then look away while she does it. This isn’t anything stressful, it’s a very casual, very normal, very regular part of your conversation. If you want, you can take her phone and put your number in too. (For special bonus points you can save it as something funny like ‘Sex Machine’ which will give her a huge laugh when you text her).
 
**Step 3 – Go right back to having fun immediately afterwards**

If I haven’t said this before, let me say it now. Getting her number isn’t this big, scary, and stressful occurrence. It’s a natural expression of the fun you guys were already having together. So with that in mind, for the love of all that’s good and holy, go right back to having fun as soon as it’s done. This way she’ll feel at ease and comfortable with giving you her details and not like she’s been dragged into anything weird.
 
**Extra bonus step – Use callback humour when you eventually message her**

Callback humour is something comedians do. The idea is that you say something funny which makes the audience laugh and then reference it again for extra chuckles later on in the set, and you’re going to do exactly that when you text this girl. Let’s say for instance that during your conversation with her you said, ‘I’m the undisputed Emperor of Japan! All hail the emperor of Japan!’, then when you message her, you’re gonna say something like “This is the Emperor of Japan and you will kneel before me!’
 
Assuming she found it funny when you first said it, then calling back to it when you message her will remind her of the great time she had with you, get her laughing again and almost certainly have her responding.
 
As Bugs Bunny once said: ‘That’s all folks!’ You probably think this guide was a bit simplistic and low on technical knowledge but the truth is that asking a girl for her number is actually a pretty simple thing to do. We as guys tend to put unnecessary pressure on ourselves and end up making what should be a fun and easy interaction into something uncomfortable. Take care and put this info to good use.
 
 **I’m always looking to connect with guys who are passionate about self improvement. Hit me up with a DM if that’s you.**",seduction
How to escalate if i have no interest in oral sex at all,I dont ever want to have it brought up on me,seduction
Shit test practice thread,"Passing shit-tests are probably one of the few areas you should have some sort of prepared material ready for in game. Just like a job interview you need to be able to respond quickly  and calculated when put under pressure. To help with this, it’s a good idea to have some general prepared answers to stop you stuttering and messing up on the spot. So let’s practice some responses to common shit tests.

I’ll start by posting some:

1) I bet you say that to every girl?

2) I have a boyfriend 

3) Give me your number and I’ll call you 

4) (if approaching solo) where are your friends? 

5) why are you talking to me? 

",seduction
Anyone used paid dating apps such as Match.com?,"Just wondering if anyone has any experience using these apps? 

It obviously won’t be my main means of meeting girls (currently doing a 30 day challenge where I have to approach 3 new girls a day).

However, I do want to cast my net wide and meet some higher quality girls compared to tinder. Tinder has served me well over the years for ONS, but as someone who now has my focus on my career (I’m late 20’s), I’ve realised it’s just a massive time sink, for very little meaningful gain. I’d seriously rather just spend 10 mins jerking it then hours trying to pull 5/6 off tinder, and all the other risks that go with it. ",seduction
Going out with multiple women you like at the same time.,"So I am invited to an event with several women I work with.  2 of them in particular that I really like are both single and related to each other.  They both flirt with me and they are close friends with another woman I flirt with a lot... So I'm not dating anyone and I'm not really sure what I should do.  It feels a little awkward to me, but I'm hoping its a good problem.  I just feel like it could create some weird dynamics I suppose if something happened, but they are definitely some of the coolest women I know. 

&amp;#x200B;

Anyone have any advice?  Greatly appreciated ",seduction
Why I stopped using Tinder and online dating," I am an average looking guy. About 6’2”, fit body and OK features – so maybe a little better than most, but clearly not enough for most girls to care about online. The truth about apps like Tinder is that ALL of the girls are swiping right on the best looking guys. And unless you’re in that tiny percentage.. you basically get NOTHING or the scraps that nobody else wants. I used to underestimate how competitive and cutthroat online dating has become, not anymore. I had a hard time matching with even average looking girls, so I can’t imagine how a guy who is seriously outside the ideal would fare. It occurred to me that women can get laid any time they want with basically whoever they want. So why would she choose an average guy if she can do so much better? I know what I would do if the shoe was on the other foot! Online dating is for attractive people, and if you aren’t attractive you are fucked. That is the truth. And no amount of game or anything else can change that reality; it just doesn’t make sense from a hot girl’s point of view to go with an average guy.

But here’s the thing. Every man has their initiative to change and approach the women they want. You can always try. And if you aren’t the ideal, you just have to try harder! You need to put even more work into yourself to be at the girl’s level, because that’s just how things work. There IS such a thing called leagues and some people objectively are higher status than others at least through this limited social lens. There is no way to avoid it and people will do everything to deny it, but it’s there. The other side is that most guys, objectively, don’t even deserve to be with a high quality woman. It’s like expecting to walk into any job or start a business and be guaranteed success. It just doesn’t work that way. 

I realized all of this about myself and accepted the hard truth that most women aren’t attracted to me and most likely never will be, purely based on appearances. And I believe this truth to be universal unless you have that particular genetic advantage. 

None of this was meant to be a sob story, but as an acknowledgement of the truth that looks DO matter, and that game is really just learning social skills. Those skills will absolutely give you an edge but they won’t reliably flip a girl around who isn’t interested.. and that’s always going to be the biggest incompatibility with the women you meet. Game is meant to lubricate the social interaction from meet to close, meaning you know what the fuck you’re doing. But if she’s not interested, she won’t even be receptive to your game; she has already given you her answer!

I will say one thing though, and that I have always hooked up with the best looking women in real life, who I met usually in daytime during pretty mundane situations. This is the edge you do develop to push your attractiveness over her threshold, and you might be more likely than others to close her based on doing cold approach regularly and going on lots of dates. Beyond that, the world is a very competitive place, especially for something as desirable and limited as very attractive women. There are cute girls everywhere yes, but the hottest girls are in actual scarcity. So if you are disadvantaged already and want those girls.. you had best be something special otherwise why would she bother? This isn’t pedestalling by the way. At this point I am close to 30 and have seen it all. I’m not saying you should believe women are better or should be worshiped, I’m only pointing out the economics of the dating market that are already obvious to anyone who does this in the real world. Anyone telling you that your looks, race, age, height, body type, job, etc.. don’t matter is probably trying to sell you on something else… like a video product that costs $300.

All a man can do is live with dignity and try as best he can. For most, this is enough.",seduction
depression feeling when seeing hot girls,"When I'm with my family I always see really hot girls. Today I was in a restaurant, like 3 different times I see girls who look 18, 10/10. I just look at them and make eye contact, it feels so weird. It feels like its so far off for me to be in a relationship with them, so I just think about how them walking past made me feel. I start to get depressed as they walk by. Keep in mind, these girls are perfect looking which is why I have such a huge reaction. 

The feeling I get is hard to explain, I feel like something is weighing me down but it feels good at the same time. Ive never seen girls like this when Im out approaching, and I have no idea what it would be like to talk to them. It sounds lame but surely someone will understand, I can talk to 7-8's normally too. Im 20 years old btw, and Ive never had a girlfriend.",seduction
Practicing - have I cheated getting this girls number?,"Alright guys. I had a rough last week with girls and I’m trying to go back to the smooth guy I was in high school. I think I ruined my shot with this girl.

I met a hot girl in class, very shy. We had a group project and I thought “what a great opportunity to practice approaching.” I’m about to approach her when my friend screams for me. I dismiss her and as I turn around, she’s gone. I go to my next class, have that, and I find her again. I went up to her and said, “Kayla, right? Hey, you wouldn’t by chance want to be in my group, would you?” She said sure. I followed by saying “great, give me your number” as I handed her my phone. For me, approaching without hesitation and demanding the number was huge. 

But according to my friend, I’ve cheated myself by being indirect. As he put it, by asking for her number for the group project, I’ve wasted my time because now I have to invest more energy to showing my real intentions. Have I butchered this? If not, how do I recover? If so, what are some other openers I should be trying on college girls while I’m finding it easy to approach hot girls?",seduction
I'm overweight and not as charming as I'd like to be,"I've had a few girlfriends before, all of them loved my sense of humor.

I feel weird at nightclubs. Not as energetic, not as attractive as other guys. I can't be humorous as I'm overthinking.

I know that I'm an amazing catch, but feel like I'm seriously outdone by any other guy at the club.

How do I improve? Approaching girls doesn't seem to help as I feel I'm constantly fighting an upstream battle where I have to impress",seduction
How to make myself go out and approach?,"I have no one to push me to do it, I don't have many friends and my social life sucks now. 

I know my only solution is to start cold approaching girls. It's hard for me to do it on my own and I also have only 2 places I could cold approach in (small city..).

I'm going to the army in 2 months and I know if I will start cold approaching at-least 1 girl every day my life will be changed in terms of my personality and who I want to be. But I just can't get myself to do it! 

&amp;#x200B;

Would love to get some help from someone",seduction
How to notice the little things about her? (Potentially very powerful),"I’ve never paid for a pickup course but recently I did something kind of comparable to that by taking a ‘relating’ course. Essentially this is sex positive feminist women (and men) teaching you how to communicate with women. There was a time when I would’ve scoffed at anything like this, assuming women don’t know shit about game because they have no outside conception of what picking them up is like. But I learned some interesting stuff. 

One thing that came up a LOT was the value of paying attention, and paying attention really seems like the secret to all this shit when you look at it. All the problems we run into whether it’s social anxiety or running out of things to talk about seem to stem from being too self involved, inwardly focused etc. Being present and unfiltered and all that RSD stuff is really just paying attention to the moment. 

Anyway, I was getting a lot from this training and was excited to do a course on attention, noticing etc when out of nowhere the company eliminated classes to focus on one on one training. Only that costs an insane amount of money which I don’t have. So basically I’ve dipped my toe into this very insightful pool of knowledge only to have it suddenly move out of my reach. 

How would you guys, especially those who practice meditation etc, recommend cultivating greater attention within game? How would you go about “noticing those little things about her most men miss”? ",seduction
"HUGE IOIs but I don't know what to do with them, also Fear of Intimacy Field Report","So brief background I'm a 22 year old kissless virgin. Social anxiety, awkward af, fear of intimacy, the works. What I do have going for me is that I'm good looking and naturally kind of polarizing and douchey, especially now that I have the proper micro behaviors internalized (laser eye contact, good body language, quick quips and push-pulls etc. etc.). Basically I can build attraction very easily if I'm in the zone but that's as far as I can get right now.

**Field Report**

Last night at the bar a blonde 7 comes up and sits next to me and my friend, and I immediately start throwing teases. She tries to act offended and comes out blazing with shit tests. I pass them all with flying colors and she gets massively into me and starts asking if I have a gf and if I think she's hot and all this stuff. I blow it off and say ""*You're cute but you're not really my type. You and I wouldn't get along anyway.*"" (BTW that old school 'we wouldn't get along' shit is fire. I couldn't believe how effective that line was). Then I try to sarcastically convince her that I'm gay and we'll have to just be shopping buddies and all this stuff. She calls my bluff and this is my excuse to stand up and show her my awesome rainbow belt buckle.

Once I'm up next to her we exchange a few more back and forths and then she grabs my arm and pulls me in really close to her. Every so often in our conversation she puts a hand on my face and says I'm funny/hot/etc. Intimacy is new to me so I struggle to maintain my frame as I'm filled with joy. I want to reciprocate the physical escalation but being the awkward dude I am I'm too timid to do it and don't know how anyway. Then I remember (for the first time ever) I need to be screening for logistics. I ask her who she's here with and she says her friends and that her boyfriend is at home. I've learned the hard way to not get all serious and be like ""*Wait, you have a boyfriend? Wtf?*"" so I just say ""*Dope*."" and change the subject.

We're probably 15 minutes into the conversation now and I've dialed back the polarizing snarky comments. In past sets I've done the douchebag shtick for way too long and found out that girls only want so much of it before they get bored and start losing interest. So lately I've been doing 100% ""*OMG he said that?!*"" douchebag for the first 10 minutes or so and then I let off the gas and coast down to like 20% douche, just enough to keep their attraction consistently topped off throughout the set. At one point she says ""*You're so mean! Insult me again; I'm not scared; what's the best you got?*"" and I go ""*You couldn't handle the best I got*"" and she responds ""*I couldn't handle your dick!*""

....It's funny, I've watched all these pickup videos on how to steer the conversation sexual and how girls have anti-slut defense and all this stuff so it never occurred to me that they'll drop explicitly sexual lines like that. Like it wasn't just an Indicator of Interest, it was a fucking DECLARATION of Interest. So I'm kind of stunned and just reply ""*Well yeah that goes without saying.*"" I know to not get excited at blatant intent because it would reveal me as inexperienced but I also don't know how to capitalize on it. It sounds really dumb because the girl is just giving me what I want on a silver platter but I don't know how to handle it.

Her friends show up, and I've lost an in-to-me girl twice now to friends, so I quickly react and say ""*Introduce me to your friends!*"" before they can steal her attention from me. She does, and I try to befriend them. There's like 6 or 7 of them and I make them laugh a couple times but it becomes obvious pretty quickly that they're not cool with us hitting it off. I assume this is because:

A) She's too overtly into me in public and

B) She has a fucking boyfriend lol

They start trying to pull her away to the dance floor and she suggests I come dance with her but I don't really want to because I'm nervous about it. Now in my defense I laughed it off and said ""*Nah I'm too white, I can't dance. This is the only move I got.*"" and proceeded to do a goofy dance in front of her. Since her logistics were god awful I should have just gotten her number right there and said I'll hit you up later tonight, but hindsight is 20/20.

This is where it gets really dumb guys, and I mean **seriously fucking DUMB**, so feel free to laugh at me. She puts both hands on the back of my neck, pulls me in so close that I can see the slight fluctuations in her pupil size (which is absolutely heavenly), and says ""*Wanna kiss me?*"" And....I just shake my head no....even though I totally wanted to. I could feel the adrenaline flow and my body freeze. I just couldn't.

Again, I laugh this off and say ""*Sorry but you're still in my screening process. I don't know how dangerous you are.*"" This is half to avoid revealing that I'm horrified of messing up the kiss and embarrassing myself (because I literally don't know how to do it) and half because I don't want to hurt her feelings or make her feel rejected. I throw some more stuff out there like ""*You're actually kind of cute. You're starting to win me over.*"" to make sure it didn't make her feel bad. She bums a cigarette off me and we drunkenly converse for a few more minutes about random shit I don't remember.

Her friends pull her away while she's still talking to me and that was pretty much a wrap. I saw her again from a distance a few times, smiling at me, but we didn't talk anymore after that.

I understand on a logical level that I should have just kissed her, even if it sucked, for the experience. Gotta start somewhere and it might as well have been there. But on an emotional level it's scary. And very hard to push through.

All in all it was really fun though. Some highlights were her squeezing her breasts in front of me, yelling ""*You're awesome!*"" &amp; ""*I love you!*"" repeatedly, the constant hands on me, and the nonstop eye contact. God we must've looked in each others' eyes for half an hour. It was great. My favorite part was at one point letting her trail off talking and looking at her in silence for a few seconds, tension building, then simply saying ""*You're silly.*"" She reacted stronger to that than anything else I said. Her face just lit up and she was uncontrollably happy. It was so cool to have that effect on someone.

\--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

So I'm mostly just writing to get that off my chest since I'm still reeling from that fun set but I'd be happy to hear feedback and stories, especially from guys who've gone through similar sticking points. 

**How did you push through the body-stiffening adrenaline when it was time to kiss?** 

**How did you win over the protective friends?**

**Any general tips on being physical when you're timid?**

In summary I've been getting really good at getting IOIs out of girls but I don't know how to behave for the rest of the interaction past the ""*okay she's attracted*"" part.",seduction
How to get girls while traveling,,seduction
wow how stupid was this....i suck i,"the context: me, a 24 year old stoner slacker minimum wage worker virgin until i was 22 returning to school after a 3 year gap year. also, i can still pass for a freshman. thanx genetics!

the setting:

me in library computer lab, sitting real cool-like, body language says i'm the coolest cat in town

hot girl walks up, i swing my eyes over, they meet hers, wham bam shazam and LOCKED

...because she proceeds to sit down right next to me

she sits there kinda just idling on the pc for a bit, can tell she's breathing a bit differently

i chill and wait to see if she says anything

she says nothing (OF COURSE SHE SAYS NOTHING, IM THE GUY I AM SUPPOSED TO MAKE THE FUCKING MOVE)

anyways she finishes her shit in a bit and leaves

leaving me to curse myself and the weird autist shit that is being the hard case newbie

&amp;#x200B;

but i am getting closer, my magnetism is growing

i can feel it

trying to keep fighting the good fight bros ...

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
Needing serious help with motivation,"I’m about to graduate college here soon. My freshman and sophomore year here were very good to me and I was not only meeting new girls but I was also actively pursuing and trying to be more than just friends with them with success. 
Junior year was alright for me.
The first senior year was awful. Barely met anyone new. Never met anyone and actually got anywhere but friends with them. 

I’m in my second senior year right now and I’m dying to meet someone and actually get somewhere with them. I’m tired of just being on my own and after the past year I just can’t make a serious move with a girl. I can talk to girls that I know but meeting someone new needs to be happening with me. Even with the girls I do know I’m just driving myself further into the friend zone and it just hurts. I don’t know what’s gotten into me but my whole motivation and drive just isn’t there anymore. I’m in college and there’s so many people to talk to and I can’t push myself like I used to

Any ideas? Tips? Motivation? 
Thanks ",seduction
"Two Chicks, IOIs given but Same Classroom. Wwyd?","First one is chick(A) that sits next to me in class.  We have had great conversations and I have thrown my game here and there, what I am missing is to invite her out I think as she always stays with me.  Because i don’t want to fall in the friendzone and caught another chick(B) looking at me(noticed it, held the eye contact till she looked back and smiled) I sat next to chick B to see whats up.  Because of this, chick A passed by me and didn’t say a word(guess jealous?) so I brushed it off and kept talking to Chick B as she was helping me study for a test.  Tomorrow I go to this class.  What would you do to either get either 1, both or not fuck up and loose both?",seduction
Is the advice outline in this video useful or complete garbage?,,seduction
How to catch a cougar in New Mexico:,"I am going to Albuquerque, New Mexico in a few days as a graduation present from my aunt. I told her I love to hike and would like to go see the mountains as softer way of telling her I am probably going to go ditch her for 8 hours one day to go into the wild. She interpreted this differently and has arranged for one of her friends to go hiking with me (as if I, a young man, need an old woman to help me go hiking, if anything an old woman would need my help). 

I looked at her facebook and there are no pictures of a ring, or a husband. Furthermore, my aunt tells me that after the hike, Im going to have to shower at her place. This seems like a good opportunity to strike ""fuck a cougar"" off the list. I am in my 20s, she is in her 50s.

I am writing this post in the hopes of starting a discussion about the seduction of older women. Suggested tactics and stories are VERY welcome. Perhaps a pattern of successful tactics and courses of action will arise.",seduction
"Is being too aggressive on a date, lowers my chance for a second?","I went to a date last with a bumble match.  I’ve been on a roll with girls lately.  We had a lot of fun!  I k-closed, feel her up try to get my hands underneath the blouse twice but she didn’t want that.  I was going for f-close.

Before we left she told she was going to be busy this weekend (wedding).  She is the professional type did an MBA (I’m doing an MBA I. The same school, so we have that in common).  She also mentioned that she’s selective and we live in a relative small town so she might not have tons of options.

Since she was going to be busy I waited until today to hit her up.  She hasn’t replied my text.  I’ve noticed she takes a while to respond, so that might be the way she operates.  While using bumble sometimes she would take a day.  

Still I’m beginning to question **if I moved to fast and she thinks I just want sex?**  My plan was to meet her again for dinner and show a little more of my serious side.

EDIT: she texted today.  She said this was going anywhere and I’m ok with that.  She’s 31 seem to be very serious and by the book (doesn’t drink, goes to bed at 9).  I’m 34 but living young and trying to still have fun.  I got a day date today, Thursday and possibly during the weekend with different girls.  **And even though I’m disappointed I didn’t get the f-close it is still a good lessons learned.  Even though normal game (I was witty, confident, funny) didn’t work with this particular person, I should’ve perhaps calibrated, it was a good experience.  Thanks for all the messages and whoever downvoted :D.**",seduction
How to get friendzoned on purpose?,"How should one approach ladies to get friendzoned from start on purpose?

The motivation to get friendzoned is to have hot female friends you can hang out with at bars and parties, to talk with about dating/relationships and they might also introduce you to other hot ladies.",seduction
How do I tell me girlfriend to stay home,"My school throws this big party every year and this year I was given the title as host so it will be at my house, my question is my girlfriend comes to this party every year we don’t go to the same school but she’s come every year. this year I want her to stay home what’s the best way to tell her to not come after she already took off ",seduction
Instagram game?,"What is the best ways to show high value through instagram, apart from social proofing? Is there some cool activities that you can show off on instagram that is attractive?",seduction
Tips to closing out a 1v2 situation?,"I'm not talking a threesome. I think we can all agree that requires a few stars to align. 

I've been traveling for awhile now, and while I've had some success, I still struggle to escalate sexually in situations where I'm hanging out with 2 girls (friends) and no wing. 

I'm in that situation again now. They are both cute but I prefer the blonde one. So far I've just been friendly, the escalating is hard.

I've had one success in a situation of two girls traveling together. In that situation I started talking almost exclusively to the one I was into, and the other one was making very obvious ""go for it"" looks to her friend so I got lucky that time. The friend even isolated herself from us later on, lol.

Right now I'm thinking I'll just try to be flirty with both when it's appropriate and initiate kino with the one I like.

Thoughts would be appreciated, cheers.",seduction
Failed first date (daygame),"Hi all, was wondering if this could be dissected. So I don't lose pussy again. Thx.

&amp;#x200B;

**Failed date:**   


Date was going smoothly. No clue what happend,  


1hr into first venue,  Light verbal escalation (she was receptive). Mostly comfort.  


Bounce to 2nd venue after 1hr and she decides to leave during bounce.  


(maybe I didn't escalate fast enough?)  


**Things that may have fucked it:**  


I said I'm 19 (I am), she's 27.   


Said  my place was a 15 min walk after she asked where I lived, and decided  to bounce shortly after (was intending to bounce to another bar, but she  may have thought I'm taking her to my place - sets off alarms?)

&amp;#x200B;

**etc**

&amp;#x200B;

she did say ""i'm looking to settle down"" but she stuck around for an  hour and was compliant to a bit of kino and all verbal escalation.   


Yes, she was willing to get fucked and I wasn't smooth enough. Guaranteed.  


Lessons learned:   


**Don't say the wrong things**  
**Escalate harder?**  
",seduction
Respect to you guys who do day game!,"I've only ever approached girls in bars and even that takes every ounce of my courage.

I had a job interview today and on the way back I got on the bus, and there were TWO absolute stunners. Like my idea of a '9' at least.

They were both really young though (about 17 I'd say. 16 is legal here no matter how old you are by the way so the age itself isn't an issue). I'm 26.

I just couldn't bring myself to open either of them and I feel so shitty now lol.

The one closest to me had ear buds in, and the one a few feet away just had this bitchy look on her face although I know that these are just weak excuses, because I know that even if the one near me wasn't earing ear buds, i'd still never have opened her!

I guess it was a mixture of ''If I open her and it get's weird fast, then we've got 10 mins stood next too each other of pure awkwardness!!''.

The age thing, although legal, also played a role. I just didn't want to look like a creep, I guess.

But man, I feel noticeable 'low' now! The were both just so gorgeous.

Even though it's all just theorising now, I guess it's best to have a rough 'plan' for each type of approach. For example, in a situation where you are 'locked in' and neiehter can just escape (such as public transport), maybe an 'indirect' opener would be best? should have asked the 1st what what she was listening too maybe, although that STILL just feels so over-familiar and 'weird' to my ears, even though that's likely just social conditioning! 

Grr.....I'll be thinking about them girls for a few days!

edit: It's mad how much NOT approaching some hot girl can hurt. I got a rejection last night at a bar when I opened a girl and she told me very soon that I wasn't her type and then she started flirting outrageously with the handsome barman, telling him how hot he was and asking for his number. Naturally made me feel crap, but this feels nearly as bad and my ego wasn't even hurt! Guess it's just being angry at yourself",seduction
Picking up girl from Singapur (infield + spanish captions),,seduction
Go to high distraction (salsa dancing) venue or more isolated venue on first date!?,"So I just started to taking (on Tinder) to this beautiful Canadian Ukrainian that just moved into town 1.5 months).  We hit it off pretty well talking back and forward, she’s very nice.

I first suggested a coffee date because I have possible dates laid out for the week + I go to school during the week.

Anyhow she said she would love to go salsa dancing (I’m Latino).  The deal with these salsa venues is that is normal to go with someone, but that occasionally people can ask girls out for a dance.

I’m just thinking there will be a lot competition she will stand out.  I’m pretty sure about this.  She’s model looking girl, and a mezzo soprano.  She’s not the cookie cutter girl.

How do I handle this?  I was thinking about taking her out drinking (which is my usual first date idea).  Should I comply with what she said or be the man and do what I want to do?",seduction
Eye contact is the single most effective way to create attraction,"Reminder: the eyes ARE the window to the soul. 

Your eyes, without the need to speak or do anything else, tell the person that is looking into them your entire status within seconds. 

Are you insecure? It shows instantly (Eyes avert, can't maintain)    
Are you dominant? It shows instantly (A more intimate stare)    
Are you kind? It shows instantly (Soft, accepting eyes)   
Are you attractive/Status/Ambitious/Alpha? It shows instantly 

The entire issue comes with creating a life that gives you for example, confidence, so that it shows naturally in your soul and thus in your eyes. But that's not what this post is for.
",seduction
I got this girls number but I hate texting is this too upfront?,"So I got this girls number and we didn’t talk much I just told her she was cute and I wanted her number. Anyways we talked for a bit and I found out her name and what school she goes too. Anyways this texting shit is really boring to me and I want to say something like, “Anyways I know this is kinda upfront but texting is really boring to me and you look like an interesting person I’d much rather get to know more about you on a date or some shit.” Does that sound too upfront?",seduction
Is it okay to ask a young girl her age?,"I was wondering, because I am at college, and some girls are under, thanks to Running Start.",seduction
"[FR] Tried to wing for a friend and ended driving the girl to her home, with kiss and a date.","A much younger friend and I were out, at a town fair, with other friends.

After a while his sister appears with an unknown girl, 20ish, thin, small, small tits, nice face, very extrovert, foreign, but speaking passably in our language.

Prety cute package all in all. 

After a while she seemed to be giving him IOIs, but he wasn't recognizing any of them. I stepped in and started to wing for him. I steered both in the other's directions, making sure I didn't show interest in her. Just having fun.

After a while they were on their own, dancing a bit and goofing around.

About an hour later she started to gravitate towards me. She got fairly drunk and while others were mixing around she insisted she was plastered and not feeling well, and practically begged me to take her home.

The drive was about 15 minutes, and in this time she just opened to me, as if I was a long time friend. 

She's an au pair, so going in the house wasn't an option, neither was going to my place and driving her back before morning,  so we kissed, and set a date for next Saturday.

As she was clearly impaired, and not comfortable, I didn't escalate beyond the kiss. No need to get into a potential non-consensual minefield. Plus I scored some points as a safe guy. 

One of the things she said, about my friend is that he was all over her, she used the expression ""so needy"", and how he was too touchy.

Takeaways from this:

If a girl smells the slightest whiff of over investment or neediness, you are screwed.

Have fun on your own, women will want a piece of the fun. 

Calibrate kino. It's a fine line


I was the eldest in the group, had gone with no expectations whatsoever in regards to women, so I was just enjoying the party, clinking glasses with everyone, paying for a couple of rounds for the gang, and generally just being jovial. I'm certain this attitude made me attractive to the women, a challenge if you will. Another girl, there with her boyfriend, kept locking eyes with me, but the last thing I'd want in that situation was to start a potential conflict. 

Be the fun rock in a group, do your best to seem the guy with the strongest frame, divide your attention among the various women, engage in constant, light, push-pull with all of them. Normally one or two of them will try to capitalize on your attention. When that happens, let them escalate. When that happens take the lead. 

If a woman gives you extra attention, don't be all over her. Dish out your attention in small morsels, she'll be piqued and push forward. 

I'm not very sure about the etiquette of being a wing and taking the girl, but seeing how my friend had totally shot his chances, I figured I might see if I'd make something out of the situation. 

Note: besides all the things mentioned, I'm the fairly ""hot dad"" type, and this girl seemed to have daddy issues, so that may have made her gravitate towards me. We'll see next Saturday how it pans out with less alcohol involved. ",seduction
Schema Therapy. Has anyone done it? What’s your opinion?,"I watched a video posted in this subreddit about 5 days ago. Towards the end of the video, the guy mentioned reading about Schema Therapy. What are your opinions about this? Does it help with pick up? What was your experience with the therapy?",seduction
INSTANT Date W/Girl @the mall (day game Infield breakdown),,seduction
I really hate asking for advice but I would like some opinions on this,"So, about a month ago I was feeling stressed so I decided to do some work from a bar I like to go to. Bar was closed so started driving around town and found one of those bars known for scantily clad waitresses. I figured I'd stop there. I just wanted a drink and to be around people for a bit. 

Walk in. Place is kind of crowded so I sit at this weird table facing the hostess station. 

My server comes over and takes my orders. She's really cute and friendly. All the servers are cute at a minimum. Great bodies. Nice eye candy. And I can see them all from my seat. So that kind of wakes me up. Something sparks up and I start talking to the waitresses. They come over and talk with me. Sit with me. Go away come back. It felt good. It felt good to have some feminine attention. I had a good time. 

I don't want to make this post too long but to make a long story short over the course of the last month I've gone back a lot. Probably too much. I think I'm a regular now. The waitresses know my name. Supposedly they talk about me a bit and wonder if I'm coming in. With the different servers I feel like there are different levels of authentic attraction. I have some of their numbers. They have mine. There's been a few texts and some talk about getting together outside of the bar. 

Lunch with one. Smoke out with another. Coffee with a third. Maybe do some shrooms with a fourth. And there's a couple more I want to get to know better. 

The funny thing is not only are these ladies gorgeous. They're funny, smart, kind, and impressive. With some there's more flirtation. More touch. Some come and sit with me just about the whole time I'm there. I don't feel like it's just them doing their job. But who knows...

so here's where I need advice. I know for sure I'll be taking a couple weeks break from the place because I don't want there to be too much of a comfort level. I don't want to seem like I have nothing going. That wouldn't be true but perception is reality. I pretty much chilled September and I needed it but October to December I need to get cracking. 

I'll also be disappearing a bit because I don't want  to be thought of as just a friend. I want to sleep with some of these girls. Familiarity breeds contempt or so they say. I remember seeing something about giving people the gift of missing you. So there's that theory.  

Plus they work together and sometimes I sense a bit of jealousy. I don't know how discreet these ladies would be. I know I'd be discreet but not sure about them. And the other rub is I actually like these people. They've become important to me so I don't want to ruin that either. 

If you need some clarification on anything. Or if you'd like specifics let me know. I tried to make it brief but may have left out some needed info. 

Basically, I want to see what you're guys next step would be. ",seduction
How to NOT Give A FUCK | How to Stop Caring What Other People Think,,seduction
How Soon Will You Sleep With A Guy? [Girl Interviews],,seduction
People are always judging you so let them do it and live your life,"So one thing my coaching clients always worry about is being judged by other people. They’re terrified about what people will do, think and say when they say hashtag fuck it and just live life on their own terms.

They want to be more confident but they’re scared of people laughing when they see them trying to better themselves. 

They want to be better with girls but they’re scared of people thinking they’re a creep for going out and doing approaches.

They want to start a dating related YouTube blog but are scared that people will think they’re ugly and have a stupid voice.

And you know what? These are totally understandable fears to have. I get it 100% because I’ve been there myself. The dark spectre of social judgement is fucking terrifying and can cripple us into paralysis if we let it.

But here’s the thing:

**The people you’re scared of being judged by if you live life on your own terms are already judging you right the fuck now. Playing small to avoid being scrutinised by people who are already doing just that is one of the dumbest fucking things you could ever do**

Does that comment shake you up? Does it bother you? Well it bothered me when I heard it and it’s not an exaggeration to say that it really stopped a brother in his tracks. The simple fact is that it’s impossible to avoid being judged because everyone does it to everyone else all day every damn day. When you walk down the street and see a woman standing across the road, you immediately start judging her. Is she too old? Too young? Too fat? Too skinny? Does she look boring or cool? All of us are making these decisions about each other 24/7 and that includes the people who know us too. 

We don’t admit it but to find someone who doesn’t actively rank the people in their lives against arbitrary standards is very fucking rare. Everyone does it and it just can’t be avoided. The truth is that the people who know you have clear mental impressions of how pretty, funny, clever, or stylish they think you are. They know how much they respect you and have opinions about your worth as a human being that you may or may not like if they were ever honest enough to tell you.

They’ve basically made judgements about you across a wide range of criteria and that’s just how it goes. 

**That’s life**

So when you play small, when you fall back like a moist little pussy and live a live that doesn’t inspire you for fear of being judged, you’re basically playing yourself.

**#stopbeingapussyyoupussy**

And just so we’re clear; when I say stop being a pussy I’m saying it with love. I’m genuinely not trying to insult you. Holding back on living the life you want for fear of the judgement of others is a straight up pussy move and can’t be called anything else.

But just so you know; I used to be that pussy. In fact, was that pussy for many a year. I was once like you are now and that’s why I feel comfortable calling you out on your bs. I’m actually 36 and only really sorted myself about a few years ago. This means that the odds are I spent more years as a moist bitch-made pussy than you and am hence perfectly qualified to make such an assessment.

**Game recognise game**

But getting back to the topic at hand. People are always judging you, no matter what you do. Have you seen a YouTube video that didn’t have some dislikes? I haven’t. No matter how awesome the video is, there’s always people who have a problem with it.

**Case in point this video here** 

**https://youtu.be/StvaOocrSaQ**

It’s from the channel of a guy called Peewee Tom. Basically he blogged his battle with cancer for a year and ended up dying a couple days ago. His family posted a message of thanks to the thousands of people who’d supported them through such a horrible experience and surprise surprise, at the time of writing there’s about 82 cunts who have a problem with that lovely video.

Judgement is everywhere and you can’t avoid it. Go out and live your life the way you want to live it. If people are going to judge you anyway then you might as well have them judge the real you instead of the fake shell you put up to protect yourself from the world.

Find hobbies and passions that excite you.
Ditch the crappy relationship.
Develop a fashion sense that’s unique to you.
Better yourself.
Become amazing with women.
Learn to see rejection and failure as necessary steps to success and don’t be crushed by them.
Speak your mind.
Tell people what you really think instead of what you think they want to hear.
Be yourself like your life depends on it.

And above all else, stop being a pussy.

**I’m always looking to connect with guys who are passionate about improving themselves so if that’s you, slide into my DMs and let’s get to chatting**





",seduction
Weird problem: girls always think I'm boyfriend material and are more reluctant to hook up?,"I've run into this before in my life and it seems to be a recurring thing, but I've found that women I'll often go on dates with think I'm boyfriend material. Now you wouldn't think this would cause a problem, but it usually means they're more reluctant to hook up, etc and wait for a few dates.


 I'm not really looking for a relationship right now just getting out of a long term one, and I even let that known but girls will still tell me that they really like me a lot, hint at us becoming a couple, etc. 


Case in point, I went out earlier this week with a girl I met.  Things went well and we were making out at the bar, etc. She told me she really liked me a lot, really likes hanging out with me, etc.  She invited me back to her place, and it may have been just because she was drinking but she fell asleep pretty quickly on the couch cuddling with me (but seemed reluctant if I tried to escalate).



Eventually I left for the night, waking her up and telling her i had to get back, and she wants to set up another date so I don't think it's a complete lack of interest or anything.


I know it's a strange problem to have, but I don't really feel like I'm in a good position to be in a relationship and these women all seem to view me as relationship material wanting something longer term with me. I know some of these women have one night stands/etc so I believe the common denominator is me. If I'm just looking to hook up how do I do that?",seduction
Alcohol and Game,"When I've had a few drinks at the bar, I'm less inhibited and my game is better. I'm more spontaneous and seem to always know what to say. 

I am complete opposite when sober. Yeah I'm able to carry on conversations in a somewhat non-awkward way, but there's still a part of me that's in my head, especially when I'm in a quiet closed-in area where I can hear my voice perfectly and feel like the attention is on me. 

It's also terrifying for me to go to clubs and bars sober, but it's essential that I do because I'll be able to recognize social cues better. How have you guys solved this problem?",seduction
Do you have a hard time getting hot women?,"Do you have a hard time getting hot women?

Do you settle for women that you don’t find attractive?

Well, there is a solution to that problem and if you do this you’ll never have to settle with unattractive women ever again.

Solution = Give 10X More Value Than The Woman You Want Is Capable Of Giving You.

Let me explain…

The reason why you are not attracting the hot women that you want, is because deep down you don’t feel qualified to be with hot women, and/or you don’t know how to deliver the value that those women are looking for.

This is a mental and emotional block that lots of men go through, and this was a huge problem that I had to overcome myself. 

If you can deliver at least 5-10 times more value than the women you’re wanting to get with, you will start attracting those women.

If you continue to provide 5-10 times more value than you receive from those women, then they will stay in your life.

Look at it this way…

Imagine your ideal woman who is 100% your type. 

Now, imagine if this woman had a monetary value. 

How much would she be worth?

Would she be worth $100,000?

Would she be worth $500,000?

$1,000,000?

Would she be priceless?

Well whatever monetary value you would consider her to be, you need to be 5-10 times higher than her in value.

So, if she is beautiful, fun and spontaneous, you need to ask yourself, “What am I bringing to the table?”

Are you good looking?

Are you wealthy?

Do you have high status?

Are you charismatic?

Are you in great physical shape?

Are you preselected by other hot women?

Are you courageous?

Are you socially intelligent?

Are you an influencer?

Are you a leader?

Are you emotionally healthy?

Are you a man who has power and resources?

Are you romantic?

Are you fun to be around?

Are you funny?

Are you intelligent?

Are you capable of taking care of loved ones and those around you?

Do you stand for something?

The women that you want, should want you too, and the only way women will want you is if you have “high value”. Ideally, you should be aiming to have so much more value than them, that you become an undeniable choice as a potential mate.

How do you know when you’re a “high value” man?

Look at the way women and the world respond to you.

Do women feel like you are a prize when they’re with you?

Do other men treat you with respect?

Do women like spending time with you?

Do women go out of their way to please you?

Are women eager to show you off to their friends and family?

If women are treating you like shit, and men are disrespecting you, then it simply means you have “low value” and/or you are communicating “low value”.

Some men don’t have much value to bring to a relationship with a woman, and then you have some men who DO have value, but they’re incapable of communicating their value effectively.

You have the potential to become a “high value” man, but this is something you must work at.

Stop trying to attract women who clearly have more value than you.

What you should do instead, is focus on increasing your value, so that you get to a point where your value is so high, that you will become an irresistible choice to women.

Once this happens, the game changes completely. You will no longer have to settle for women who you are not attracted to. 

You will no longer have to lower your standards. You will finally be able to date and hook-up with the women of your choosing.",seduction
Second cold approach done!! Happiest person in the world :D,"Maaaaaa! Today I went out again , learn so much and did only one approach, at first a little bit weird but I talked a little bit with her and it went great and felt confidence and smile. I end telling her:
Give me your phone to have a date some day. She said:
Well, okey... with a weird face. I noticed it and said:
If you want to, if not there is no problem. And she said:
No, yes yes take it, it is just that it is a little bit weird to get approach.
So in general lines the interaction went great, a lot to practice but awesome. I can't wait till nest sunday to do approaches.

And she was really sexy bro. I'm the happiest person in the world, the beast have been awake 

I can explain how fucking happy I am right now, without words. Let's hack the system!

For the people with problems, you can!",seduction
How To Get A Girl To Forget About Her Ex,,seduction
"Had a fun date, got the kiss, but it wasn’t good. Thoughts?","Had a first date with a girl I met and got a number off in Starbucks. First date was very fun, lots in common, didn’t try to hard, did push/pull and got her interest. I didn’t want to seem too eager so waited until the end of the date to go for the kiss. Finally the tension was built up and she was receptive for me going for the kiss, but the kiss was rather lackluster. No tongue was involved but it still lasted for a few minutes of “neat and tidy” kisses. I genuinely believe we both had a ton of fun, but I’m a bit concerned that if she didn’t want to go for French kissing that she’s less interested than I thought. What’s your take? ",seduction
"For the first time, I approached a girl in a club tonight...","...she looked at me with disdain and turned away! Possibly the worst possible outcome, but it felt so much better than the preceding ten years of inaction, and I was having too much fun to care, anyway. Overall a great night, 8/10, would get rejected again!",seduction
Have you ever done this?,"This happened last night. 

Me: Damn babe, you're so hot....do you want to keep fucking?

Her: Yes!

Me: (thinking about it)......nah. I wanna cum now.

And I proceed to pull my dick out and have her jerk it off until I came.

I don't know, it feels kind of alpha to still be in control of your orgasm but then to essentially say, ""This sex session is done now.""

What are your guys' thoughts? ",seduction
"Found this on another subreddit, relates to seduction, kinda?",,seduction
How to become cool? Or rather how to have an awesome lifestyle?,"I can approach, I date women on and off, I'm usually pretty confident. But the ONE thing I've been unable to grasp my head around is the concept of being *cool*.

One on one, Im usually pretty solid and have decent game but I actually want to have a persona of a cool individual, that person that just exudes Alpha male traits and has a nice lifestyle with tons of awesome friends etc.

I recently went to a house party being thrown by a pretty rich socialite and I came across so many men that just exuded what I feel I just don't get.

Might sound like a dumb question, but I've just not been able to grasp my head around this and the more I try, the more try hard I appear and it shows.

Anyone got any suggestions, material, tips? This just isn't clicking for me sadly.",seduction
Today I did my first Cold Approach!! :)),"Brooooooooo. I'm so fucking happy and proud of myself, I go to a total stranger and try to talk her, maaaaan, I'm the happiest person in the world, tomorrow I will try it again and lets see! 

This shit is awesome! Hope you all are doing great :)",seduction
I just want to be honest and hook up,"Firs of all sorry for my English and for the bad title. 

So, I have no problem in seducing girls both irl both old, but apparently I come up as boyfriend material and at the moment I don’t want a relationship. 

If I i go very upfront about my intentions I fail to get laid. On the other hand, if I act like I’m used to do, the girl think I want something more than sex, and I don’t want to mislead and hurt anyone. 

I suppose I give the wrong vibe?

Advice?",seduction
Why Actively Showing Intent IS BAD,,seduction
Gaming during winter?,"Hey everyone

I discovered PUA a few months ago. During the summer I finally decided to go out and approach ladies during the day. While I have to admit I have achieved very little results, it has given me a boost in confidence and conversational skills.

However, we all know winter is coming. It's already considerably colder where I live (not US) and winters are really harsh here. No way to cold approach someone during the day. 

So how do you guys game during winter? Do I have to suck it up and start doing night game which I don't really like?",seduction
Strategy to win her over,"Hey guys, I met this goddess the other day and we went on our first morning coffee breakfast date yesterday ... it came out that she's 31 and I told her I didn't want to tell her my age until we had sex first because then it wouldn't matter to her LOL ... I was just being playful and then told her that I was 50 ... I could see her mind starting to race probably thinking about what her friends would say and what not, I could see her struggling because I know she likes me and is attracted to me ... But the date continued and we really hit it off well, but with the way the date ended I have a feeling she won't be able to get over the age hurdle, ... Which leads me to my pollfor you casanova's out there:


What's the best approach here?

1. Back off be silent and out of communication and let her send me a sign or text me first?


2. Just address the pink elephant in the room with her and ask her if she wants to see me again or if my age is a problem?

3. Very soon invite her out for another date and completely ignore the age issue and let her be the one to bring it up? Spend more time with her so she can realize she really likes me and the age doesn't matter

could use some help guys because this chick is banging hot and I don't want to fuck it up

PS when she guessed at my age before I told her she guessed 40 so I'm in good shape and look pretty good for your average 50 year old


UPDATE - I decided to throw caution to the wind and asked her out again today and got the following text response, should I not respond and let her go?  Ask her when she can meet again next?  or what should I say?

""It's looking like I'm going to be busy all day""

This kind of text feels like the beginning stages of being blown off",seduction
I'm getting stuck in certain processes.,"I've been in the game for awhile and it's changed my life for the best! Recently I've noticed that I lose interest in women after we have sex, and usually they want a relationship with me about a month or so after. It happens so often it's actually crazy. They've mentioned quality guys don't often approach so they aim for the hip when they find on.

&amp;#x200B;

1.) I tend to go back to these girls and try to get the spark back after I've kinda next'd them. Certain qualities I miss in them which attracts me again. I'm guessing I need to be approaching more women so this doesn't happen. 

2.) I have a real problem keeping women in my circle. Maybe my attraction game is lacking? It's like I have legit game for the initial meet but months after they go cold, saying I seem not to care about them.

3.) For the future I want a LTR I'm tired of the approach/meet/lose of interest /repeat. What should I be working on to keep a positive relationship going the distance?

 ",seduction
Being busy good/bad?,"Hey,
some guys told me to be busy because my gf looks like she needs my attention all the time (we're together 7 months)

And here's a question i thought of, does being busy comes with a danger that your gf will leave you?

(And questions to me if you need some ofc) ",seduction
How to know if a girl wants to be approached?,"Total noob here, im 23, pretty introverted, and lack confidence but 2 months ago I decided I wanted to change that! Started working out and following a meal plan, always been pretty skinny, which has helped my confidence somewhat but could still be improved. Decided dating apps werent for me and I should go out there in person.

Anyways Ive noticed my biggest issue is knowing when a girl wants to be approached? If I see a cute girl I usually dont do anything cause it looks like theyre busy and it would just be rude to interrupt them. Am I wrong? Like is there a clear sign that tells you the difference between someone who doesnt mind being approached and someone that does? 

Also is it better to go alone or with friends? I go to concerts alone a lot and whenever I try talking to a girl most find it odd that im there alone and are usually immediately turned off. I heard it shows confidence going alone but so far in my experience its the opposite. ",seduction
100 Attraction Mantras To Up Your Game,"Gentlemen,

Some people swear that repeating a few mantras on a daily basis can have positive psychological and even metaphysical effects on your life.  Even if you believe that's bullshit, it's hard to argue that giving yourself a quick pep talk before starting your sets is a bad idea.  Everyone from professional athletes to kindergarten gymnasts need a little reminder-coaching before jumping into the game.

Below are 100 Mantras to get your mind right before you head out to nail the hotties.  Even if you find just 1 on this list which resonates with you, internalizing it and making it part of your pre-game reminders could make all the difference.

Read these as if you were saying them to yourself.

\-- 100 Mantras --

1. I’m Always Ready – Hot chicks appear at random times in unexpected places.
2. I Never Hesitate – Delay is sexual poison. The moment I see her, I approach.
3. I Approach for Fun – Hitting on women is a game. I’m the player.
4. I Approach for Practice – Top players practice. Regularly.
5. I Approach Just to See What Happens – Because fuck it. That’s why.
6. I Approach Two Girls at Once – Because the bonus points I get for this big-dick, confident move will trump any stumbling I may do along the way.
7. I Approach in Front of Other People – They give me high-fives when the deed is done.
8. If She Rejects Me Nicely – I compliment her and wish her the best.
9. If She Rejects Me Rudely – I compliment her and wish her the best. Karma will take care of her for me. I don’t have to do anything.
10. I Laugh at Rejection – Because what else is there to do?
11. I’d Rather Get Rejected Than Not Know – Not knowing what could have happened because I never tried is far worse than a rejection could ever be.
12. She’s Not Too Busy – Women are not “too busy” when approached by confident men.
13. She Has A Boyfriend – Great. I wasn’t asking for his number.
14. She Has A Boyfriend 2 – “Me too. Maybe we should set them up.”
15. I Make Women Instantly Comfortable – Simply because I’m comfortable with myself.
16. I’m Easy to Talk To – Women open up to me because I open up to them first.
17. I Always Know What to Say – Because I understand I can say anything.
18. I Always Know What to Say 2 – It’s not the line. It’s the man. A confident man can make anything work.
19. I’m Unpredictable – Spontaneity is a sexual drug. I’m the dealer.
20. I Send Mixed Signals – First tough, then tender. First interested, then aloof.
21. I’m Exciting – When she doesn’t get my text, she longs for it. When she gets it, she smiles.
22. I’m Challenging – I don’t agree just to please her. The more challenging I am, the better.
23. When I Disagree, I Disagree – Disagreement shows I’m a real person. Not a kiss-ass.
24. I Take Women on an Emotional Rollercoaster – They love the ride.
25. I’m The Source of Her Emotional State – Realizing this is the difference between guys who struggle and guys for which everything seems so easy.
26. I’m Authentic – I fully express myself. Authenticity is the most magnetic thing in the world.
27. I Have My Own Shit to Do – Women are excited to enter my interesting world.
28. I Learn New Things Daily – Because I’m fascinated by life. When a man’s only fascination is women, women run away. When he’s fascinated by life, they flock toward him.
29. Text is for Arranging Dates – Nothing more. I’m not her BFF. I’m a cock to be sat upon.
30. I Text Ridiculous Shit – Because texting “normal” shit doesn’t stand out. She got 20 texts like that already today.
31. I’m Hard to Get A Hold Of – Busy.
32. I Improve Myself Daily – This is for myself. Women finding this attractive in an ancillary benefit.
33. I Improve Myself Daily 2 – Because Kaizen motherfucker.
34. I’m a Master of Conversation – Because I took the time to make myself that way.
35. My Body is My Temple – Because living a healthy life is important.
36. My Body is Her Temple – The more I get jacked, the faster her clothes hit the floor.
37. I Have Wings – They help me fly.
38. I Have Wallflowers – They guard my table and can distract the cockblocking fugly one.
39. Can You Buy Me A Drink? – No. But you can buy me a drink.
40. Can You Buy Me A Drink Now? – Yes. But first name the 5 reasons why you think I’m so hot.
41. Can You Buy Ma A Drink? – Yes. But first stand up and do your best MC Hammer impression.
42. I’m Touchable – I have a body and wardrobe that women want to touch.
43. Kino – Yes, I touch women. Women love to be touched.
44. Kino 2 – I know how to escalate attraction through touch. Because I took the time to learn.
45. I’m An Object of Desire – Women want men that other women want.
46. Eye Contact – Only losers stare from a distance.
47. Eye Contact 2 – I have sexual eyes that drill through the eyes, down the spine and into her loins.
48. I Have A Sexual Presence – Only idiots pretend they don’t want sex, thinking such behavior will get them sex. That’s lying. And retarded.
49. I Have A Sexual Presence 2 – I’m around women for sex. My body language let’s them know.
50. I Have A Masculine Walk – I take my time. I walk with intention and purpose. I take long strides.
51. I Make Sexual Innuendo – Because sexual conversation results in wet panties.
52. I Use Sexual Frames – I frame sex as a good thing. A positive thing. An exhilarating thing.
53. I’m Not Needy – “Oh, you have something else to do? Go….”
54. I Don’t Kiss &amp; Tell – Yes, she can release the dirty slut hidden inside. No, no one will find out.
55. I Don’t Kiss &amp; Tell 2 – I don’t write field reports. Girls don’t fuck guys who they discover are sluts of the keyboard.
56. I Sleep Different Women Regularly – It’s not a secret. I’m not hiding that from her. She needs to know where she stands. And she’s appreciative of the honesty.
57. I’m Honest with My Intentions – If I’m looking for a relationship, I tell her. If I’m looking for fun, I tell her. Honesty consistently gets me what I want. Lying doesn’t get me anything.
58. I Flirt – Constantly. Even with women I’m not attracted to.
59. I’m Non-Reactive – Nothing in the surrounding environment can sway my focus.
60. I’m Unphased by Tests – I simply agree &amp; dispel with humor. Or agree &amp; go to the extremes.
61. I Don’t Take Her Tests Seriously – Nothing can get under my skin unless I take it seriously.
62. I Don’t Give A Fuck – About small, petty, mediocre bullshit.
63. I Don’t Give A Fuck – About what other people say and think.
64. I Do Give A Fuck – About important stuff like friends, family and career.
65. I Help My Friends – Because friends are more important than women.
66. I Help My Friends Get Laid – Have you ever seen the way a woman looks at you after you spontaneously set up your friend with another chick in the bar? Have you ever seen a tigress ready to pounce?
67. Women Are Sexy &amp; Amazing – This is the mindset of someone who doesn’t get laid.
68. Women Are Cute &amp; Silly – This is the mindset of someone experienced with women.
69. She’s Just A Person - Trust me, she farts too.
70. Women Chase Men – That’s a fact. What they don’t chase is strangers. So I open my fucking mouth and say something. Now I’m not a stranger anymore.
71. I’m Delusional – I believe all women want me. Because what else is there to believe – that women don’t want me?
72. Women Give Me Attention – Because I don’t ask for it. I command it without ever saying a word.
73. I Don’t Laugh at My Own Jokes – Because only idiots do that.
74. I Laugh Loudly When Shit is Funny – My laughter is contagious. I can make people around me start laughing even when they don’t know why.
75. Attraction Is Not Logical – Guys who give women logical reasons to date him, go home alone.
76. Attraction Is Not Logical 2 – It’s an emotional response that’s out of her conscious control.
77. Attraction Is Not Logical 3 – I know how to trigger primal attraction because I took the time to l learn.
78. Money Is Irrelevant – Attraction is an uncontrollable tingling in the stomach, the mind and between the legs. It’s not created by money.
79. I Control What I Look Like – No excuses.
80. Nicknames Are Fun – I call her silly names, particularly if it makes her punch me in the shoulder.
81. Assumptions Are Fun – I assume things about her that are wrong. She becomes fascinated.
82. Disqualifiers Are Fun – I get her attracted to me, then I tell her she can’t have me.
83. Disqualifiers Are Fun 2 – Attraction is like a yo-yo. The more you push her away, the faster she comes spiraling back.
84. I Blame Her – “Stop hitting on me.” “Is that you’re best line.” “Quit bumping into me” “That’s why we can’t have nice things.” “Stop looking at me like that.”
85. I Hit on Girls in Front of the Girl I Actually Want – Preselection is like money. The more you have the easier it becomes to get even more.
86. I Make Sure Girls See Me with Other Girls – In person. Online. Everywhere. This is the “dating equivalent” of getting “likes” and “5 star reviews.” From this perspective, attracting is no different than buying a toaster. The more women like me, the more other women like me.
87. Attraction is Easy – After all, if you believe it’s hard, you’ll never get good at it. What you believe is what happens.
88. I’m a Leader – The first person I lead is myself.
89. I’m a Leader 2 – Leaders get their pick of the litter. So be a fucking leader.
90. Communication Trumps Words – How I communicate is far more important than what I say. I take the time to master public speaking and body language.
91. Communication Trumps Words 2 – I trained myself to the point where the sound of my voice can make a woman turn around just to see who’s talking. I win.
92. Pausing – I pause for dramatic effect. The faster a man talks, the less attractive he becomes. I pause to create suspense and make her wait. If she leans toward me during a pause, I win.
93. I Tell Her Stories – The logical mind turns off when people listen to stories. Stories make people feel like they’ve known you for years. I took the time to become a great story teller.
94. My Bedroom Looks Like the Ritz Carlton – That’s right: plush, soft, breezy and with extra pillows. A place that’s visually tempting and relaxing. Somewhere she’d like to spend lots of time.
95. Public Foreplay Drives Her Crazy – I’ll keep things spicy by putting my hand down her pants while ordering the Enchiladas. Just make sure that over-sized cloth napkin is appropriately hiding the taco.
96. I Close – There’s no sale for guys who can’t close. Closing is an ongoing process. I close for attraction, fascination, compliance, the number, the date, the kiss, the lay. Always be closing.
97. Dating Me Is an Adventure – For women, adventure is the most exciting thing in the world.
98. I Pleasure Women – I know how to please women in bed, in the kitchen, in the bathroom, in the living room, everywhere. I know how to make them orgasm repeatedly and come begging for more. I let that knowledge project itself non-verbally through my facial expressions and body language.
99. I Like Blowjobs – “Oh really, she thinks she’s good at it? We’ll see.
100. Everything on This List Is About Me – I attract women because I focus on myself, not because I focus on them.

\---

My best selling book 'Make Women Chase You' is now available to read **FREE** on Kindle Unlimited.

[amazon.com](https://www.amazon.com/Make-Women-Chase-You-Conversations-ebook/dp/B07GLJQJZQ/ref=sr_1_1?s=digital-text&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1538193056&amp;sr=1-1&amp;keywords=how+to+attract+women+talk+to+girls+start+conversations+flirt+text+alpha+male+seduction+body+language) / [amazon.co.uk](https://www.amazon.co.uk/Make-Women-Chase-You-Conversations-ebook/dp/B07GLJQJZQ/ref=sr_1_1?s=digital-text&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1538193197&amp;sr=1-1&amp;keywords=how+to+attract+women+talk+to+girls+start+conversations+text+alpha+male+seduction+body+language) / [amazon.com.au](https://www.amazon.com.au/Make-Women-Chase-You-Conversations-ebook/dp/B07GLJQJZQ/ref=sr_1_1?s=digital-text&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1538193254&amp;sr=1-1&amp;keywords=how+to+attract+women+talk+to+girls+start+conversations+flirt+text+alpha+male+seduction+body+language) / [amazon.ca](https://www.amazon.ca/Make-Women-Chase-You-Conversations-ebook/dp/B07GLJQJZQ/ref=sr_1_1?s=digital-text&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1538193354&amp;sr=1-1&amp;keywords=how+to+attract+women+talk+to+girls+start+conversations+flirt+text+alpha+male+seduction+body+language) / [amazon.in](https://www.amazon.in/Make-Women-Chase-You-Conversations-ebook/dp/B07GLJQJZQ/ref=sr_1_1?s=digital-text&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1538193319&amp;sr=1-1&amp;keywords=how+to+attract+women+talk+to+girls+start+conversations+flirt+text+alpha+male+seduction+body+language)

\---

Also check out my free guide on 5 Steps To A Masculine Sexual Frame That Women Find Irresistible [here](http://dailymanup.com/attract-women-girls-masculine-alpha-sexual-frame-presence).",seduction
[FR] Night club and the belief that's holding me back,"TLDR: My belief that I'm interrupting girls or getting in their way when opening makes me eject to quickly form a conversation or open in a really weak manner.

So at a nightclub these were my sets:

-Girl standing with her group, asked her if she had a lighter and if she smoked. That was it I couldn't advance it from there I get too nervous when gaming alone at night but I decided to count this one because I took some sort of action despite this massive pressure.

-Girl outside club. The club was packed that night and I made a comment about that as my opener, I kept on going for a small while and then I left. She wasn't the kind of girl I wanted to tal to but the fact that I did it while going out solo makes me proud.

- Stopped girl as she was walking past me, opened with a hi and started talking random stuff. She was really receptive, I took her to the dance floor to dance for a while. Then went back to her table and number closed. Later bumped into her as I was leaving and talked to her again. The number flaked but it was the best interaction of the night.

- Girl at club. Opened about the tattoo she had and kept the conversation going from there, we exchanged names and then she left. Didn't see her after that

- Girl at table. Opened her by saying hi but she wasn't very receptive, even when I tried to get her name she answered ""Why?"" I made fun of that, It was a bit awkward and I tried to get have the conversation be a bit more loose but she was not very receptive. I left after a while. I'm proud that I persisted but I'm not sure if I left to early or should've kept talking.

- Girl at table next to me. She was dancing and I tapped her on the shoulder and said hi. She was a bit startled and I commented on that. We had a small conversation and then another dude walks in asking her out to dance, she denies him and he persisted. I tried joking around with the dude (he was a bit drunk) but he eventually left. We talked a bit more and then I took her to dance for a while. Tried to number close after that but I got rejected. I didn't open her again after that. That was a mistake on my part. I took that rejection too far.

- two girls at table. I opened with a hi and started asking how they know each other and making assumptions on who's the bad influence of them both. They were both receptive but I was a bit in the dark as I didn't know what to do. Eventually I left but reopened some time later and tried to number close one of them but I got the ""I have a boyfriend line"" Still proud of how I handled that set

The obvious sticking point here is that my conversations are dictated by a girl's initial reaction when I open. If she's receptive I tend to have a better conversation but if she gives me an awkward look or something that shows she's not very receptive, then I have really weak conversations and I usually leave the set pretty quickly. It's weird because I'm fully aware that I'm not doing anything wrong with talking to a girl yet I don't fully believe it because I'm holding back. Anyway any feedback is appreciated.",seduction
"PUA at university, worried I'll be labeled the school slut and become known for the wrong thing...","How do you handle PUA at uni? There's so many women here, I'm just worried I might say the wrong thing while trying to get better at talking to women and end up becoming well-known, for the ""wrong"" thing. Anyone ever try pickup at uni, also I just want to hookup, how do I let a girl know I don't really want a relationship? I just started getting back in the game so yea..... any advice is appreciated, thanks.",seduction
What am I doing wrong?,"I'm very much stuck in a rut at the moment and am trying to work out exactly what it is that I'm doing for me to be in this position. It's been going on for years now, so I'd appreciate some help.

There's two major issues I have, and that is that I can't get a date, and I can't get laid. Some would say those are similar but usually someone has difficulty getting dates but will still score on the occasional weekend, or has difficulty getting lucky but can usually grab a coffee with a girl. I can't get either.

Honest to God, people have described me as handsome, confident, very social (""you know everyone""), and charismatic. I will admit to you that my confidence with women is quite shot at the moment because of the circumstances, but generally speaking everything else is in order; own place, career, car, hobbies, work out etc.

Last night, I went out looking my absolute best. I felt good. Not the best dancer, but I make an effort and I'd argue more than perhaps others. As the night drew to a close, I was surrounded by people coupled up and me on my lonesome. I've never been able to pull, it's just never happened. Girls don't look my way so I can't make eye-contact and approach, I've not ever had a girl try to dance with me and such like. Why does this happen to me? And just as an additional note; the group I hung out with was almost all girls. Women that know me are definitely comfortable around me, but these were my friends...so no-game.

And same with dating. I can generally get matches on Tinder, and conversations flowing, but landing a date is the tricky bit. I'm speaking to three girls currently, and all of them say they are interested (and also tend to compliment me by saying it makes a change to meet a genuine lad on those apps, for better or worse), but they're always ""busy"" or bland with their replies etc. Unfortunately meeting people IRL isn't an option because my career is extremely time-consuming so I don't have much opportunity.

I don't know if it's a vibe I'm giving off or I don't look approachable / friendly or I'm just unattractive or something. I've asked around, been to counseling, posted my pics on the net. No one has been able to offer me advice that has actually helped (and believe me, I've tried).

After four years trying, at this point I'm starting to believe I'm just an undesirable guy.",seduction
Noticing women too much?,"So I'm at an electronic music festival, and everyone is dressed like there's a sale at the Halloween/BDSM depot.  Being judgemental is toxic and doesn't help me connect with people, however these women are dressed so skimpy it can distract from actually having an enjoyable time.  I end up in my head and in a passive, observer state.

Club scenes are far outside my comfort zone, I don't go out much at all.  Am I just temporarily overwhelmed because I'm not accustomed to this environment?  Is it normal to be *this* struck by beautiful women?  My social barometer feels broken.",seduction
Fun and good ways of getting fit,"I always struggle to get motivated for the gym and hit the machines.

Any suggestion? I read somewhere that boxing is fun and works, but I don't know what to believe.

For example,  I do a lot of dancing, but it doesn't really help you to get fitter.",seduction
Confusing date. What should I do?,So I matched with this girl on OkCupid. On her profile she says she is looking for friends. No mention of dating. We texted and it was good and now I have a date for Tuesday. I'm not sure if this is a date or are we hanging out as friends? I would definitely want it to be a sexual encounter and she's really hot as well. I'm 26 and she's only 18. What should my approach be?,seduction
"I put in some time to make a short video about Casanova's first love. Basically a short summary in my own words from a part of the writings in The Story of My Life by Giacomo Casanova. Tell me what you think, here is the teaser:",,seduction
Motivation,How do you guys keep your motivation going? Of course we all want to get laid or get a gf or just not be fucking alone. But its hard motivating myself to go out and approach when I keep getting rejected and nothing seems to get better. Some advice on this would be appreciated!,seduction
[FR] Do I have a bad wingman or did I was too aggressive?,"Me and my friend, was wanting to get out this past evening. So we set up that we would during the night, and he tells about how he's going to bring a chick that is his friend and it is for me. We go to our place for drinks, and the girls he told about, was not there, he kept saying that he should find his other girl friend, so he could find the girl that I supposed to meet. 



Before giving up of finding his girl friend, he tells he got another girl that I supposed to meet. We finally go pick her up, and almost the second she comes in, my friend start saying that I would eat her out, this kind of sexual stuff, always laughing about it. We stayed at a car smoking, and sometimes got out of the car when the rain let us. The whole night I was doing my shit, having fun, and not caring about the outcome of picking the girl, I was not desperate. It was great, one time, I was approaching a horse, it was so awesome, in the rain. She followed me up, we were having lots of fun and being carefree but almost all of the interaction with little touch.



After quite a time, my friend was really insisting on us getting laid and whatever, so I felt pressured and took her outside of our car so I could make a move. It was so fucking awkward. It did not seemed that I was being very natural about it, it was awkward. I take her hand a moment, and she tells me ""don't you worry ForeverInYou, I'm right here!"" to quickly get free of my hand.I respected, and when we came back to the car, I sat with between the two of us, another friend. I was still having fun, but I honestly needed some space in the window, to breath better after the smoke sesh.



After we took the girl back home, my ""wingman"" said I had fucked up. He started saying ""why you didn't grabbed her by the pu**y"", all kinds of shit. I defended myself and said he had fucked up being so fucking ridiculous about a meet-up. So, I **think** I didn't fucked up, as I was still fun and result independent, and she added me on Facebook right when I got home. About my wing man, in the aftermath the driver of the night told me my wing a time said that it seemed my meet-up wanted to be with him. This very moment he called her from inside of the car, like it was something urgent, right when I was having a good time with her. 


Could I had handled my wing friend in a more beneficial way? 



It's kind the second time this happens, what should I do with the girl now? Apologize because of the pressure? Or just keep cool with whatever happened, and free of guilt, being confidence that I tried my best to give good energy to everyone, and was myself close to about 100%?


Thank you, sorry for my wording and phrasing, I'm drunk and baked right now.",seduction
What to tell her when you want to be alone,"I have a girl that i love very much, but we all men (like girls have their period) have times that we need to be alone, feel freedom.
Tell me please how can i ensure her that i love her when she feels that i don't miss her because like she told me after day of not texting her ""When you miss somebody, you want him close"". And i don't know what to tell her because i don't miss her now. ",seduction
How to escalate it in second date,We had a great first date and also planned for the second one.She is in her 30s and I am inexperienced at 23 in dating.share your tips to how to get a kiss from her in the second date.,seduction
Girl at work. Fast food.,I just wonder how to seduce a girl when we are working in a resturant with no time to talk and almsot no breaks. ,seduction
Field report: Took a red head home in less than an hour.,"I’m a city guy, but I like going to two-step country clubs because I like to dance.

Last night, I walked in, did my usual routine of asking girls to dance. Some of them are so drunk they end up making out with you, but that’s not the field report.

I’m 6’2”, so I have that going for me, but I have an average face and I’m mexican. On a good day, I’d say I’m a 7. On average, probably a 5 or 6. I’m thin and lanky, even when I’m fat.

I sit down next to a red headed white girl. Gorgeous sharp blue eyes. She had this sunburn on her nose and cheeks that made her look like she was blushing. It was hot. Big rack. Perfect teeth. Nice skin. Wore a dark blue sundress with pink flower patterns on it. Beautiful girl. A 9 by my standards. I love white meat.

She was sitting next to some loser with baggy clothes. She didn’t look particularly interested, so she turned closer to my direction and I saw it as a good opportunity to start talking to her. 

Asked her some basic questions. Called her out for wearing cowboy boots even though she was from Colorado and didn’t know how to country dance. She laughed. Since I’d already danced with 500+ women in the last year and a half, I took her hand and told her I’d give her a tutorial. She did well learning it, so I took her onto the dance floor.

I pulled some sweet dance moves on her, and after about two songs, she gave me a certain look and kept lingering after giving me a thank you hug, so I said fuck it and went in for a kiss.

After a heavy makeout session in the middle of the dance floor with other people staring, I grabbed her hand and led her back to my car, then back to my place. I’m sure you can figure out the rest. This all happened within the span of one hour.

Not here to preach. I’m just sharing my experience.",seduction
I need advice,"Here’s my story, literally had two of my buddies bailed on me. I thought it was good I dead to attend downtown club. Of course, club name hotel Congress, interested me. I saw women (college student) standing there without any guy near by. I thought to myself to go approach. I went over there and said “ hello, my name is unknown, I thought to say hi to a beautiful lady. Everything goes good except she does not want to dance so I kind of left the scene. Moments later I see her  with guy having conversation and left to different booth. To myself, I thought I fucked up by not trying to be near her. Then, thirty minutes past, by that time I was little depressed. I saw her at the dance floor with no guy so I go again. Of course, I am honest with her about trying to make conversation yet she reveals that has no outgoing life. So i make suggestion to get another drink at the bar. And she does with trust.  After I paid for her drinks ( inside I should have  not) she was very quit but close, looking at different directions. Long story short, I literally lost the women to guy that got her to dance with her grinding on him while I watched. It pissed me off inside. She try to include me in the dance circle. I see guys getting her info as they left yet thinking what the hell am I still doing here. She becomes more distant with texting friends. Back of my mind, I should just leave. Then, the guy from before approaches coming all cheerful and jolly while she smiles at him, making himself block me from her. At that point I give up. I submit and told her I had wonderful time. Got her Snapchat and left out ",seduction
"""It's my last night..."" A GREEN LIGHT to escalate [FR] Models series","*Hey everyone, OpenStraight back with more write-ups as part of the Models series. I'm trying to get these down* as factually as possible *so if you see read something that's* [weird](https://www.reddit.com/r/seduction/comments/9jcebw/we_might_die_how_to_plan_a_date_thatll_blow_her/e6qhn4c) *or* [lame](https://www.reddit.com/r/seduction/comments/9jcebw/we_might_die_how_to_plan_a_date_thatll_blow_her/e6qh33h) *or you think is* [weak af](https://www.reddit.com/r/seduction/comments/9jcebw/we_might_die_how_to_plan_a_date_thatll_blow_her/e6qfhyw) *- that's just how I do.*

**TLDR; If a girl tells you that ""it's her last night"" then the chances that she's about to sleep with you have just skyrocketed.**

Women play a funny game when it comes to sex. They don't want to put out too easily. But they also don't want to miss out altogether. **A woman will string you along with teases forever but if she feels like she's about to miss out altogether, she WILL sleep with you**. This is the basis for many hookups and if you are a man of real value, a women may sleep with you just because deep down she knows that **she has to** if she wants a **shot at the marriage** or to **stop you getting it elsewhere**. Here's a quick account of three girls I slept with who **did so because it was their last chance.**

&amp;#x200B;

1. Chinese 20F some kind of [instagram model](https://i.imgur.com/GiJmZEi.png) alone at a jazz bar. I came in, amped from 'ecstatic dance', and proceeded to sit down next to her and make jokes about how she is just like [Lei Feng](https://www.quora.com/Whats-the-story-of-Lei-Feng). We used google translate to cut across the language barrier and then she tells me: ""**It's my last night in the country**"". She's got to get back to her hotel. I've got the umbrella. We were bed together less than two hours after meeting.
2. Chinese 28F spending $500 for four days at a yoga resort (not worth it). I danced with her at the same ecstatic dance then asked her if she wants to come out for drinks the next night. She's not doing anything; Chinese women are **hopeless** at making friends overseas. We're listening to karaoke and she says ""**Tonight is my last night**"". I asked her if she wants me to take her back to her room. Yes. We were in the shower thirty minutes later.
3. 30F educated German woman who had been been eyeing me off me all week after I took her swimming in the shallows whilst high on LSD\*. She's pissy because *I won't give up spending time with other girls* for her and I'm pissy because she won't *tell me outright whether she has a boyfriend*. Finally she ***insisted***  we spend the evening together. She tells me **""I'm going back to Germany tomorrow""**. That night, we made love.
4. BONUS: The same principle was in play [here](https://www.reddit.com/r/seduction/comments/9jcebw/we_might_die_how_to_plan_a_date_thatll_blow_her/)

Conclusion: If you hear the phrase ""**This is my last night**"" it's on.

Best of luck out there boys.

\*LSD and psychedelics - [don't mess around with it.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xh7CV1Bm9xY&amp;t=5m57s)

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
Looking good really helps,"It’s been said here countless times. But it’s the weekend and I just wanna encourage some of you guys. 

Hit the fuckin gym! 

I actually have girls approaching me now it’s easy as fuck to fuck, lol. 

Also tinder is straightforward. 

Get your face and body leaned out and watch how girls can’t stop checking you out, it’s almost uncomfortable, but you gotta just embrace it. 

If you’re not there yet, so what? Still, go out, while you’re building your body and get some confidence built inside you. 

Have a great weekend!",seduction
Im at the club rn,Advice plsssssss. At the club rn. Look good let me live thru you.  What would you do? If you had all the confidence in the world.,seduction
Language barrier - Brazil - Club,"Hello Pimps,

I am from the Netherlands and now living in Brazil for an exchange, i've been struggeling with social anxiety for my entire live. However, since i am in Brazil i notice i've become more open and things are changing for me. Still sometimes i experience it. I get constantly laid with girls i met using tinder, i am physically attractive, however, my confidence could be better. I have problems talking sometimes because of the language barrier, especially in clubs where there is loud music. 

&amp;#x200B;

Went out yesterday with a friend to a very big club, it was cool lots of nice chicks. BUT, i didn't take action my brazilian friend was in the VIP earea and provided me with free drinks so he said i should stay near that place because otherwise i would be pushed back by the crowd. This in turn caused that i didn't walk much in the club. I didn't approach a girl. I notice i've problems in this loud environments to approach girls because i can't make myself understandable.... 

I felt kinda lost and my state was really droping at a point i wanted the girls and i couldn't get myself to have fun by my own. How can i prevent situations like this or what can i do?",seduction
How to never run out of things to say,"So I work as a confidence/dating coach and one thing guys always complain about is running out of things to say. It’s a massive pain point which affects loads of people so if you can relate to that then I feel you bro. I feel you. And I got you too. I both got and feel you! So this is what I’m gonna do. Here I’m gonna address some techniques you can use to make sure that you’re never lost for words ever again and can flow effortlessly through your future conversations.

You ready? Here come the pain.

First things first, (I Poppa freaks all da honeyz) you need to realise that when you’re tongue tied in front of that smoking hot 10 at the bar, you haven’t run out of things to say. You’ve run out of things to say that you think are good enough.

The truth is that there are any number of things for you to talk about. Millions and billions of things. Trillions and gazillions of things. Jillions and quintillions of things! You could talk about your love of architecture, about Drizzy, whether or not she checks out girls’ legs or asses in public, about Spider-Man, Ethiopian coffee beans, or anything else your brain can come up with. 

**You just need to think of something interesting and then voice it to the other person.**

But that’s not what you do, is it? What you do is judge yourself. 

What you do is tell yourself that whatever you have to say simply isn’t good enough for the stunner you want to say it too. 

What you do is put a ridiculous amount of pressure on yourself by thinking that your ideas are crap while simultaneously raising this person to godlike status in your brain. 

And guess what? This pressure causes your brain to short circuit and render you as witty and engaging as a Timmy from South Park.

**TIMMY!**

**The first key to never running out of things to say is to have faith in the things you want to talk about**

**TIMMY!**

Assume that whatever it is that you would want to discuss if you weren’t so fucking nervous is fucking cool and fucking worth talking about. Assume that the person you’re talking to wants to fucking hear whatever you have to fucking say and then act like that’s the case.

**Fucking simple**

**TIMMY!**

Something that you might want to know about us here people we’re kinda like apes or sheep (sheepapes?). If someone starts acting in a confident way around us then regardless of whatever the freak they might be talking about, the VAST majority of us will assume that they’re a leader and get to following pronto. 

Use that to your advantage! If you act like the things you have to say are awesome and worth hearing then people will get sucked into your world and happily talk to you about whatever the hell you’re into. It really is that simple. Just act like what you have to say has value and people will assume it does.

**The second thing to remember when talking to people is that you can’t be stuck inside your own head.** 

Being stuck inside your own head is the poison of free-flowing conversation. 

So be in the moment. Be present. Get the energy flowing through your body. Listen to the music and nod your head to it. Hear the wind, look at the person you’re talking to and what they’re wearing. Are they preppy or gothic? Do they look like they’ve been on holiday? Do they look like they’ve been killing it in the gym?  Do they have an accent? Does it sound German or Spanish? Why don’t you guess and then ask them if you’re right?

There’s any number of things you could be talking about and there’s no reason for you to ever run out of shit to say in a conversation.

Follow these quick tips and you’ll notice an immediate improvement in your conversations with both guys and girls.

**TIMMY!**

**btw I’m always looking to connect with guys who are interested in self improvement so if you’re on a mission to become the best version of yourself then hit me up with a DM**



",seduction
Advice on approaching women in a group or in a pair?,"Approaching a girl on her own is relatively easy, however when they are in a group or in a pair in get be significantly harder. 

Regardless, say you do approach and the conversation is flowing and you then want to seal the deal by asking for the number, can you ask for more than one number? Or should you directly ask one of the girl's only for her number which might risk hurting any others in the group?

&amp;#x200B;

Anyone have any experience/ideas in this regard?",seduction
Buffalo NY - How do I find a group of PUA?,"Hello Reddit! I've been lurking on this group for a few months now and am obsessed with seduction tech. 

My simple question is this- Does anyone know a good way for me to connect with other PUA (any level of experience) in Buffalo NY?

I have tried checking out the forum on RSD and Facebook but haven't found any medium that will help me connect.

I do go out frequently and have an easy time connecting with people in real life. Recently I have come to the conclusion that I need to find a peer group to grow as a aspiring PUA. My plan B (to finding a group online) is to continue going out and be more social with ""Naturals"" that I've identified and build friendships there.

Any advice is welcome! Thanks!",seduction
First tinder date after many matches! Any advice?,"I have been in tinder game for few months. Finally I got my first date after many matches.  The girl i m going to date in quite social. She said she casually go out with friends for drinks. And I don’t not hang out much with friends. So I want to know how to entertain her and keep her happy all the time when she is with me. So that we can go for many dates. I want her to have a chill vibe around me. I m meeting her in a local bar.

P.S. she looks a bit chubby in photo.",seduction
What if you'll never be naturally funny?,"I'm 22. What I've found to be the 2nd most important thing to attracting women, is being funny or the ability to hold a light hearted convo and get a few chuckles. 

-
Sure you can have money or power, but if you're an average Joe, it seems like girls my age, in college, look for this primarily after being physically attractive. Even money and power will get you so far... 

-
I'm physically attractive enough to women. I'm just not great at conversation, despite years of practice. And being funny does NOT run naturally with me. I've never been funny nor will i suddenly obtain it. My mind is just a little slow at coming up with stuff.

-
What the fuck do i do? No one wants a boring ass mother fucker. I go to bars and have had no luck bc i cant put a smile on their face.",seduction
Tips on how to seduce sassy women?,"Hi there,

Beginner in seduction and long time lurker so bare with me lol. 

Theres a girl who attends the same college as me, see her around now and then, I know who she is because shes a friend of a friend. We've spoken casually like 3 times, but every time was a group conversation. I didnt find her physically attractive when I first met her (4 months ago) but after I saw her new instagram photo, I cant stop thinking about doing the deed with her. We both follow each other on Instagram. 

I've got the general fundamentals of seduction down, but in need of a few tips on how to approach this specific type of girl... because Google provides nothing. 

She is SUPER SUPER bitchy, says whatever she wants and acts like shes the most beautiful women on Earth (personally I'd rate her as a 7). Shes like the type of girl to shoot you down no matter what you do.  A lot of guys are super afraid to approach her because of her hot head. I know shes 'done it' with 2 ex-boyfriends, both were your typical bad boys and were gang members, if that helps. Tips would be greatly appreciated! :) Thanks! ",seduction
Girl just told me I have a ton of friends and she feels lucky to be one of the closest ones.,"She said ""Everyone likes you"", I said ""I think everyone is an exaggeration"", and she said ""No, really. Everyone likes you. I guess I should feel lucky for being one of the closest to you.""

Does this mean anything ir is it just friendly?",seduction
Take it to the next level,So im a girl and im not usually the dominant in a relationship. This being said i just asked my crush to a movie (he agreed) and how to i make the next move or get him to? ,seduction
A giant list of QUESTIONS TO ASK A GIRL to make her attracted to you,"Stumbled over this website, which has seduction guru Hypnotica talking about asking girls questions from a place of confidence.   


There are heaps of questions to ask girls on the site, and loads of stuff from Hypnotica about confidence (if you watch his confidence video).   


[http://questionstoaskagirl.strikingly.com/](http://questionstoaskagirl.strikingly.com/)",seduction
Supplementary Subs/Websites that you recommend in Non-PUA topics,"As you all know seduction is more than just approaching random women, etc. it also is about being the best version of your self. Any resources you guys can recommend for others to improve themselves? For example I regularly read:

&amp;#x200B;

r/Fitness

[r/nutrition](https://www.reddit.com/r/nutrition)

&amp;#x200B;

Anything you guys can recommend for fashion, etc.?",seduction
Freedom from outcome,I must say since I found out about this wonderful community the number one trait that has helped me is developing freedom from outcome when talking with women. As long as I approach and say hello then I feel like I have won. Whether she rejects me or acknowledges me it doesn’t matter. My state has risen so much just from the simple fact that I initiated contact.,seduction
How To make a woman feel like a woman without putting her on a pedestal (Question),"Like the title says, how do i make a woman feel like a woman, loved, wanted, desired, compliment her without putting her on a pedestal?

&amp;#x200B;

Edit:  This whole making a woman feel desired wanted beautiful etc comes from sexual advice for the bedroom. 

Yet i find it difficult to go from my normal mindset where i wouldn't put a woman on a pedestal to suddenly switch and do it in the bedroom since i fail to really grasp why it would be so different there. ",seduction
Strategies for fucked up situation,"I'm in my twenties, never had a gf, gone to prostitutes several times and now I don't have a good group of friends with whom I can go out and socialize /practice game. In my university there are only males and I struggle to create occasions for going out outside of classes. I'm going to gym and taking a martial art class but I haven't managed to get a good group of friends. I have given several shots with dating apps with no success in the past. I'll try again with Tinder in 3 weeks with a legit profile but other than that I don't know what to do to improve my situation. Due to the university I've got little to none free time. I'm afraid to go out alone because I think that if known people sees me alone I'll ruin the little social circle I currently have. I'm also nearly broke (in terms of money and also mental health sometimes). Any advice?

  
",seduction
The Secret To A Successful Night Out (an easy hack for when you've got no wingmen),"I’ve been travelling the world for the last year, working as a freelance writer and confidence coach. 

One of the most common questions I get from my clients is: ""How do you go on nights out alone?""  

The truth is: it's easy to find friends to go out with if you're living in a party hostel like I often do.

Still, I do adventure off into the occasional solo night out, and here are the steps I take to ensure I always have an awesome time.

## 1. Be social ALL day

If you spend the entire day working hard and not talking to many people, it's likely you'll arrive on your solo night feeling really stifled and anti-social. 

The cure to that is to make smalltalk with everyone you come across.  

Luckily, if you live in hostels, it's NORMAL to that and WEIRD if you keep yourself to yourself. 

That's why hostel life is for me :)

If you're not that lucky, it's really useful to give the occasional compliment to passers-by in the street, or have a quick chat with the cashiers, waiters or Uber drivers who serve you throughout the day. 

This is especially important when you're on your way to a bar or a club. Make a point to speak with people in the queue, the bouncer, the cloakroom worker. It'll do a lot to get you out of your shell.  

## 2. Find a 'home base'

This is the secret, alluded to in the title  

It makes it so easy to feel comfortable on a solo night out. 

The first thing you do is hunt for a 'home base'. This is a group of people who like you or accept you.

It doesn't have to a group of hot chicks, or even anyone remotely cool (it's actually easier if they're not). Just a group of people who don't mind you hanging out with them.

All you have to do is be really nice to them. No flirting. No edgy opinions  that'll piss them off. 

Provided you have a decent base level of fun and charisma, they'll probably be really pleased that some cool guy came and talked to them. They might even buy you drinks (happens to me all the time!)

Now, you have a group of people to hang out with. 

If anyone asks: ""where are your friends"" you can point in their general direction (or say whatever you want - if you're comfortable with your loner status, they will be).  

Of course, you don't need to stay with them your home base. But they're always there if you're feeling a bit self-conscious about being alone. 

## 3. Be an awesome fun, confident person. 

If you're the sort of person who knows how to: 

* speak in a way that makes people want to listen 
* never run out of things to say 
* self-amuse and have fun in any environment
* help people get out of THEIR comfort zone. 

These are the things we should first be learning through the game. Get this handled, then sprinkle all the PUA tactics on top of that. Learn how to do this and you will slay in the club, regardless of how many friends you bring inside with you. 

That’s what’s been working great for me overseas anyway. I’ve had my most successful year with the ladies, yet I find myself being less ‘gamey’ than ever. 

***I recently co-launched a Telegram group for men who want to become amazing with women. Hundreds of lads discussing their goals and getting feedback on their sticking points. Drop me a PM if you'd like to join.*** ",seduction
[FR] Cold Approach at Starbucks - long post with conversation details.,"I'm not too familiar with day-game and cold approaches in this setting, so this was a bit of a new experience for me. I was at Starbucks earlier today doing work when a super cute girl sat beside me. She was talking on her phone in Russian, and she had an accent herself. I thought to myself ""damn, I'll be pissed if I miss this opportunity"". She is probably 19-20 years old, and a student at the college here.

&amp;#x200B;

When she hung up on the phone, she pulled out her books and got settled. I turned to her before she buried herself in to reading to strike up a conversation. The conversation went as follows:

Me: ""Hi, were you just talking in Russian there?""

her: \*smile\* ""yes""

Me: \*smile back\* ""Oh cool, are you from Russia?""

Her: ""no, I'm from Ukraine""

Me: ""Nice! did you come here for school?""

Her: ""yes, I go to xyz school""

Me: ""French school?"" (With her accent, the name of school sounded like she was saying ""french"")

Her: ""yes"" (Short response, but she's smiling throughout it all)

Me: ""I didn't know there was a french school here""

Her: ""no no! xyz college""

Me ""ohhhh! xyz college""

Her: \*blush\* ""sorry....""

me: ""no no that was more my fault"" \*playful and very light bump with my elbow to her arm\*

I asked her what she was taking and she told me she was in marketing/advertising. I just so happened to be working on a proposal for one of my new clients which involves virtual reality escape rooms.  I told her I was in something similar and she asked me what I did. 

me: ""I am doing some marketing for virtual reality escape rooms, do you know what those are?""

her: ""no, i don't think so""

I explained to her, and she did know what they were once I broke it down. She started telling me about her experience with VR and stuff like that, and escape rooms. It was a pretty cool convo, but the atmosphere was so loud and coupled with her accent, it was hard to understand fully. I was keeping the convo going but it was sort of difficult to be smooth about it. Once the conversation felt like it was dying down, I did the following:

me: ""I'm puanerrd by the way, nice to meet you"" \*handshake\*

her: ""I'm *girl,* nice to meet you to"" \*soft handshake\*

me: ""that's a nice name, do you know what it means?""

her: ""yes I do""

Me: ""I don't really like the meaning of my name""

her: ""Why don't you like your name?""

Me: ""I do like my name! I just think the meaning is really cheesy"" 

Her: \*laughs\* ""oh, what does it mean""

Me: ""It means beautiful"" \*laughing...\*

Her: ""that's a good meaning though!""

Me: ""yeah I know, but it's so corny. Whats your name mean?""

Her ""my name means fire.""

Me: ""Wow, see? that's really cool haha. Could be your nickname"" (lame thing to say....)

her: \*laughing\* ""yeah i like it. I don't want to be called fire tho ""

Me: ""haha, I know.""

The convo felt like it was dying again because I couldn't think of anything clever to say to save myself here. I switched conversation to her being here in Canada. I asked her if she liked the country, and she said she wants to travel it more before she comes to a conclusion. But right now she has to focus on studying. I went the flow and asked her if she was studying for a midterm, and she mentioned it was just a quiz. Had a little back and forth about quizzes and how I had to them every week. Sounded like she wanted to get to it, so I figured I should respect that. But here is how I attempted a number close

Me: ""can I ask you for your number. i wanna shoot you a message and we can link up sometime"" (I was so nervous. I lost eye contact at the last half of that sentence, and used a bunch of short filled words like ""uh, um"". Not overly, but still there)

Her: ""I'll give you my facebook"" (so an obvious failure on my part) 

I give her my phone with FB open and she sends herself a friend request. I know that she was just being nice, and the likely hood of her actually accepting it is very low. (still hasn't done that at the time of this writing and it was about an hour ago). 

Me: ""it was awesome meeting you, i'll shoot you a message!""

Her: ""it was nice meeting you to!""

Then I left and that sums it up. I know that I didn't succeed here, but it was my first real attempt at a day-game cold approach so I will call it a win. Question for you guys:

**I could have improved the confidence level of the way I asked her for her number for sure. But how would you have phrased the question asking for her number?**

**I didn't do much ""kino"" (a slight bump with the elbow and a handshake). I didn't feel it was appropriate to do much more. Could I have done more?**

**Whenever I felt a conversation was dying, I would quickly switch topics. Is that a good strategy to keep conversations going?**

**Even though I could have done better, she wasn't ""weirded"" out so much that she felt the need to leave or sit elsewhere. She would have just turned back to her work. I just felt wayy to awkward to be sitting there after that convo and the attempt at the number close. Do you guys think I should have kept sitting there and worked on my own thing beside her? (with this being the case, I would keep talking to her over the course of sitting there, maybe not full blown convos, but something). Or do you think me leaving was likely the better choice?**

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
How can I stop getting in my head and making moves?,"So I had another date that didn't end the best. 

The 411: Matched with this girl on tinder, met at a coffee shop, talked for 20min, then walked around for 1 hour while window shopping, and then she invited me to her dorm. We talked for a bit, played music, lied down on her bed and just talked. We looked at tattoos online, since she was going to get a new one, and life stuff. The topic of feet came up which both of us were disgusted by, saying that's not her kink. I said I'm vanilla as hell, which she said she has her various kinks, but then said I don't show and tell. 

Before I had to go, I went for the kiss, didn't get the cheek, but just a quick peck but then she said ""she doesn't kiss on the first date"". She's a bit busy with life, but we do want to see each other again, in a few weeks so I'm not getting my hopes up.

What can I learn from this?

Should I make a move earlier, or not?",seduction
When a girl makes flirty eye contact,"I was out in public on a bus and noticed that a girl standing to my side was looking in my direction. She didn't stop after 5 seconds so I turned to face her. She looked me in the eyes mischievously, then looked me down and looked back in my eyes with a sultry smirk. Now I don't have a problem striking conversation with girls but where do I start after an assertive introduction like that? Something neutral like weather would probably sound silly. Should I have complemented her on her appearance right away? What is the best way to continue in such situations? ",seduction
Successful conversation samples,"Is there anyway I can find good tinder conversation examples? Whenever I read those, I come up with good things to say on my next conversation, when I don’t, I struggle to think of something funny / witty.

Whenever I google for it, I always end up on the same links and in the end they don’t add anything new anymore.",seduction
Does age play a part in seduction? Regarding approaching older women,"So, my friend (19) and I (18) started going out to bars/nightclubs (18 is the legal drinking age here) and we've noticed that usually we are the among the youngest if not the youngest people in the room. We only visit student/college places where the crowd is 18-24 so we don't really run into any mature people, but still we end up being by far the youngest. This seems to be affecting our success. 


The only girls we have success with is girls our own age meaning 18yos. Everyone else, not so much. We even got a few eyerolls from girls, as if we were joking around. But it's not like we make an active effort. We actively approach 20somethingyearolds and it seems that they definitely aren't into us and seem to focus on other, usually older guys. But it's not like we're ugly or anything, we're pretty attractive active guys, and it seems shocking that girls may sometimes go for other guys, who are less physically active/attractive, just because they're older.. We do have babyfaces (or what people would usually call that) so it may be playing a part in all of this..


It's weird, since I read online that girls like it when younger guys hit on them.. Is there something we are doing wrong, or should we just stick to girls our own age?",seduction
Some food for thought for those who hate how they look,,seduction
Daygame approaches and how to overcome technical difficulties,"Hey everyone.

TL;DR

I think I just saw the girl of my dreams. In the bus, standing right next to me. And I could not talk to her. She had headphones.

&amp;#x200B;

I heard from girls that I have the player vibe. I pulled girls from night clubs and Tinder dates are going well. I don't see myself as an expert, just some guy that can read the situation and have the emotional qualities to make her follow my lead.

&amp;#x200B;

But I just cant approach on daytime. Even when its clear she's interested, or when the situation is just so easy and ripe for the pickings. I think I just saw the girl of my dreams. In the bus, standing right next to me. We got out of the bus in the same station even. And I could not talk to her. She had headphones. And that's it, this is where I got stuck. I knew what I would say to her and her vibe was very clear, but the headphones... I know the typical response to this kind of difficulty is ""just give her something better to do"", but I still feel this is a roadblock for me. Or daygame, in general. As if the frame in a club or in a Tinder date are very clear, but I just can't do it in day time.

&amp;#x200B;

How do you guys handle the every day situations? What's the internal realization that I miss in order to feel it is really as normal and effortless as it should be in day time situations? Thanks for reading.",seduction
5 Common Habits That Will Kill Your Confidence,,seduction
How much time after the first date.,I went out to a girl I've met on tinder. It went well. Didn't do anything because some advice me to be more patient. How much time should i wait before inviting her again ?,seduction
"""We might die"". How to PLAN A DATE that'll blow her knickers off. FR Taking a 19F Art Teacher on an island adventure. Models Series [FR] [F-close]"," 

https://i.redd.it/318rbwhrxro11.png

*I'm doing a series on the girls I've slept with since reading* ***Models*** *in 2015. Hopefully this helps you see the principles playing out in real life.*

I met this girl one day beforehand at a beach party.

[https://www.reddit.com/r/seduction/comments/9ipiqj/approaching\_19f\_and\_stepmother\_at\_a\_beach\_party/](https://www.reddit.com/r/seduction/comments/9ipiqj/approaching_19f_and_stepmother_at_a_beach_party/)

TLDR; **Lead** the date (have a motorcycle or car), go to **multiple great locations,** do something **physical,** make it **simple**to go to your place at the end.

This is a short post on how to **structure** your date so that you get the most out of it with the least complications.

1. **Pick her up** and go somewhere **familiar to you.** I chose a sauna in the north of the island. Great spot because it has fires, drinks, sweets, open air, and *most importantly* saunas and showers. The key point: I **knew the location** like the back of my hand.
2. Do something **physical** early on. This sets the **trajectory** of the date.I [rubbed baking soda](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=d5PLeVh9Oqk) into her skin in the sauna. Start at the hands and move to the arms - that way it doesn't feel intrusive. Then move to massaging the neck and shoulders, and ***when IOIs\\*** **are present**\* do the sidebody, breasts and lower back.
3. **Move on** early to \*\*multiple locations.\*\*I chose to take her to a local waterfall and pool nearby and grabbed a quick drink then again to a local 5-star resort. I'm **in-the-know** and can [take her](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=RmqRx3ypWwU&amp;t=0m37s) to [prestige](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=nMsacoc9DnQ&amp;t=127s) **venues**.
4. Do something that gets the [**heart racing**](https://i.imgur.com/1uW9AuZ.png)**.** I challenge her to walk across an underwater [land-bridge](https://goo.gl/maps/42tvqjYd37w) to an adjacent island. The waves are huge and in the dark we're in danger of being swept away. I laugh and tell her if we go further **we'll die**. Take her back on the **motorcycle** so we can ""wash off"" at my place.
5. **Don't be** [**too eager**](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=47qqz2zes8Q&amp;t=0m14s) to go to bed. We went for a walk along the beach and a swim at my place. I'm not \*\*desperate,\*\*and I'm not **pushy.** This delay also gives me time to take a viagra which **extends** my ""window"" for sex. Once back in my bathroom I showed her how to use the shower and asked her if she wanted me to take her top off.
6. **Talk** her through what you're doing""[I'm going to touch you here X,](https://www.goodreads.com/book/show/265413.The_Tao_of_Sexual_Massage) is that ok?"" ""This might hurt a little bit, you tell me if it's **too much**"" ""Would you like to **make love** now?"" For girls who have been with guys who say nothing and make no noise, these verbal cues are real **turn on**. Plus for the new generation coming through who **obsess over consent**, I get to play to their ideals.

Conclusion:

That girl still calls me up now and again to have phone sex and talk about how much she loved the night. Plus I got to be bold and adventurous and push myself to have a ripper time **without worrying where it was going**\*.\* Dates are like writing an essay: as long as you know where it's going, it can write itself.

BONUS: I normally wait two days to text a girl once I have her number (but I also text her later on the night that I get it) because I think this shows a certain '**non-neediness**'. With this girl, I texted her *the next morning* to catch up *that night.* I was lucky because she was ""**Leaving the island**"" (I've got **another post** on that theme coming up) the next day I would have missed my chance.

\*Indication Of Interests",seduction
Still Can’t Approach – Try The “I’m Nervous As Hell” Method,"We’ve discussed all kinds of tactics to get yourself to approach. There’s the “fuck it” method. There’s the “do it to see what happens” method. There’s the “countdown method.” One dude on here a while back was doing the “Pennywise method.” That’s right, he approached chicks at the bar by tossing them a red balloon.

These methods are all great (except I’m not sure about the Pennywise method), and there are certainly dozens more. However, if you’re still unable to approach. If you’re still just standing there. If you still turn into a knees knocking, hands sweating, legs trembling, heart throbbing, mouth babbling, blob of a human being, then here’s another opener for you to consider:

Be honest. Be straight up honest and tell her you’re “nervous as hell.” I personally prefer “nervous as fuck” but you make your own choice. 

It’s amazing the kind of relief honesty can provide. When you’re nervous as hell and you approach a woman, trying to appear ***not*** nervous as hell, you’re not being honest. You’re hiding something. You’re faking it.

This not only makes you seem awkward in front of her, but it adds tons of weight to your own personal discomfort. There’s enough to think about when approaching a girl. Hiding the fact that you’re nervous is just another thing to think about. 

So if you want to try this method, just walk up to her and say:

“Excuse me. I’m really nervous as hell to tell you this, but I think you’re really cute and I wanted to come say hi.”

You should find that by saying that, you will instantly feel much more at ease. It will also put her at ease because you’ve laid your cards out on the table and you’re not trying to be some smooth PUA which she then needs to throw up defenses against. 

So when you say it, say it with a huge smile. Not a “I’m pretending to be confident smile” but rather a “what a relief” smile. 

If you try this method, I guarantee you will get a huge smile from her and a “thank you” 9 times out of 10. Think about it, almost no girl is going to blast you for hitting on her if you’re straight up honest (and show a touch of vulnerability) right from the start.  

Now you’re in. The conversation is open. Take it from there. You won’t get the number or the date every time. No one does. But you will get the number or the date more times than if you just stood there with knees knocking. 

Of course, you still should have your grooming and wardrobe put together when you do this. That should go without saying. Being nervous isn’t an excuse for looking like shit. 

And if all else fails, try the Pennywise method. ",seduction
Approaching in the library,"I have NO game whatsoever. I did only 3 approaches in the last year(terrible, I know). Every now and then I see this insanely at the library with her friends. She's always so focused and studious. Me, being a pussy and having no idea on how to do this, told myself that I'd approach her when I see her alone and outside the library. BUT I never see her outside the library. My only option is to go for it head in first. How should I pull this off? The library is big with about 100 people studying and it's quiet af. People from the other side can hear you whispering. And the place is crowded, so I rarely see a seat next to her empty. I don't know how to approach her without being awkward. ",seduction
Curious?,"I was already good with women prior to reading PU. Please select from the following:

1. I had charm and did well with women but couldn’t explain why.

2. I did well with women but could explain things I.e. I was technical about things.

3. I didn’t do well with women so I sought out advice due to low understanding of women. Pu explained women to me.

4. I didn’t do well with women but understood them and often had female friends but they weren’t interested. 

From you alls responses I can tailor my advice better. 

",seduction
Do girls like the babyface or no?,Im 20 and im constantly told by women and men i look like im 16 if not younger. I got carded in canada and it was legal to drink at 18....and the bartender was the same age as me. Im not overweight but the bodyfat percentage isnt the best haha would working out help or is this something i should learn to work around?,seduction
"When first meeting someone on a date, what's a good way to quickly break the ice?","I get a fuck ton of dates through online dating and it's great, but I haven't gone on a date in 3 years since I was tied down haha. I want it to be relaxed and fun, what's a good way to break the ice and make it natural?",seduction
How do you get a woman who is your friend to feel attraction for you?,"The quick answer to this question is to stop acting like a friend and start acting like a potential lover.

In other words, you need to communicate to that woman that you’re a potential mate and you need to communicate to her that you’re of higher value than her other options.

If you’re friends with a woman, then chances are she is already comfortable with you, and she likes your personality, but you haven’t triggered attraction in her, which is why you are friends and not lovers.

So, what you can do is start teasing her more and treating her like a bratty little sister. This behavior will show her that you don’t have her on a pedestal and you’re not “over-valuing” her because of her beauty.

Another thing you can do is show that you are preselected. She needs to know that you’re getting other women, and those women need to be on her level or higher. If the friend you’re trying to attract is what you consider an “8 out of 10” in looks, then you need to communicate to her that you are already getting other women who are “8s out of 10” or higher.

You can communicate preselection to her by literally telling her about the women you’re dating or bring them around her. You can also post pictures on social media, so she can see that you clearly have options and you’re not desperate to be with her.

Some other things you can do is be less available. Don’t call her as much. End the conversations with her faster than usual. Stop complimenting her as much. Behave like a man who has plenty of options with beautiful women and doesn’t need to bend over backwards to impress any woman.

One thing you need to understand is that by attempting to transition from friends to lovers with a woman, you’re risking whatever relationship you already have with that woman. If you both have a great friendship and you try to change things up suddenly, it could backfire, and the relationship will never be the same.

So, if you want to get with a woman who is currently your friend, really think about whether you’re willing to risk the friendship you already have with her.",seduction
Breaking the wall (I'm an Introvert),"I get on the bus with three other people. I sit down and an attractive girl sits down right in front of me. It is just us four on a previously empty bus. She sits down on both so she is leaning back and he legs are up and she has a sucker in her mouth. However she is watching something on her phone with her earbuds in. From the angle the phone is at, I have a feeling she is watching me though her phone's reflection. She's hot, but I don't know if I should bother her. My confidence is low, and I'm a shy introvert.

I don't know what to do. Girls will do shit like this and send hints, like bend over in front of me. I never had a girlfriend. So sexual stuff is mostly just a frequent fantasy in my head. I get hot and bothered, and start stuttering / acting weird. And you know how much girls sense awkwardness like this

I enjoy nice things in life, I want to treat someone else to me. I'm just so shy I don't know wht to do. I'm thinking someone on this subreddit was like me.",seduction
"Went on a date, got pretty drunk, but she seemed agitated","Hey seddit,

I went on a second date with this girl, and we were having a good conversation. We got pretty drunk and talked a lot. But then.. this is important:
I'm not white and she is, and we started talking about race, and then she said ""please don't hate me for this"" and then said ""I would never want to talk to only white people"". I was like 'ok, NBD' but she said she's awful and can't believe she said that and she said she shouldn't have had so many drinks. I don't even see anything wrong with what she said but after that moment she was acting very agitated for the rest of the night until we parted to our ways and said good bye.

We kissed a few times during the night and when we parted ways but I initiated and she seemed agitated when she kissed me back.

What do I do now, is it ok to text her asking if she is ok, I have no idea what happened to her. I really like this girl and want to see her again but don't want to seem desperate by texting her first 

How do I proceed?",seduction
How to Homecoming (For Highschool),"Basically the title. As long as I make the night great for her it'll be great for me. What can I do to make this night a night to remember?

Also so for some context, I'm a sophomore, she's a junior. Our school is pretty big ~1500 students it's a Catholic school (It's not celibate it is quite the opposite). If more context be needed I'll reply.",seduction
Pickup Newbies,"Hey everyone. I started following the journey of PUAs and I seem to resonate with their stories. I have moderate social anxiety, low confidence when interacting with others, a limited social life, and feel like getting good at pickup could change my life in all aspects. I consider myself a decent looking guy with an above average physique. I have a bad habit of reading too much information without applying, so I am really looking to take bold action here in attempt to change my life. So with that being said, if anyone reading this has ever been at the same point in life as I am right now, I would appreciate if you answer my questions and give me your insight :)

&amp;#x200B;

Is getting over AA as simple as approaching tons of girls endlessly? - I made my first cold approach about 2 weeks ago indirectly by asking for the directions and then turning it into a conversation. I ended up getting her snap and we talked for a little after that. I don't really care about whether she actually liked me or not, just want to grow the confidence to do this at scale. I have read about a program by Good Looking Loser for AA, but it's long and I feel like there's a faster way to get over AA. How did you personally get over AA? Or if not, how did it eventually have less of an effect on you?

&amp;#x200B;

After getting over AA, how did you improve your actual conversational skills and learn to convey alpha male dominance? One thing that I do all the time is I get stuck in my head during conversation and I'm not truly able to be myself in a relaxed manner, which ends up making the conversation very awkward. I have been practicing mindfulness meditation which allows me to not become critical of myself after every awkward conversation. One thing I am going to do is film my interactions and study them later that night to figure out what I could have done better. What have you guys done to improve your social IQ? 

&amp;#x200B;

I have a feeling that it just comes down to fucking up a bunch of times until you succeed, and then as you succeed more, you'll grow a new self image and you'll get better. I just need to learn to not give a fuck. Please leave your suggestions and answers to my questions. I appreciate it.  

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
I got a “Yes” but I think I should’ve worded things better,"Today I asked a girl I liked if she wanted to “hang out” sometime. The only problem is exactly that, I said “hang out” not “go out” or “get together.”

I have her number and whatnot, should I text her for a coffee date? Should I have worded things better? ",seduction
Hostel game,Can someone give me some briefs on hostel game?,seduction
Tinder is a confusing place,Why is it that girls match but then give you half assed responses without any potential for the convo to continue. It’s like most girls use it for an ego boost to see guys trying to get with them. Either that or I’m not that attractive lol. Any ways of how to deal with this? I’m practically addicted to tinder ,seduction
How can I approach in a classroom setting?,"There’s this girl across the room in my chemistry class who I catch staring at me once or twice per class, how could I go about approaching her. I feel like it’s a little more difficult because I can’t just start small talk as if she were sitting near me and # close. 

Does anyone have any advice?

Edit: wording",seduction
Good places to daygame in Houston?,"I was wondering if there were others in Houston who go out daygaming and where they usually go to? Houston can get super hot and humid and I find there's very few spots with people, especially pretty women, walking around if they can just drive instead. All I can think of are the Galleria and college campuses.

&amp;#x200B;",seduction
Is this coming across as needy?,"So I've been talking to a girl on bumble and we previously agreed to go out for drinks at some point. After chatting a few days after said agreement, the conversation came to a stop (and after some hinting at meeting up) and then a few hours later I asked if she wanted to meet up next week. Does this come across as needy?",seduction
"Moved to Fort Lauderdale, Florida and looking for a wing",Hello there. I'm a 29 year old male looking to try out some night game with a wing. Would anyone be interested in joining me in the city?,seduction
I'm one of the most successful and one of the most afraid gut I know.,"So I just wanna know if anyone can realte to this.

&amp;#x200B;

I fucked probably over 200 girls. I had threesomes with my ex, which was one of the most beautiful woman in most rooms (i'm 29 shes 21, which I don't think it matters but most people here seem to think it does), I had 5 more girlfriends during my life time. I'm thin, tall and constantly being called out for being handsome and/or stylish. (A girl (not a hot one) even aksed me once to please take a picture with me, WHILE I WAS WITH MY GIRLFRIEND, cause I was so handsome). And yes I feel handsome too.

&amp;#x200B;

Ok, that being said I'm fucking weird. I look like I don't care and/or feel superior to most people so normally (NORMALLY) people don't think I'm shy, just arrogant, which is better (but not good anyway). But I don't even know how I got so much success in my lifetime. I just ended a 1 year 7 months realtionship and I really like being single again but I totally lost the small sense of game that used to make me get laid I totallly losted, I know 2-3 months going out and it'll come back but I don't want that, I want real change.

&amp;#x200B;

Not a selfpity post, my intentions here is to understand how can I be so strange, How the fuck did I got that many girls, and I'm still one of the most afraid man I know. I was even hired to be a coach in a company here when everyone said I was the most succefull with girls from the seduction comunity in my city. What they didn't realize is I'm not really good at this... I was just kind of... smart, I seeked oportunity and I knew how to use them in my favor. I was never that guy that was brave, stood in the middle of the crowd and owned the place and got out with the hottest girl. I was just smart enough to use my advantages, to work on my looks etc. If I had made any big change inside I can't see how I would still be so scared...",seduction
Does alcohol help with game? (from a former teetotal),"The second I heard that not drinking helps with game, I was all-in. Full teetotal. 

I’d gone a year without getting laid while I was on the sauce, so what did I have to learn?

# Benefits of gaming sober

The main benefits of gaming sober are: 

* You remember what went well and what didn’t. You begin to notice patterns, the more you go out. You feel the pain of the bad nights, which should motivate you. THis all adds up to improving the more you go out
* Added general confidence in everyday sober life. Surely that’s everyone’s end goal.
* You’re sharp at the end of the night when it’s time to pull, while every other motherfucker can barely put two words together (in England anyway)
* As you progress, you notice social cues so quickly. Is she getting bored? Is she thinking about leaving? Is the mate about to cock-block. With experience, you can notice and address this shit before it happens.  
* Then, there’s obviously the financial and health benefits…

# Potential of gaming sober 

Let’s address these. Maybe you feel stifled and anxious at the start of the night. I got over this by approaching loads and building as soon as possible. Before I knew it, I was ‘in state’, and it would only fade if the approaching faded.   

Potentially some girls think you’re weird for not drinking, but you can overcome that just like any other shit test 

# My hypothesis about booze and the game

My hypothesis is that you should 100% be sober if you’re a beginner in the game.

However, once you pulled a few dozen times, my hypothesis is that you’re all good to enjoy a few drinks. 

At this point, it’s like playing with cheat codes activated. 

The two cons are completely eliminated. 

Just don’t get sloppy drunk and you will slay.

After four years as a teetotaller, I can have an awesome time off one pint :))) 

However, it’s not all buttercups and roses.

* There have been a couple of cases where a pull seemed completely on, then the girl lost interest seemingly out of nowhere. I was too drunk to realise why.
* Alcohol makes you OK with being bored. If you’re not careful, you can spend 30 minutes   You can be less motivated to approach. 
* I got whisky dick last month and that was pretty damn embarrassing. 
* Erm...my abs ain’t what they used to be...

Basically, as I’m travelling the world and sometimes living in party hostels which are heavily booze-orientated, so I’ve fallen back into it. 

Anyway, it could be fun to hear thoughts and experiences with gaming and booze.

***I co-launched a Telegram groups for men who want to become amazing with women. Hundreds of lads discussing their goals and getting feedback on their sticking points. Drop me a PM if you'd like to join.***  ",seduction
Indian Guys - #1 (Surprisingly Obvious) Tip To Getting A Western Girl,"When I was putting together my latest book, The Indian Dating Guide, I put in a couple calls to my cousin, who is dating an Indian guy named Tony. That’s right, Tony. I’ll get to that in a second.

My cousin btw is about as Catholic, American Pie as it gets.

I asked her and Tony all kind of questions about their relationship, how they met, etc. Tony was full of great information, but one thing stood out for me above all, and it’s the most obvious thing in the world.

He told me that after he started dating my cousin Lisa, all his buddies started asking him how me managed that.  They wanted his secret. What did he tell them? “I went over and talked to her.”

That’s it. He approached.

He went on to tell me that Indian guys he knows will often immediately disqualify themselves (for a variety of reasons) when they see a western girl they’re interested in. So they just won’t approach her. And obviously if they don’t approach, then they don’t get any dates.

Then I started casually asking women in my social circle if they’d ever been approached by (or dated) an Indian guy. Three women said yes. There were like three dozen that said no. Now obviously this is not some scientifically/statistically accurate measurement, but the general point seems clear. If you’re an Indian guy and you are interested in dating a western woman, you need to start approaching. If you’re disqualifying yourself for some reason, you need to stop.

BTW, if you’re wondering why my cousin’s boyfriend’s name is Tony, here’s why. It’s not his birth name. His birth name is something I can’t pronounce or spell. It’s a nickname he gave himself. He told me that as soon as he did that, he immediately saw improvement in his game with western girls. Why? He gave me two reasons. One, because the name Tony made him more relatable. Western girls grew up hearing the name Tony, which makes it familiar. Two, because it’s a totally unexpected name for him, which almost always makes the girl smile (due to it being unexpected) and is therefore a great conversation starter.

Give it a try. Approach some girls you would normally not approach and give yourself a nickname to start the conversation.

\---

The Definitive Dating Guide For Indian Men is now **FREE TO READ** with Kindle Unlimited at [amazon.com](https://www.amazon.com/Definitive-Dating-Guide-Indian-Men-ebook/dp/B07HFK4HZL/ref=sr_1_2?s=digital-text&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1538111781&amp;sr=1-2&amp;keywords=how+to+attract+women+talk+to+girls+have+a+conversation+flirt) , [amazon.co.uk](https://www.amazon.co.uk/Definitive-Dating-Guide-Indian-Men-ebook/dp/B07HFK4HZL/ref=sr_1_2?s=digital-text&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1538112008&amp;sr=1-2&amp;keywords=how+to+attract+women+talk+to+girls+have+a+conversation+flirt) or [amazon.in](https://www.amazon.in/Definitive-Dating-Guide-Indian-Men-ebook/dp/B07HFK4HZL/ref=sr_1_2?s=digital-text&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1538112060&amp;sr=1-2&amp;keywords=how+to+attract+women+talk+to+girls+have+a+conversation+flirt) ",seduction
18M needs advice on clubbing/partying/getting a girl,"I've never been to a club before (was invited to a couple of parties but turned them down, mainly because on both occasions the girls who were making the party invited me, and let's say they weren't my type), I have no fucking idea what I should be doing at a party/club in order to make out with a girl (at least).

Any advice is welcome, thanks :D",seduction
Things I've learnt so far in night game after 3 months working in a club,"Before i say anything just know I'm not a coach or anything still learning and struggling i just want to share things I've experienced after 3 months working in a club

OPENING SETS
-usually night game looks matter a lot for attraction especially dance floor game where you it's loud and can't really here the girl but you can still get girls even if you're ugly,just up your confidence or go infield and see what works for you
-before i used to open girls coming outta nowhere and boom ""hey"" i got a lot of rejections from this,my friend his a natural he puts himself in positions where he can open girls indirectly like on the dancefloor he doesn't just walk up to them and ask them to dance,he enjoys dancing by himself and just put his hand out to her and she comes in or at the bar just asking ""what's you drinking"",this got me good results
-on the dancefloor or a place with loud music i usually dance with the girl first or just pull out my phone write what i wanna say (OPENING THE SET Just getting the simple logistics name,where she stays,who she is with,school bla bla) and then isolate for comfort.
-if i isolate the girl usually for me its an indicator of interest and i try to escalate fast and go in for the kiss,since i know the club pretty well i can take her to a much more quiet place for a heavy make out session
-the most important thing tho is isolating the girl and leading 
-if you face resistance on isolating just ask her to to go to the bar for drinks ,once at the bar build and lil comfort then lead for further comfort
-some girls are pretty sexual and will open up to you easily ,isolate them fast cause they will leave you for the next dude",seduction
Can I approach at 16?,"although I haven't actually tried yet, I feel like I could be confident enough to approach a girl.

However, 2 things that I'm still on the fence about
1. Idk if its just what I find attractive but for some reason, I'm really shit at gauging how old a girl is and often I seem to find older girls more attractive (18/19) which is fairly normal but idk.
2. At 16, I'm not sure how willing girls to give out their number. would I be better off asking for her snapchat?
Also any tips and advice for a first time approacher would be appreciated thanks.

anyone in London know the best places to approach?",seduction
Everytime I get a girl's Snapchat,"We'll talk for a little. Then I'll randomly say ""we should hookup"" a few hours into the conversation.

They leave me on open. Every single time. So, I don't respond. If they don't block me when I ask them that, without fail they text me back a few hours later. Every single time.

Why is this? Just curious? Is it them testing me to see if I give a shit? (Cause I truly don't since I already have options.)",seduction
Critique my text game,"Little bit of back story. Just got back from a trip to the mountains with some friends. Met a mutual friend who I've had little contact with in the past. Current friend who also was there is an AFC - in love with this girl and she makes it clear she doesn't like him, but we're friends nonetheless. This girl is so into me on this trip - 

Girl - ""I have a secret that I need to have with you""
Me - ""what's that?""

She whispers as AFC passes by:
""Will you fuck me?""


Terrible ending - no sex. Kept escalating secretly from there, but without causing this guy to explode in anger and ruin the trip it just wasn't gonna happen.

We go back home from the trip.

Me - ""Come over tomorrow.""
Girl- ""are you having a party?"" (I've invited her to one house party in the past)
Me - ""Yeah make sure to bring the strawberries."" (Inside sexual joke from the trip)
Girl - ""Haha sounds like a great party""
Me - ""It's all we need. Bring enough for two desserts.""

No response after this (late at night) but the messages were coming in about every 10 min. 

Next day in the early PM.

Girl - ""Do you remember me licking your face 😂"" (I told her to make out with me at a bar during escalation. She was afriad bc AFC was around. She quickly went in for the kiss, and then I puckered up to a wet tongue from my bottom lip up to the base of my nose. Weird, but kinda hot.)
Me - ""It's in my top 7 face licks but you're in contention if you practice more.""
Girl - ""haha I didn't know it was a common occurrence for you.""
Me - ""how else do you think I screen my women. That and elbows.""
Girl - ""omg""

I didn't reply. Messages coming in during that time about 3-20 min each. 

Later that night she snapchats me. Sends a video with her cat trying to crawl between her legs from her POV. Could mean nothing, but an oddly sexual angle.
Her caption - ""not a tunnel system!"" (I should mention this was not on her story)
Me - ""but there's buried treasure!""
Her - ""😂😂😂""

My next move I'm questioning. I send her a text about 20 min later.

Me - ""Let's split a bottle of wine this week. You can tell me all your crazy cat lady stories.""
Girl - ""hahaha I haven't had her for long so I'm not quite at the crazy stage yet."" (Note - no response to the date)
Me - ""I think I found you."" (I send her a funny pic of a cat lady family photo)

No response. Late at night. Messages coming in every 3-10 minutes. First thing in the morning:

Girl - ""Goals 🙌""

Have not responded.

Please critique. I find it strange when I only get emojis as a response or short texts. Especially when she didn't mention the wine. I don't see enough investment from here. So I feel the best thing to do is hold off on texting and wait for her to text or snap. What do you do when you get low investment?",seduction
What to do when a girl looks at you or (How to pick up a girl at the bar),,seduction
Who Gets Laid? Funny Guy vs Serious Guy Comparison..,,seduction
I have a hard time finding girls interesting,Any advice on how to become more interested in a woman’s personal life?,seduction
There is a person who never forgets your birthday. Does this person like you or is this a game?,"So yeah there is a person who never forgets my birthday. Never! We know us from school. More than 4 years now. The person studies in a town a couple of hours away. We see us rarely. No, my birthday is not on facebook (dont have fb) or another social media platform. I keep my birthday a ""secret"" without telling people that I keep it a secret. Just a few people know my birthday. The person always remembers my birthday! This is somehow scary and crazy. When I think back I can't remember any ""signs"". Just the fact that the person was acting shy when I was around. Never had deep smalltalk We also chat or see us rarely since school. 

Does this mean something or is this person just nice? ",seduction
How should I approach my crush in class.,"Hey guy It’s been a month since I’ve been taking a class with a girl I used to stalk a little bit on twitter and I actually keep doing it. She is very attractive and I get very excited every time I get to see her in class. The first couple of days I used do sit by her side but but because I couldn’t think of anything worth saying to her, now I sit all across the room away from her to avoid anxiety. I haven’t said a word to her, other than a question I made to a group of people that she was in. I really want something good to happen but i still cant think of a good approach.. What you guys think I should do? Forget about her? If not, how should I give it a shot then?",seduction
Did Mystery Have Game?,,seduction
Gaming Asian girls,"I wanted to ask on tips about gaming Asian girls. I live near a pretty heavily Asian populated area, with a lot of cute Asian girls. They are a bit harder to read because usually they will be shy or are not into eye contact. Also is there a big difference on how you would approach an Asian-American girl and a foreign Asian?
Also from the few Asian (mostly Chinese) girls that I have dated they have been more colder than other types of girls, is this everyone’s experience?",seduction
Going out with a girl that wants to go as friends,"Now just to elaborate, we are both in high school grade 10 and we see eachother everyday at school. 
What i heard is sometimes women do this to get to know you better. I just want advice on how to get out of the friendzone.",seduction
So this community,"I was pretty put off when that chick posted on here a few days ago about being harrassed and tonnes of people basically said she didnt have a point and how she needed to get over it basically. Fuck off.

I am in this community because I love women and like to get to know them better sometimes sleep with them too. Not because i want to dominate them and i see them as fair game. I will post why i am acting like a whiteknight in the comments. But morale of the story you dont need to behave that way to get laid she is into you or she isnt, you are just terrifying some poor woman. That isnt confidence, that is a fragile ego rejecting her rejection, it is just harrassment.

Jesus christ guys what happened to making sure the girl had a good time too?",seduction
Approach Today – Or Your Leaving Your Life To Chance,"If you feel like there’s something missing from you’re life, you’re not alone. Everybody has some gap to fill. Everybody feels some void in their life. Society pounds those feelings into us as we constantly compare ourselves to everybody else and wish we had something more. 

There’s two ways to handle this. One is to be grateful for what you have already. The other is to get off your ass and go get the necessary things to start filling the void. Both ways work. You should use both. But the second way, especially when it comes to women, is much more fun. 

Most people coast through life waiting for something good to happen. They wait for that job promotion. They wait pats on the back.  They wait for that “perfect moment” when the “perfect woman” appears in the “perfect situation” and makes things super easy: like when some 10 approaches you to ask for directions and there just happens to be no one else around to hear you hit on her. Um…..if you wait for that “perfect situation” you’ll be waiting forever. And you’ll be leaving your life to chance. 

If you want to take control of your future; take control of your bedroom; start filling that void in your life, then you need to approach some girls. 

How about a date for this upcoming weekend? How would you feel if you had one? Or would you prefer to just sit on this subreddit Friday and Saturday night complaining?

Go out today and tomorrow and hit on some girls. Walk up to them and say whatever is easiest for you.

You can say:

\- Hey I just saw you and thought you were really cute and wanted to come say hi. 

\- Hey, excuse me, listen this makes me really nervous to do, but I thought you were really cute and I wanted to come say hi. 

\- Hey I just say you passing by and I thought ‘that’s a little troublemaker I want to know.’

\- Hey, excuse me, can you tell me where the nearest Starbucks is so I can take you over there right now for a latte. 

\- Hi, I’m John, I’m hitting on you right now. 

You can say any of those, or any other opening that you want or like. It doesn’t really matter what the opener is. If it’s honest and genuine, it’s better than standing there, sweating, nervous, and watching her walk by. 

Go read [Fuck It](https://www.reddit.com/r/seduction/comments/8h0pwh/fuck_it_the_magic_words_how_i_learned_to_approach/). Then go out there, say Fuck It.

Fuck it. Fuck it. Fuck it. Until you get a date for this weekend. 

Then come on the sub and tell everyone how you took control of your life. ",seduction
Leave her better than you found her,"I was just walking towards school today and was just chilling. As I was walking I saw a girl walking towards me. I just smile and look away just as usual. As we get closer she smiles and begins to blush. Now I thought why tf is this girl smiling at me and why is she blushing? Was it the new deodorant I just bought? Am I finally getting ripped from going to the gym every week? Have I suddenly become that good looking guy who doesn't need to try anymore? (lol) She breaks the silence, looks up while walking the opposite direction and says,"" Remember me!?"" with a huge smile. I was confused at first. Why is this random girl asking if I remembered her? Then I came to a quick realization. This was a girl I had approached a week before that had a bf. I remember when I approached her she had been genuinely thankful that I thought she was very attractive.

The lesson here is that no matter where you are or who you decide to talk to; leave them better than you found them. Whether that be with a girl you just met for 20 seconds or the relationship you've built over years. \*Learning to become a really good PUA means that you give value to everyone\*. You never know what situation or mood that the girl is in. I recall a post here a year ago about a guy getting his haircut by a girl who he thought was attractive. Months passed in between him and not making a move on this girl. He's in his head the whole time. He can't seem to get passed saying hello to this girl. Months pass in between haircuts. Then one day he comes in for a regular haircut and realized that the girl wasn't there anymore. After asking about her, her coworkers had a grim look on their face. She was experiencing a lot during that time and had just become a single mother. In the past few weeks she had decided to take it upon herself and end her life. Now other than showing that you've got the cajoneys to cold approach, this guy should've added value in a way that put a smile on her face even for a moment.

TLDR: On your journey, don't lose your humanity. Leave her better than you found her.",seduction
NYC - I do not speak English completely yet,Hello every one!!! Do you know someone who wants to sarge but speaks Spanish? in NYC. I just coming here from Argentina. And I don't know a lot of people. I know about the subject. I have made a lot of boarding in my country.,seduction
Is there some PUA community in New York city???,,seduction
"""why cant I get a girlfriend?""... This is the wrong way of thinking","I see so many guys on this sub asking how to get a girlfriend, or why they can't get one. If these are the types of questions you are asking, then you shouldn't be focusing on them. This isn't directed towards people who are constantly having ONS and just can't keep them emotionally. This is for the guys who have barely spoken to girls and yet, are asking how to get a girlfriend. 

Someone in your position should be bettering themselves. Be it lifting, eating right, confidence.

You should be just interacting with girls, guys, building social circles.

Why do you specifically want a girlfriend? Do you think the version of yourself is better when he has a girlfriend? What about a guy who has the confidence to talk to ANY girl? And have girls be wondering if YOU like them back. Learn to walk before you can run.",seduction
How to have more interesting conversations and ones that you enjoy having,"Instead of trying to come up with something that you think the other person would like to talk about, talk about something that you're interested in finding out about them. Like sometimes you ask the person a question about where they work or what their major is. Personally I don't really like the responses to those questions unless they have jobs that interest me or I think are cool. Like if they were a snake charmer, a botanist, a farmer, a chicken whisperer etc. I don't care about the work of a doctor or an engineer. So sometimes it's better to avoid that type of question until later on in the conversation when more rapport has been built. But again if you're not that interested in the job then there's no point going very in depth. Instead if you mostly like to talk about family, friends, experiences, art, technology, philosophy, social dynamics, social issues go for those topics. If you're interested in the topic then you'll be more interested in what the person has to talk about and plus you'll be more interesting. Also people know when you want to talk about something and when you're talking just for the sake of talking. Or asking questions just for the sake of asking them and trying to continue the conversation. Don't do that. Have a genuine conversation where both of you can actually make a connection and one that you can enjoy and find out things about the other person. ",seduction
When you match on Tinder with someone less than 1Km from you...,,seduction
"Dale Carnegie's Core Principles in ""How To Win Friends and Influence People"" are incredibly useful for everyday interactions with everyone. Try incorporating one of these each day.",,seduction
